Mike J Knifong sounds like a foolish remark 💩💩
Sheldon Satchel me!
Sheldon Satchel lol
Lori Shepard WHY????????????????.
Mike J Knifong sounds like a foolish remark 💩💩
Veronica James well you do realize that includes you as well Veronica...right?😏
Patty Coffey I left out the people that are slinging garbage on here.
God 500 comments on this comment
Carol Ramsay     Hate to disappoint...Dems are the party of the KKK!!!🦅🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🦅
Hi
Andrew Pepe the govt and Canada... you know because it wasnt even ours? F*&$*>< stupidity.
Who's with you? Russia, Putin, morons, racists, clueless libertarians, and mike pence. That's it.
Sheldon Satchel I'd rather use the dragon balls to bring Saddam Hussein and Osama Bin Laden back to life to run for president
Sheldon Satchel you have been conned along with all his idiot supporters. Congratulations, you played yourself
Sheldon Satchel many of us are with you .the wall Trump and us want to build is slinging all kind of garbage here . The ones who disagree are the ones who hate Trump. Bottom line. Not about the wall at all..hate  is bad.
Nancy D Heffron fake account? Its 9 years old dumbass
Sheldon Satchel  You are a proud American. I'm with you. TRUMP 2020.
Liar
https://twitter.com/Pontifex/status/1085860604664037376?s=20
Caleb Tello you must be watching fake news!
سوف يقع الجدار في النار
Ronald Binkley, Don't call me Honey first of all I'm NOT you're honey and secondly you could be a real Creep! Bc You're basically taking away someone else's right and that's against what our Country Stands for! Every American has a right to vote rather you like it or not. You're taking away there freedom.
And when YOU take  away someone else's  Freedom, it's called SLAVERY!
Linda Vera You've already said good bye to your freedom. You voted for Trump who is selling America off to Russia. You've already lost your freedom because you have to arm yourself against your fellow Americans and bolt yourself up in your house because you're guarding your 'stuff'. You've already lost your freedom because you live in gated communities and can't walk alone at night. America is not free and not brave. If you were, you would get that nutcase out of your White House and put in an adult.
He don't like yo black ass dummy wake up .
So NO,  YOU do NOT have that RIGHT!
Jean Lavoie Black people are just as susceptible to stupidity, advertising, subliminal influence as anyone else. You just have to learn to spot it for what it is. Unfortunately, republicans have never learned this which is why so many of them support Trump in spite of all the evidence of wrongdoing by his campaign team and Trump himself. You're fans, not thinkers.
Sheldon Satchel you should be called every name Tom.
Luis Arboleda You're unhinged buddy..you should probably quit posting before you embarrass yourself further..
Shelby Canada, Honey, your incorrect, please do your research.
https://www.fiverr.com/my_profile
Sean McDonough WHAT an idiot!
Deanita young, Thank God, it' takes more than 3 votes, to elect.
Jean Lavoie Black people are just as susceptible to stupidity, advertising, subliminal influence as anyone else. You just have to learn to spot it for what it is. Unfortunately, republicans have never learned this which is why so many of them support Trump in spite of all the evidence of wrongdoing by his campaign team and Trump himself. You're fans, not thinkers.
Luis Arboleda what a damn SHEEPLE. Believing all the DemonCrats lies. Say good bye to YOUR freedom and anything you own if you IDIOTS continue to vote Dem.  You'll be living......or NOT living like the people in Venezuela. It amazes me you Dems are THAT DAMN STUPID!!
Andrew Pepe, Hillary!
Luis Arboleda Wow.  you've really been drinking the kookaid!
https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2019/01/13/trump-putin-meetings-interpreter-notes/2565471002/
Sharon Taylor cause he is NOT a slave for the DemonCRats!
Shelby Canada you must not know a lot of black people.
Ruth Mosley What has he done that makes him a criminal?
It was the Republicans who fought to free blacks from slavery and amended the Constitution to grant blacks freedom (13th Amendment), citizenship (14th Amendment) and the right to vote (15th Amendment). Republicans passed the civil rights laws of the 1860s, including the Civil Rights Act of 1866 and the Reconstruction Act of 1867 that was designed to establish a new government system in the Democrat-controlled South, one that was fair to blacks. Republicans also started the NAACP and affirmative action with Republican President Richard Nixon’s 1969 Philadelphia Plan (crafted by black Republican Art Fletcher) that set the nation’s fist goals and timetables. Although affirmative action now has been turned by the Democrats into an unfair quota system, affirmative action was begun by Nixon to counter the harm caused to blacks when Democrat President Woodrow Wilson in 1912 kicked all of the blacks out of federal government jobs.
Sarah Elizabeth wow Yea YOU ARE a gullable ASSHOLE. 😂😂😂😂😂😂
Andrew Pepe  haha love it
Luis Arboleda Wow.  Did you get this info on Wikipedia?  Absurd and factually incorrect.  Nice try though.
Sheldon Satchel you joined as a Russian. Hang it up comrade. Does Moscow have a section called the Bronx?
During the civil rights era of the 1960s, Dr. King was fighting the Democrats who stood in the school house doors, turned skin-burning fire hoses on blacks and let loose vicious dogs. It was Republican President Dwight Eisenhower who pushed to pass the Civil Rights Act of 1957 and sent troops to Arkansas to desegregate schools. President Eisenhower also appointed Chief Justice Earl Warren to the U.S. Supreme Court, which resulted in the 1954 Brown v. Board of Education decision ending school segregation. Much is made of Democrat President Harry Truman’s issuing an Executive Order in 1948 to desegregate the military. Not mentioned is the fact that it was Eisenhower who actually took action to effectively end segregation in the military.
I remember when Hillary  was involved with Russia!
Shelby Canada why Republicans don't want to take down confederate monuments and hold dear to the confederacy? Those were southern democrats also known as Dixiecrats.
Veronica James please provide that as well.  Disagreeing with my opinion is not proof
Tony Perez you have proof of that?
Randall Pace yep!!
Shelby Canada Quit while you're ahead..I'd like to see your source that explains how MLK was a Republican
Sheldon Satchel... I will stand by your side without a hesitation! Trump has more support than the left side Liberal media leads us to believe.
Clayton Longfellow but he remembered how to human, how to American
Fernando Moura pray all you but they will be wasted prayers since I am not on food stamps or any entitlement program.  How very smug of you to ASSume that I was.
Nancy Harris you should know if you voted for Hillary
Shelby Canada Quit while you're ahead..I'd like to see your source that explains how MLK was a Republican
The Democratic Party  Created The KKK.  Klan violence worked to suppress black voting, and campaign seasons were deadly. More than 2,000 people were killed, wounded, or otherwise injured in Louisiana within a few weeks prior to the Presidential election of November 1868. Although St. Landry Parish had a registered Republican majority of 1,071, after the murders, no Republicans voted in the fall elections. White Democrats cast the full vote of the parish for President Grant's opponent. The KKK killed and wounded more than 200 black Republicans, hunting and chasing them through the woods. Thirteen captives were taken from jail and shot; a half-buried pile of 25 bodies was found in the woods. The KKK made people vote Democratic and gave them certificates of the fact.[67]
Gary Sallman I crack up at the words ‘assistance’ and ‘help’ coming from Democrats.  Rent hep...really?  Rent help is called a job which he has created more than 2mm.  Every point you try to make is a direct result of your party’s abhorrent policies.  Welcome to the Republican Party.
Only a mad minority.
Amy Lynn says the dumb white bitch.
Sheldon Satchel you and trump are both idiots. And you need to learn about punctuation!
Jackie Lewis yeah because hes a Republican yet are you saying dems are not patriotic?
Amy Lynn says the dumb white bitch.
Shelby Sutherland Aultman , I voted the same as late President Bush.  Check that out, I believe he knew from  experience how to vote wisely; and you ?
Sheldon Satchel I dont care who you vote for personally. You fb page though...
Deborah Molta Griffin,  Bc he doesn't need The  Democratic Party to Control  him Nor Speak for him!  People do have there own opinion, either Deal with it or F**k Off!
Shelby Canada you're a liar. You welcome those who believe the same as you do. That's it.
Sheila Lessing what does that matter when you have this?  "What you really need to do is go back in the ’30s, when they outlawed all types of drugs in Kansas (and) across the United States. What was the reason why they did that? One of the reasons why, I hate to say it, was that the African Americans, they were basically users and they basically responded the worst off to those drugs just because of their character makeup, their genetics, and that.  Alford’s comments referenced a belief promoted by marijuana prohibitionist Harry Anslinger, the founding commissioner of the Federal Bureau of Narcotics.  “Under Anslinger’s leadership, the FBN came to be considered responsible for the Marijuana Tax Act of 1937,” the report noted, “regulating cannabis and further taxing it to the ultimate detriment of the hemp industry that was booming at the time.”  “Reefer makes darkies think they’re as good as white men,” Anslinger said once when explaining why marijuana supposedly caused crime and violence. The commissioner also fought for the prohibition of cannabis due to “its effect on the degenerate races.” "  https://www.patheos.com/blogs/progressivesecularhumanist/2018/01/gop-lawmaker-blacks-cant-handle-marijuana-genetics/?utm_medium=social&utm_source=share_bar&fbclid=IwAR1a0r6zt3lIAcIO4el5QMMrUbkxjQcIiXmhb0VqxyrhcukaAC1GqunkSjM#ZL0Xf6bLCtu2GRhH.01
Sheila Lessing  That was proven to be a fake quote.  It came from a Meme out of Russia.  Do much fact checking?
Terri Pryde,  Bc he can... He does have his  own Voice and Opinion, bc He's NOT controlled by you're Party!
Sheila Lessing what does that matter when you have this?  "What you really need to do is go back in the ’30s, when they outlawed all types of drugs in Kansas (and) across the United States. What was the reason why they did that? One of the reasons why, I hate to say it, was that the African Americans, they were basically users and they basically responded the worst off to those drugs just because of their character makeup, their genetics, and that.  Alford’s comments referenced a belief promoted by marijuana prohibitionist Harry Anslinger, the founding commissioner of the Federal Bureau of Narcotics.  “Under Anslinger’s leadership, the FBN came to be considered responsible for the Marijuana Tax Act of 1937,” the report noted, “regulating cannabis and further taxing it to the ultimate detriment of the hemp industry that was booming at the time.”  “Reefer makes darkies think they’re as good as white men,” Anslinger said once when explaining why marijuana supposedly caused crime and violence. The commissioner also fought for the prohibition of cannabis due to “its effect on the degenerate races.” "  https://www.patheos.com/blogs/progressivesecularhumanist/2018/01/gop-lawmaker-blacks-cant-handle-marijuana-genetics/?utm_medium=social&utm_source=share_bar&fbclid=IwAR1a0r6zt3lIAcIO4el5QMMrUbkxjQcIiXmhb0VqxyrhcukaAC1GqunkSjM#ZL0Xf6bLCtu2GRhH.01
Mike Harper sorry for your issues
No ones with you, Trumpturd is an incompetent fool and he’s a Russian stooge!  #TraitorTrumo
A black man voting for Trump is like a virgin voting for rape.
Grace Mendoza Ehm You need serious medical help!  You are delusional!
Sheldon Satchel dumbazz troll
David Lloyd King, Now we have proof that it's NOT Trump who HATES but you're Party and Hillary are The Hateful bunch! Trump supporters welcome everyone unlike YOU Liberals!
Aaron Gondek  Just bc he has a different  opinion doesn't make him Fake!  Get a F Life, Low life Scum!
Shelby Canada why they voting Republican today? And why Republican claim heritage to confederate monuments?
Sheldon Satchel I'll gladly stand with you sir. TY 🇺🇸

John Bentley Border Patrol will be watching, won't be pretty
Mike Harper yes these are all the things O’bummer did. Pos
Sharon Taylor because he is not and idiot and don’t drink the kool aid.
Michel McDougal the insanity of some people, I do not understand!!! Yeah your ex was cra cra!!!
Shelby Canada why they voting Republican today? And why Republican claim heritage to confederate monuments?
Because you are a fake profile. Lol REPORTED.
Mike J Knifong Where's your proof?
I sure am.  Thank you.
Michel McDougal the insanity of some people, I do not understand!!! Yeah your ex was cra cra!!!
Gary Cave I'm free to call your b.s.
Laurette Reiff you are such an angry idiot.
Should not the democrats be in favor of the monuments?
Laurette Reiff is just a childish ignoramus.
Xenia Shust so...
I sure am.  Thank you.
Shelby Canada you said democrats had slaves so they had the monuments too right?
Mike J Knifong that’s such an ignorant comment 💩💩💩this is what’s coming out of your mouth
Randall Pace don’t need I did not and wouldn’t support Obama anyway LOL
Xenia Shust so...
Perfect
Michel McDougal. LET Her walk. I no longer associate with any Vile Lib Dem socialist Communists. F EM.
Randall Pace  I NEVER said that.  Don't put words into  My Mouth!
Jeannie Hill , Finally every Vile Hypocritical Dem came out of the closet.  Openly Embracing socialism MARXISM AND COMMUNISM.  While supporting And Electing to the House of Representives Sworn in on Qurans and Arabic Shariah Islam Tists wives who Kill Gays Transgenders Lesbians their own daughters wives and children and women of all races.  Dems also hate hard working educated Non Shariah Islamists who support Capitalism Freedom and America.
Sheldon Satchel you deserve it...
Mike J Knifong you're ignorant
Shelby Canada so you have no problem taking down confederate monuments?
Tony Perez
Farobag Homi Cooper Spoken like a true Luciferian.

The Liberals work for  illegals, NOT America  Nor Americans! Plus Hillary had connections to The Russians! 😂😂😂😂
Boris Nikolayev is a russia troll
Jonathan Landry, Why bc he can think for himself without being forced by You Democratic Slaves!
Sheldon Satchel and that is so sad.  I have many black friends that done me the same way.  Beyond color, really what do people see positive that the Democrats are doing??  I respect you for having your own voice.
The Democratic Party of SLAVES...   The Federalist Party and the Democratic Party were united in their goal of building up the United States by conquest and genocide. Both agreed that the U.S. would come to rule the continent of North America by taking land from Mexico and from the Native Americans. They wanted the state to use the army to clear new territories for expansion. The Democratic Party candidate Andrew Jackson was elected in 1828. His first action was to support the “Indian Removal Act” which was passed in 1830. Under Jackson and the next Democratic Party President, Martin Van Buren, 70,000 Indians east of the Mississippi were terrorized and driven out of their lands by the military. In 1845 Democratic Party President James Polk took the United States into a war with Mexico to acquire the territory from Texas to California. That summer, in a leading Democratic political magazine, the editor John O’Sullivan proclaimed that it was the U.S.’s “manifest destiny to overspread the continent…” In other words, it is the so-called God-given right of the United States to dominate the continent of North America by force.
Veronica James nonsense brainless
Robert Viramontes go back home.
Sheldon Satchel what has he promised you? Trump is a fake
Sheldon, I call you smart, open minded and able to think for yourself.
Robert Viramontes You need to do some homework!
Sheldon Satchel  No thanks. GOOD LUCK
I'm still Working and Getting  Paid. Don't know what y'all  are B**ching about! Lol 😂😂😂😂😂😂
Potus just talked about Iran's failed launch of what could be an ICBM. Iran probably wants its own "spy satelite" but that could not be all: We know the Iranian Ayatollahs do want nukes: The Shah already had a nuke program. The Shah even admitted that in an interview and explained: "Iran is a Great Power. Why should UK and France have nukes but not Iran?". We also know that the Shia Ayatollahs have great hate for the Wahabist Saudi's (as for the State of Israel and the USA). A Saudi official did warn Iran in the past: "If Iran gets nukes, we already bought them from our friend Pakistan". Pakistan certainly has nukes but probably not these Intercontinental Ballistic Missiles. Iran and Saudi do have missiles (Russian, Chinese ?) that can strike each other, possibly also Israel but not ICBMs (yet). Then we also have in our history books the argument of Mao against MAD: Chairman Mao said that he could win a real nuke war with the Sowjets (who had betrayed the real communist Stalin) because, that was Mao's sincere argument, more Chinese would survive than Russians. The Russians absolutely believed Mao was telling what he felt and feared him, also because Mao had no hesitations at all to attack Sowjet troops near the Amoer and Oessoeri rivers. The Ayatollah Khomeiny is not only seen as the True Imam, the legal heir of the True Imams Ali and Husseyn who were betrayed by these "wicked Suni heretics", but also as the Mahdi: the returned Prophet of the Apocalypse.
Smart move
Sheldon Satchel haaaaaa
Sheldon Satchel, you forgot how to black
Bill Ciszkowski ,no I believe you've won that award. And it for the human race.
Sheldon Satchel , you can see clearly what is happening in our country. Pray the veil will be lifted and all people will see the left's corruption before it is too late !!! Stand up people !! Stand behind this President !!!  The ones ridiculing you needs to read what President Trump has done for the people in just two years and what the left has not done in the last 50 years !
Yep
Kenneth McIntyre not hardly
Bill Ciszkowski ,no I believe you've won that award. And it for the human race.
Love Hillary Hates!
Mary Moogk sorry for you being an idiot .. I think your village is looking for you
Barbara Beth Miller definitely not definitely
Gary Sallman you are dumb!
Roy Oswald seriously, are these kind of comments necessary? Just because someone has a different view than you.
Sheldon Satchel   👍👏👏🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
John Gardner stupid comment
Sarah Elizabeth Uncle tom was a good guy dumbass
Bryan Davis lol
Sheldon Satchel troll alert!
Sheldon Satchel we're with you, brother. I'm a Mexican who voted for Trump and will do so again in 2020. Let the ignorant haters hate.
James Darren Ratcliff because the other choices, so far, are a woman who claims to be black but is actually Native American/Jamaican, a man who can’t keep his hands off young women, a woman who already lost the presidency once and seems to have severe health issues AND Trump is actually doing a good job for America
Veronica James you would be incorrect
Bill Ciszkowski you’re a moron and a disgrace to humanity
Ron Racheletta know that from experience, do you?
Fernando Moura you’re praying for someone to die?
Ruth Mosley unfortunately your grasp of English explains your intelligence factor in all things
Elle Richelle, Racists POS.
I was until he went anti gun.
Nav Moh sadly you’re a follower not a leader.  Break free from the stereotype
Laurette Reiff is there a reason that come on President Trump’s page daily? Don’t get me wrong it’s great entertainment!
Shuaib Adamu Jimira and your an idiot.
Edward Nicholson that’s your problem, you ASSumed
Rebecca Higgins Meisner you talk to much jackass
Ruth Mosley, Sry but Trump's NOT going anywhere just bc he hurt you're poor lil feelings it doesn't incall for impeachment. Now if you do succeed in impeaching him it will be bc YOU have broken our Laws to do so. So if I were you I'd prepare for a War if he does. Bc there are abunch of Patriotic Americans who will be P***ed bc were getting tired of all the PC BULLSH*T. Plus the campaign promises becomes a lie when it comes to the Dems. Plus YOU Libtards choose illegals over Anerica and Americans.
Sarah Elizabeth how about you use your head and think for yourself just like Sheldon does.  Ignorant fool.
Nick Birkin stupid limey
Ron Liptack oh that’s cute! Do you fee like a real man now? Lol.
Sean McDonough thank you for alerting us to your status .. we now know not to take you seriously
Edward Nicholson that’s your problem, you ASSumed
Sheldon Satchel God bless you sir!
Nancy D Heffron I knew one you libtards would say that...you guys never disappoint!!😃
Nancy D Heffron fake American
Me me me!!
Sheldon Satchel you are the most stupid black person I know! Donald J. Trump is a slave master and you are kissing his ass.. you are one of those...
Chris Crisis Campbell as if trump can control who does and doesn't support him. The fact that you can't see through the manipulation tells me you really shouldn't even have the right to an opinion much less a vote.
Sheldon Satchel a high five for you and there are many people that are right there with you. President Trump is a blessing, just what America needed after having to deal with political jerks that are not defending our country but instead have been helping the people that are being fought by our soldiers and their being killed by equipment being left for the enemy to use to against America. And the Dumocrats keep putting people into position jobs to fight the only person that has our best interest at heart. Stop using our tax payers money to finance illegals, it's not okay with us, what the hell is wrong with you idiots. We're tired of what is taking place so we have to fight for our rights because we sure can't count on the governors that are getting into offices that I know I for one would never have voted for, you started this now we citizens with sense will have to take you on morons.
Gary Seebold how do you know so much about blacks?
Mary Moogk your a very ugly person, and so is your family.
Barbara Beth Miller more importantly, damn your ugly!!
Sheldon Satchel you are the most stupid black person I know! Donald J. Trump is a slave master and you are kissing his ass.. you are one of those...
Nick Brizzi  Until the police show up
Bill Ciszkowski dude you are white. You make me sick moron.
Shelby Canada  Who does the KKK support right now

Horace Pinker are you mad that I could read and you can't. All you got to do is sound it out. Have fun working IN HELL
Barbara Beth Miller more importantly, damn your ugly!!
Pam Sanders Jackson Let’s all pray to Jesus Christ that HE will take Trump to Heaven during his sleep! MAGA 🇺🇸
Sharon Taylor why not?
Sheldon Satchel African Americans living in poverty with no jobs, So what do we have to lose,  slaves 400 years with no reparations and you Europeans are reaping the benefits from my ancestors.... if someone attack the u.s, why should us black people living poverty with no jobs help you Europeans\ white Americans  that's reaping the benefits from my ancestors... I realize when any other country threatens the US they go directly for Europeans the white man, no other nationality only the Europeans white man, why is this?
Horace Pinker are you mad that I could read and you can't. All you got to do is sound it out. Have fun working IN HELL
Patsy Cramer and I pray to Jesus Christ  my Lord to take him to Heaven during his sleep! Amen
Dean Gabos .... and this coming from Gabos, a recent Honduran refugee!🤣🤣🤣
Jewell Jenkins yet you fools call other people bigots. Idiot
Sheldon Satchel... thank you...
Idiot.
Max Salgado grow up
People are stupid.
Laurette Reiff looney
Sheldon Satchel mental retardation sees no color
Rob W Itherspoon ,praying for you all
Can devil be reformed?
Jewell Jenkins yet you fools call other people bigots. Idiot
Sarah Elizabeth Cracker
Ron Liptack GROW UP
Moise Luc stfu
Can devil be reformed?
Sheldon Satchel  Not everybody wants to leave the plantation.
Sheldon Satchel me
Sheldon Satchel blacks for whites you dumb as hell
Sheldon Satchel you a fool to vote for him
Ron Racheletta why, because he voted for the best person possible
Sheldon Satchel  I don't see color brother only intelligence 😉
https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/clemson-invite-michelin-starred-restaurant_us_5c405e68e4b027c3bbbe566b
See look at how The Libtards treat Blacks who don't agree with them. There Proof that they hate on Blacks who don't agree with them!
True American sure their with you I'm with voting for president trump 2020 America great....
Sheldon Satchel I assume you don't mean yourself or the nation any good
Sheldon Satchel Crack is wack uncle tom 😉
Laurette Reiff how many times did u edit you're dumb post.  girl please hypocrite
Sheldon Satchel stay strong Sheldon...nobody gets to define you!!
All americans. Thank you Sheldon. Trump is the President America needs to keep America safe and great!
Sheldon..the Lord was cricified too..!
Sheldon Satchel fake account
Uncle Tom would be the most accurate
Uncle Tom would be the most accurate
Rod Novoa just like your mama huh rod
null and void our thriving economy, bring back Isis, send our vets from Korean war back, and I guess kim jong un should fire missles again , null and void the new trade deal , I could go on but you get the point. you may dislike our GREAT PRESIDENT, but please do not make pathetic and ignorant remarks, but if you truly feel this way maybe you should leave this GREAT COUNTRY.
David Dennison
Rod Novoa DUMB@$$ Keep drinking the kool-aid... TROLL.. sissy boy
Rod Novoa,Really did you not feel that way when Obama was in office giving all the tax payers money to overseas?
Rod Novoa How is this a fraud?
I'm just waiting for it to be legal to shoot people like you.
Rod Novoa what a stupid, ignorant, and uneducated post!!
Laurie Dunco so you just sit there looking (and sounding) stupid as you make stuff up?  Lol
Josh Gr Russia what.
Rod Novoa grow up and quit whining
You need to be executed for treason.
Donna Davis Takes one to know one.
Rod Novoa your a CNN washed ANTI AMERICAN fool that trolls all darkness!
Josh Gr Russia what.
Rod Novoa... really ??? On what ground , you dumbass !!
- Rod Novoa , sure, dream on. That’s the problem we got with people like you who cannot solve any national problem and cannot see they live in a country which is not socialist country such as Cuba or Russia rather live in a country which is called capitalism. If not Trump then who? Obama? Hillary? Come on be real and don’t insult Americans intelligent an IQ. Be grateful that you got someone like trump. Lists the things you don’t like about Trump so people can see your point of you. And please read what you’re about to post before posting it. Fraud !! You think Trump election was a fraud ??? And Congress, Senate, Justice Department, FBI, Homeland security, etc. so all these agencies saw what you saw and they didn’t do anything about it !! Aren’t you a genius!!
Moron

Rod Novoa dude save your breath. You're going to need it to blow up your girlfriend later
Rod Novoa You’re just stupid aren’t you?
Lorrie Tracy  Rod Novoa is one of those aoc douche bags that wants free free free while sitting on his ass doing nothing.
●●●●●  ROD NOVOA  STOP TROLLING, GET A LIFE!  YOU'RE BLINDED BY YOUR HATE AGAINST OUR PRESIDENT!  YOU'RE SO JEALOUS OF HIS GREAT ACHIEVEMENTS THAT YOU CAN NEVER DO IN YOUR LIFETIME FOR AMERICA AND FOR ALL AMERICANS!    SHUT UP AND GO AWAY!  AMERICA DOESN'T NEED NEGATIVE PEOPLE (LIKE YOU) WHO NEVER ACKNOWLEDGE PRES. TRUMP'S GOOD WORKS FOR ALL AMERICANS  ---  (FREE OF CHARGE, NO PAY!  "GRATIS ET AMORE DEI" WHICH MEANS "BY THE GRACE AND AND LOVE OF GOD"!)!  BUT, YOUR FAVORITE CORRUPT OBAMA KEEPS ASKING TO RAISE HIS PENSION!  SHAME ON HIM! HE'S THE WORST PRESIDENT EVER IN U.S. HISTORY!  HIS LEGACY IS RIDICULOUSLY DISGUSTING!  INGRATE! ! !
Rod Novoa sounds like something a Venezuelan would say about 20 yrs ago!
Rod Novoa go back to slobbing on knobs you're just another snowflake we don't care what you say thank you don't like it leave the country
The "Nation State" cannot be taken lightly. Main worry for Brexit and the British Government is "the falling apart of the United Kingdom". We already heard lots of Brits politicians talking about "the Scottish Nation".. "The Welsh..the Irish.. do not accept this".
Rod Novoa Looks like you’re a fraud, from seeing your....work!! Cheap line of clothing lol!
Thats true when it comes to every single politicians who were lobbied ergo jews
Not true for donald though
BUt I take your point

Rod Novoa  we wish liberals kept their promises and moved to Canada but here we are and life isn’t fair.
😂
What about all the people who voted him in?
Sucking the Globalist off won't help you, there agenda 21 is world depopulation from 6-7B to 500M. Trump and Brexit are both massive 🖕 to the satanic elite
I hope that united states of america be peace
Please explain to us in detail how this presidency is a fraud.  Give us some evidence to back up your claim.
Rod Novoa Dude, I love the pics of half naked women on your Profile and the cool pic of you at the beach with no shirt on. Dude, you are sooooo cool!!!!! 😂😂😂. You’re such a hipster Douche. You personify what a hipster douche is 😂😂😂🙄🙄🙄
Laurie Dunco THIS...
Josh Gr why you worrying about the USA when you are not even a citizen,
Rod Novoa typical liberal. Going off at the mouth about Trump with nothing to back it up. If you are so smart Rod, give us one law that it has been proven Trump broke that warrants impeachment. If you can’t provide that than SHUT THE FU@K UP YOU PUSSY SNOWFLAKE!
Rod Novoa kinda like your post there asswipe!!!
Laurie Dunco THIS...
Joel Nash...God bless you
Katherine Ricciotti Ooh I know he can’t. All he can do is the same bs everyone else like him does. Spew bulkshit cnn rhetoric because they think they have some fact behind it cause it was on tv.
You shouldn't listen to fake news it will make you say stupid things.
Give him a diapper that has the name Pelosi or Schumer on. But seriously Rod need urgent medication, he is suffering from TDS infection. A disease that when you change your thinking to Democrats, it can affect you within few minutes😂
Chip Hughes was almost 6$ here😐
Katherine Ricciotti Ooh I know he can’t. All he can do is the same bs everyone else like him does. Spew bulkshit cnn rhetoric because they think they have some fact behind it cause it was on tv.
Rod Novoa your an idiot
Only people that don't like trump illegal aliens and their families, anyone losing their food stamps and have to go to work...
Rod Novoa your an idiot
I DO BELIEVE YOU ARE A FRAUD...TROLL   But I see you are a New Yorker,,,so I guess that's why you're so deranged...poor guy.
Rod Novoa why
Rod Novoa  Trump 2020 re-elect that motherf--er.
Almost 4 million jobs created since election.  More Americans are now employed than ever recorded before in our history.  We have created more than 400,000 manufacturing jobs since my election.  Manufacturing jobs growing at the fastest rate in more than THREE DECADES.  Economic growth last quarter hit 4.2 percent.  New unemployment claims recently hit a 49-year low.  Median household income has hit highest level ever recorded.  African-American unemployment has recently achieved the lowest rate ever recorded.  Hispanic-American unemployment is at the lowest rate ever recorded.  Asian-American unemployment recently achieved the lowest rate ever recorded.  Women’s unemployment recently reached the lowest rate in 65 years.  Youth unemployment has recently hit the lowest rate in nearly half a century.  Lowest unemployment rate ever recorded for Americans without a high school diploma.  Under Trump's Administration, veterans’ unemployment recently reached its lowest rate in nearly 20 years.  Almost 3.9 million Americans have been lifted off food stamps since the election.  The Pledge to America’s Workers has resulted in employers committing to train more than 4 million Americans. We are committed to VOCATIONAL education.  95 percent of U.S. manufacturers are optimistic about the future—the highest ever.  Retail sales surged last month, up another 6 percent over last year.  Signed the biggest package of tax cuts and reforms in history. After tax cuts, over $300 billion poured back in to the U.S. in the first quarter alone.  As a result of our tax bill, small businesses will have the lowest top marginal tax rate in more than 80 years.  Helped win U.S. bid for the 2028 Summer Olympics in Los Angeles.  Helped win U.S.-Mexico-Canada’s united bid for 2026 World Cup.  Opened ANWR and approved Keystone XL and Dakota Access Pipelines.  Record number of regulations eliminated.  Enacted regulatory relief for community banks and credit unions.  Obamacare individual mandate penalty GONE.  Trump Administration is providing more affordable healthcare options for Americans through association health plans and short-term duration plans.  Last month, the FDA approved more affordable generic drugs than ever before in history. And thanks to our efforts, many drug companies are freezing or reversing planned price increases.  We reformed the Medicare program to stop hospitals from overcharging low-income seniors on their drugs—saving seniors hundreds of millions of dollars this year alone.  Signed Right-To-Try legislation.  Secured $6 billion in NEW funding to fight the opioid epidemic.  We have reduced high-dose opioid prescriptions by 16 percent during my first year in office.  Signed VA Choice Act and VA Accountability Act, expanded VA telehealth services, walk-in-clinics, and same-day urgent primary and mental health care.  Increased our coal exports by 60 percent; U.S. oil production recently reached all-time high.  United States is a net natural gas exporter for the first time since 1957.  Withdrew the United States from the job-killing Paris Climate Accord.  Cancelled the illegal, anti-coal, so-called Clean Power Plan.  Secured record $700 billion in military funding; $716 billion next year.  NATO allies are spending $69 billion more on defense since 2016.  Process has begun to make the Space Force the 6th branch of the Armed Forces.  Confirmed more circuit court judges than any other new administration.  Confirmed Supreme Court Justice Neil Gorsuch and nominated Judge Brett Kavanaugh.  Withdrew from the horrible, one-sided Iran Deal.  Moved U.S. Embassy to Jerusalem.  Protecting Americans from terrorists with the Travel Ban, upheld by Supreme Court.  Issued Executive Order to keep open Guantanamo Bay.  Concluded a historic U.S.-Mexico Trade Deal to replace NAFTA. And negotiations with Canada are underway as we speak.  Reached a breakthrough agreement with the E.U. to increase U.S. exports.  Imposed tariffs on foreign steel and aluminum to protect our national security.  Imposed tariffs on China in response to China’s forced technology transfer, intellectual property theft, and their chronically abusive trade practices.  Net exports are on track to increase by $59 billion this year.  Improved vetting and screening for refugees, and switched focus to overseas resettlement.  We have begun BUILDING THE WALL. Republicans want STRONG BORDERS and NO CRIME. ~The White House
Rod Novoa Of course you say that you’re from New York. Lip Tarde.
Josh Gr worry about your own leader cupcake.
Ruth Mosley you’re gross. You might like that, don’t assume others do
James Kenney   Wind Bag
Sarah Knutson,...hardly.  The world is coming to the realization that what Trump says makes sense.   Had to #WalkAway
That’s interesting because Brazil just voted in Bolsonaro as President, a man nicknamed “Brazil’s Trump.”  You gotta be pretty damn dumb to think “the whole world is laughing at Trump.”
Josh Gr worry about your own leader cupcake.
Oh ok, kNUTson. You're the laughing stock of Edmonton, Alberta :)
Tony Perez, your next crisis is trying to figure how to get over that wall.  LOL
That’s interesting because Brazil just voted in Bolsonaro as President, a man nicknamed “Brazil’s Trump.”  You gotta be pretty damn dumb to think “the whole world is laughing at Trump.”
Tony Perez are you a kook . Not going to happen
Sarah Knutson if your talking about our President take your head out of your ass and don’t be astounded. He is making them pay their fair share . They are crying not laughing. You as a pathetic little American don’t understand that.
Sarah Knutson
Sarah Knutson please read my reply again. Maybe you will learn something.
Randy Johnson The uneducated garbage is really old. Evidently you don't know many educated people. There are plenty who support him because they don't like the thought of communism.
Victor Bare 👍👏😉 I would like to copy that.
Facebook said that it had identified two disinformation campaigns originating from #Russia — including one tied to an agency controlled by the Kremlin. The company said it deleted nearly 500 pages and accounts that had posted the misleading messages.-https://www.nytimes.com/2019/01/17/business/facebook-misinformation-russia.html
Kingsley Medland like they don’t speak German?😂
Eva-joy de Lestenac a chubby Canadian kid who has rich parents
And she is a Canadian.
If he is such a joke then why do so many countries want to make a deal with him?  The joke is on the Democratic Party. This is the first time in a long time our country looks and feels strong. The weak spots in our country are in the Democratic Party.  They care more about their political party than they do this country. We are all seeing clearly each and every day. Schumer, Pelosi and Warren will hand the election to President Trump because they hate him so bad they get nothing done.  Voters are watching them and laughing. Like Warren drinking a beer is going to get the Southern vote... That was pretty lame.
Especially in Canada but id like to see all the out of works still support him :p
Sarah Knutson you have to be a citizen here to have any validity on what you comment. Bye 👋🏻
Alexander James oh I'm sorry. Are we going back centuries or staying current? You go and read some books  soft lad...id say start with some history..id actually start with European as you have so little of your own.
Not really.
Sarah Knutson BS...us 61 million are laughing at you
Not really.
Rudy Giuliani says Trump didn't collude with Russia but can't say if campaign aides did  (CNN) Rudy Giuliani said Wednesday that he never denied President Donald Trump's campaign colluded with the Russian government during the 2016 campaign, only that the President himself was not involved in collusion.  In an interview with CNN's Chris Cuomo on "Cuomo Prime Time," Giuliani, a former New York mayor and Trump's attorney, said he doesn't know if other people in the campaign, including former campaign chairman Paul Manafort, were working with the Kremlin during the 2016 presidential race.  "I never said there was no collusion between the campaign, or people in the campaign," Giuliani said.  He added, "I said the President of the United States. There is not a single bit of evidence the President of the United States committed the only crime you can commit here, conspiring with the Russians to hack the DNC."
Sarah Knutson Please..can you think for yourself??  What has Trump done that you hate him so much?
Diane Miller hahaha you really think that?
Sarah Knutson what world do you live in...the world of fake news?
https://www-m.cnn.com/2019/01/16/politics/pence-isis-defeated/index.html?r=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.google.com%2F  Haven't heard from ISIS?
Sarah Knutson easy to judge from the outside
Kingsley Medland And European meddling hasn't messed up the world in general?
Mik Pell they never moved to Canada 😢
Sarah Knutson easy to judge from the outside
Sarah, that's because you have the most basic idea of life wrong.  You say on your FB page that you believe in the basic goodness of people. You are young and havent got a grip on reality yet.  All leftists look at the world this way.  People are not all good.  Unfortunately many are evil.  That's why we need conservatives to do the work of protecting.  Your effeminate leftist men can't protect anything while wearing a dress.  Don't worry tho.  You've got men down here in the US protecting that chunk of ice you call Canada.
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Jonathan Schremp poor walnut
https://www.facebook.com/photo.php?fbid=10217680344856468&set=a.1116241702314&type=3&theater

Jonathan Schremp  Speaking of defense-Trump’s choice of lawyers was bad. He would have been better off with Frito Pendejo.
Jonathan Schremp AMEN!
Jonathan Schremp God does not bless satan
Jonathan Schremp  do you think it’s strange that Trump didn’t get the wall funded over the last two years when the GOP controlled all 3 branches of the government? Now that he lost the House, now it’s a crisis. Don’t you think that is strange?

Henry Durban  you have a great day too!
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Jonathan Schremp God don't bless Corrupt Criminals Bigotic stupid Morons Kidnapper Racists KKK Members and Traitors Liars Bigotic Morons Pussy Grabber and Cheater and Bone Spurse  Proof : Read Bible Low Minded Trumpee  Unbelivable what naive uneducated Brainless People live in USA
Jonathan Schremp phuck trump
Jonathan Schremp God knows he's a lying, hypocritical, greedy, dumb ass.
Which god are you thanking???
yea hopefully god blesses you so you don't get sent to hell....
William French wow, I hope you never need God because this is honestly the best thing you can say to a person, trust me I know all too well. God bless America and God bless President Trump!!!!
KEEP PRAYING TOGETHER  One Nation under God. Prayers, Praises & Faith. May God protect and guide our President! MAGA 2020
Jonathan Schremp is that the pure white god
#trumplies
Henry Durban  you have a great day too!
#Russia's state TV reports that for the first time since 2014, the US is lifting sanctions from Russian companies [#Deripaska's Rusal et al.] The host laughs out loud about the Democrats not getting enough votes to block the effort, expresses hope that this is just the beginning.
....McConnell, Graham, Romney, Cornyn, Burr, Cruz, Johnson and Thur's photo's are shown as though they were heroes - they are traitors.
Jonathan Schremp something wrong with you
Jonathan Schremp   Can you people find a little something more original to say than God Bless Donald Trump. That seems as though it’s about all you people have to say.  Find some reason why God shou
Jonathan Schremp ameen
Jonathan Schremp https://www.facebook.com/219730435104566/posts/561409630936643/
Meredith Bogue They make medicine for your problem..........Preparation "H"
Thomas Fico von Holt Your countries doing well I see........loser............
#trumplies
Thomas Fico von Holt Your countries doing well I see........loser............
William French I'll repeat ,  Preparation "H"  use it liberally, it's gonna be a long 6 more years for you losers................
Lorrie Tracy, once again, English please.
Liberalism is a disease, treated as such!
Joseph Mellone right on
Joseph Mellone you must like children a lot
Ellen Baskin your family profile picture is the reason why family members shouldn’t get married to each other and have offspring!   You disgusting 🐖
Paul Burton whatever from the mouth of a gay- bald Peewee Herman- could possibly not be true?
Paul Burton  whats on your DD214?
William French I'll repeat ,  Preparation "H"  use it liberally, it's gonna be a long 6 more years for you losers................
Joseph Mellone your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go
Joseph Mellone You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress.
Meredith Bogue your stupidity doesn’t even warrant a response. You clearly are the dumbest person on this thread and that’s pretty dumb! Congrats
Paul Burton  whats on your DD214?
Joseph Mellone you must have a paycheck coming in.

Joseph Mellone  Donny is sealing his fate as a one-term president!  Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is his cost-ineffective wall.  Donny needs to agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so his shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
Lorrie Tracy obama was 6 when war finished ,
Meredith Bogue your stupidity doesn’t even warrant a response. You clearly are the dumbest person on this thread and that’s pretty dumb! Congrats
Lorrie Tracy, English please
Roy Norwood, America's Last Line Of Defense is a liberal troll satire page, dummy, lmao!
Paul Burton Obama said he was a proud Muslim and is great friends with Farrakhan!! Farrakhan is a hateful bigot Muslim!! Look up the picture with them both in it. The man who toke the picture was told not to release it or something bad would happen. He only released it after Obama left office!#Walkaway
Lorrie Tracy obama was 6 when war finished ,
Paul Burton Obama said he was a proud Muslim and is great friends with Farrakhan!! Farrakhan is a hateful bigot Muslim!! Look up the picture with them both in it. The man who toke the picture was told not to release it or something bad would happen. He only released it after Obama left office!#Walkaway
Paul Burton sounds like you are
Meredith Bogue he makes America richer. It's an investment I. Our future not foreigners
Yea that's all you selfish people care about money and yourselves. As long as you're wealthy no one else matters. Just forget about the imprisoned kids who were taken away from the families and all the families that were seperated in general. We are all humans. We all have feelings. Who cares where we come from. And some of you need to do your history lessons because we are all foreigners the only real "Americans" are the native americans who were here first. Thank you
Maria Lopez we care, just come here under due process and Support America. We really don't care where a person comes from, however we do care that they come here to join America not to change it suit their ways.
Maria Lopez Not even one of your friends say ,you are smart
Mary Lewis me too, he's a real leader and loves our country!
Elisa Farina DiCarlo I hope you enjoy #MAGA2020 when #BestPresidentInYourLifeTime is still your President
Paul Howard crackhead
Paul Howard Amen !
Paul Burton sounds like you are
"F*** Donald Trump yea F*** Donald Trump" 😂😂 best song ever made
Paul Howard Amen !
Sheila Lessing  🖕🏼
Ramon Soto Vice??? ROFLMAO. Yep that’s a reputable source 😂😂😂😂😂
Anne Crossway  not even close
Dean Rosser. Thanks man.  You're so wise to have said that.
Paul Howard stunod
Paul Howard You support him at the expense of our nation.
Paul Howard yea best as in the the best russian asset ever place in the peoples  house! Treasonous
Paul Howard LIE. Biggest crook and liar of a president in our history. Illegitimate president. Russia Russia Russia
Joe Salvatore Carollo Demmocomunists seath with hatred for #TheBestPresidentInOurLifeTime I can't wait till #MAGA2020 becomes their new reality! Thank You Mr. President!
Paul Howard  He’s married to an illegal. Which of the criteria for the Einstein Visa did she meet??  🤔 https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/EB-1_visaen.wikipedia.org
Paul Howard I feel bad for you people who inherently hate Democrats. You inherently hate over half the country you live in. So much so that your willing to say this person is the best president of your lifetime. Better then Regan? Better then Bill Clinton.. the last President to actually balance our budget? You should quit listening to the likes of Rush Limbaugh and Sean Hannity, they have poisoned your mind against our own country.
Paul Howard, hahahahahaha!
Paul Howard https://www.theatlantic.com/ideas/archive/2019/01/trump-the-toddler-wants-a-wall/580021/

Paul Howard your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go
Paul Howard your just a dumb ass with a dumb ass comment
Stephen Pierson  U R A F*ING Communist!
I think it's hilarious all you people are calling Paul delusional it's you liberals and democrats you people are delusional ones take a good look in the fucken mirror it would do yourselves a big favor to Just shut the fuckup

Stephen Pierson, based on your fb and all the trump on it, you need help. Like it or not, hes your president and hes doing a damn good job. No president is perfect, but one that genuinely cares about America is a nice change of pace!
You all think they get paid weekly, you are fools, they get paid once a year.
James Kenney ya he's a billionaire that's can't add lol
Stephen Pierson, based on your fb and all the trump on it, you need help. Like it or not, hes your president and hes doing a damn good job. No president is perfect, but one that genuinely cares about America is a nice change of pace!
I TOTALLY AGREE. AND THEIR STAFF TOO.
Addy Means Elizabeth Warren gave hers up! To a refugee/ asylum seeker foundation but she did give it up. SMH Right after she said Trump's shut down is keeping 800,000 Americans from being paid so I am donating my paycheck to illegals! OK how does that help Americans not getting paid??  They have lost their minds, or they have never really been heard before.
James Kenney please know facts before posting. Trump's father gave him $1 million which he turned into $4 billion.  No flunky.   He is one of the most elite entrepreneurs in US history and an amazing negotiator.  Art of the deal -playing out for us since he stepped into the WH
Kathleen Scott their salary from Congress is nothing compared to the money they get from their corrupt doing with lobbyists.
Addy Means how are Dems greedy when the Republicans are the ones that are trying to give rich people tax breaks and you're only believe in helping yourselves where as Democrats are trying to help everybody Republicans believe in self-preservation they don't care about anybody else y'all are the greedy ones
Robert White protect us from what??!! In the last two years the largest most violent attack was by an American to Americans!!! What happened to the “scary immigrants “ that were on their way to rape and pillage prior to November elections??? Crickets... because as usual trump uses alternative facts and fear to rally people like yourself on board. Investigate on your own and then chime in trump has enough parrots within the senate!!
Barf
Robert White poor walnut
Robert White he is a strong man. I would have cracked long ago. I am grateful that he stands his ground. He makes me proud to be an American.
sociopaths dont crack so he is not strong at all
Did you start the bonfire to burn the books yet?
Build that wall....
Addy Means how are Dems greedy when the Republicans are the ones that are trying to give rich people tax breaks and you're only believe in helping yourselves where as Democrats are trying to help everybody Republicans believe in self-preservation they don't care about anybody else y'all are the greedy ones
Robert White You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress.
Why don't you get a real job!
Robert, first uncage the kids.
Robert White are you really that stupid or you  just play stupid  on fb? Its not a theory #sillytrumptard
Florence Karfeld who knows best you or the border patrol that has their boots on the ground or maybe you know more than Mark Morgan who was the head of Border Patrol under Obama because he too says we need a wall.
The border patrols are with the democratic party. We do not need a wall. New radio power will take care of it. See what is happen down under.  Let us take care of the caged children.
Martha Pickens then not now.
Fake account. Rusdian bot!
Build that wall....
Robert White it’s bullshit.
Comrade Veronica seems confused.    Trump is Russia’s bitch, they are paying to help him.    Putin doesn’t want his cock holster out of the Oval Office.
Anne Crossway you obviously don’t know the full spectrum of the word security. I suggest joining the military and learning 😂🤣 It’s called a deterrent. It’s not an end all solution, only part of the whole package (barrier, cameras, more personnel, equipment, etc...).  Democrats were all for a wall/barrier/fencing before, the ONLY reason they’re against it now is because of President Trump 🤷🏻‍♂️ The President can literally come out with the cure to cancer and the Dems would be against it 😂🤣 The President has and is still willing to compromise, like he did with DACA, and the Dems aren’t..... But isn’t that what our government is supposed to be, a compromise amongst a group of people? But the Dems don’t need to compromise?? Go back to the pastures with the rest of the sheep 🐑 😂🤣
Climate change? On what do you base your fears on? Al Gore’s so called Science? The same science that can’t predict what the weather is going to be tomorrow? Or the same science that doesn’t acknowledge humans begin life at conception?
Robert White your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go go
Robert White meanwhile tsa workers not getting paid and not doing their job properly. Yeah, that makes tons of sense.
Fake account. Rusdian bot!
Robert White dumbasses everywhere lol
Veronica Torres hispano lambeculo
Robert White agree
You know why the Russians helped get their operative elected President?  So they could destroy the U.S from the inside!  Because of trump's tariffs the Russians are prospering!  They are now supplying China  instead of us and our farmers are on Government welfare!   Did trump and family ever bring THEIR businesses to the USA?  NO, THEY ARE ALL STILL IN CHINA and other Asian countries!  But it's OK NONE of them are included in the tariffs!
Robert White meanwhile tsa workers not getting paid and not doing their job properly. Yeah, that makes tons of sense.
You know why the Russians helped get their operative elected President?  So they could destroy the U.S from the inside!  Because of trump's tariffs the Russians are prospering!  They are now supplying China  instead of us and our farmers are on Government welfare!   Did trump and family ever bring THEIR businesses to the USA?  NO, THEY ARE ALL STILL IN CHINA and other Asian countries!  But it's OK NONE of them are included in the tariffs!
Troll, doesn't know a thing about American politics.
Bill Westerlind more fake news
Cheryl A Flood I know I dont like fat girls
Build that wall Mr President. Only true patriotic American people understand its importance. God bless America.
Veronica Torres nice shill account.
After we do build that wall next will be term LIMITS. Poor Nancy and Charlie will have to get a job. Not steal from real Americans.
Too bad Putin is a really the one in control
Kim Karauss its happening tomorrow
And u know this how?
Robert White Obama created policy that protected Americans from 5 most dangerous countries. Trump opened the boarder to them. Obama created policy to modernize the wall. Trump caged babies. Never forget 9-11 16 terrorists were Saudi. They were Saudi trained. They were Saudi financed. ZERO were Mexican. Zero arrived from Mexico. Zero would have been stopped by a idiotic wall! This man tRump and his son-in-law just sold $billion weapons to the only people, the Saudis, who've attacked America. Trump and GOP just allowed the Saudi Prince to murder and dismember Khashoggi. Makes you think.
Dave Boyer Executive Order,  dump as Trump
Dave Boyer  impeachment  just do it already!
Dave Boyer I see you done understand the way our government functions or our Constitution. 😂😂 I suppose your lack of knowledge comes in handy supporting Trump, though.
Dave Boyer if he does it he will win a free ticket to impeachment!
Lucky Barry Collins why?
Y all is 🐑
Dave Boyer 5 photos no friends fake account reported
He needs the budget
And u know this how?
So you're telling me that after all the bullshit about Obama bringing Sharia Law to America, you'd be okay with Trump declaring martial law over something as pointless as a border wall?
Dave Boyer why ? Like trump don’t Like hearing that you’re all stupid ?
Veronica Torres fool
Bill Miller youncantbargue with ignorance
I don't know Him Much Let Him do the right thing.
Dave Boyer  He needs an excuse so he can say “I have no choice”. Lyin Donnie has neither the wit nor the stones to just say it.....after all if the buck stops with all of us, and 2/3rds of the country doesn’t want the Wall...why is Lyin Donnie pushing it? Tillerson was right
He needs the budget
Dave Boyer calls like this, to bybass the Constitution of the United States are inappropriate.
Dave Boyer Donny is sealing his fate as a one-term president!  Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is his cost-ineffective wall.  Donny needs to agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so his shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
No comrade Dave, here in this country we don’t allow the tyrant president to do end runs around congress.    We call that a coup, and we execute people for it.
Worley Michael comrade. I served my country. Did u?
Dave Boyer your president needs you Immediatly Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go
I still can’t get over this part: Michael Cohen paid the tech company for its campaign-related work with nearly $50,000 of CASH STUFFED IN A BAG.  Classic mob move.🙄
Dave Boyer let's get this out of the way.yes I served.my country in vietnam.you complained about immigrants running up hospital bills,well my friend it's the drinks and druggies.that don't have health insurance and run up our premiums.the.reason why Obama's bill mandated all Americans to obtain insurance.deadbeats without insurance use the emergency room as a doctor.
Dave Boyer  He needs an excuse so he can say “I have no choice”. Lyin Donnie has neither the wit nor the stones to just say it.....after all if the buck stops with all of us, and 2/3rds of the country doesn’t want the Wall...why is Lyin Donnie pushing it? Tillerson was right

Ruth Mosley r u
Dave Boyer , hey dumb ass, Congress can overturn an executive order. If he vetoes, Congress needes 2/3 votes to override his veto. Get educated before you open your pie hole.
Dave Boyer let's get this out of the way.yes I served.my country in vietnam.you complained about immigrants running up hospital bills,well my friend it's the drinks and druggies.that don't have health insurance and run up our premiums.the.reason why Obama's bill mandated all Americans to obtain insurance.deadbeats without insurance use the emergency room as a doctor.
Dave Boyer timing is everything
Dave Boyer  can’t, just like his Muslim ban
Dave Boyer , the hospital uses tax write offs on nonpayment of bills. You probably didn't deserve a raise.
Dave Boyer 😂🤣😅🤣
Dave Boyer  can’t, just like his Muslim ban
Veronica Torres you're braindead.
Mark Hack But what are you saying, that there AREN'T 17 investigations into Orange? Coz i tell you, there really ARE... https://www.wired.com/story/mueller-investigation-trump-russia-complete-guide/
Jeremy Stephens I would guarantee every bit of your hate for him comes from liberal media outlets and their lies. Who has proven what wrong?? You don't want to debate because a brick could prove you to be a imbecile.
Jennifer Myers very untrue
Ha if only it were true that's just a bunch of bs
Nancy Pelosi.
Veronica Torres you're braindead.
Mark Hack anything not spoken by trump or conservative Talking Heads is a lie according to trump brainwashed cult followers!
Kathy A Norton and how many of those lies have they publicly corrected or have been sued for?  " if they're real and really matter there would be court documents "  like we see for CNN and many other liberal media outlets like the one you're using as a source. 😂
Kathy A Norton i like real facts. PRO TIP: media headlines are not facts...
Kathy A Norton why do you keep defecting and not posting the stories you say are out there? you keep trying to change the topic when called out to prove something. 😂
i can hear your google humming... 😂💯
Mike Lee Limmer how many test have NK done since 2016?
Mark Hack Apart from THAT, it's common knowledge Hannity and Orange have a night call where they make up their daily "news" for you to gobble up... BTW they're BOTH  under several investigations... https://www.thedailybeast.com/report-trump-and-hannity-have-a-bedtime-phone-call-most-nights
Mark Hack And those "conversations" he had with the OTHER lunatic were just a photo-op, a handshake to appease his ego... Coz in reality he was PLAYED, BIGLY! https://www.theguardian.com/world/2018/dec/06/north-korea-secret-missile-site-upgrades-satellite-images
Nancy Pelosi.
April Foster lmaooo u and ur misinformation. Obama #DID want to have dialogue with him. Lmaoooo its funny ppl praised trump for talking to him, but when President obama tried he was condemned. U all are hypocrites https://www.cnn.com/videos/politics/2018/06/12/fox-news-obama-trump-coverage.cnn
Yall are all over the place with this 🤦
Mark Hack And those "conversations" he had with the OTHER lunatic were just a photo-op, a handshake to appease his ego... Coz in reality he was PLAYED, BIGLY! https://www.theguardian.com/world/2018/dec/06/north-korea-secret-missile-site-upgrades-satellite-images
Jennifer Myers  Get a job Commie and enjoy the benefits of OUR Great President, you're a commie obviously.
Jeremy Stephens From leftist communist is what he saved this country from.  Old elitist and idiot ghetto queens are the only democrat base...all communist
Kathy A Norton yeah, let's take data from a biased anti-trump network that has been busted for lying many times.   love your logic and source of facts. they match up well. :)
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
Mario Salerno yeah, Russia!
Kathy A Norton did you forget hillary started that mess?
Mario Salerno yeah, Russia!
Americans are loved around the world!!! Stand strong and keep turning around the country. No excuses as Trump is a real estate developer. Most of fixing a country rests in its infrastructure. No better person to fix the issues and to secure the border.
Ruth, fix your own country where you all allowed for the Jews to get wiped out and you are talking about us Americans?   Get a grip you Jew killer, your country allowed people to be wiped out and YOU SAID NOTHING, AND YOU COME ON OUR THREAD AND TELL US WHOM TO LIKE AND WHAT TO DO?  OH HELL NO LADY GFY WITH A SIZE12 DILDO FRANKLY YOU FREAKING HYPOCRITE
Janice Bradford, Right! I will be watching for this fake and she will be exposed every single time. Always for Trump!!
he needs to keep saying it until congress stops obstructing what common sense tells us we need.
The calling of names is disgusting, immature and non-productive.  some of you people need to seriously grow up.
Phyllis Haberkamp Did you hear Marko Rubio?  Nancy Pelosi expects him to unconditionally surrender to her every desire of resisting everything he wants.
Americans are loved around the world!!! Stand strong and keep turning around the country. No excuses as Trump is a real estate developer. Most of fixing a country rests in its infrastructure. No better person to fix the issues and to secure the border.
Janice Bradford Who are you to tell other Americans to leave "our" country? Because I have another opinion? Well, it looks like you have a mental problem.
Rick Voss Hahaha 82%, still waiting for your proof.
Peggy McGinnis What's a "Zazi" sweetie? I see you deleted your other comment. Criticize others but can't take any criticism hahaha.
Phyllis Haberkamp Did you hear Marko Rubio?  Nancy Pelosi expects him to unconditionally surrender to her every desire of resisting everything he wants.
Lynda Birch Jeffs So when border patrol says we need a wall, then that's the majority? Please give me a break and who told you that I am NOT from "here"?
Ruth Mosley I'm blocking you you're not American and you're on here to argue and shove your stupid on us! You are apparently on heavy medication not talking to you your delusional we don't need people like you in America period. Blocked!
Casey Voigt what’s meme?
He needs to post it 57 more times.
Ruth Mosley the number of states Trump won and the number of electoral college votes he received can be found on google.
Ruth Mosley, You miserable foreign troll. Fake!! You're  comments matter none.  Nazi German troll!!!!
Lynda Birch Jeffs So when border patrol says we need a wall, then that's the majority? Please give me a break and who told you that I am NOT from "here"?
Casey Voigt lol
Ruth Mosley, You miserable foreign troll. Fake!! You're  comments matter none.  Nazi German troll!!!!
Christopher Goodwin! YOU ARE REAL IDIOT.
Casey Voigt ok goat fucker
Terry Clark If you have nothing to say but want to say something, play the Obama, Hillary or Soros card. This is old crab Terry!
Rick Voss Hahaha where did you get that number from. The majority of Americans do NOT want the wall.
Casey Voigt why do you care! Just delete it if you don’t like it!
Casey Voigt  Americans who care about our country are re posting it 😂😂😂 ❤️🇺🇸🙏🎚
I think I will re post this every day just for you😂😂
Casey Voigt 58 Cat Kisser......
Casey Voigt  then why comment! You dems are so passive aggressive!
Terry Clark If you have nothing to say but want to say something, play the Obama, Hillary or Soros card. This is old crab Terry!
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
Ron Liptack enjoy the next SIX years Ronnie. TRUMP2020!   KAG!
I hope trumps punishment for treason is public hanging on pay per view... Use the money to build him a wall
Dan Sawyer Just skip over it. Don't continue being a dumbbutt
Casey Voigt  then why comment! You dems are so passive aggressive!
You've trolled 57 times.Chill out snowflake...
Trump got 27% of registered voters last time .  Won on electoral college ... He won't win again... If he lives that long
Denise Foot that poor kid
You've trolled 57 times.Chill out snowflake...
Denise Foot that poor kid
James Kenney And where do ILLEGALS fit into your delusional List ??!!!
James Kenney WOW...You really are DELUSIONAL..Hope you are Wealthy or soon you will be on the DOLE like the ILLEGALS !!!!..It amazes me that you can't see that the CORRUPT DEMS want a One World Order will CONTROL of us all, and while they get RICH we will be told what , how, when we can do ANYTHING....Take a look at Venezuela DUMBASS !!!
James Kenney And now BLOCKED...Bye Bye
Cheryl Steffen I rest my case.
I'd love to have a president who can spell :(
Putting our country first????
Loveda Whinerz  true voice of the democrat party.
Cheryl Steffen I rest my case.
Ha!Ha! Corrupt and evil! Wow. If democrats are corrupt and evil, what is isis?
Hes not even deporting them hes giving out work visas. Thousands per day. Suckas
Webster you didn't finish the verse, "but I found no one".
I used to joke that the best evidence the President is not an asset of the Russians is that his policies have been so pro-Russian that even the Russians would tell him, "slow down, you're being too obvious.”  But the damage done to our security is no joke, and demands an answer.
Cheryl Steffen You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress.
Loveda Whinerz  true voice of the democrat party.
Cheryl Steffen You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress.
Mary Lou Baker Looks like you need the grammar check not me !!!!
Oscar Carter and even they agree that a 26 billion dollar war is NOT the,answer
Oscar Carter and who are you to say he's wrong.
If your God blesses a self-described "pussy-grabber" and an adulterer, then your god is not in heaven but in hell.
daddy issues isues or a Russian we want to know what is it help us understand your confusing
Lea Callahan god bless and grab em by the pussy
Stephen Pierson He doesn't bless traitors with potty mouths either.
Heads down!! Incoming liberal bullshit!!!!
For what?
Mary Lou Baker Looks like you need the grammar check not me !!!!
#Russia's state TV—which was previously more than happy to exclaim "Trump is ours"— now nervously attempts to refute the idea he is an agent of the Kremlin. Russia's foreign minister Sergey Lavrov complains about the lack of leaks in the Mueller investigation. They smell trouble.
Lea Callahan you're as big of a joke as your "president"
Karar Reh Ab Get the ;hell out of here STFU
Benjamin Barnes Another dumb ass spewing crap he knows nothing about atleast dont make it so obvious STFU
Loren Michaels Sorry honey  like it or not he is your President to so get over  yourself
Dwaine Berbohm he's Putin's President not POTUS for any citizen
Loren Michaels Trump's brainwashed following are pathetic.
For what?
Peace be upon the Commander of the Believers Ali bin Abi Talib (peace and blessings of Allaah be upon him)
Border security is not the same thing as a wall.
Worley Michael how is that logical when a barrier will limit areas for entry..so yes a barrier is part of border security..even border agents have said many times there needs to be a barrier along the border..and these agents are at these borders everyday..they know what they need..you think you know more on what's needed than these agents working on the border
Donald Trump is the ANTI-CHRIST.  His only God is MONEY.
Lea Callahan your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go go
Lea Callahan  So dumb
Lea Callahan God replies: Lea, read Psalm 109:8

Lea Callahan  Putin / trump MRGA Make Russia Great Again 😡😡😡😡😡
Here‘s just some of the crimes committed by illegals in a six month period in Texas,  take into account this doesn’t include all the crimes where the illegal perp wasn’t caught and only includes those that were already in a database.  It is DISGUSTING the level of crime you demofilth have allowed in this country.  You are a bunch of damn traitors.      https://www.dps.texas.gov/administration/crime_records/pages/txcriminalalienstatistics.htm
Denise Foot I'm not wallowing in lies from anyone. YOu are naïve. I know exactly what's been going on in California for decades. I don't need anyone to tell me that.  I don't have to "read" anything about what I said either.  The previous governor Jerry Brown and the new one, Gaven Newsom do nothing but ruin California and if you can't see that , then maybe you should go there and learn a few things.  I don't need Donald Trump or anyone else but the people who actually live it in that state to tell me what those stupid politicians have allowed for over 30 years. My statements are true. YOU are naïve.  And don't call me a fool when you obviously know much of nothing about the situation in California. Take a trip and get outside of your own comfort zone, lady. Try learning real things and talk to real people.  YOur term "vanity wall" is a media term.  Don't you have your own words?
Denise Foot I didn't go only by what Trump said. Can't you research anything? You just laugh at everything instead.  There's 700 miles of border wall/fence already there!  Are you totally ignorant or what?  They have been repairing sections and replacing some too. Nancy Pelosi said it when she tried to deny it!  She said...."no new wall is being built, they are repairing sections of what's there and replacing some."   REPLACING some!  You are out of touch and think that laughing at things is rational.
Joani Pakula you should provide some data which demonstrates that there is a security crisis at our southern border. After you realize that the evidence doesn't support that crisis rhetoric,  you should think critically about the true nature of this demand for a wall (campaign gimmick) and the fact that there was bipartisan legislation passed by the Republican Congress that Trump refused to sign - after he said he would,  which shut down the government.    Is it rational to support and believe a well known liar?  Is it rational to blame Democrats for a shutdown that Trump promised if he didn't get what he wanted?
Lea Callahan  Putin / trump MRGA Make Russia Great Again 😡😡😡😡😡
Denise Foot another ignorant liberal POS!!!

There's no crisis at the border now, but it's coming in groves!!! Get the wall built now!!!

Joani Pakula you should provide some data which demonstrates that there is a security crisis at our southern border. After you realize that the evidence doesn't support that crisis rhetoric,  you should think critically about the true nature of this demand for a wall (campaign gimmick) and the fact that there was bipartisan legislation passed by the Republican Congress that Trump refused to sign - after he said he would,  which shut down the government.    Is it rational to support and believe a well known liar?  Is it rational to blame Democrats for a shutdown that Trump promised if he didn't get what he wanted?
Another retard dem...
denise.. naivete is only charming in very small children hon. Go on and go to work now.
DEMS ARE IMMORAL!
Denise Foot Those aren't lies.  You don't get out much or know many people?  Immigration has been a problem for decades. Illegal migration is created by politicians and always has been. It's a huge problem.   All that California governor is going to have is slave labor and wealthy people and an overpopulation of poor people.  Ever see the homeless situation in southern California?
Lee Broniszewski sure. Want to make a comment about your beloved liar in chief?
Thomas Evans why not consider the fact that Trump is a liar and conman?
Denise Foot liar.
Jul Cox why?  You clearly ignore facts to support the man under investigation for talking and behaving like a Russian asset.
Greg Felsing quit believing a liar and conman.
Kristen Schmitz no that's all the dumbacrats and their followers take it all in and believe whatever the dumbacrats want them to believe.
Talk to the border agents -- they will tell you what they need and they said they need the barrier.
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Greg Gray you might look at the data rather than relyingon someone's 'word'.
You are a fool.  You think lies are truth and that truths are lies.  I am very thankful that the majority of people in our great country are not as foolish as you are.
facts are the enemy of the truth....keep your foot out of your mouth before running off at the mouth dick head...
More fool than foot
Get your dumb ass down to the border and look for yourself...idiot
Eh, let's leave her alone.  It's painfully obvious that Denise here is just a washed up, out of touch crusty old bag.  She probably doesn't get much attention in real life so she trolls the internet to get her daily dose of human interaction.  Yes, it is pathetic, but also a very real and growing trend amongst the lonely and socially depraived.
Get your dumb ass down to the border and look for yourself...idiot
I'll take the border patrol's word over CNN.
Robbie girl, you wouldn't know a communist if Lenin himself asked you out for a date.
Trump Organization’s Use of Foreign-Worker Visas Reaches 10-Year High: TPM  Despite President Trump’s anti-immigration rhetoric, it appears that the Trump Organization has been using foreign workers at a higher rate than ever before, Talking Points Memo reports. The organization requested and received at least 192 visas for foreign workers in 2018—the highest for the company going back to at least 2008, according to Department of Labor data. The Trump Organization received an average of 116 visas per year in the decade prior to 2018, according to American Bridge, a Democratic research group. Review of the data revealed that the visas were almost entirely for the type of low-skilled foreign workers that Trump has claimed drive down American wages. Cooks, servers, housekeepers, and farmworkers make up a large chunk of the Trump Organization’s requests, most of them making between $10 and $15 hourly. The largest number of the Trump Organization’s foreign-worker visas in 2018 went to his Mar-a-Lago property in Palm Beach, Florida. Last year, the resort received 78 temporary foreign-worker visas last year for waiters, cooks, and maids.  DailyBeast
Judy Goebel Donny is sealing his fate as a one-term president!  Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is his cost-ineffective wall.  Donny needs to agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so his shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
I'll take the border patrol's word over CNN.
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
I think it's time Judy goes to a retirement home. She clearly has Alzheimer's.... js
Judy Goebel Let us all pray to Jesus Christ Our Lord to take Trump to Heaven,Amen!
Judy Goebel you are thanking a man who stopped the pay and pay for 800,000 government employees and forces thousands of critical air traffic controllers to work unpaid. How do you sleep at night condoning such self centered evil?
Judy Goebel , your right about hanging in there....the noose is tightening.
Jennifer Myers you and what army? The traitors are the Dumbocrats/liberal/socialist/communists! You must be one!
Bill Miller How do you sleep at night being a communist!
Judy Goebel Donny is sealing his fate as a one-term president!  Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is his cost-ineffective wall.  Donny needs to agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so his shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
Lol
Judy Goebel goebbel
Bill Miller How do you sleep at night being a communist!
Judy Goebel goebbel
Beverly Hurst Smith wimpy a*# republicans wouldn’t do their job! WIMPS WIMPS WIMPS ..that’s why it didn’t get done! Repubs are Dems in disguise
Lol true my health insure is higher now than 2 years ago and can’t afford a new house anymore 😪
LMAO, damn but the half of you need to get your heads out of your hateful asses
Rich Williams retard
Lol
Steve Imbresci what happen to "the best negotiator" "no one better"?
Beverly Hurst Smith idiot
Kathy A Norton thats difficult when one side dousnt want to do anything the other does hardly
Rich Williams retard
Tony Perez troll
Charlie Daboub and what did your rising star occassional-cortex say they were?? Oh yeah, president, house and Senate.. lol 😀..
Beverly Hurst Smith ???
Jack Gatty trolls just hear what they want to hear. Fake news.
he didn't have the support of the republican party.......dodo............and any bill they produced was full of pork barrel, that's your answer...
Tony Perez What would he go to prison for? Hes done nothing illegal.

Cally Schneider BS, ditz. Apparently, you can't even read the comments here or didn't bother.
Rich Williams you spelled Hillary wrong
Beverly Hurst Smith BINGO. He and the GOP didn’t do anything because the didn’t want the fallout. All of this crisis stuff and shutdown stuff is for Trumps base. It could have already been funded and in progress by now. THEY HAD ALL THREE BRANCHES OF GOVERNMENT.
Congress is like a herd of cats. Have you ever tried herding cats?
Beverly Hurst Smith liberalism is definitely a mental disorder sister.
Victor Bare the wall would cost at least $50 billion to complete.
Frank Lapinski Ever heard of the Caucus Room conspiracy? You can blame your own party for the current climate of obstruction.
Kathy Lee the platform was Mexico was going to pay for it and you sheep probably thought that was going to happen. Damn sheep everywhere
Raul Sanchez Sometimes it's better to say nothing than to embarrass yourself.
Typical reply from a blind liberal! Sit down!
Florence Lake you can say that again.... I do hate him.
We still needed Democratic votes when we had the Congress and Senate.
Beverly Hurst Smith more than any other president in history in his first 2 years maybe... get a clue.
Beverly Hurst Smith not a damn thing
Beverly Hurst Smith idiot
Joshua de Perrodil and just what was that???
It's ok if you don't understand politics just don't spew your stupidity around
Go on get   quit bugging
Utterly stupid comment Beverly. Proof you’re a leftist moron.
Further, none of us can change yesterday. It's today and tomorrow we must deal with. Build it now, and take away the magnets.
Joshua de Perrodil and just what was that???
He didn't have the votes. Republicans want the illegals for cheap labor and Democrats want them for votes and to set this country on a path to Marxist / socialism..
Further, none of us can change yesterday. It's today and tomorrow we must deal with. Build it now, and take away the magnets.
Sarah Elizabeth had the house. Most votes in Senate require 60 votes. He only had 51. Want to try again.
He saved us by undoing all the bs Obama did
He saved us by undoing all the bs Obama did
Rob Jandl you need the lego. You sound like a child.
Logan Storey Happy birthday! Now go build a wall make sure it’s around yourself though
Paul Burton Learn how to spell! LMAO!
Nadine Weber, do YOU live at the border that you can honestly say "how bad it is"? Seriously! You live in NEBRASKA!!   You people are caught up in hysteria for something that doesn't even AFFECT you. This "border crisis" was created by the man in the White House to deflect from the fact he has RUSSIAN CONNECTIONS!
Sally Gillespie Bailey YES!  And pay me Coast Guard son for doing his job.  Every.  Single.  Day.
Sally Gillespie Bailey Starving border guards are in no way corruptible, and fully attentive.
China Marie Elam your comment was so fkn stupid everyone in here is slightly dumber for having read it.
Paul Burton Learn how to spell! LMAO!
Stephen Lee I think the air lines should pay TSA
Barbara Sowa They are effective......the ones at work.  Have you not seen the news?
Tom DeGregorio What a Jerk you are!
Nadine Weber no threat there just people travelling to and from work. I spent the last three years traveling around that area for work when I lived in Merced California.
China Marie Elam your comment was so fkn stupid everyone in here is slightly dumber for having read it.
Sally Gillespie Bailey I hope you get gang raped by 6 illegals, then they rob and kill your family lol
Nadine Weber no threat there just people travelling to and from work. I spent the last three years traveling around that area for work when I lived in Merced California.
Sally Gillespie Bailey not going to work sweetie. You'll have to try harder.
God has nothing to do with this devil 👿
Michael Mont Pas there is no god😂😂😂😂😂😂
god has never heard of trump
Michael Mont Pas your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go
no she doesn't love trump the fat baby man
Sally Gillespie Bailey not going to work sweetie. You'll have to try harder.
Communists have no respect for Christians around the world or for the Western World and frame the West for their evil agenda.
ALLAH ZALİMLERİ SEVMEZ BU ADAM ZALİM...
no she doesn't love trump the fat baby man
ALLAH ZALİMLERİ SEVMEZ BU ADAM ZALİM...
The best way to end this shutdown is for TSA to go on a nationwide strike tomorrow morning so Congress cannot leave and millions of Americans get severely inconvenienced. Since the GOP cannot empathize with the common working person, pain is what they must experience.
Bobby Wilson a lot of people here want a wall for border security but couldn’t care less if terrorists board planes and commit acts of terror. Damn hypocrites
Bobby Wilson. 5.7 billion please!
Bobby Wilson they will get back pay. Meanwhile I would like to get my community back, so I want border security.
Bobby Wilson fund the wall like you agreed to over the years then the president will open the govt.
Communists have no respect for Christians around the world or for the Western World and frame the West for their evil agenda.
Kevin Lake how about you run your ignorant ass to my Coast Guard unit and tell my 42 member of an armed service that didn’t receive their paycheck to move along cupcake.... DM for the address and you better bring your big boy pants..cupcake...
Bobby Wilson stop whining
Bobby Wilson: Looks like having a government job is not so luxurious after all and has its drawbacks.  Government jobs are the #1 biggest expense this country has and is the very reason our country is in such a deficit.  Converting us from a 'Republic For Which It Stands", to a never ending bloating Democracy Big Government has proven to be a disaster of which I am saddened to see that your just beginning to experience.  Our Founding Forefathers gave us a Republic not a Democracy!  They warned us, "If You Can Keep It".
So ... our elected leaders have reached the point where they are semi-openly acknowledging that they are entirely powerless to reopen the government and need a deus ex machina -- people outraged at airport lines -- in order to have any hope of returning things to "normal."
Excellent Brandon Rayelina Sutton, he owns it. So he shouldn't cave if he's the one causing it. Congrats, you just defended him.
Bobby Wilson keep them closed as long as it takes. Build the wall.
Bobby Wilson seems to me, the democrats won't meet with our president and negotiate...dude, call Nancy and Chuck.
Bobby Wilson seems to me, the democrats won't meet with our president and negotiate...dude, call Nancy and Chuck.
T-Mobile announced a merger needing Trump administration approval. The next day, 9 executives had reservations at Trump’s hotel.------------------Nothing to see here, folks. Lobbyists choose the Trump Hotel for its “fine service and security.”  Apparently, other hotels just don’t offer the same influence-peddling service, or the security of knowing your merger will get preferred treatment.   Hope you enjoyed your stay!
I hope you are taking down walls in your home, leaving your doors unlocked and taking illegals in. Come on, where’s your hearts??
No it won't, if they're carting them in vehicles, they're coming in at a border point.  That would require more staff to check more vehicles.  If they are coming by sea, no wall will stop that
Barbara Hill where did you get your stats that trafficking was as a direct result of illegal immigrants entering at illegal points of entry?? Or are you like trump, spewing alternative facts???!!
Yes Lawrence and Karen, they can still use boats or tunnels. However a fence is the biggest barrier to discourage and reduce people from entering illegally.
Bobby Wilson run along cupcake
Barbara Hill #Pedogate
Barbara Hill nope.  It won't.
www.humantraffickingsearch.com confirms this horrible epidemic ❤️
Yes Lawrence and Karen, they can still use boats or tunnels. However a fence is the biggest barrier to discourage and reduce people from entering illegally.
Barbara Hill  Secure borders, Yes. All Americans want that.  A big beautiful wall is a waste of taxpayers money.  This shutdown is hurting your fellow Americans.  #NOWALL #OPENTHEGOVERNMENT
Reduce human trafficking, build it 🇺🇸
David Dennison No it suggests some were working on their own agenda and not the administration's.
Red neck trash
Susan Scarberry, FACT❗️Obama is NO LONGER IN OFFICE. Try to keep up!  You can't deflect from the deep, deep trouble the man CURRENTLY in the White House finds himself. Scandal after scandal. The name RUSSIA seems to pop up often. WHY?   If President Obama was such a hardened criminal why has the ONLY issue connected to him was paying a fine for errors in campaign records? Not ONE indictment, not ONE conviction and NO ONE from his administration went to prison. Oops!
It's a distraction and a waste of money.
David Dennison- old fake news
Hes going to be kicked out. You are loosing
Dallas Shryock - we'll see
Reduce human trafficking, build it 🇺🇸
David Dennison you still into those fake fisa warrants, that was done by last administration , just wow !!
David Dennison yThat is getting old,two years and the can't find anything! Go find your safe space!
Don Zunner You do know you are  certifiable insane! You lost,there will be a wall!
David Schroeder Old news,find something else to rag on!
Lynda Worden we need President Trump too!!!!
Jeremy Stephens wow, talk about delusion. Ohr testified a lot of things, some of them back to mueller. It's getting very interesting. Do you realize just how many investigations are ongoing at this time into the abuse of fisa court and abuse of power? Guess not.
Mischeal Trala well duh. It's a crime. and is being investigation as you deny it. Try to research.
Lynda Worden  I politely disagree that we need the wall.  For what?  I wonder.
Dallas Shryock - we'll see
Susan Scarberry All of that drivel, yet he hasn't had one single indictment from a Republican controlled House and Senate. Kinda makes it look like its a bunch of made up BS created by right-wing talking pundits like Sean Hannity or Rush Limbaugh to whip you mindless people into shape. You should not listen to those folks, they are steering you wrong.
Rudy Giuliani says Trump didn't collude with Russia but can't say if campaign aides did  (CNN) Rudy Giuliani said Wednesday that he never denied President Donald Trump's campaign colluded with the Russian government during the 2016 campaign, only that the President himself was not involved in collusion.  In an interview with CNN's Chris Cuomo on "Cuomo Prime Time," Giuliani, a former New York mayor and Trump's attorney, said he doesn't know if other people in the campaign, including former campaign chairman Paul Manafort, were working with the Kremlin during the 2016 presidential race.  "I never said there was no collusion between the campaign, or people in the campaign," Giuliani said.  He added, "I said the President of the United States. There is not a single bit of evidence the President of the United States committed the only crime you can commit here, conspiring with the Russians to hack the DNC."

Lynda Worden  I politely disagree that we need the wall.  For what?  I wonder.
David Dennison what's sad is your ignorance.
David Dennison what's sad is your ignorance.
Wow really so you going to belittle heavy set people. Some people can't lose weight and don't eat that much they have physical issues with their body that makes them retain weight. You sound just as ignorant as your party
Jamie Hammack I’m not belittling anyone.  I asked a fucking question, grow up.
Jamie Hammack read my original post.  This is about Trump editing his appearance to appear more fit on social media.  I’m sorry, but his entire existence is mired in falsehoods, and his social media team editing his appearance to make him more attractive is yet another way of manipulating people into thinking he is something that he is not.    So by my asking the question of why he feels the need to do that I’m belittling others who are overweight?  That’s a stretch bro.  By “my party” I’m assuming you mean “Democrats”.  Nah man, keep trying though.
Jamie Hammack also, check out the responses to my question.  People are insulting my family, including my dead grandmother, a few cousins (who I might add have struggled with weight issues, and one who is somewhat ability impaired), and my sister.  You wanna talk about belittling, address those from “your party” who think that behavior is acceptable.     INSULTING MY DEAD GRANDMOTHER.  Let that sink in.
Scotty G. Donnelly uhm, what?
Scotty G. Donnelly there is no need for a wall.  So again, what?

Linda Lail why do you feel the need to insult my family as well?
Joel Bernardini you are a worthless liberal.
Linda Lail no, I didn’t.  What’s your point?
Joel Bernardini, really? THAT is what you see? There are more important things to look at.
Phyllis Haberkamp oh the irony.  Read what you wrote, think about it, and get back to me.
Peggy McGinnis it is photoshopped
Joel Bernardini
Say, that's important!
Fay Wright no, it’s not important for the leader of this nation to photoshop himself, so why is it done for every single one of his photos on his Facebook page.  Don’t patronize me.
Department of Homeland Insecurity is working here
Joel Bernardini TROLL


photo shop can fix his ugly obese A%&
Heather Hegge so you don’t understand my original question, retort to your reply, nor cognitive dissonance.  Cool story.
Joel Bernardini , demented demoncratic snowflake. At least he's still the man to all kinds of things your likes celebrate.
Well we c u didn't Photoshop your profile pic.... Lol
Joel Bernardini why are you such a bully??? Daddy issues or mommy not love you, better yet lacking in the lower region?? It’s easy to be an asshole (as I’ve just demonstrated).
Fay Wright no, it’s not important for the leader of this nation to photoshop himself, so why is it done for every single one of his photos on his Facebook page.  Don’t patronize me.

Joel Bernardini u r a sad person to be wasting you time on here with this remark'- I suppose if your child had been killed from some one illegal - u would be more respectable.
Peggy McGinnis has no integrity
Sable Ash has the cultural experience of a farm girl
Barbara Anderson oh man, again I asked a question, and now my upbringing, reproductive organs, and intentions are being questioned.  It is easy to be an asshole, and I’m good at being one, but that was not the intent here.  I asked a question.


Joel Bernardini, your family pic? Look at it. LMFAO. trolls!!!


Sable Ash has the cultural experience of a farm girl
Joel Bernardini fake news! 🤣🤣
just like hillary


Gene Kutina got that Pelosi?
That quote applies to Obama. This isn't about the president, it's about American sovereignty, human trafficking, drug trafficking and American lives.
Gene Kutina huh?
Open your eyes and minds to this traitorous blow hard who has betrayed his country and the office of the President.  God has nothing to do with this lying , manipulative drone of Vladimir Putin!
Boris Nikolayev Well said comrade!  😵
Dear Trumpanzees,  Please don't conflate hate with patriotism.
Phyllis Haberkamp:  As it concerns hate wagons:  "Patriotism means to stand by the country. I does not mean to stand by the president."   Theodore Roosevelt.   We've had an immigration problem for decades.  It has been ongoing since before Reagan pardoned all illegals during his administration.  One is naïve to think that building an ineffective wall across our southern border will be a solution to a long festering problem.  Are you able to recognize when your being played?

Gene Kutina   Wow   Nailed it.
Phyllis Haberkamp:  As it concerns hate wagons:  "Patriotism means to stand by the country. I does not mean to stand by the president."   Theodore Roosevelt.   We've had an immigration problem for decades.  It has been ongoing since before Reagan pardoned all illegals during his administration.  One is naïve to think that building an ineffective wall across our southern border will be a solution to a long festering problem.  Are you able to recognize when your being played?

Kathleen Towns Grimsley i have called my representatives offices about this and at first we have a great connection, but as soon as I mention term limits they can't hear me then hang up 😢.

Lonny Watters humpty dumpty trumpty is filling the swamp
The sooner the better.  How is that going I hope well haven’t heard
so you are wrong again and he doesn't already get paid
Joanne MacEachern, people CLAIM Donnie "doesn't get paid." Where's the proof when he's NEVER shown his tax returns? What's he hiding?
Luis  Duron  you're another special kinda moron aren't you....lmao
The sooner the better.  How is that going I hope well haven’t heard
Luis  Duron  you're another special kinda moron aren't you....lmao
Catherine Barbier Blanchard  Actually I would be OK with Trump making every one that doesn’t want the wall pay for it just like Obama did with Obama care!
he doantes his pay to chartieswhat has any of the others done and farther more what he did when he wasn't our president doesn't bother as much as what the democrates have done in our goverment at the expense of it people
Catherine Barbier Blanchard  Actually I would be OK with Trump making every one that doesn’t want the wall pay for it just like Obama did with Obama care!
Elvis Jaws Groves the greater the jewels, the stronger the safe.
Julie Smith so what. It’s not illegal to apply for asylum.
James Woodruff you’ve been brainwashed
Samuel González how many times have you needed to have a ten foot wall around your house for protection???
Barbara. When I was in Puerto Rico I had to move my family to a gated community surrounded by a 12' wall and an armed guard at the gate. Gracias.
Julie Smith  Re: three caravans, I was not aware, nor do I consider them a threat.  Why should I?  You must be aware that we have the largest and most effective military in the history of the world?  What threat to you suppose these or any of the billions of other migrants might pose?
To be clear, because so many seem to want to imply this:  I do NOT think we should have open borders, nor do I think we should stop deporting illegals.  Though I certainly think we should prioritize deporting those illegals who are bad actors first...not hardworking illegals with families and a long history of positive behavior here.  Duh.  However, I do think we ought to spend our money on ACTUAL problems, like deporting those misbehaving here first and more and better train border security personnel.  One for immigration courts that currently seriously ask 5 year olds if they understand the nature of proceedings and sometimes perform proceedings over Skype.  We need to process asylum seekers and those accused of entering illegally with fast, fair and effective courts.  Obvious, we need to treat those being held pending trial humanely.  Keep children with parents (Jesus, do I really need to advocate that?), And stop the profiteering of private detention centers.  The proposed border wall fixes nothing and cost a fortune that could EASILY be better spent.  It is a bad idea that would not even fix the problems that are made up justify it.
Why aren’t the taxpayers vote on this issue?? It’s their tax dollars paying for it!! Why not pay the unpaid government workers with the money paid to the crooked politicians??!
great Point , just so everyone know's  Chuck Schumer's Anal dildos say "Made in Mexico ".
Clark Webber you are pos just like your messiah
To be clear, because so many seem to want to imply this:  I do NOT think we should have open borders, nor do I think we should stop deporting illegals.  Though I certainly think we should prioritize deporting those illegals who are bad actors first...not hardworking illegals with families and a long history of positive behavior here.  Duh.  However, I do think we ought to spend our money on ACTUAL problems, like deporting those misbehaving here first and more and better train border security personnel.  One for immigration courts that currently seriously ask 5 year olds if they understand the nature of proceedings and sometimes perform proceedings over Skype.  We need to process asylum seekers and those accused of entering illegally with fast, fair and effective courts.  Obvious, we need to treat those being held pending trial humanely.  Keep children with parents (Jesus, do I really need to advocate that?), And stop the profiteering of private detention centers.  The proposed border wall fixes nothing and cost a fortune that could EASILY be better spent.  It is a bad idea that would not even fix the problems that are made up justify it.
Samuel González  That is a false analogy for two reasons.  1.  You home and the countries borders are not the same thing.  You do not have anyone applying  for asylum, for example.  2.  There is no threat at our southern border.
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Sherri Giddings Latimer
Tom DeBiase they should want security for their country and stand strong . If the work for the government they should be responsible people and have a nest egg for this. Gov shut down isn’t new


Samuel González  That is a false analogy for two reasons.  1.  You home and the countries borders are not the same thing.  You do not have anyone applying  for asylum, for example.  2.  There is no threat at our southern border.

Donna Snyder, we have a Coast Guard station where I live along the California Coast along with several military installations. We have a credit union who is offering loans interest-free for those affected, the county animal shelter (no-kill) that's offering free food for pets, and so many other organizations helping those in need.  Ventura County went through two wildfires in two years and is now dealing with heavy rain and flooding. We got through it before and we'll do it again. People will always help.

Donna Snyder you’re talking union benefits while supporting Trump? You do know the Republicans are anti union with all their right-to-work, wolf in sheep’s clothing policies, right? Please google right-to-work legislation. Find out what it is you are supporting. You may be surprised.
Donna Snyder you’re talking union benefits while supporting Trump? You do know the Republicans are anti union with all their right-to-work, wolf in sheep’s clothing policies, right? Please google right-to-work legislation. Find out what it is you are supporting. You may be surprised.
I think you would need alchemy or something for that not a wall
Mike Keck, how many of those children were killed by legal citizens, I willing to bet 90%
Let me explain, Angel Moms are the mother's of children murdered by ILLEGALS. 100% of these children who were murdered by ILLEGALS Were murdered by ILLEGALS. And yes, more children are murdered by citizens than non citizens but that doesn't negate the fact that illegals are murdering children in the USA. If liberals really wanted to stop the no 1 cause of murder in this country they would help Americans overturn Roe V Wade.
Donna Snyder, we have a Coast Guard station where I live along the California Coast along with several military installations. We have a credit union who is offering loans interest-free for those affected, the county animal shelter (no-kill) that's offering free food for pets, and so many other organizations helping those in need.  Ventura County went through two wildfires in two years and is now dealing with heavy rain and flooding. We got through it before and we'll do it again. People will always help.
Let me explain, Angel Moms are the mother's of children murdered by ILLEGALS. 100% of these children who were murdered by ILLEGALS Were murdered by ILLEGALS. And yes, more children are murdered by citizens than non citizens but that doesn't negate the fact that illegals are murdering children in the USA. If liberals really wanted to stop the no 1 cause of murder in this country they would help Americans overturn Roe V Wade.
Corrado Raeli 🤢🤢🤢
Agnes Salgado 🌭🌭🌭🌭
James Walker What side is better, right or left side?
Mike Keck, how many of those children were killed by legal citizens, I willing to bet 90%
James Walker What side is better, right or left side?
Got to go with Linda on this. ..read the description of heaven....a high wall. By the way, broad is the way that leads to death of destruction and a city without walls is doomed to capture.
That's blasphemy.
Hell has walls also, and that where fuckhead Trump is going, hopefully sooner than later.
Linda Potter Hell has walls too and once there you NEVER get out!!
Craig Gillhaus No one ever said that Heaven had walls they said you have to go through the gates of Heaven where Trump will never enter.

Linda Potter read revelation 21 verse 20 . You don't know God word .
So trump is god then? Hmmm
Linda Potter yas
Corrado Raeli get my good side....
I always knew you people literally worship Trump as a god
Linda Potter yas
I always knew you people literally worship Trump as a god
Belinda Price   Agree , call National Emergency, Shut down folks go back to work , Build The Wall
The Majority of We the American People DID NOT vote for trump. trump was installed as Putin's puppet in Our White House by Putin's evil deeds and manipulations. trump is not a legitimately elected POTUS. trump IS Putin's puppet. Period.
Belinda Price   Agree , call National Emergency, Shut down folks go back to work , Build The Wall
I was at the game. I swear that Bundy was short of the goal line on that last TD. They should have had instant replay back then. Bundy would not be the legend he is today if there had been instant replay to show he did not score the winning touchdown in the final seconds.
Tom Cook Awesome.

Dear Sir: I agree with you wholeheartedly, however, it is the people you serve to protect that are being penalized. Call off the shut down. Call a National Emergency, if you must. But get this resolved QUICK!

Zachary R. Bode another predator that should be locked up with his crazy ass wife.
Let's see your husbands cheat on you,  then turn around and say "well you're not perfect either". Lol let's see how much sense that makes then
Chris Reed ... you’re ....
Chris Reed and never lied and always lived by the commandments. You will get your reward. I never knew a person without any faults.
Elisabeth Temple you do now. 😁
Dovid Staples evidently all of them. 😂
Tom Cook Awesome.
Chris Reed I hope you get an excruciating beat up from an illegal Mexican immigrant, then we'll see.
Cynthia Hill are you really defending Trump and his "sudden" dedication to his promises? 😂
Of course you are perfect!!!!!!!
Val Maciag well I was born on Christmas,  just saying. 👼
Chris Reed guess you are perfect

Dovid Staples evidently all of them. 😂

yes, "no one is perfect" Who among us hasn't paid a naked pornstar $130,000 to spank us on the ass with a rolled up copy of Forbes magazine while our wife sits at home pregnant with our son?
Costing us $3.2 Billion
Denise Jacks   Next time pay all government employees but do not pay Congress since they collectively cause the problems.
yes, "no one is perfect" Who among us hasn't paid a naked pornstar $130,000 to spank us on the ass with a rolled up copy of Forbes magazine while our wife sits at home pregnant with our son?
Denise Jacks   Next time pay all government employees but do not pay Congress since they collectively cause the problems.
They already are.    They are stopping a dipshit man child from pissing money into a worthless wall to make bigots feel less scared.
Oh and dumbass, trump didn’t even win the majority vote.    The wall is even less popular than he is.
Susan Rena Wolf Mid terms kicked his ass. He is not a majority, never was. Shutdown just makes him look bad and ruin our economy but he will blame someone else like all assholes do. Moderate Americans decide his fate.
Stephen Pierson Thats a lie FAKE POLLS
Worley Michael If you take all the dead people off and illegals he did better start doing home work.
Cath Stricker congress is not going to do anything as long as trump wants it
Okay Stephen. According to the way we elect presidents in the United states, we elected a president. This president's name is Trump. I don't care who or who doesn't like him. We, the United states of America, have a president. The people, according to years of tradition, have elected Trump as that president. Work harder at getting a viable democratic president.
In the Illuminati Secret Order Of Society Satanic Worshiping Group Contract, it says Congress is the almighty powerful that they are so powerful, they will take every penny then can from the tax payers and vote themselves a raise for doing it.
Cath Stricker ... House Speaker Nancy Pelosi
Costing us $3.2 Billion
Cath Stricker I would only note zero votes by the Senate on funding the govt.  And 7 yeas by the house to reopen the govt.  Your move.
Cath Stricker ... House Speaker Nancy Pelosi
Cath Stricker I would only note zero votes by the Senate on funding the govt.  And 7 yeas by the house to reopen the govt.  Your move.
Term limits, if we the people walking out from our own jobs we would not get paid so what’s good enough for us is good enough for politicians
James Kenney yes but a new car and expensive cell phones are not a necessity. Like I said people spend what they make. There are ways to save and make cuts. Each person is responsible for their expenses. I realize sometimes expenses come up that aren’t planned. I am old school and if you can’t pay for it you don’t buy it. I know people have to have a home and I am not talking about that.
Penny Mason He was too busy retouching photos to make his hands appear larger
Term limits, if we the people walking out from our own jobs we would not get paid so what’s good enough for us is good enough for politicians
Penny Mason He was too busy retouching photos to make his hands appear larger
Derrick J Johnston and they will all get their money.
Derrick J Johnston ....I’m just happy you enjoyed the comments!😉
Derrick J Johnston   It’s winter and cold outside, nothing to do but have some fun  replying. Hopefully spring comes soon.
James Kenney yes but a new car and expensive cell phones are not a necessity. Like I said people spend what they make. There are ways to save and make cuts. Each person is responsible for their expenses. I realize sometimes expenses come up that aren’t planned. I am old school and if you can’t pay for it you don’t buy it. I know people have to have a home and I am not talking about that.
Derrick J Johnston   It’s winter and cold outside, nothing to do but have some fun  replying. Hopefully spring comes soon.
Derrick J Johnston ....I’m just happy you enjoyed the comments!😉
Fake news= fake photos
Fake news= fake photos
Latest polls show support for his wall is just shy of 35%. Half is a bit of an exageration.
Latest polls show support for his wall is just shy of 35%. Half is a bit of an exageration.
Lautaro Augusto Rodriguez it’s photoshopped.  https://i.redd.it/arl9gme5n1b21.gif
Bonnie S. Pickett because they say one thing preach another, they hypocrites.
Why are the cartels building tunnels if walls don't work?
Jim Villella they should feel LUCKY not to be Canadians! It's about SOVEREIGNTY You MORON!
You're gonna feel betrayed when it's YOUR turn in the GULAG!
Lautaro Augusto Rodriguez it’s photoshopped.  https://i.redd.it/arl9gme5n1b21.gif
You're gonna feel betrayed when it's YOUR turn in the GULAG!
We should use the seized drug money to build the wall legalize marijuana and tax it federally to pay the people working at the wall and to maintain it
You get it, walls don't work anyway.
Someone up there playing with Photoshop when you need to open the damn government already.
Not much winning so far.
How much does Russia pay you to post?
Someone up there playing with Photoshop when you need to open the damn government already.
Truth is priceless
Joy Z Cohen -a federal employee without health insurance? Very odd!
Truth is priceless
Joy Z Cohen -a federal employee without health insurance? Very odd!
Sonny CaptainButtler GiduduOcean crack is a hell of a drug
WTF?
Nikolai Patrushev, Putin's national security advisor, has just threatened Ukraine with "loss of statehood." Is anyone in this administration still awake?
Sonny CaptainButtler GiduduOcean  Oh honey you got it bad! But whatever Trump will win again in 2020 he’s not done with his mission yet!
Sonny CaptainButtler GiduduOcean sonny that was a waste of time reading that stupid letter. I was a self proclaimed jerk for reading it. I still don’t know what the hell your talking about
Joy Z Cohen joy, but she will still pay for her I phone cable tv that’s more important. Complain to Nancy and chuck.
Sonny CaptainButtler GiduduOcean sonny that was a waste of time reading that stupid letter. I was a self proclaimed jerk for reading it. I still don’t know what the hell your talking about
Wall isn’t going to happen
Worley Michael we shall see.
Sonny CaptainButtler GiduduOcean  Oh honey you got it bad! But whatever Trump will win again in 2020 he’s not done with his mission yet!
Worley Michael we shall see.
Our country is better protected if there was no shutdown.
Thankful for our President! ❤️🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Kingsley Medland, why are you here?  Apparently you don't have a clue how huge a bullet this country dodged with the victory of Donald J. Trump. So, why are you here?  🤬
Leslie Kirscht-Sutton Holker lol, I probably know more about your country's limited history to understand that Trump as Presidents go is nothing short of a joke..and I'm here because your comment was funny..the thing is you and the rest of the world are likely to need some prayer because he is an incompetent menace to not only Americans but to the rest of us..you do realise your country is the one believed to be the biggest threat to global peace. That said.. Clinton was shite too..for the so called, self given 'greatest' country on earth you lot are clueless. Go read some books and educate yourself.
Kingsley Medland dude...you’re British slime. What a dumbass
Lee Grant  just another piece of eurotrash.
Thankful for our President! ❤️🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
I urge moving the "State of the Union" Address to Independence Hall Philadephia, we need the Rock Solid visual of a Republic, at its Founding, and the back drop Story of those Events, this is a fight over the role of each branch of Government, no place surrounds those Ideals like the Home of the Founding Documents, our birth as a Nation, and the hope for We The People every where in the Wider World. Folks each American knows the story of Independenc Hall, and the Founding Fathers, with President Trump's skills in weaving in History, Events, and the Crowd, he can Hit a Home Run Speech likes of which has never been seen, the one liners will reverberate for years...
Why this man look like he just appointed the new manager of Crystal Palace Colin Charlie
Lee Grant  just another piece of eurotrash.
Who photoshopped this photo? He hasn't had a jaw line since he was 8, nor a waist size under 52 since he was 14.
God would never condone the actions of this individual. The fact that you can't see that makes you a fake.
Who photoshopped this photo? He hasn't had a jaw line since he was 8, nor a waist size under 52 since he was 14.
Jeremy Stephens I support the Presidents policies of standing against the slaughter of the unborn, traditional marriage as the Lord ordained it, protector and supporter of Israel ect.   I do not support his language or his behavior from time to time but I have no stones to throw because I’m not perfect either, ask me if I care what u think of me.
Linda Leitner Martin you do realize uh that we all technically are immigrants and that there is much crime found within our nation by itself... stop looking for a scapegoat.
Keep the caravan of criminals OUT! #BUILDTHEWALL
Webster Lynn, it’s actually a small price to pay when one considers we spend 310 billion in annual interest on 22 trillion in debt
Webster Lynn Anybody who's seen more than two of these estimates knows that they're all over the map. You haven't even given a reference, so for all we know, you made this one up.
Jeremy Stephens I support the Presidents policies of standing against the slaughter of the unborn, traditional marriage as the Lord ordained it, protector and supporter of Israel ect.   I do not support his language or his behavior from time to time but I have no stones to throw because I’m not perfect either, ask me if I care what u think of me.
Webster Lynn Anybody who's seen more than two of these estimates knows that they're all over the map. You haven't even given a reference, so for all we know, you made this one up.
Do you live on the border? Maybe we'll steal your land to build a wall on!
Denise Scott your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go go
Webster Lynn, it’s actually a small price to pay when one considers we spend 310 billion in annual interest on 22 trillion in debt
Denise Scott your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go go
Do you live on the border? Maybe we'll steal your land to build a wall on!
Leif Menzie lucky to live in America where there is help. Time to make sure we can keep it that way!
Kevin Lake its not vacation for these people. There are real life consequences of Trump throwing a tantrum over his vanity wall. These workers aren't getting paid. Some people are being forced to work without getting paid. I would call that slavery.

Nick Baker He will a soon as Democrats get off their ass and do what’s right for the nation
Sandy Swaney Mahady by "whats right" I'm assuming you mean pass legislation to re-open the government so those 800k workers can get paid? House Democrats passed a spending bill that Senate Republicans previously passed 100-0. Why won't Mitch McConnell allow a vote?
Nick Baker tell that to President Nancy she will not give one dollar to the wall. Result shutdown.
James Walker the Senate voted on a spending bill 100-0. The Democratic House passed that same bill. Now all we need is for Mitch McConnell to pass it and we're on our way to funding the government. Trump is throwing a tantrum for a vanity wall which the majority of people don't want.
Leif Menzie lucky to live in America where there is help. Time to make sure we can keep it that way!
Kevin Lake man you are in a roll, I can’t wait to see you tell that to my units face, and my families. Facebook commando, keyboard hero, bet you keep your mouth shut in real life #paythecoastguard #paydhs
Valerie Spofford Tilley what’s pointless is taking out loans to feed my family after 18 years of service to my country you ignorant Facebook commando.  #paythecoastguard #paydhs
Judy Feinberg Qualls The Senate passed a spending bill (with no money for the wall) 100-0 in December. The Republican house rejected it. Democrats took control of the House in January and passed that same bill. Now Mitch McConnell isn't even bringing it up for a vote (new session, new vote). This shutdown could end right now if Mitch McConnell wanted to. Trump isn't doing anything to help bring this shutdown to an end.
James Walker the Senate voted on a spending bill 100-0. The Democratic House passed that same bill. Now all we need is for Mitch McConnell to pass it and we're on our way to funding the government. Trump is throwing a tantrum for a vanity wall which the majority of people don't want.
Lisa Hertel non-essential refers to the job they do. National security is essential. Issuing social security numbers is not. That type of thing.
Kevin Lake great! Good to know you don't care about workers
Orie Franco yup. Non essential. And they will get all the pay back. So, you Democrat’s want more government control over your lives so you are more dependent on them?  You don’t even know how stupid and brainwashed you are. True to your Nazi/communist roots.
Nick Baker  He has been trying to open the government back up everyday and Democrats are admit they don’t want a wall. I’m not going to sound like a die hard republican because I’m far from it but I do support trump because I believe he truly loves America. If the right democrat runs you bet I’ll vote for them. I’m not trying nor will I sit here and argue. #unitedwestanddividedwefall
Lisa Hertel getting back pay doesn't help if you get evicted because you can't pay rent while you are working and not getting paid.
Joseph Hart first of all I  a disabled vet myself and have the utmost respect for any service member. Secondly, chill out buddy. You will get your pay. If you are in financial troubles after missing on paycheck then obviously you aren't very good with money and acting all badass calling me a keyboard commando sure doesn't make me shake in my boots.
Lisa Hertel getting back pay doesn't help if you get evicted because you can't pay rent while you are working and not getting paid.
He's been trying to open it everyday you goof but Pelosi and Shumer are playing games
Un SOS   Im  a psychopath locked in the NHS mental health system currently in hospital knowing full well  that all health care is controlled by the secret service currently being injected against my will enforced by law  Thet put images of my father and uncle on the packaging  of imperial tobacco products and stole the money physcopathically directing their tumors
Ross Jones body off lick you poor doul.
Ross Jones that's best of luck you poor soul. God help you.
We're going to assume Rudy Giuliani was ALLEGEDLY drunk (again) when he went on CNN last night to walk back the whole NO COLLUSION narrative that Trump and Co. have been peddling for the past two years. Perhaps Giuliani suffering verbal diarrhea after a bad word salad, or maybe he was just foreshadowing the next Mueller indictment, but Chris Cuomo was dumbfounded when Giuliani blithered, "I never said there was no collusion between the campaign, or between people in the campaign. I have no idea."
And hes a trump supporter, hmmm
Ross Jones   If you weren’t already locked up , I hope you would be on the other side of the border locked out.
He's been trying to open it everyday you goof but Pelosi and Shumer are playing games
Ross Jones   If you weren’t already locked up , I hope you would be on the other side of the border locked out.
Steve Zadorozniak maybe you’re suffering from cognitive dissonance and leftist mental disorder
Lee Grant or maybe I'm saddened and sickened by the fact that kids kill kids and noone seems to care, especially idiots like you
And hes a trump supporter, hmmm
Lee Grant or maybe I'm saddened and sickened by the fact that kids kill kids and noone seems to care, especially idiots like you
THE BEST PRESIDENT EVER!! GOD BLESS YOU MR. PRESIDENT!!
Bette Ristoff Cite one of your "reports". Or were you just screaming like a crazy cat lady because you can't help it?
Paul Hogan ill have your pussy ass screaming like a bitch after i beat you down
Paul Hogan and you won’t get paid until 2020. You will work for free???   Moron just like the spurs boy
Only one party is trading Border Security for illegal votes. That's the Democrats. TSA isn't getting paid because Democrats favor illegals over America's safety. All for votes ...not for anything else either.
Paul Hogan  And  you have a very dark heart. GOD BLESS YOU.
I have an incredibly kind heart. I hope they all make it into America ...LEGALLY. You can't properly vet an illegal - you just can't. Fund the border wall and everyone gets paid. It's that simple. Every LEGAL American wins that way.
Dear Madame Speaker:  Due to the Shutdown, I am sorry to inform you that your trip to Brussels, Egypt, and Afghanistan has been postponed. We will reschedule this seven-day excursion when the Shutdown is over. In light of the 800,000 great American workers not receiving pay, I am sure you would agree that postponing this public relations event is totally appropriate. I also feel that, during this period, it would be better if you were in Washington negotiating with me and joining the Strong Border Security movement to end the Shutdown. Obviously, if you would like to make your journey by flying commercial, that would certainly be your prerogative.  I look forward to seeing you soon and even more forward to watching our open and dangerous Southern Border finally receive the attention, funding, and security it so desperately deserves!  Sincerely,  Donald Trump
THE BEST PRESIDENT EVER!! GOD BLESS YOU MR. PRESIDENT!!
Paul Hogan National Parks are trash heeps, TSA agents quit, government employees on SNAP.  What a disgrace!
Paul Hogan tell that to my kids who need food on the table.  #paythecoastguard
LOOK At these idiots PICK UP A REPORT AND READ IDIOTS, THE WALL WILL DO NOTHING TO FIX THE PROBLEM...
Dear Madame Speaker:  Due to the Shutdown, I am sorry to inform you that your trip to Brussels, Egypt, and Afghanistan has been postponed. We will reschedule this seven-day excursion when the Shutdown is over. In light of the 800,000 great American workers not receiving pay, I am sure you would agree that postponing this public relations event is totally appropriate. I also feel that, during this period, it would be better if you were in Washington negotiating with me and joining the Strong Border Security movement to end the Shutdown. Obviously, if you would like to make your journey by flying commercial, that would certainly be your prerogative.  I look forward to seeing you soon and even more forward to watching our open and dangerous Southern Border finally receive the attention, funding, and security it so desperately deserves!  Sincerely,  Donald Trump
LOOK At these idiots PICK UP A REPORT AND READ IDIOTS, THE WALL WILL DO NOTHING TO FIX THE PROBLEM...
Michelle Helderman If that scripture were referring to a person then trump would have a capital T. You are just grasping at straws. Also, God would never condone the actions of this man. The fact you think he would makes you a fake.
Jeremy Stephens I am Gods WITNESS and at the same time I posted this i was given a sign. I will pray for you Jeremy.
Michelle Helderman You are a nobody, same as I am. You witnessed nothing. You saw a little thing in your book and latched onto it with all you have, with the hopes it would explain to your practical mind, why your spiritual mind thought voting for this highly immoral person was the best choice for America. I don't mind being prayed for, as I will pray for you as well.
Julie Smith yes but we need to warn them.
Michelle Helderman  I absolutely love this! And if you read in revelations, when the world goes as  one nation the anti christ will rule it. We are given a choice to stop it!
been fighting over two decades, a lifetime of Hell. Believe me, we are past the antichrist in office. now to keep him out!
Sandy Swaney Mahady 1 Corinthians 15:51-52 King James Version (KJV) 51 Behold, I shew you a mystery; We shall not all sleep, but we shall all be changed,  52 In a moment, in the twinkling of an eye, at the last trump: for the trumpet shall sound, and the dead shall be raised incorruptible, and we shall be changed.  King James Version (KJV) Public Domain
Sandy Swaney Mahady the last trump.....
Joseph Hart You'll get paid every cent brother. That being said, if this shutdown prevents you from feeding your kids then you are a fucking loser. ...or were you just using a catchy phase to sound profound?
Michelle Helderman and if you use the Bible, remember it says not to commit adultery like trump, don’t steal like trump, be a righteous man unlike trump, love thy neighbors unlike trump, be humble, help the sick, help the poor, etc etc.
Well, that's nice and dandy, but the original text was not written in English but Greek and most likely referred to a Shofar. These were also blown when the walls of Jericho fell. The passage you quoted is talking about the resurrection, not a wall in the US.  National pride is the beginning of Babylon. That is coming from someone who lives in Germany. ;)
Stephen Pierson praying for you!
Sandy Swaney Mahady the last trump.....
he is still in transformation. like you and me. but its there for you to see. I was just given a sign. get ready for Jesus to return.
Susan Dowd Susan no high horse here. Nancy won’t negotiate. Complain to her. Not our president. They all will be paid for doing nothing. Apply for unemployment, food stamps etc. they give these things to illegals they can give to deserving Americans.
Victor Bare hey Vic get a life.
Robert Demars Suzan is a loser.
Anne Crossway Ann and Susan two airheads. Our border security sucks. They keep pouring in . Fake polls by the media.
Pencil pushers are starting to freak out about Trump's shutdown, warning that if federal workers miss another paycheck, a drop in economic growth coupled with the loss of consumer and business confidence, combined with Trump's trade war and the long term sting on consumer credit ratings, could trigger a recession. Lucky for Trump, who gauges his success on the ebbs and flows of stock market, Wall Street's 1% hasn't noticed rank-and-file federal workers are on the verge of quitting en masse.  Trump's 2020 campaign manager and pubic beard-in-chief, Brad Parscale, says that they have all this polling data that says they're winning the war on messaging, but he refuses to show anybody. I guess Parscale's model is from a different school three towns over, and isn't available right now because it's currently vacationing in Russia.
Lee Grant your delusional. Obviously your getting a paycheck. Ask the 800,000 not getting paid about becoming unhinged.
James Walker name calling. Typical. Fake polls by who? According to Cohen...that was Trump.
James Walker oh that's right. Paid vacation. I forgot.
Terry Clark what's Hillary got to do with anything. That shipped sailed long ago. You guys need a new tune....lol
Lee Grant  Anne Crossway Anne dont you love the koolaid drinking trolls. Good old Lee here has a Facebook account joined in Dec 2018....🤣🤣🤣 so much for Facebook monitoring their own site for fake profiles.
he is still in transformation. like you and me. but its there for you to see. I was just given a sign. get ready for Jesus to return.
Donna Park The original Fathers who wrote the Constitution & later some amendments, wrote that good sound protection of the country was important. They also said that a strong defense would protect & Americans would be safe. Damages would not be by "External" attack, but by "Internal" decisions. Yes, Democrats appear uninterested in USA border security.. & only the illegals. Citizens are not their priority..it is illegals votes & the power they will gain.
Susan Dowd that is how they did it for 35 years and nothing got done after the fact. Not this time.
Lee Grant  Anne Crossway Anne dont you love the koolaid drinking trolls. Good old Lee here has a Facebook account joined in Dec 2018....🤣🤣🤣 so much for Facebook monitoring their own site for fake profiles.
Susan Dowd that is how they did it for 35 years and nothing got done after the fact. Not this time.
"Negotiate"...Reopen the government and then 'negotiate'. That is exactly what the Democrats want. You really think they will 'negotiate' once the government is open. SMH They could careless about Americans security. It is all about power and greed to them.  "America will never be destroyed from the outside. If we falter and lose our freedoms, it will be because we destroyed ourselves."
"Negotiate"...Reopen the government and then 'negotiate'. That is exactly what the Democrats want. You really think they will 'negotiate' once the government is open. SMH They could careless about Americans security. It is all about power and greed to them.  "America will never be destroyed from the outside. If we falter and lose our freedoms, it will be because we destroyed ourselves."
James Kenney Obama sure did.  Thank goodness we have Trump.  MAGA 2020!!
James only got 9? friends Maybe you could send a friend request to leave and you to Homo’s can make out
Hey lee did you give James a call hey James I think you found one more friend ? so you’re on Facebook just a troll like a fucking liberal that lives in his moms basement
OK James you’ve got all the answers you’re trying to correct everybody
You should’ve got on here to correct all the lies Obama and.  Hillary Clinton  told
Tommy Elston My mother died 39 years ago. Wipe the orange off your chin, homophobe.
James Kenney Obama sure did.  Thank goodness we have Trump.  MAGA 2020!!
Lee Barrett that’s barry and Killary
Lee Barrett omg...dude...you've got a seriously huge democrat cock up your ass...i'm anarchit...which means i reject being ruled by anyone..so as a neutral third party? get that dick out of your ass
Tommy Elston My mother died 39 years ago. Wipe the orange off your chin, homophobe.
Tommy Elston Boycott Elston Auto Repair. He's a homophobe.
Ooh, using “gay” as an insult. The 1980s think you’re awesome.
Matt McNulty When we go high, you lie.
Arky James who's going to take your vote when gov't employees aren't paid and quit? Logical?
Daniel Maczko You must be talking about the 800,000 non-essential employees who will be lucky to not get laid off altogether. They'll vote straight Democrat anyway. No loss.
Tommy Elston Boycott Elston Auto Repair. He's a homophobe.
It like saying why do people have gates around their house....to protect people who don’t belong on their property!
so you photoshop your hand to look bigger, bet you bought a MASCULINE TOILET to feel large, thats why you looove whitaker. you have been diagnosed with small penis syndrome, pleas get checked
Daniel Maczko You must be talking about the 800,000 non-essential employees who will be lucky to not get laid off altogether. They'll vote straight Democrat anyway. No loss.
so you photoshop your hand to look bigger, bet you bought a MASCULINE TOILET to feel large, thats why you looove whitaker. you have been diagnosed with small penis syndrome, pleas get checked
The irony is here so rich that I may require an AED
Ray Welch You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress.
Ray Welch he's scared of humpty DUMPty trumpty
It like saying why do people have gates around their house....to protect people who don’t belong on their property!
Ray Welch he's scared of humpty DUMPty trumpty
Nicki Michelle Yes, you are correct...I’m hoping that taking the average of all the polls will be more meaningful...Of course the Russian collusion did have an impact....
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Kevin Lake If trump holds your values, Pleas feel free to “ love all over him”....Fo myself and  those I respect we will not as his values are not....
Doris Caruth Please continue to support trump as this is your right....It is also my right and duty to resist....His values are not mine....
Sandy Swaney Mahady please look at all the polls (30 some) add them together and divide....You will get a much better picture....
Joan Clapp crooked media, just look at the support he has in the comments. Keep believing cnn type poles taken by asshole dem sympathizers.
Ray Welch You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress.
Joan Clapp crooked media, just look at the support he has in the comments. Keep believing cnn type poles taken by asshole dem sympathizers.
Sandy Swaney Mahady please look at all the polls (30 some) add them together and divide....You will get a much better picture....
Hang in there! Thank you for never giving up! 🇺🇸👏🏻👏🏻👏🏻
He will continue to do nothing for you as well
Hang in there! Thank you for never giving up! 🇺🇸👏🏻👏🏻👏🏻
He will continue to do nothing for you as well
Barry Davis.  You obviously have zero understanding of American history and the presidents who have given their time and talents to improving the life of Americans ... unlike trump who is only tearing down institutions and programs that we the people have established through our elected representatives throughout the decades.  You are obviously oblivious to the fact that unlike any other American president trump has given more to our enemy Putin who probably controls him or has something on him that he is obviously concealing.  If you don't agree tell me another American president who invited Russians and their media into the White House while not having OUR media there and where he spilled Israeli secrets to the russians.  That's not fake news we saw it happen before our eyes as was reported by America's free press (thanks to the Constitutional protection that our free press has, deserves and earns every time they expose trump's lies.
Why you say that?
Thank you Mr President!  Stay strong.  My family is praying for you.
Why you say that?
Linda Mesopotanese  Yes...Here’s his message: “ You’re f..ked suckers...Lies told lies kept”.
Ron Racheletta My, my, my, Ron Racheletta such hate and filthy language exudes from that mouth of yours.  Be careful now, your bitterness is showing.
Barry Davis.  You obviously have zero understanding of American history and the presidents who have given their time and talents to improving the life of Americans ... unlike trump who is only tearing down institutions and programs that we the people have established through our elected representatives throughout the decades.  You are obviously oblivious to the fact that unlike any other American president trump has given more to our enemy Putin who probably controls him or has something on him that he is obviously concealing.  If you don't agree tell me another American president who invited Russians and their media into the White House while not having OUR media there and where he spilled Israeli secrets to the russians.  That's not fake news we saw it happen before our eyes as was reported by America's free press (thanks to the Constitutional protection that our free press has, deserves and earns every time they expose trump's lies.
Ron Racheletta My, my, my, Ron Racheletta such hate and filthy language exudes from that mouth of yours.  Be careful now, your bitterness is showing.
He sure is protecting his Government workers huh?  blah blah blah protection starts with helping out those who can't help themselves 🙄
Drew Mullen how many terrorists have the TSA caught vs how many of them have been arrested? 😂
Diana Morris  he gone kill all y’all stupid asses 😂😂
DEMS whom put Israel first think that Americans don't deserve border security yet they have a wall and a military protecting its borders. Why does America's greatest allies Israel not have their best interest at heart???????
Drew Mullen question if you please...do you vote in primaries? Have you ever caucused?
Linda Mesopotanese  Yes...Here’s his message: “ You’re f..ked suckers...Lies told lies kept”.
Drew Mullen question if you please...do you vote in primaries? Have you ever caucused?
Drew Mullen Why don't you ask Nancy Pelosi?
Can’t believe people love this orange lying mentally clown more than they love this country.
Chris Ng tRump says climate change isn't real! Why oh why is he spending million to build a sea wall around his Russian financed Mar A Largo golf course???????
Veronica Torres hahahahahahaha
Chris Ng A house without walls ? What would hold up the roof?
Lara Estes Climate change is a big hoax (nobody says climate never changes, BTW). But why change the subject, we're talking about the wall here.
John Rigazio Frames.
All I'm going to say is El Chapo smugglers said they don't get drugs in this country the illegal way... They drive straight through... Every body keep saying the wall will make us safe, keep drugs out this that or another, but if a person wants to get drugs into the country or they just want to come to the country they will find a way... Far as the drugs go, the drug of choice now that such a crisis is opioids and those come right from the doctor... Weed is damn near legal almost every way, and crack has always been around... Now make us safer naw I don't by that because illegal immigrants aren't doing majority of the killing and other crimes... But if you think having a wall will make you safe that's your opinion, but ask all the mass shootings victims family would a wall have made a difference for them...
Latoryaira Schnell Peoples If you want to keep bury your head in the sand, sure. Here's just one study in Arizona:  "This data do not rely on self-reporting by criminals. Undocumented immigrants are at least 142% more likely to be convicted of a crime than other Arizonans. They also tend to commit more serious crimes and serve 10.5% longer sentences, more likely to be classified as dangerous, and 45% more likely to be gang members than U.S. citizens."  https://crimeresearch.org/2018/01/impact-illegal-aliens-crime-rates/
Latoryaira Schnell Peoples Also, something like 80% of the girls taking the journey from Central America to the US are raped along the way. Who knows how many died along the way. I guess you don't really care about them either. I also figured, you don't care much about the angel families who has members killed by illegals, just and Nancy and Chuck who would even meet with them.  That's surely very compassionate and putting America First (not).
Can’t believe people love this orange lying mentally clown more than they love this country.
Latoryaira Schnell Peoples Also, something like 80% of the girls taking the journey from Central America to the US are raped along the way. Who knows how many died along the way. I guess you don't really care about them either. I also figured, you don't care much about the angel families who has members killed by illegals, just and Nancy and Chuck who would even meet with them.  That's surely very compassionate and putting America First (not).
The communist agitators are paid by the democrat communists kings that live in fortresses
Build that wall TRUMP 2020 we stand WITH you
Bryan Steinberg We don’t.
No other country has guns either and they have socialist healthcare. You still think "other countries" is the example you want to use?
Dovid Staples Shalom Brother!  I think the problem is people have the wrong idea about a border and don't really understand the concept
Build that wall TRUMP 2020 we stand WITH you
Dovid Staples Shalom Brother!  I think the problem is people have the wrong idea about a border and don't really understand the concept
No other country has guns either and they have socialist healthcare. You still think "other countries" is the example you want to use?
Keep fighting the good fight keeping us safe!
He is the president of the USA. If a wall is a national emergency than so is Flint.  Everybody is so democratic & so republican that no one looks at the big picture.   The U. S coast guard is working without pay!   Y’all assume that everyone that disagrees with you is a democrat. Trumpster logic.   If I wasn’t a democrat before best believe I’ll be voting blue in 2020.  Regardless of your political leanings Trump is one of the worst things to happen to this country in a loooooong time.
No one said your a democrat were just pointing out the obvious truth... democrats destroy everything they touch !! Mic drop!!!
Suiter Kaye 👎👎👎👎👎👎 🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮
lol if you think that’s a mic drop. I’ll let you have it.   I’m more concerned with why we have a president who thinks a wall is of the utmost importance when his own press secretary has admitted that threat is entering by airport & why people are working & not being paid.
Really? Because borders do matter and he actually cares about this country like a REAL american you should respect that if u love your country
Suiter Kaye makes sense right?
if he cares about the country so much Why not invest that money in more airport security since his press secretary admitted that’s where the threat is?   If he loves the country so much why not invest in Flint, Michigan?  The man is a  liar.  I mean I thought he said Mexico was paying for the wall. What happened to that?  He said he release his tax returns if he won.  He said there were fine people on both sides in Charlottesville.  I mean to think that a former reality tv star, who comes across as a narcissistic , and has had many a failed business venture.   To believe that man over  journalists, historians, scientists & really anybody with a sliver a decency.   I don’t see how anybody who supports Trump could consider themselves a real American.   He has Americans working for free. That’s unacceptable.  Anyway, I’m done discussing it.  If 🇷🇺 doesn’t interfere,  😉 I’m sure the majority of the American people will vote differently in 2020.  You have a good night.
Keep fighting the good fight keeping us safe!
if he cares about the country so much Why not invest that money in more airport security since his press secretary admitted that’s where the threat is?   If he loves the country so much why not invest in Flint, Michigan?  The man is a  liar.  I mean I thought he said Mexico was paying for the wall. What happened to that?  He said he release his tax returns if he won.  He said there were fine people on both sides in Charlottesville.  I mean to think that a former reality tv star, who comes across as a narcissistic , and has had many a failed business venture.   To believe that man over  journalists, historians, scientists & really anybody with a sliver a decency.   I don’t see how anybody who supports Trump could consider themselves a real American.   He has Americans working for free. That’s unacceptable.  Anyway, I’m done discussing it.  If 🇷🇺 doesn’t interfere,  😉 I’m sure the majority of the American people will vote differently in 2020.  You have a good night.
You are aware that the Mayor of Flint took money given to her to fix the water and donated it to a super PAC right?
You are aware that the Mayor of Flint took money given to her to fix the water and donated it to a super PAC right?
You are such a joke.  Meanwhile, TSA agents and air traffic controllers work without pay.  And how is it that this keeps us safe?
Same.
Mary Sue or everyone stop working . we the people can truely shut down America
Jesus isn't into civil war so FU with your fake Christianity!
Liberals won the last last civil war, dumbass.
Well said bye someone that never served
You are such a joke.  Meanwhile, TSA agents and air traffic controllers work without pay.  And how is it that this keeps us safe?
Well said bye someone that never served
You actually think the president can put TVs inside congress?     You really don’t understand how a republic works do you?
Worley Michael You teach us....................the comment expressed a desire to see the anti-security Demos be VISIBLY seen along side (or, underneath) their own public remarks, ON RECORD of their "commitment" to this nation's security.  Probably not on your list of expertise either, but this President just hosted the national champ football team..................founding fathers probably omitted that function....................whadya think?
Liberals won the last last civil war, dumbass.
Worley Michael You teach us....................the comment expressed a desire to see the anti-security Demos be VISIBLY seen along side (or, underneath) their own public remarks, ON RECORD of their "commitment" to this nation's security.  Probably not on your list of expertise either, but this President just hosted the national champ football team..................founding fathers probably omitted that function....................whadya think?
You actually think the president can put TVs inside congress?     You really don’t understand how a republic works do you?
Thank you Sir 🇺🇸if ever it’s going to be done, you’ll be the one to do it!  Hold your ground
Ryan Riffe plus all these on here that hate our president are enemy to our country they should be trying to help make it better but they can not because they are to full of hate.
Stay firm Mr. President!  The border security including the wall & then immigration reform is needed & has been since the amnesty fiasco.
Veronica Torres  "comminst"  :)
Communist trolls are paid by their masters the democrat communists
Stay firm Mr. President!  The border security including the wall & then immigration reform is needed & has been since the amnesty fiasco.
Communist trolls are paid by their masters the democrat communists
Veronica Torres  "comminst"  :)
Then why is russia backing Trump?
Natalie Halem yea Nancy and the Democrats won’t open the government. 5.7 billion is a drop in the bucket for them! They rather give it to Central American dictators than use it at home.
No they aren’t. He quite literally said that he would be proud to shut it down and would take credit for it. Try again
Tommy Carter not in the your life time, complete waste. Dont get me wrong I want people to come in to this country the right way, 5.7 naw
Natalie Halem pay attention mam... The Democrats are not going to give OUR PRESIDENT ANY SUPPORT ...THAT'S RIGHT HE IS YOUR PRESIDENT TOO!!!
Just Bob no Bob he is not my President, he is a con man, corrupt, liar, unfit for the job.
Then why is russia backing Trump?
Just Bob no Bob he is not my President, he is a con man, corrupt, liar, unfit for the job.
Carrie Stewart not true, trumpet stop being blinded by the light and drinking the koolaid.
He will win & get his way with building the wall that's why he's our President our Leader !!!! If you don't like it you're welcome to go to Mexico!!!!
Source? Maybe among Republicans but no polls show even a majority among the general population.
Webster Lynn Gld your awake, what do you support if it's not America?
He will win & get his way with building the wall that's why he's our President our Leader !!!! If you don't like it you're welcome to go to Mexico!!!!
Webster Lynn Gld your awake, what do you support if it's not America?
We wouldn’t have a leader working for a hostil power to start
Phoebe Cassandra Smith American citizens are donating to the Wall. We will get it done around failed government.
We wouldn’t have a leader working for a hostil power to start
Remember the last terrorist attack here? Know how they arrived? Through customs via legal ports-of-entry. The last one before that was by two white dudes that were American citizens. Terrorists and drug dealers aren’t sneaking across the southern border through tunnels. They aren’t that stupid.
Sandra Hughes, it would have been a disaster with that evil woman!
Remember the last terrorist attack here? Know how they arrived? Through customs via legal ports-of-entry. The last one before that was by two white dudes that were American citizens. Terrorists and drug dealers aren’t sneaking across the southern border through tunnels. They aren’t that stupid.
SECURE OUR BORDERS! The Democrats could care less about our safety!!!!👹
John Carty Wow do you need a history lesson. Reign of terror? lmao
Its amazing what this country turned into! Just because the dems dont like my president that is doing a great job they refuse to give him anything. In my mind this is the worst case of treason ive ever seen dems should be in jail unreal! Keep up the good fight mr president and ty for all your dealing with to try to save our country!!
Its amazing what this country turned into! Just because the dems dont like my president that is doing a great job they refuse to give him anything. In my mind this is the worst case of treason ive ever seen dems should be in jail unreal! Keep up the good fight mr president and ty for all your dealing with to try to save our country!!
Ramon Rodriguez you could self deport...as an option
Jill Travassos I’m just so frustrated people don’t see the logic in this.
Gale Petroski They are rotting their brains with all the hate!!
Ramon Rodriguez you could self deport...as an option
Gale Petroski They are rotting their brains with all the hate!!
Sherry Waldie Smith Oh they see the logic, they just HATE this man so much they can think of nothing else - how to get him.  It is disgraceful!
Charles Burger You are using too much reason.     Wall, Trump need wall.  Brown people bad!  Take your jobs, and collect unemployment!   Wall now, or else!
Barbara Hernandez You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Charles Burger You are using too much reason.     Wall, Trump need wall.  Brown people bad!  Take your jobs, and collect unemployment!   Wall now, or else!
Barbara Hernandez You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Do NOT cave on this Mr President!  Build that wall!!!
There was a time i hated trump because as an African the only news network we can afford  is CNN but to know what he stands for & his commitment to do it changed my mind. because i love my country & a person who loves his country with all is what all countries need & trump is that person.
Yep Why does Nancy Polosi have a wall around her house ?
Yes genius,. continue to love and pray for your blasphemous, unwitting, inept bungling goofus as he single handedly dismantles the organizations that have protected the free world from aggression since 1945.  Hooray for his restocking the swamp with anti environmentalists sucked up from the bowels of corporate America.  Most importantly thank the Buffoon and Chief for attempting to create a space force that already exists and finally, for attempting to build a wall constructed from hate and unmitigated bullshit on our southern border.😵
Gene Kutina he is wonderful and the crap you speak of is nothing that is high on our priorities.   Get a real life.  We love this President.   He is everything g we need and God's gift to USA.  We want and need a wall.  Would suggest you pack your bags and leave USA because he is there 2020 and beyond.  Just look at his rallies   No one else comes close...when you leave take your wimpy men with you...
Yep Why does Nancy Polosi have a wall around her house ?
Gene Kutina he is wonderful and the crap you speak of is nothing that is high on our priorities.   Get a real life.  We love this President.   He is everything g we need and God's gift to USA.  We want and need a wall.  Would suggest you pack your bags and leave USA because he is there 2020 and beyond.  Just look at his rallies   No one else comes close...when you leave take your wimpy men with you...
Sunni Dorman Moseley YOU GOT THAT RIGHT.....DEMOCRATS WANT A CIVIL WAR....THEY WILL REGRET IT...IF IT HAPPENS.....IT WILL BE THE END OF THEIR PARTY AS THEY KNOW OF IT
Sunni Dorman Moseley  I have said the same thing since he won. Secretly I said it before he won because I didn’t want to argue about it with anyone 😂 but I totally agree with you. #womenfortrump #maga2020trump
Yes genius,. continue to love and pray for your blasphemous, unwitting, inept bungling goofus as he single handedly dismantles the organizations that have protected the free world from aggression since 1945.  Hooray for his restocking the swamp with anti environmentalists sucked up from the bowels of corporate America.  Most importantly thank the Buffoon and Chief for attempting to create a space force that already exists and finally, for attempting to build a wall constructed from hate and unmitigated bullshit on our southern border.😵
Sunni Dorman Moseley  I have said the same thing since he won. Secretly I said it before he won because I didn’t want to argue about it with anyone 😂 but I totally agree with you. #womenfortrump #maga2020trump
Spoken like a true fascist.    Why do you hate America?
Worley Michael Bwhahahahahahahahaha
Sunni Dorman Moseley You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Worley Michael Bwhahahahahahahahaha
Spoken like a true fascist.    Why do you hate America?
The only thing he should hang for is treason.
The only thing he should hang for is treason.
all American love you 🇺🇸
Frances Hartley so true!
This especially pertains to DemocRATs and RINO RepubliCONs: "No man's life, liberty, or property are safe while the legislature is in session." -- Mark Twain
all American love you 🇺🇸
This especially pertains to DemocRATs and RINO RepubliCONs: "No man's life, liberty, or property are safe while the legislature is in session." -- Mark Twain
Wanda Martin by starving children and elderly people? Or increasing the homeless population by thousands to millions? Ya...I feel sooooo safe
Frances Hartley so true!
Cheyenne Swift What are you talking about?
Plz continue to secure our borders,  build the wall , God bless
CM Garner , you do know our president is crooked, Right? You do know trump is Putin's puppet? Right? You are aware that most of the people around trump  are getting arrested for real crimes, Right? How much more do you need, and just last night Giuliani finally told the truth about Russia and trumps campaign.  So it's only a short matter of time before the rest of the truth about out criminal treasonous president comes out.
Plz continue to secure our borders,  build the wall , God bless
CM Garner I get it, you're a Russian bots, paid to post propaganda. You even have lovely pictures of that russian POS murder  Putin on your Facebook page.  Facebook has confirmed that all those bogus/fake  news pages about Hillary  during the election were in fact fake,  paid for by the Russians.  Drop dead you commie bastard.
Tif Duff TROLL!!
Sherri Giddings Latimer so that's how the right memes, huh? Yikes.
Why should I leave when the #1 argument for those coming is "stay and fix your own country"? Your arguments arent even consistent with each other. Should I flee bc I dont like the state of my country or should I stay and try to fix the problems? Which is it, buddy?
The amount of money we spend on illeagal immigrants,could definitely be spent to improve our Country! We can agree on something......
Yeah.... right. Keep watching CNN.
CM Garner I get it, you're a Russian bots, paid to post propaganda. You even have lovely pictures of that russian POS murder  Putin on your Facebook page.  Facebook has confirmed that all those bogus/fake  news pages about Hillary  during the election were in fact fake,  paid for by the Russians.  Drop dead you commie bastard.
Tif Duff Trump fixed so many problems already, INCLUDING the jail situation, as you so much wanted him to do. Seriously, can you give the man some time to do the best job as president than anyone else has ever done? He's not a communist, so you aren't going to get all that free stuff you want. Get a job.
Michael Hale mm, yall keep saying these people arent seeking asylum and are illegal. Illegal immigrants dont qualify any sort of free programs or government assistance.
Colleen Kandra I was 🤷‍♀️ I'm not complaining a out Obama NOW bc he isnt relevant anymore as hes not president. How come you can't answer my question?
Still waiting too get a answer.What 77 countries are you talking about.Come on,where is the list????
Colleen Kandra I was 🤷‍♀️ I'm not complaining a out Obama NOW bc he isnt relevant anymore as hes not president. How come you can't answer my question?
Charles Burger. Do your own research.
Remember when Trump set up a commission to try to prove that illegal immigrants were voting? They found nothing.
But Fox News toldz him dey waz?!
Charles Burger. Do your own research.
But Fox News toldz him dey waz?!
It shows, he is just winging it and if it goes bad just blame the flag or this wall
Remember when Trump set up a commission to try to prove that illegal immigrants were voting? They found nothing.
It shows, he is just winging it and if it goes bad just blame the flag or this wall
President Trump does everything in his power to keep America safe. To bad Pelosis Congress won't get on board.
Kolja Beckmann what are you talking about? Germany is one of the safest, if not the safest country in the world. So what if they let a bunch of Islamic refugees in, what have they done to Germany that is so bad? Besides crime, rapes, child grooming, attacks on Germans etc etc.....
Kolja Beckmann the sad part is that a lot Democrats think open borders are a good idea but they dont live in a country destroyed or being destroyed by open borders.
President Trump does everything in his power to keep America safe. To bad Pelosis Congress won't get on board.
Kolja Beckmann the sad part is that a lot Democrats think open borders are a good idea but they dont live in a country destroyed or being destroyed by open borders.
Will Titus That might be one of the dumbest things I’ve heard
Barry Davis you need to get out more. You spend too much time in your parents basement.
Sorry
Kolja Beckmann what are you talking about? Germany is one of the safest, if not the safest country in the world. So what if they let a bunch of Islamic refugees in, what have they done to Germany that is so bad? Besides crime, rapes, child grooming, attacks on Germans etc etc.....
Sorry
What’s the weather like is Moscow this time of year “Maxine”?
Worley Michael Proof-read your post so it makes some sense or is that how they talk in Mexico?
Barry Davis you need to get out more. You spend too much time in your parents basement.
Worley Michael Proof-read your post so it makes some sense or is that how they talk in Mexico?
You should hold your breath while waiting for what  you asked for. It will make it happen faster for you.
Jeremy Stephens you got nothin.
Worley Michael like I said you got nothin...go milk your unicorn and clean your room before you mom gets home from turnin tricks.
Aww I think we triggered the little trumpcuck.    Are you afraid that Putin’s cockholster is going down?  I love how Barr duped your dipshit orange clown into thinking he was against Mueller.    You know Mueller is a republican right?  He is just one of the few that still has some balls.
Worley Michael you still got nothin.
What’s the weather like is Moscow this time of year “Maxine”?
Worley Michael you still got nothin.
Dear Me President  Please call for. State of emergency call the bluff of the Democratic Party. Security in our country is vulnerable right now people using boats to come because our coast guard don’t have the man power that mean more drugs. The people of the United States are behind you, we want our people to get paid but we also need border security and the only way to get that is to use your power card. The Democratic don’t want to come to the table you have given them ample time. Now it’s time to put this country first. 🇺🇸
Dear Me President  Please call for. State of emergency call the bluff of the Democratic Party. Security in our country is vulnerable right now people using boats to come because our coast guard don’t have the man power that mean more drugs. The people of the United States are behind you, we want our people to get paid but we also need border security and the only way to get that is to use your power card. The Democratic don’t want to come to the table you have given them ample time. Now it’s time to put this country first. 🇺🇸
If so important why didn't you do something two years ago instead of that tax reform.  Because it was not important until you created a humanitarian crisis.  You the Liar!!!!!!!
Diane Hozjan how dare someone pray! Those heathens! Don’t they know there is no god? That’s what you meant, right? 🤪
Diane Hozjan You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Charlie Daboub please learn the voting process.
Martha Pickens  Yes, he couldn’t get enough votes to get this ridiculous piece of egoism passed when the republicans held both houses. What in the world makes him think it will happen now?
Lol. And if you believe that, I’ve got some swamp property to sell you. When did the intelligence of the American people drop into single digits?
If so important why didn't you do something two years ago instead of that tax reform.  Because it was not important until you created a humanitarian crisis.  You the Liar!!!!!!!
Lol. And if you believe that, I’ve got some swamp property to sell you. When did the intelligence of the American people drop into single digits?
How much do you know about what you are talking about? The wall in Germany was built to keep people from leaving the country.Our wall is for the protection of Americans. There is no comparison. I will get the Dems will believe the that comparison because the government that tried to keep people under control is the very government Dems are building.
Its working great in HEAVEN! The only open borders lead straight to Hell! I have noticed no prisons having issues with walls nor the Vatican or any of Congress! Ask Obama he sure built a big ole wall around his place! Hypocrites. Gotta love'em ha!
wow man go back to history class.  The Berline wall divided a country and neither side wanted to be divided.  Our American wall will divide two seperate coutnries who want to be seperate countries.
Bobb Marly the point was, did the wall solve any problems, and if so, why does it not exist today?
Martha Pickens  Yes, he couldn’t get enough votes to get this ridiculous piece of egoism passed when the republicans held both houses. What in the world makes him think it will happen now?
Bobb Marly the point was, did the wall solve any problems, and if so, why does it not exist today?
wow man go back to history class.  The Berline wall divided a country and neither side wanted to be divided.  Our American wall will divide two seperate coutnries who want to be seperate countries.
Build it for Pete’s sake it has to be done
Agree 100%.we need the wall.
John Ulsh yes and if I enter Canada illegally, am i breaking your Canadian laws or not ? Also , do you have any idea what it requires to immigrate legally to cabana ? FYI
Borders? Never heard about protected border in EU... Sadly. Maybe some legend from XX years ago.
https://www.facebook.com/100011042624731/posts/757414017970012/ Buck Strunk
Another uneducated cockwomble living in a bubble
Neither do we. Just because he says it doesn't make it true.
Every country in the EU has open borders. Infact most borders are largely open in the absence of war
Agree 100%.we need the wall.
Tim Davidson You are a Fool!
Ricky Miles the Hell I would claim that Assclown Trump as my President .My President was Ronald Reagan ,George HW Bush .George w Bush, Jimmy Carter .Bill Clinton and Barack Obama and you can add John F Kennedy Dwight e Eisenhower Abraham Lincoln Franklin Delano Roosevelt
Every country in the EU has open borders. Infact most borders are largely open in the absence of war
Danielle Moore   dufus....
Patrick Benthin and look at how they are over run with two-legged vermin.
Nick Amato The question was when, not why.
Patrick Benthin And everyone of those country's have major immigration problems
other country's have tougher laws and enforce them ...in other country's if you steal you get your hand cut off, here you get a slap on the hand... other country's if you kill someone you get put In front of a firing squad,  here you get 20 years of appeals till your unfit for death...see the difference we need stricter laws and to enforce them..
Nick Amato The question was when, not why.
Isaiah Marquiss smart?
Barbara Anderson what the f*** do you know? There are hundreds of miles of border with no one watching and people just streaming across. Guess where I live. Now think about where you live. Butt out stupid
Natasha Bitter Russia
Bakhtyar Abdullah Either do it legally, or make your country amazing!  Nothing wrong with that!
Catherine Ott Walls are put where needed.
Stupid lol....
Buck Strunk THANK YOU 🙌🏻🙏🏻👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼🇺🇸
Stupid lol....
Liberalism is a disease!
Buck Strunk yes, there are many other countries in Europe for example.. Had you ever been out of the United States?
Buck-  We don’t  have  open  borders  and  despite  what  the  lying  dimwit  in the  White House  says,  the  Democrats  are  not  in  favor  of  open  borders.
Buck Strunk AMEN
because the "educated" has mistaken a sculptors inscription for law....and no one can get through to them that though we invite anyone to come, there is a right way..
Laurie Dunco and the REPUBLICANS are spending like crazy
We don't! Ptf, you believe every little thing he says.
Absolute moron. All of the EU has open borders.
Which part of "Donald Trump is a shifty piece of garbage" were you folks too stupid to comprehend?  https://aol.it/2syE6Zk
Buck Strunk Canada has border crossings but no wall yet so our border is open. FYI
Buck Strunk what is the difference between me and you,your country is rich but my country is no many so i want live in amazing country,thats wrong?
Shannon gee do I need to report you to the authorities.you worry me.do you have dead bodies hidden in your basement.
Uhm....you need to educate yourself with a map, and how are your borders open?
Buck Strunk lie
NRA spent $30 million on pro-Trump endorsements in 2016. Where did that money come from? https://www.newsweek.com/nra-admits-accepting-money-23-russia-linked-donors-882310?fbclid=IwAR015PHN88-ca9ZgQGvoX1CHlHUrxPcvMV0DOU3waskM3xsJFvwY4PL7jkw
Buck Strunk is that your real name fucktard?
Buck Strunk your president needs you immediately  volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money go go
Glenn N Dansker which they do their business on, than laugh about how the lettuce and vegetables were recalled.
Buck Strunk No it doesn’t. The biggest wall in the world is the Great Wall of China. The Vatican has a wall like many town/ cities in Italy when it was made up of city states prior to becoming a nation. Lots of cities across Europe have walls, built during the medieval period not this century or the last. Examples such as the Vatican  are not a valid comparison to Trump’s plan.
Buck Strunk we don’t have open borders? Idiot.
Wrong, check your facts, you sound like trump.
Buck Strunk  Australia has open borders.
Stan Pierce How does Israel have anything to do with anything that I said?
What the hell are you talking about?
Glenn N Dansker which they do their business on, than laugh about how the lettuce and vegetables were recalled.
I'm guessing you don't live in the EU. Here everyone has open borders and every country is full of immigrants. It's fucking awful
Buck Strunk So we should do what other countries do?
Because nobody else has borders probably
To set an example.
Buck Strunk we do not have open borders
What the hell are you talking about?
Lonnie McAfee ok give us you address and we can send some illegals to your house. I pray no one you know gets killed by any illegals. You would change your mind on that.
Buck Strunk we don’t have open borders, stop believing everything Trump says....
Fernando Volquez you are not that stupid to think that no one has walls to protect their borders are you. I don’t know you so maybe you are. Let me enlighten you some do. Shut for brains
Spoken like a true follower. Read closely what you wrote. I can see why you like puppet, no I'm not a puppet, puppet celebrity apprentice President.
This is quite literally untrue.
Buck Strunk Not True. Almost all of Europe has appendix border. I will be in Switzerland and all I need is a Visa. Do not talk if you do not know. You are an ignorant.
Spoken like a true follower. Read closely what you wrote. I can see why you like puppet, no I'm not a puppet, puppet celebrity apprentice President.
Buck Strunk, not true, the USA border has never been 'open'.    Except the one square mile , The Vatican, has no continuous fence/wall.
Buck Strunk Wrong, as pointed out here. But that's these other countries' misfortune and bad judgement.
Buck Strunk especially at the expense of TSA and and Air Traffic Controllers. WTF!?!?
Buck Strunk Not True. Almost all of Europe has appendix border. I will be in Switzerland and all I need is a Visa. Do not talk if you do not know. You are an ignorant.
Blaine Tundler I hate liars, and your good at it, also I didn't know they let monkeys at the zoo cut hair, What a disaster.
Well, UK kind of does. It hasn't gone so well at all. Hahaha
No freebies, need more security, we love president trump koodos to him for all Americans
Buck Strunk especially at the expense of TSA and and Air Traffic Controllers. WTF!?!?
Dump as Trump howw do you kinow that ozher nation have cloesed Boders MORON , Have youl been ever one sterpp out of your County or USA, How muchg did Travel to other Continets . I GUSS NEVER, Therefore sgutup lowmaned stupid uneducated Trumpee , stay in your Trailer Park and dont write such a Bullshit. unbelivable what Morons are in USA .🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮
No freebies, need more security, we love president trump koodos to him for all Americans
Buck Strunk we do not have open borders.  Think better.
Marcus Nizza ya and they are revolting against their government now lol
Because if we have open borders then all the invaders will come and overload the systems and break down the United States. Then the globalist can move forward with the new world order.
Problem with many Yanks is they got tunnel vision...We expecting the rest of Zimbabwe very soon....millions here already...draining our already overstretched resoures...dont put up the wall and that's gonna be your lot..disease,crime and general derogation...look at South Africa and see your DOOM...
Friends. Have you people joined the team Trump yet? Please join, so we become more effective. Thank you.
Mexico and Canada
Dump as Trump howw do you kinow that ozher nation have cloesed Boders MORON , Have youl been ever one sterpp out of your County or USA, How muchg did Travel to other Continets . I GUSS NEVER, Therefore sgutup lowmaned stupid uneducated Trumpee , stay in your Trailer Park and dont write such a Bullshit. unbelivable what Morons are in USA .🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮
Raul Andres Gonzalez Sr. Wrong!
It's a TRAP !!!!!!! 😈
Ranting In Reality its fact 🐸☕️
Does Canada have a wall? 🤔
Keith Webber Jr.  Actually, anyone that is here because they have overstayed their visa Is Trumps fault. Remember, he said he was going to round every illegal up and report them.
Marcus Nizza it is a Desaster.
Buck Strunk so are you saying you are not free?
Mexico and Canada
Christina Messa drugs are the problem concentrate on the problem not a midevil wall that can be breeched over under around or through
Buck Strunk your borders aren’t open... and they wouldn’t be if a wall fails to suffice. do you even look anything up or get your info straight from the hog?
Buck Strunk they aren’t open here either
Buck Strunk Have You Never Heard Of The Great Wall Of China?
Buck Strunk NO ONE wants open borders doofus! Quit drinking the faux koolaid
Blaine Tundler   You will be waiting quite a while. No one is against border security. Absolutely no one. The only debate is how most effectively and cost-effectively to do it. I know my math is a little rough, but I understand this wall will cost about $30 billion. A virtual wall can be created for around 1 billion. He’s been offered 1.6 billion already to upgrade and repair existing structure. The $27.4 billion difference could pay an additional 4750 border patrol agents for 100 years. In my book, that’s a hell of a lot better idea than borrowing another $30 billion from China and paying interest on it.
Buck Strunk so are you saying you are not free?
Buck Strunk yes they do.  All the bad ones can come live with you or by you and your kids.
Buck Strunk Uh, we don’t have open borders.
Blaine Tundler   You will be waiting quite a while. No one is against border security. Absolutely no one. The only debate is how most effectively and cost-effectively to do it. I know my math is a little rough, but I understand this wall will cost about $30 billion. A virtual wall can be created for around 1 billion. He’s been offered 1.6 billion already to upgrade and repair existing structure. The $27.4 billion difference could pay an additional 4750 border patrol agents for 100 years. In my book, that’s a hell of a lot better idea than borrowing another $30 billion from China and paying interest on it.
Buck Strunk no other country has a wall around it. Canada, Russia, China, Brazil none has a border wall.
Try not being hysterical open borders is not what we are talking about
Buck Strunk yea our borders arent "open" theres a fence buddy
Buck Strunk , all countries under international law are required to accept people seeking asylum. Get educated before you speak.
We do not have open borders you cultist
Que ridículos son e.U
Jajsjsjajaj
Solo son ustedes basura
Horacio Daniel Hernandez and the Vatican's gold is more precious than American's lives?
Joseph Hart ... they all get paid, dumbass....
Buck Strunk
That was great
Buck Strunk yea our borders arent "open" theres a fence buddy
Buck Strunk Canada?
Jason Mills walls and fencing works! Ask Nancy & Chuck. They have them around their palaces to keep people like you out!
Buck Strunk stupid as remark
Buck Strunk What about the Great Wall in China? That is the worlds largest wall & China was still invaded by the Mongols! Not by imaginary caravans!
Buddy Phillips only to stop my dog from escaping....
If all is said and done and the political arguments are passed again and again, more fluently each time, like a complicated classic dance, the Potus has the ultimate responsibility for US security: "Buck stops here". That said, a compromise is always to be advocated if both parties want that. (some guarantees for "Dreamers" in exchange for funding the Wall. That wasn't perhaps a bad idea.Like in the Agent Starling/ Hannibal Lector scene: "Quid quo pro Doctor".)
That was great
https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/ppx7b9/a-brief-history-of-donald-trump-and-the-mafia
We've never had opwn borders, idiot.
Renate Elhart because you lot fund the bombs that drive them out their own countries.!
You don't have open borders. Stop being an idiot.
Mike Maynard ask the local businesses who hire if they care...lol...they don't and won't unless you string a few up every day until they respect you...lol...that's NOT going to happen... Businessmen are toooo greedy...plus you are subsidizing their workers very nicely...and they have lowered their taxes so you pay even more...you're the fool for thinking gov isn't helping business...
Europe is falling apart with its open door massive immigration and illegal immigration policy. Canada same crap under commie Trudeau.
Stephen DeVoy yea look at Europe right now. They are being raped pillaged and burned and the police do nothing. Open borders must be working. Not!   Right now common people are rejecting this idea. Common folks have donned yellow vest in France and fighting to take back France. So there’s hope folks!
If all is said and done and the political arguments are passed again and again, more fluently each time, like a complicated classic dance, the Potus has the ultimate responsibility for US security: "Buck stops here". That said, a compromise is always to be advocated if both parties want that. (some guarantees for "Dreamers" in exchange for funding the Wall. That wasn't perhaps a bad idea.Like in the Agent Starling/ Hannibal Lector scene: "Quid quo pro Doctor".)
Mike Maynard That is not true at all. No Democrat ever has called for open borders. Republicans just like to say that's what Democrats want. But no Democrat has ever said that. If you do not have a social security number you can't vote in the US. So no illegals can vote for Democrats or Republicans. Democrats win more often then Republicans, because they show human compassion more often then Republicans. The vast majority of the people in this country want that from their leaders more then the strong arm approach. You don't have to agree with me on the surface. But just think critically as to why the last three Republican presidents only won the electoral college and not the popular vote, while the last 3 Democratic presidents won the electoral college and the popular vote.
Buck Strunk try China for the biggest wall.... you bigly fucknugget
Dumb ineffective wall to climb or fly over, swim or boat around, tunnel under, blast or cut through. Pure ignorance, from ignorant play president. He wants a government shutdown to golf more. Lazy crybaby babbling incoherent corrupt conman prick.
There are far more criminals and murderers  that are white Americans ,  not to mention all the other American gangs and criminals than the 0.0132% of illegals that are criminals. Most drugs come through check points, human bodies, planes, etc. Hell, the drug cartels, can spend an extra couple of hundred dollars to go to Canada first then here. I mean damn...they have submarines and bring them all up and down the coast. You think an ignorant wall will stop them, lmbo! They are laughing at us!
Stephen DeVoy yea look at Europe right now. They are being raped pillaged and burned and the police do nothing. Open borders must be working. Not!   Right now common people are rejecting this idea. Common folks have donned yellow vest in France and fighting to take back France. So there’s hope folks!
Lonnie McAfee or how many of us have them not to keep people out, but to,keep livestock like say sheep in?
Diana Berger only if you Russian bots suddenly grow bodies and build it yourselves. We won't be held hostage by a spoiled man child with no leadership,abilities.
Noble Loria not true if by open borders you mean any one can enter without permit from the country authorities.
Kevin Huth those countries that have walls are under attack by pretty much everyone omg . Walls are for war , which I'm sure trump already has a plan for how much he will make off it . More border security at all ports of entry is the issue . The wall is for you idiots 🙄
Buck Strunk we  are. America. . America  is and will always be the melting  pot of all nations
Buck Strunk we don't you nut
Trump supporters , you have no relevance. You are a Trump supporter. You obviously have no common sense, no morals, and are too gullible to have an intellectual opinion, since you are dumb enough to support Trump. You have been conned. A damn wall really? A wall to swim or boat around, because the wall can't block waterways. A wall to dig under, because they haven't been building mile long tunnels across the border already. A wall they can't climb over, blast or cut through like they have done. A wall they can't fly over....I mean, Trump supporters have no common sense, to know it's a waste of money. Especially, when we have a homeless problem and places like Flint!
Tom Peden travelling outside the US might give you some perspective.
👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼
Stephen DeVoy please mention one
Paul Burton that's not what open borders means.
Buck Strunk we don't you nut
Buddy Phillips you red neck get a life you loser
Really so the EU funded wall between Syria and Hungary says what?
Stephen DeVoy and you are so democrat
We don't you fucking idiot, Jesus Christ.  Clearly never had to wait hours to cross the border.
Paul Burton that's not what open borders means.
Buck Strunk schengen?
Renate Elhart there is no mess lol
Buck Strunk we don’t wow!
Buck Strunk so when will you be writing the CHECK!! #45fakepresidentwithhelpfromrussia. FOOL
Is that a real name?
Laurie Dunco, and that's because it doesn't benefit them.
Zulu Dalek yez
Buck Strunk Most other countries have open borders.
Stu Brierley shithole
Buck Strunk the 28 countries in the European Union have open borders. Try escaping your little bubble, the world is bigger than the US
😂😂😂😂🤔
Roy J. Freeman, here you go, you lazy and illiterate git.  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Open_border
Blaine Tundler what are they calling then, they want open borders there other way to explain it
Uhm... we don't. You don't need a wall to have border security
Buck Strunk to bad the people who are brave enough to stand at that boarder and protect the nation didn’t get paid thanks to his wall.   #paythecoastguard #paydhs
Buck Strunk I don't believe the US has ever had open borders.   Maybe you're just a twat?
Buck Strunk I don't believe the US has ever had open borders.   Maybe you're just a twat?
Continue to stand fast. Border security is vital. Thank you for ignoring the ignorance and selfish interests behind the opposition. That's what true leadership is about, forging ahead in the toughest of times, doing the right thing long before others discern the need.🇺🇸
Dianne Moore cause we have never been safe? Come on! Wow
Continue to stand fast. Border security is vital. Thank you for ignoring the ignorance and selfish interests behind the opposition. That's what true leadership is about, forging ahead in the toughest of times, doing the right thing long before others discern the need.🇺🇸
Jody Radtke Vie -WAKE UP...  Annual cost of illegal immigration: OVER $84 BILLION. Yet Democrats will NOT spend 5 BILLION to keep Americans safe & stop drugs. Wake up Taxpayers! #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸
JL Schermerhorn no its the OTHER ADMINISTRATION'S THAT everyone cheered and gave wall money to....who LIED AND DID NOTHING!! Where is your blame for them? Oh thats right the liberal paid media only Trump bash 24/7 for over two years BECAUSE THEY ARE PAID TO BY THE DNC/HILLARY CLINTON! Because she lost.....TWICE!! Maybe we would not be in this situation if they walked their talk....but Democrats just talk the talk! That was proven with 8 crap years of Obama!
The prefect metaphor for Trump supporters is a person who finds a piece of garbage on the ground and thinks it's a $100 bill. When you point it out the the person, that it's, actually, trash; instead of throwing the garbage away and saying, "thanks, " They point to another piece of garbage and SCREAM at you, "WHAT ABOUT THAT TRASH, THOUGH?!  THAT'S GARBAGE, TOO RIGHT? YOU DON'T HAVE A PROBLEM WITH THAT TRASH"  Sure - but I'm talking about the piece of garbage in your hand, that, still, isn't a $100 bill.
Punch line: I'm not a Democrat. I like Ike and Lincoln - they are ROLLING IN THEIR GRAVES AT THIS MONSTER.
Jody Radtke Vie -WAKE UP...  Annual cost of illegal immigration: OVER $84 BILLION. Yet Democrats will NOT spend 5 BILLION to keep Americans safe & stop drugs. Wake up Taxpayers! #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸
Punch line: I'm not a Democrat. I like Ike and Lincoln - they are ROLLING IN THEIR GRAVES AT THIS MONSTER.
A wall is to save our sovereign state from foreign countries  or terrorist.   Dumbass
The prefect metaphor for Trump supporters is a person who finds a piece of garbage on the ground and thinks it's a $100 bill. When you point it out the the person, that it's, actually, trash; instead of throwing the garbage away and saying, "thanks, " They point to another piece of garbage and SCREAM at you, "WHAT ABOUT THAT TRASH, THOUGH?!  THAT'S GARBAGE, TOO RIGHT? YOU DON'T HAVE A PROBLEM WITH THAT TRASH"  Sure - but I'm talking about the piece of garbage in your hand, that, still, isn't a $100 bill.
A wall is to save our sovereign state from foreign countries  or terrorist.   Dumbass
Yes! We’ve got your back, Mr. President!
William Taylor waaa! Get over it and stand up to humpty dumpty trumpty
Yes! We’ve got your back, Mr. President!
William Taylor waaa! Get over it and stand up to humpty dumpty trumpty
Umm that's only 1 one of your many jobs. . . Meanwhile you aren't doing any of them well.
Nhanha Yhaa Bankkz not today.
Umm that's only 1 one of your many jobs. . . Meanwhile you aren't doing any of them well.
Nhanha Yhaa Bankkz not today.
“If you tell a lie big enough and keep repeating it, people will eventually come to believe it. The lie can be maintained only for such time as the State can shield the people from the political, economic and/or military consequences of the lie. It thus becomes vitally important for the State to use all of its powers to repress dissent, for the truth is the mortal enemy of the lie, and thus by extension, the truth is the greatest enemy of the State.”
WAKE UP PEOPLE... Dems don't want the wall because "DRUG MONEY" is being funneled directly into the DNC's pockets. - - #America1ST💯 #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸️
Jill Earnhardt Go and read Michael Cohen’s tweet, honey.
Alix Kruz Turns out you are full of crap. Prove it!
Karen Hare Seale His lawyer is admitting it. Don’t know how much more proof you need, but I’m 100% sure you’ll just flag it down as “Fake News” because you’ve been fed crap from the start and regurgitate that when ever you hear something you don’t like.
WAKE UP PEOPLE... Dems don't want the wall because "DRUG MONEY" is being funneled directly into the DNC's pockets. - - #America1ST💯 #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸️
Karen Hare Seale His lawyer is admitting it. Don’t know how much more proof you need, but I’m 100% sure you’ll just flag it down as “Fake News” because you’ve been fed crap from the start and regurgitate that when ever you hear something you don’t like.
Doris Caruth ohhh u mean like the man in charge starving half the nation??? Where's the wall to protect us from him?
Alix Kruz Turns out you are full of crap. Prove it!
Doris Caruth ohhh u mean like the man in charge starving half the nation??? Where's the wall to protect us from him?
Thank you President Trump! God bless you and God bless America! Build the Wall sir
Leslie Battee Andre MILITARY IS BEING PAID! YOUR WELCOME! Did you ask Congress why they are getting paid? Nancy? Chuck? Nah....they were vacationing lol
They’re getting paid because of Donald Trump’s signature. Also, your GOP members of Congress are getting paid as well, you dumb motherfucker
Thank you President Trump! God bless you and God bless America! Build the Wall sir
They’re getting paid because of Donald Trump’s signature. Also, your GOP members of Congress are getting paid as well, you dumb motherfucker
سوف يقع الجدار في النار
Leslie Battee Andre MILITARY IS BEING PAID! YOUR WELCOME! Did you ask Congress why they are getting paid? Nancy? Chuck? Nah....they were vacationing lol
سوف يقع الجدار في النار
I never said income taxes. I said taxes. Everything they buy here, they pay taxes on. Just like you or me.
That’s a dead link Cindy. Feel free to try again.
Brian Nixon oh sales tax. Why would they get that back, do we?
Brian Nixon also this is not related, but I noticed your recent post, and I agree that wildfires are a terrible issue. I'm unsure, then, why house democrats rejected a proposed bill for increased funding towards wildfire prevention methods?
Mr President you have my support one hundred percent. As the great grand daughter of immigrants who came here the right way.....by right way I mean they didn't sneak or try to push their way in....I say kudos for taking on this fight and not simply whimping out and passing it on to the next administration .
COULD YOU PLEASE GET GOVERNMENT OUT OF MEDICAL CARE ! I DONT APPRECIATE DOCTORS WRITING PRESCRIPTIONS WITH THE INTENTON OF HARMING THE PATIENT ! WHAT HAPPENED TO THE DOCTORS MOTTO OF FIRST DO NO HARM ! THIS IS THE RESULT OF obomocare !
Brian Nixon also this is not related, but I noticed your recent post, and I agree that wildfires are a terrible issue. I'm unsure, then, why house democrats rejected a proposed bill for increased funding towards wildfire prevention methods?
Shut it down under furlough! Drain that swamp!
سوف يقع الجدار في النار
Shut it down under furlough! Drain that swamp!
سوف يقع الجدار في النار
Charlie Daboub liar
Charlie Daboub, Honestly no.. I'm just saying I think a good idea...
Lee Grant whether he's right or not I still feel how I feel I still feel we should build the wall Democrats in anybody else that don't like it the live on the other f****** side of it not for nothing but I work my ass off to send my kid to college and now immigrants get to come here and go to college and s*** for free so let me ask the people something that don't want the Wall.. if us Americans went to their country do you think that they would honestly give us what we give them, food, housing, health Insurance, and now free college education! BULLSHIT!
Lisa Golden I think it’s not a bad idea for sure. For the life of me I just don’t know why he didn’t get this in the works when he had all three branches of government.
I didn't get paid but don't let that stop you president Trump keep fighting for the wall I'm behind you if I lose it all. I can always ask for the freebies if American citizens are eligible.
Lisa Golden I think it’s not a bad idea for sure. For the life of me I just don’t know why he didn’t get this in the works when he had all three branches of government.
Steven Brickhouse You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Charlie Daboub that's an easy one.... to build the wall requires funds. Since we have 3 or 4 rino's it was blocked. Trump even stated he would be ok with it not getting approved in 2018 but he would put up a fight for it in 2019..... hence, we are here and he isn't rolling over like the way republicans have been known to do for the last 20 years.  Let me know if you need anymore schooling.......
Lee Grant whether he's right or not I still feel how I feel I still feel we should build the wall Democrats in anybody else that don't like it the live on the other f****** side of it not for nothing but I work my ass off to send my kid to college and now immigrants get to come here and go to college and s*** for free so let me ask the people something that don't want the Wall.. if us Americans went to their country do you think that they would honestly give us what we give them, food, housing, health Insurance, and now free college education! BULLSHIT!
Charlie Daboub that's an easy one.... to build the wall requires funds. Since we have 3 or 4 rino's it was blocked. Trump even stated he would be ok with it not getting approved in 2018 but he would put up a fight for it in 2019..... hence, we are here and he isn't rolling over like the way republicans have been known to do for the last 20 years.  Let me know if you need anymore schooling.......
Greatest President ever 🇺🇸
Mike Hall and the democrats
Mike Hall you all seem well read.
Greatest President ever 🇺🇸
Mike Hall you all seem well read.
Mike Hall and the democrats
So happy you are our President! Thank you for protecting Americans!
So happy you are our President! Thank you for protecting Americans!
Think maybe he is Andrew Jackson come back to remind the House and Senate that the Constitution institutes a Chief Executive and neither the House nor Senate have authority over his execution of his Constitutional duties.  Pelosi is really beginning to come across as having mental problems...those of us who have seen our parents turn into our great-grand parents will know what I’m talking about.  Make me wonder who is taking care of her and Chucky Baby who both seem headed in that direction.  Really need leadership; not senile obstinacy.
Thank you, President Trump! Stand strong for the People's WALL
Think maybe he is Andrew Jackson come back to remind the House and Senate that the Constitution institutes a Chief Executive and neither the House nor Senate have authority over his execution of his Constitutional duties.  Pelosi is really beginning to come across as having mental problems...those of us who have seen our parents turn into our great-grand parents will know what I’m talking about.  Make me wonder who is taking care of her and Chucky Baby who both seem headed in that direction.  Really need leadership; not senile obstinacy.
Thank you, President Trump! Stand strong for the People's WALL
I fully agree! Please don't give in Mr. President. 🇺🇲😎
I fully agree! Please don't give in Mr. President. 🇺🇲😎
Jim Cavo Gaff theres 33million undocumented illegals you and I support, and not by choice!
Darlene Sinatra DEMOCRATS ARE NOTHING BUT DOMESTIC TERRORISTS
Webster Lynn YOU ARE CORRECT ON ALL COUNTS
Jim Cavo Gaff theres 33million undocumented illegals you and I support, and not by choice!
Webster Lynn YOU ARE CORRECT ON ALL COUNTS
Shanna Jones most mass shootings have been committed by emigrants from other countries, research it before making an uneducated statement
Roman Wood ooh i would love to see a source for that one.
so you are ok with 1 our of every 3 woman being sexually assaulted because they have been duped by coyotes to come to this country illegally?
Roman Wood according my damn television, common sense and NewsWeekly...54% of the mass shootings in America were carried out by white males!!! You look it up...I know the truth hurts...
Darlene Sinatra DEMOCRATS ARE NOTHING BUT DOMESTIC TERRORISTS
Roman Wood according my damn television, common sense and NewsWeekly...54% of the mass shootings in America were carried out by white males!!! You look it up...I know the truth hurts...
Okay then tell me what were we before all of this commotion and divisive rhetoric?
What comes through the legal entrances can be controled and tracked because they have security.  Things that come through an unsecure border can not.
Barb Thornberry do you know more the the patrolmen that have their boots on the ground that say they desperately need walls.
Okay then tell me what were we before all of this commotion and divisive rhetoric?
Barb Thornberry do you know more the the patrolmen that have their boots on the ground that say they desperately need walls.
Bobb Marly my brother these are the days of coming of Christ i meant it in a way where as life isnt meant to be thiz way God bless you. I walk with Christ
Bobb Marly it's still not 100% foolproof and we don't have an unsecured border like the tRumpsters like to call it..tell those that patrol it that it's unsecured
Bobb Marly my brother these are the days of coming of Christ i meant it in a way where as life isnt meant to be thiz way God bless you. I walk with Christ
Build that wall and make it tall then DEPORT THEM ALL !!!!!!
Joe Trump Holmes I trust his timing
Build that wall and make it tall then DEPORT THEM ALL !!!!!!
Joe Trump Holmes I trust his timing
Then declare a national emergency already we are behind you
#AmericasWall God bless POTUS!!
Get it done now. If you intend to run in 2 years, your success will depend on this ONE issue. Your future platform could not include any more promises of a wall. You used up that one in 2016.-mb
lol. Really? tRump inherited $40 million from his dad, filed bankruptcy 6 times, then convinced a small minority of Americans that he was a great businessman by playing one on a tv reality show.
Kristen Baby , come of it already ...don't spout ignorant gutter through Your trap . So if inheriting 40mil makes You a loser , and strategic filing for bankruptcy 6 times out of his 500 + companies ie 6 out of 500 , that's still a Genius to me .. so Cut the crap , and have some Good Oral Hygiene , For Christ's sake ....
Get it done now. If you intend to run in 2 years, your success will depend on this ONE issue. Your future platform could not include any more promises of a wall. You used up that one in 2016.-mb
Kristen Baby , come of it already ...don't spout ignorant gutter through Your trap . So if inheriting 40mil makes You a loser , and strategic filing for bankruptcy 6 times out of his 500 + companies ie 6 out of 500 , that's still a Genius to me .. so Cut the crap , and have some Good Oral Hygiene , For Christ's sake ....
Because this is all false.
lol. Really? tRump inherited $40 million from his dad, filed bankruptcy 6 times, then convinced a small minority of Americans that he was a great businessman by playing one on a tv reality show.
Because this is all false.
Unbelievably, Nancy Pelosi threatened to cancel the State of the Union address for fabricated “security” reasons while simultaneously refusing to open up the government because she doesn’t want security at the border. This only makes sense if you’re a liberal. 🤔
Andrew David Johnson - I don't think so, boy.....
you are a dumb a$$, it was CRIMINILLARY who was PAID by Russia,...or didnt you know that ??
Andrew David Johnson - I don't think so, boy.....
you are a dumb a$$, it was CRIMINILLARY who was PAID by Russia,...or didnt you know that ??
I support Trump 110% I agree on legal immigration but the ones coming across the border are draining our schools are cities or states God Bless America
Tell us Michael what is it like being in a shrinking minority?
John Decker pretty good never trusted people anyway.  Soooo?
I support Trump 110% I agree on legal immigration but the ones coming across the border are draining our schools are cities or states God Bless America
John Decker pretty good never trusted people anyway.  Soooo?
I dont see why we need to have the wall us Americans are making the drugs now ! He's demanding way to much money for the wall and taking money from workings family's and their food stamps how is that good for our country he's attacking us
Oh yeah but the 150 billion those illegals cost oh that's not a lot, but by all means bitch about 5 billion
Tell us Michael what is it like being in a shrinking minority?
Oh yeah but the 150 billion those illegals cost oh that's not a lot, but by all means bitch about 5 billion
Susan Close You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Charlie Daboub If he used exec powers it be in the courts for another 30 years.  I've wondered on several 'situations' and if our legislatures were only half doing their jobs we would all be better off.  But there are few legislators out there, just a bunch of avaricious party sycophants.
I dont see why we need to have the wall us Americans are making the drugs now ! He's demanding way to much money for the wall and taking money from workings family's and their food stamps how is that good for our country he's attacking us
Charlie Daboub If he used exec powers it be in the courts for another 30 years.  I've wondered on several 'situations' and if our legislatures were only half doing their jobs we would all be better off.  But there are few legislators out there, just a bunch of avaricious party sycophants.
Louis Scherfig go away satan
Louis Scherfig 🖕
Susan Close You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Louis Scherfig 🖕
Go Deaf to the Left! Do whats right!Build that Wall, ignore their games!
Your child molester and a rapist
Sherry Michaels Saye you heard what I said your a child rapist and a molester of fine ethics
Go Deaf to the Left! Do whats right!Build that Wall, ignore their games!
Sherry Michaels Saye you heard what I said your a child rapist and a molester of fine ethics
Maria Gambrelli it's called adaptation, glad you have a sense of humor gonna need it when the Truth is revealed. Rudy will probably screw up again and admit Trump and Family knew everything!
Your child molester and a rapist
Maria Gambrelli it's called adaptation, glad you have a sense of humor gonna need it when the Truth is revealed. Rudy will probably screw up again and admit Trump and Family knew everything!
Amen , thank you Mr President Trump
Brenda Flores he did not say that
Brenda Flores it would take an idiot to vote for the new Marxist democrats
Amen , thank you Mr President Trump
Brenda Flores it would take an idiot to vote for the new Marxist democrats
"If you like your doctor, you can keep your doctor".    We currently have a potus who lies way more than he tells the truth, this is a new experience.
No doubt.  It shows what kind of person you are.    Do you realize how many people around Trump have been charge, indicted, and plead guilty to a plethora or crimes, many leading back to 'individual 1' ?   Do you just ignore all of that, and somehow reason it all out?
Lots of people like us...
Sadly.    Does not make it right.
Brenda Flores he did not say that
Sadly.    Does not make it right.
Jeramy Felton Hargis He is the one working while the Democrats vacation.  Love you President Trump
Kathy Werbicki, the man baby doesn't know what work is! In less than two years he has golfed and vacationed more than our last president did in 8 years! He has done so while profiting off of us tax paying Americans, by staying and playing as privately owned Resorts and golf courses. He is a con man. The Democrats have said every day for him to re-open the government! That there are other ways to secure our border other than an ineffective wall!
There are far more criminals and murderers  that are white Americans ,  not to mention all the other American gangs and criminals than the 0.0132% of illegals that are criminals. Most drugs come through check points, human bodies, planes, etc. Hell, the drug cartels, can spend an extra couple of hundred dollars to go to Canada first then here. I mean damn...they have submarines and bring them all up and down the coast. You think an ignorant wall will stop them, lmbo! They are laughing at us!
Kathy Werbicki dumb ineffective wall to climb or fly over, swim or boat around, tunnel under, blast or cut through. Pure ignorance, from ignorant play president. He wants a government shutdown to golf more. Lazy crybaby babbling incoherent corrupt conman prick.
Lots of people like us...
Kathy Werbicki dumb ineffective wall to climb or fly over, swim or boat around, tunnel under, blast or cut through. Pure ignorance, from ignorant play president. He wants a government shutdown to golf more. Lazy crybaby babbling incoherent corrupt conman prick.
the defense of the nation is the number one priority of the whole federal government.
Larry S. White the senate won't allow a vote!
the defense of the nation is the number one priority of the whole federal government.
Larry S. White the senate won't allow a vote!
COAST GUARD AND BORDER PATROL AREN'T BEING PAID.
Timothy Norton I would propose both. Seeing as the numbers of people coming are overwhelming.
Shane Randle  but words do produce do they not? The intent with words are very powerful. GOD UTTERED WORDS AND CREATED A UNIVERSE! What have you created  today or in your life that's actually your own intellectual property?  Words are energy. They hold vibration  They hold power They hold good or bad!!! Postitive Words hold Life! Negative Words are Anti life!! Words are energy!!!🤔 Have an Awesome Day!!
Timothy Norton I would propose both. Seeing as the numbers of people coming are overwhelming.
Shane Randle  but words do produce do they not? The intent with words are very powerful. GOD UTTERED WORDS AND CREATED A UNIVERSE! What have you created  today or in your life that's actually your own intellectual property?  Words are energy. They hold vibration  They hold power They hold good or bad!!! Postitive Words hold Life! Negative Words are Anti life!! Words are energy!!!🤔 Have an Awesome Day!!
Douglas Moore you need to learn the voting process.
Those are indeed all words...
Douglas Moore you need to learn the voting process.
Abby Schmidt they tore it down cause it worked too well
Jim See Not really! Read up the history on it! As I recall it was President Regan ( a Republican) who stood & asked for the wall to be torn down! Do some reading on it then get back to me!
Jim See Like I said read up on that! Because you are wrong! An estimated 5000 escaped into West Berlin! 327 were killed! Again,like I said do some reading on it & then get back to me instead of spouting ignorant nonsense!
Go back to history class.  The Berline wall divided a country that did not want to be divided.  Our American wall will divide two different countries that want to be divided.  See the difference or are you still blind with hate.
Abby Schmidt the Berlin Wall was built to keep people in the southern border wall is to keep people out.
Tax cuts for billionaires were more urgent.
Abby Schmidt the Berlin Wall was built to keep people in the southern border wall is to keep people out.
Don't give up!! Latinos are with you!! Politicians doesn't care about the country or the future of the country.
https://www.dps.texas.gov/administration/crime_records/pages/txcriminalalienstatistics.htm
Jody Radtke Vie   Then why do we have so many illegals?
CM Garner please do Americans crime statistics also! Thanks!
Don't give up!! Latinos are with you!! Politicians doesn't care about the country or the future of the country.
CM Garner please do Americans crime statistics also! Thanks!
And please make him smarter. Amen.
Phoebe Cassandra Smith Why Do You mock God?
Jody Radtke Vie   Then why do we have so many illegals?
Phoebe Cassandra Smith Why Do You mock God?
And please make him smarter. Amen.
Yeah, but if you build a wall, how are the Dems going to get the voters necessary to secure Texas and Florida's electoral college votes?
Joseph Hart military is still funded you idiot
That's right!! You said it was a swamp, and it sure us true.  Imagine Pelosi cancels state of union due to security concerns, but will not secure our border. ?🤔🤔
Russian asset
Democrats aren't afraid the wall won't work. They're afraid the wall WILL work- thereby stopping the drug money they are currently receiving! #TRUMP2020 #MAGA #America1ST💯
That's right!! You said it was a swamp, and it sure us true.  Imagine Pelosi cancels state of union due to security concerns, but will not secure our border. ?🤔🤔
Democrats aren't afraid the wall won't work. They're afraid the wall WILL work- thereby stopping the drug money they are currently receiving! #TRUMP2020 #MAGA #America1ST💯
Russian asset
Kevin Bay but we serve a mighty God
if we allow the chump to continue with his ignorant actions (not to mention words) we will definitely cease to be a nation.  THE GODDAMNED CHUMP IS A GREATER THREAT TO THE USA THAN PUTIN AND KIM COMBINED!
:O
if we allow the chump to continue with his ignorant actions (not to mention words) we will definitely cease to be a nation.  THE GODDAMNED CHUMP IS A GREATER THREAT TO THE USA THAN PUTIN AND KIM COMBINED!
Mind=blown
How ironic can it be that Nancy Pelosi wants to postpone the State of the Union for "security" reasons? The whole government shutdown is on her shoulders for not having those same concerns for our national security!!! Build the Wall.
Phoebe Cassandra Smith grass is seems greener on the other side of the fence but are yard is full of ice. Canada open boarders are fucked. Did u know over 1000 Canadian community don't have drinkable water? Does that seem fine to you? If so your a moron.
How ironic can it be that Nancy Pelosi wants to postpone the State of the Union for "security" reasons? The whole government shutdown is on her shoulders for not having those same concerns for our national security!!! Build the Wall.
Phoebe Cassandra Smith grass is seems greener on the other side of the fence but are yard is full of ice. Canada open boarders are fucked. Did u know over 1000 Canadian community don't have drinkable water? Does that seem fine to you? If so your a moron.
Trump and his base need to dial back the name calling. The House has a Democratic majority and Trump won't get a single bill passed if he can't get some Democrats to support him. Calling them "evil" and "dim" isn't likely to work.
It seems to be doing fine compared to the US.
Trump and his base need to dial back the name calling. The House has a Democratic majority and Trump won't get a single bill passed if he can't get some Democrats to support him. Calling them "evil" and "dim" isn't likely to work.
Jody Powell.  Haha. It is now Snowflake!
you the one freaking out about a non existent emergency 😂🤷🏻‍♂️ keep melting down ❄️❄️❄️
Charlie Daboub you are welcome sir!!!
Stand strong President Trump!!  DO NOT CAVE TO THE WICKED DIM-WITS!!
Charlie Daboub you are welcome sir!!!
If the President does not defend our borders who would then mr/mrs Democrat?
Then you are a hypocrite.
If the President does not defend our borders who would then mr/mrs Democrat?
Then you are a hypocrite.
End the Shutdown. Families are affected. You are a embarrassment
I'm not a american and i dont live in america. But D.T is the best in this world
the coast guard helps defend our borders, yet here they are not getting paid
David Huthmaker Banks have offered ‘ no interest’ loans until they do. When they get the Retro pay , they will pay back the loans.
I'm not a american and i dont live in america. But D.T is the best in this world
David Huthmaker Banks have offered ‘ no interest’ loans until they do. When they get the Retro pay , they will pay back the loans.
the coast guard helps defend our borders, yet here they are not getting paid
Shari Petski Mayer and it feel GREAT! He has my vote in 2020! #repeat #loveourpresident
We thank God that you are the President and are defending our sovereignty.
Right on Kevin
We thank God that you are the President and are defending our sovereignty.
Right on Kevin
Derek Crow-Brown WHY didn't trump ask for 5.1 Billion in his budget?  You know the one that he presented, asking for 1.5 billion,  that was passed and ready for him to sign?  So why did it becone an EMERGENCY after FOX and conservative Talking Heads said to NOT negotiate?  WHY  didn't trump pass the funding when he had both Houses and just needed a couple of votes?  WHY didn't the Republicans negotiate for trump with the few Democrats?  WHY after 2 years has he decided to ransom the American people for a Wall that is obsolete?
How many thousand American government employee's are currently not working who's job it is to protect us ?  That is defending a nation sir and you won't let them with your shutdown...   Let me repeat that Donald Trumps Shutdown.   So with that if National Defense is your highest priority?  You fail.    Resign
Derek Crow-Brown WHY didn't trump ask for 5.1 Billion in his budget?  You know the one that he presented, asking for 1.5 billion,  that was passed and ready for him to sign?  So why did it becone an EMERGENCY after FOX and conservative Talking Heads said to NOT negotiate?  WHY  didn't trump pass the funding when he had both Houses and just needed a couple of votes?  WHY didn't the Republicans negotiate for trump with the few Democrats?  WHY after 2 years has he decided to ransom the American people for a Wall that is obsolete?
Rita Lambert You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Annual cost of illegal immigration: OVER $84 BILLION. Yet Democrats will NOT spend 5 BILLION to keep Americans safe & stop drugs. WAKE UP TAXPAYERS! #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸
Rita Lambert You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
I will also vote for him again in 2020.  The only person I have ever voted for just for the fact that he is not a political lobbyists pet.  He is doing his job.  Never gets credit for what he has done and accomplished, but gets criticized for every move he makes.  Proud to say he IS THE PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES.
Don't  give in to  the  stubborn  Democrats  President Trump  we are praying for you and our country. God  bless  you and your love ones
I will also vote for him again in 2020.  The only person I have ever voted for just for the fact that he is not a political lobbyists pet.  He is doing his job.  Never gets credit for what he has done and accomplished, but gets criticized for every move he makes.  Proud to say he IS THE PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES.
We love you President Trump!!!
Matt McNulty he’s protecting us Americans 💯. Liberal fascists can leave   Go ruin another country
We love you President Trump!!!
Matt McNulty he’s protecting us Americans 💯. Liberal fascists can leave   Go ruin another country
Jul Cox perfect so we can show Donald J. Trump the door anytime now...
WAKE UP PEOPLE... Dems don't want the wall because "DRUG MONEY" is being funneled directly into the DNC's pockets. - - #America1ST💯 #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸️
thank you. We support you. Hang in there.
So true.  We will be a third world county in 20 years.  Stop them now.  Oh, another caravan, 2000, is on its way.  Democrats just don't get it or it is just because Trump wants it.  Guess what, so do the American people.
Todd Cuson Wow, i actually grew up in a small town, Woodstock outside of Chicago.  Went to church every Sunday.
We just pay for other countries walls.  Did this rant make you feel better?
thank you. We support you. Hang in there.
Where were you in 1968? Hanging with rich white Nixon folks in Chicago? Big Chicago been criminally infested with corrupt leaders as a standard for over a century.   Caravan? Send your church, not the military. Latin American asylum seekers are more Christian than Republicans pretend to be. BTW did you know that Canadians make up for most of the overstayed visas?   Your biggest error is overestimating his support. It is more than obvious that a majority of American disapprove of the President. The mid-terms are a fact he was a loser. His shutdown now has half of his supporters questioning if they would vote for him in 2020. He is falling apart, did you listen to his speech an hour ago about missile defense?
We just pay for other countries walls.  Did this rant make you feel better?
Where were you in 1968? Hanging with rich white Nixon folks in Chicago? Big Chicago been criminally infested with corrupt leaders as a standard for over a century.   Caravan? Send your church, not the military. Latin American asylum seekers are more Christian than Republicans pretend to be. BTW did you know that Canadians make up for most of the overstayed visas?   Your biggest error is overestimating his support. It is more than obvious that a majority of American disapprove of the President. The mid-terms are a fact he was a loser. His shutdown now has half of his supporters questioning if they would vote for him in 2020. He is falling apart, did you listen to his speech an hour ago about missile defense?
Marie Foster thank you
Todd Cuson Wow, i actually grew up in a small town, Woodstock outside of Chicago.  Went to church every Sunday.
Marie Foster thank you
Darlene Carter done!
No it’s not it’s how much can I grab before I’m ousted
Michael Fowler, trump can't freeze Congress's paychecks. LOL 😆 Stu-pid!
Mark Butler:  I know but, it sure would make them wise up and do the right thing for the American people as a whole and think of our country rather than their own self interests of just not letting Trump win because they despise him so much.  Over 327 million human lives versus 1 that is hated.  Odds should be in the majority's favor. wouldn't your think?🤔
No it’s not it’s how much can I grab before I’m ousted
And ... I,m glad it is ... no one seems to know ..what the democrats highest and most important duty is ...I,m pretty sure it,s about taking something from you .. not doing anything for you ...
Mark Butler:  I know but, it sure would make them wise up and do the right thing for the American people as a whole and think of our country rather than their own self interests of just not letting Trump win because they despise him so much.  Over 327 million human lives versus 1 that is hated.  Odds should be in the majority's favor. wouldn't your think?🤔
One can always tell when you’re lying because your lips move....
Does anyone know the 800 number to build the wall? I just saw the commercial and I didn't get the number quick enough. Thank you.
One can always tell when you’re lying because your lips move....
Does anyone know the 800 number to build the wall? I just saw the commercial and I didn't get the number quick enough. Thank you.
Patrick Dullea You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Charlie Daboub that’s not how appropriations work, idiot
https://www.cnn.com/2019/01/14/opinions/trump-border-wall-bonds-solution-zelizer-zeldin/index.html?fbclid=IwAR1vCVNN44hN-bW74GWLP55dcNkM7xvhJDIrpnOSP1zmyX151phYHS6DmlY  Is this a viable option, Mr. President? I would donate :)
Charlie Daboub that’s not how appropriations work, idiot
😂😂😘😘😘😘❤
Patrick Dullea You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
What a huge load of horseshit!
😂😂😘😘😘😘❤
So where is the cry for wall with Canada - that they will pay for?!?!?
wrong,...https://www.dps.texas.gov/administration/crime_records/pages/txcriminalalienstatistics.htm
So where is the cry for wall with Canada - that they will pay for?!?!?
wrong,...https://www.dps.texas.gov/administration/crime_records/pages/txcriminalalienstatistics.htm
Buna kim destek verecekki unutma sağlam kaleler içinde olsanız ölüm yine gelip bulacak sizi
This FB post is a LIE! DHS and CBP statistics prove that we defend our borders.
It's incredible that so many can block the president's every move - and get away with it.
Buna kim destek verecekki unutma sağlam kaleler içinde olsanız ölüm yine gelip bulacak sizi
Stand strong Mr President! Build OUR WALL!
Julie Showers And you know this how? Keep screaming at the sky! 🙄
Stand strong Mr President! Build OUR WALL!
Julie Showers And you know this how? Keep screaming at the sky! 🙄
You dont know about votes huh? Liberals are so dumb!
Tonja Tyree DO you need a dictionary to look up majority?
This shutdown has lasted more days than Trump has spent with Barron in his entire life.
Was wondering if Soros sent out checks for trolls during shutdown, asking for a friend
Tonja Tyree DO you need a dictionary to look up majority?
Thank you Mr. President for all you do the move you made today made my day.
Build that wall...save lives on both sides.....IN GOD WE TRUST - IN TRUMP WE BELIEVE...Amen...
Hypocrite
Thank you Mr. President for all you do the move you made today made my day.
Hypocrite
Stand firm, Mr President, we are behind you.
Stand firm, Mr President, we are behind you.
Yet you want to remove sanctions on Russia. How is that defending our country.
Happy birthday! Now go build a wall make sure it’s around yourself though
If we don’t pay our employees, then we cease to be good people.
That may be your silliest yet, Donald John on repeat.  😑🙄
This is true.. If people don't believe it just leave!! You don't belong here then.
True!!! Thankyou for your good work!
This is true.. If people don't believe it just leave!! You don't belong here then.
Kevin you might have missed this but you are an idiot
That may be your silliest yet, Donald John on repeat.  😑🙄
Kevin you might have missed this but you are an idiot
Hahahahaha! Photoshop much?   https://www.reddit.com/r/PoliticalHumor/comments/ah26x0/trumps_facebook_page_slimmed_him_down_and_made/?st=JR1TJO7Q&sh=2cb98066
Hahahahaha! Photoshop much?   https://www.reddit.com/r/PoliticalHumor/comments/ah26x0/trumps_facebook_page_slimmed_him_down_and_made/?st=JR1TJO7Q&sh=2cb98066
so he can lie and lie some more?  Why MUST it be given? Not sure there is a union anymore
Sophie Tkacz Wildrick name one thing he's done that's helped this country and tell me how it's actually helped this country.
so he can lie and lie some more?  Why MUST it be given? Not sure there is a union anymore
Sophie Tkacz Wildrick name one thing he's done that's helped this country and tell me how it's actually helped this country.
Ronald Palmer  It certainly is a part of his job.  Since I do not perci me a threat along our Southern border, but I am alarmed by his contempt for NATO, I think he behavior and policy are inappropriate.
Timothy Norton well I`am from europe and President Trump is 100% correct about most european countrys not spending 2% on defence as for the southern border or any border in any country for that matter,you can`t have people wandering about coming and going as they please,from what I have read there is a huge volume of drugs comes into the USA through the southern border,if true thaat alone would be good enough reason for a wall even here in europe it has been a absolute disaster all the migrants getting in and allowed to wander unchecked ,just two days ago a afghan mirgrant stabbed a pregnant woman in hospital they managed to save the woman ,but the baby iis dead
Mike Pesci Not too bright, are you!
Timothy Norton well I`am from europe and President Trump is 100% correct about most european countrys not spending 2% on defence as for the southern border or any border in any country for that matter,you can`t have people wandering about coming and going as they please,from what I have read there is a huge volume of drugs comes into the USA through the southern border,if true thaat alone would be good enough reason for a wall even here in europe it has been a absolute disaster all the migrants getting in and allowed to wander unchecked ,just two days ago a afghan mirgrant stabbed a pregnant woman in hospital they managed to save the woman ,but the baby iis dead
American badass and my hero rock on MrTrump!!!
American badass and my hero rock on MrTrump!!!
Why do you pretend that’s your real hair ?
I bet your farts smell like cheese and artichoke heart 😣
Why do you pretend that’s your real hair ?
I bet your farts smell like cheese and artichoke heart 😣
Oh, I'm sure that's proof of everyrhing you claim.  Hahahahahhahaha.  What a joke.   I'm positive, after two years being investigated by a partisan group of lawyers, they're just not reporting this collusion or defense of Russia to the nation.  Your side claims Donald Trump is dumb, but he somehow masterminded a betrayal of that size and scope.  Which is it?  Trump is a super genius...or he's dumb and every one of the professionals investigating him is incompetent?
Your felon in chief will face serious charges, as have his cohort. Mueller is careful and thorough, and we shall see what he has when he is ready. There is proof. The investigators are not partisan. My 'side' is the one using the constitution, seeking truth, and considering everything. Your invective is not persuasive, and would be an embarrassment to you, if you were capable of being embarrassed.
P-R-O-P-A-G-A-N-D-A.   Your airbrushed photos and rhetoric are straight out of the dictator handbook
Your felon in chief will face serious charges, as have his cohort. Mueller is careful and thorough, and we shall see what he has when he is ready. There is proof. The investigators are not partisan. My 'side' is the one using the constitution, seeking truth, and considering everything. Your invective is not persuasive, and would be an embarrassment to you, if you were capable of being embarrassed.
Build the wall. Pay the hard working federal employees asap so they can feed their families. Also fire the committee members that decided not to pay our coast guard and homeland security. YES I KNOW HE CAN'T LITERALLY FIRE CONGRESS MEMBERS.
Jeanne this isn't The Apprentice, he can't fire anybody in the Congress.
Oh, I'm sure that's proof of everyrhing you claim.  Hahahahahhahaha.  What a joke.   I'm positive, after two years being investigated by a partisan group of lawyers, they're just not reporting this collusion or defense of Russia to the nation.  Your side claims Donald Trump is dumb, but he somehow masterminded a betrayal of that size and scope.  Which is it?  Trump is a super genius...or he's dumb and every one of the professionals investigating him is incompetent?
Jeanne this isn't The Apprentice, he can't fire anybody in the Congress.
Exactly,,,,by what ever means available we must defend our boarders as vigorously as we defend other nations over seas from the aggressions of communist and terrorist . Why would we do any less for our own home country?
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Exactly,,,,by what ever means available we must defend our boarders as vigorously as we defend other nations over seas from the aggressions of communist and terrorist . Why would we do any less for our own home country?
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Sure Sure, that is why you are selling us out to Russia on the world stage
That's not true at all lol..
I'll vote for Donald. Nobody else has any references! Check that out?
Sure Sure, that is why you are selling us out to Russia on the world stage
Pelosi doesn't want to secure our Country, but she is worried about security on the Hill.  Hypocrisy in action!
No I’m not for or against especially to protect crooked politicians , but what I am against is falsely claiming your patriotism is the reason you’re doing something when that billions of dollars of money could go to things that would immediately effect Americans daily life’s, and then to top it off thousands of people are being effected by something they can’t even control and may bit wvwn belive in all due to one mans agenda, I cannot call that patriotic or love of a country.
Brandon Wright slowing down illegal immigration would help our homeless and needy immensely. Do you know how much our government programs are giving money , food stamps, free medical, etc. to illegals!? While our vets and needy citizens go without. In the state of Colorado, if you are illegal, you will pretty much instantly qualify for government assistance. It is sickening.
Pelosi doesn't want to secure our Country, but she is worried about security on the Hill.  Hypocrisy in action!
Brandon Wright slowing down illegal immigration would help our homeless and needy immensely. Do you know how much our government programs are giving money , food stamps, free medical, etc. to illegals!? While our vets and needy citizens go without. In the state of Colorado, if you are illegal, you will pretty much instantly qualify for government assistance. It is sickening.
Polls on the morning of the 2016 election had Hillary winning by 80%...do you still believe polls?
No I’m not for or against especially to protect crooked politicians , but what I am against is falsely claiming your patriotism is the reason you’re doing something when that billions of dollars of money could go to things that would immediately effect Americans daily life’s, and then to top it off thousands of people are being effected by something they can’t even control and may bit wvwn belive in all due to one mans agenda, I cannot call that patriotic or love of a country.
Polls on the morning of the 2016 election had Hillary winning by 80%...do you still believe polls?
Pelosi's PERSONAL VENDETTA comes BEFORE the American citizens!!!
omg, then what would you have done with CRIMNILLARY who was the one who was PAID by the russians ??
CM Garner  really cause trump was broke in the 2000’s and Putin bought condos off him for 12 times the worth and inbelzed money to Trump to the tune of 1/2 a billion dollars ~ he’s bailed him out not only once but twice ~ we have a Russian in the White House ~ even Nixon hated dictators and communist ~ Trumps a TrAitor ~ Putin’s puppet ~
Pelosi's PERSONAL VENDETTA comes BEFORE the American citizens!!!
CM Garner  really cause trump was broke in the 2000’s and Putin bought condos off him for 12 times the worth and inbelzed money to Trump to the tune of 1/2 a billion dollars ~ he’s bailed him out not only once but twice ~ we have a Russian in the White House ~ even Nixon hated dictators and communist ~ Trumps a TrAitor ~ Putin’s puppet ~
Trump, please turn to our God for direction of what to do. I understand the importance of the wall, but also understand the importance of millions that are vulnerable at this time. I only pray we can turn to the Lord of Host for guidance and direction. Thank you Missionary Marie
I am very proud of my President... Waterbury Republicans for Trump. Right-through!
Stop talking about it use your power president
I refuse to vote for a pathological liar. Why would you?
I refuse to vote for a pathological liar. Why would you?
Trump 2020 God Bless America
John C Dickinson That hurt coming up with that on your own didn’t it? Scream at the sky, they say it helps! 🙄
Trump 2020 God Bless America
Phoebe Cassandra Smith sounds good, $27 for the wall or $1200 for not wanting to participate.
Yes sir, mr president. #buildthewall
Phoebe Cassandra Smith sounds good, $27 for the wall or $1200 for not wanting to participate.
Susan Kirkland Now that would be hard!
Sophie Tkacz Wildrick Some people just don't know what is good for them....and have to be saved from themselves!
God sought a man among them that would build the wall, and stand in the gap before me on behalf of the land, that it should not be destroyed. Ezekiel 22:30 -- Pray for President Trump & a strong America! 🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯🇺🇸️
Sophie Tkacz Wildrick Some people just don't know what is good for them....and have to be saved from themselves!
Rob Kettner show me one thats similar. Stretching the truth doesnt make you right.
Susan Kirkland Now that would be hard!
Rob Kettner show me one thats similar. Stretching the truth doesnt make you right.
I mean.. in what metric do you mean failing?  Greatest job numbers ever, largest stock market numbers... ever, lowest unemployment, low gas prices, The Korea peninsula talking?  I mean.. What is the failure you're referring to?  You don't like the guy, that's fine, but the results are quite measurable.
WHAT.... Ck GDP & Economy#'s.   How is that failing?
Interesting picture, reminds me of the Stalinist posters.
If not a wall, US Military troops will stand guard.
WHAT.... Ck GDP & Economy#'s.   How is that failing?
If not a wall, US Military troops will stand guard.
Melanie Garrett BS. Didn't u notice how many more ppl got Medicaid under Obama?
Cynthia Hill  wake up , look around you !!!
Melanie Garrett so all the medical care going to immigrants is zero concern ? How about that going to actual citizens.
Michael Pauly yuo missed my point
Good bag up the liberals and deport there asses .
Michael Pauly yuo missed my point
Looking and acting like PUTIN every day!
Melanie Garrett so all the medical care going to immigrants is zero concern ? How about that going to actual citizens.
A goat’s stubbornness tramples Iran, bible prophecy.
Just remember France ! Damn Black Forest!
Need to know a bit more about this border WALL
Looking and acting like PUTIN every day!
Need to know a bit more about this border WALL
Jason Jindo we need walls not just for Russia 🇷🇺!
Mike Kizy id rather have a tax cut for whomever makes under 100k
Jason Jindo we can have it all
Im here and waiting for service. Ready to make Australia great again with your support Sir.
Jason Jindo we can have it all
Mike Kizy id rather have a tax cut for whomever makes under 100k
Daniel Mckinnon what?
facts...lol
Daniel Mckinnon what?
facts...lol
This is an actual fact. A government's VERY FIRST DUTY is to protect its citizens.
Kristen Schmitz What ever you smoke is way way way to strong for you #remove Kristen
This is an actual fact. A government's VERY FIRST DUTY is to protect its citizens.
We need the Wall & More..
It is why I call him "Mr.Triumph"!!
Kristen Schmitz What ever you smoke is way way way to strong for you #remove Kristen
I don’t care what the rest of the world thinks of our president. They probably did love Obama because he wasn’t  for America.
Cathie Lee 72%
47% of eligible voters did not vote in last presidential election.
I don’t care what the rest of the world thinks of our president. They probably did love Obama because he wasn’t  for America.
It is also the sworn duty of members of Congress. How do you intend to encourage them to do what they swore to do?
47% of eligible voters did not vote in last presidential election.
Get it done Mr. President, We need you back in 2020.
Dario Sanchez Just you keep your head in that dark place that's between your legs!
Your mother
I'm out here already boy, & a wall ain't gonna stop us from finding jobs and a better life over here, trust.
Get it done Mr. President, We need you back in 2020.
I'm out here already boy, & a wall ain't gonna stop us from finding jobs and a better life over here, trust.
Kingsley Medland Without being rude, maybe you are on the wrong page, try typing in dating sites if that is what you are truly looking for. This site is about caring for our country and it's problems.
Dario Sanchez come here legally!  He can be your President!
Kingsley Medland Without being rude, maybe you are on the wrong page, try typing in dating sites if that is what you are truly looking for. This site is about caring for our country and it's problems.
You might want to focus on that legal defense...
Jeri Hendren yes lol they have about 10 better ideas than a wall. Read up.
You might want to focus on that legal defense...
Your President may be controversial but given the way the world is these days, to have a leader that's creating jobs, boosting your economy, and doing something about your national security, has to be the right man at this time don't you think?
Senator Graham is pushing his DACA, Pathway to Citizenship, TPS,and Amnesty nonsense AGAIN! We told you NO the last time! Quit constantly pushing your “comprehensive immigration reform” nonsense!
Jeri Hendren yes lol they have about 10 better ideas than a wall. Read up.
You just gonna make the drugs more expensive 😂
Joshua Snyder  Simple Trump wanted to make the DEMOCRATS the bad Guys.
You just gonna make the drugs more expensive 😂
Joshua Snyder  Simple Trump wanted to make the DEMOCRATS the bad Guys.
This is one thing about Trump that baffles me. I would have been getting everything I could get done about border security while my party had total control of Congress. He wouldnt have had to put up with any BS from the Democrats. I think he is hurting himself even with his own supporters over shutting down the government for so long over something that could have already been handled.
A federal government who operates a catch and release program for illegals does not have the moral high ground to go after sanctuary cities.
Moses Mikheyev Trump has six more years to trigger liberals just hang in there big guy.
A federal government who operates a catch and release program for illegals does not have the moral high ground to go after sanctuary cities.
💙❤🇺🇸Mr.President, I support you. LET'S BUILD THE WALL!!🇺🇸❤💙
Yea but at a cost of the American federal workers they have nothing to do with you holding there paychecks. Plus you are not giving them any incentive for this just not paying them. lol
Moses Mikheyev Trump has six more years to trigger liberals just hang in there big guy.
may the force be with you mister president.
Stay strong president Trump. We're with you all the way
may the force be with you mister president.
Stay strong president Trump. We're with you all the way
Andrew Spencer that’s ok just my opinion 👍
So the dems want to do 2 things in the short run..1 have open borders and flood the country with new voters and/or 2 eliminate electoral college.  It's the ONLY way they can take back power.  Then they can eliminate guns, raise taxes, take control of major corporations like FB and control the conservatives and christians thru social credits.  They will turn us into a socialist country and wreck it, like Venezuela.  That is where we are heading...
Agree but  the other side has no common sense  Mr President they want to ruin our nation something else has to be done about them
Stand Strong President Trump!!!
There is a vet who raised 9 million for wall on go fund me. Saw it once then gone. Must be that the Dems stopped this.
Rae Malee Dornick-Walsh  REALITY FOR THOUGHT! "Heaven" and "Hell" are human constructs from the creative minds of men.  LET THAT SINK IN!
"STUPID REMARK BY ROD NOVOA A COMMUNIST DEMOCRAT"
"STUPID REMARK BY ROD NOVOA A COMMUNIST DEMOCRAT"
Veterans & Army Retirees & Active Duty Military For & Support President Donald Trump. Making & Keeping America Safe. 🇺🇸🙏🎺🇺🇸
Brandon Detwiler agreed
Veterans & Army Retirees & Active Duty Military For & Support President Donald Trump. Making & Keeping America Safe. 🇺🇸🙏🎺🇺🇸
O u r losing your home after just a few week of this if that was true u were already on slippery slopes with your bank they don’t want that dam house back remember they went through this before and all a sudden nobody was living in them they sold them a 500 dollar pony when the real true value was a 100 dollars pony u get my drift .
Can you explain this simple facts to the swedish politicians as well?
Brandon Detwiler agreed
Withhold paychecks of the senate as they are federal employees!  Then see how long they. Avoid meeting at the White House for talks....
Because they knew it was bullshit now they can blame the democrats
David Lovell because of so called republicans like flakey flake, mr thumbs down McCain, Corky Corker and other Democrats acting like Republicans and technically we never had the Senate it takes 60
Withhold paychecks of the senate as they are federal employees!  Then see how long they. Avoid meeting at the White House for talks....
David Lovell because of so called republicans like flakey flake, mr thumbs down McCain, Corky Corker and other Democrats acting like Republicans and technically we never had the Senate it takes 60
OPEN THE GOVERNMENT! #TRUMPSHUTDOWN #NOWALL
The government will reopen next week most likely Monday, that will mark 30 days so just relax.
Lenny Anders  You know this how?  🤥#45 whisper in your ear?
Because they knew it was bullshit now they can blame the democrats
Lenny Anders  You know this how?  🤥#45 whisper in your ear?
Trump loves the ego stroking that comes with the SOTU. All those legislators, Supreme Court justices, honored guests, etc. If he gives a speech somewhere else it is just another speech. He wants the pomp and circumstance that prove he is the President.
The government will reopen next week most likely Monday, that will mark 30 days so just relax.
Thank you for taking that role seriously!
Trump loves the ego stroking that comes with the SOTU. All those legislators, Supreme Court justices, honored guests, etc. If he gives a speech somewhere else it is just another speech. He wants the pomp and circumstance that prove he is the President.
Thank you for taking that role seriously!
Noble Loria I'm so afraid that you are right on this one.
Levi soldiers there to take care of the Border wall
Fact.  Simple, blatantly obvious FACT.
Trolls are out  and about.
Mr. President, I 100% support your position about the wall--it is needed especially with another caravan headed our way. As a forever Trumper, I would suggest calling their bluff in front of God and the entire country. Here is my suggestion on a dialogue for the SOTU message----You should reopen the government DURING THE SOTU MESSAGE,.You should say that "I have always stood for doing what is best for the American people, for their prosperity and their security and because of that promise to the American people and because I want to show my willingness to negotiate and work with the Democrats... They have said that we should we reopen the government AND THEN we can talk so I am holding them to their word. I will give instructions to reopen our government immediately and I want to say thank you to all the people who have hung in there with us. I will also instruct that all people effected by the shutdown receive their back pay immediately. BUT, tomorrow, I will request a bi-partisan meeting to keep the commitment of the left to enter into honest and open negotiations about the wall. If we cannot then reach a mutual agreement to fund the wall/barrier, I will have no choice but to take an alternate measure of action. Hopefully, with another caravan heading to our border, all parties will realize the need for this border wall which has worked in places we already have a wall as well as how it has worked in other countries. I will do my part and I hope they will do theirs". I think it is a win for you showing your concern for those impacted by the shutdown and now they would have to put up or shut up. God Bless you Mr. President---I will be 100% with you in 2020.
So you like chess okay. White knight to black rook. Your move marfema auswitz 999 op nation Z initiate peg12go###
Noble Loria I'm so afraid that you are right on this one.
Mr trump all due respect ✊ perhaps you can stop the nation from paying taxes until this boarder is resolved
Absolutely. This is the lifeblood of our nation: SECURITY.
No the life blood of America is it people, all kinds of people
Mr trump all due respect ✊ perhaps you can stop the nation from paying taxes until this boarder is resolved
No the life blood of America is it people, all kinds of people
I have a question, you are require to give congress a state of the union address but Representative Pelosi has stated that is her house and because of security reason you can give it. (It's Americans house but we won't go there for now). Why can't  you address the other chamber of congress? Send her the address on paper like she wanted but give the address from the Senate floor.  How can she stop that.  She doesn't control that.  If she wants to be left out it's on her. Heck let her go on her trip then
Teresa Collins Batchelor Presidents have been giving the State of the Union address in person only about 100 years. There is no requirement that it be done in person.  Pelosi is just showing her ASS.  Text, call, or write her and tell her what you just posted!
Absolutely. This is the lifeblood of our nation: SECURITY.
BUILD THE WALL NOW! NATIONAL EMERGENCY!
"your highest and most important duty "....it is clear it is to protect Putin !
Stay strong Dems. Not one dollar for Trump's worthless wall. Not one. #NoWall #TrumpShutdown
Hell yeah.👍 Support Donald Trump. It looks like Soros wants to  bring down American economy by inundating it with thousands of caravan people. It has evil Soros written all over it.
I think that is what the left wants
Stand firm President Trump.  This has to be handled finally after ALL the past leaders have said this is necessary but have done NOTHING.  This country can no longer care for ALL those who want to come here for those GOLD PAVED STREETS!
Teresa Collins Batchelor Presidents have been giving the State of the Union address in person only about 100 years. There is no requirement that it be done in person.  Pelosi is just showing her ASS.  Text, call, or write her and tell her what you just posted!
Stand firm President Trump.  This has to be handled finally after ALL the past leaders have said this is necessary but have done NOTHING.  This country can no longer care for ALL those who want to come here for those GOLD PAVED STREETS!
Sherri Giddings Latimer sure go ahead and avoid the facts 😉
it only took place while obama was president... " he did nothing "
Mark Hack you're joking right?  He put sanctions on Russia, closed two diplomatic compounds and also expelled many Russian diplomats.  Trump? He believes Putin over our intelligence agencies, removed some sanctions and also has taken his time putting on Congressional sanctions.
James Campbell remember when they busted them in that lie about all 17 supported that? 😂🤣
Mark Hack what lie? The over 7,000 verifiable lies that Trump has told?
Mark Hack https://www.google.com/amp/amp.timeinc.net/time/5340060/donald-trump-vladimir-putin-summit-russia-meddling
I think that is what the left wants
Mark Hack https://www.google.com/amp/amp.timeinc.net/time/5340060/donald-trump-vladimir-putin-summit-russia-meddling
Here is the latest oppression efforts lead by Facebook.. Now, when we like something you say, We are being sent to detention and not allowed to express our opinions, It happens every time, I make a  comment about standing up for America and the border wall.. Lets hope the Congress and the New AG will Look into how tech company's are suppressing free speech and thought by abusing there tools... Perhaps the FCC needs to be involved too... start asking some hard questions and laying serious fines down! Thankyou Sir ..Suggestion for the Suggestion box..!! Have a nice day....
ive been in facebook prison , no big deal. this site is a ghetto of no freedom .just  use it , abuse it , crap on it . what ever it gave you ,you just give it back !
Mark Hack what lie? The over 7,000 verifiable lies that Trump has told?
What a change from the last guy.
I agree with President Trump 100%
You're the one we need the most defense from...
Thank you Mr. President. You’re doing the right thing.  I can’t wait to hear your State of the Union speech.
YES !!! except the wrong ones are not getting paid !!!!!!! we need a law
The dems want open borders for exactly that reason.
Wish it was the Democrats....#walkaway
ive been in facebook prison , no big deal. this site is a ghetto of no freedom .just  use it , abuse it , crap on it . what ever it gave you ,you just give it back !
That's what it should be!!!!
I think the military should be deployable to defend our borders.  Those laws should also be changed.
Thank you, President Trump!!!!
How about paying your employees?  That’s important.
This is what desperation looks like.
“After I take Russian sanctions away so they won’t release the pee tapes or tell America I’m broke and Russia owns me”.
Oh twitler,you're done for!
I guess those 240 year before you showed up don't count.
That’s what the Democrats want. That’s why the people put you in office.
So why don't you focus your efforts on shipping point's of entry and planes.  Where the REAL problem is.  Border issues have been declining for decades now.  A wall is not the answer.
Wish it was the Democrats....#walkaway
So why don't you focus your efforts on shipping point's of entry and planes.  Where the REAL problem is.  Border issues have been declining for decades now.  A wall is not the answer.
That’s what the Democrats want. That’s why the people put you in office.
True our borders must be safe to protect us and America
Both Borders? Just the one the Brown people are coming thru?
He had this photo photoshopped !!!!😂😂 Longer fingers and he is acting like he is skinny!! alternative president!!😂😂😂❄️💦🇺🇸
Agree, it's time too take action as the democrats are out of their minds!
god bless you President Trump x
Yes yes yes yes build wall defund  legislators
Praise the Lord we didn't end up with Clinton.  Trump has saved this country from evil plans.
Exactly.  We will have the Wall👏👏🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸❤️❤️
I want a poster like this one.
Andrew David Johnson conspiring with a foreign government isn’t lemming
How much is that defense budget? Need some more? Suurree
TOO BAD PELOSI AND SCHUMER DON'T FEEL THE SAME WAY.
Seems it was not important to our last president.
And it should also be the duty of all of our congress people.  But the progressive/socialists that now control the DNC want their politically correct hope and change mandate to over ride all laws and the Constitution which would have been gone by now had HiLIARy been elected.
God Bless Our President 🇺🇸🇺🇸🙏
Anyone who is against walls please remove all the doors to your home. Practice what you preach.
Stand strong and give that speech.  I will vote Trump 20/20. Build that Wall and this is a DEMOCRATIC SHUTDOWN especially Nancy Shutdown.
Democrats now are hard headed...weird they wanted the Wall all along...it is all about the votes I guess so.
The defences of the Constitution should be your highest priority.
I want a poster like this one.
The defences of the Constitution should be your highest priority.
“We will cease to be an nation.”   Fear mongering over nothing 🤷🏻‍♂️
Lee Mcclelland maybe you should get a job and put your moms basement
Lee Grant   My moms dead and I’ve been working and living on my own for a around 15 years now 🙂
Democrats now are hard headed...weird they wanted the Wall all along...it is all about the votes I guess so.
THANK YOU!!! RRR PROTECTIVE PRESIDENT TRUMP!!!
Explain this again when all the TSA agents go on a very justifiable strike.
Best president ever !!!  Trump 2020 !!!
Trumps administration so far: 33 indictments, 187 criminal charges, 32 separate guilty pleas
#SupportTrump.  #BuildaBarrier. #ImmigrationReform - stop chain migration, stop anchor babies, require E-verify, implement merit based immigration, decrease immigration numbers, tighten asylum criteria, etc.  #Improve border security per Border Patrol needs/requests (drones, cameras,personnel,judges,etc)
Pelosi & Schumer.. politics as usual!
I LOVE My #PresidentTrump
As an AMERICAN   I love this about our PRESIDENT  It's beyond me to believe any representative's can be other wise  I am 100% on board with our PRESIDENT
Lee Grant   My moms dead and I’ve been working and living on my own for a around 15 years now 🙂
Never been more prouder of a president of the United States than I am of Donald J Trump!!!! We need you!! Thank you for keeping us safe!!
We the people hired this man to do a job. He has come through on more items than any president in decades! Ask why these people oppose. What is the real game here. The democrats have something to lose and you can bet its monetary. We the people need to rise up.
Got that right we should have kept the TRUMP family OUT!
Peoples wages and lives are NOT
Call 1-800-350-6647 for a No on the 🍊🤡s Wall. Just press “2”
Best President ever!! TRUMP 2020 WINNING!!
All of you blindly supporting Trump are not realizing all those affected (or don’t care) by this government shutdown. And it really shows.    And you won’t notice until each one of you are directly affected. You’re all acting like children calling those who disagree with you “snowflakes”  Grow up and do your homework. Stop watching the news.
As a Mexican, my vote is for you, Mr. Trump 2020
I heard the liberal Read it in small print with large glasses that they couldn't find!
As an AMERICAN   I love this about our PRESIDENT  It's beyond me to believe any representative's can be other wise  I am 100% on board with our PRESIDENT
I heard the liberal Read it in small print with large glasses that they couldn't find!
Raymond Conv  yep
As a Mexican, my vote is for you, Mr. Trump 2020
Americans are just mad because he doesn't bomb other countries as much.
Time to drain the swamp some more
He followed is promise to keep is country save , God bless Mr President God bless America.
Stand strong for the people of the United States.  God bless you for standing strong .President Trump
Exactly.  He gets it. Why can’t certain Dems??
What on earth are you like 😂😂😂😂😂
Trump please we the Nigerian about the upcoming election, we no longer need huhari
But only with words and money god forbid he would actually join up when he was younger...all mouth no guts
Don't back down on Wall funding or the republican party is finished in 2020. Forever.
Raymond Conv  yep
thank you president Trump
Everyone surrender to Nancy Pelosi!
Best President in my lifetime.
Please do not cave to those that want the worst for our country.  Do not give Cry'n Chuck a reason to celebrate in not giving any wall funding.  Please don't waiver your position!
"Pericles"  " it is right to endure with Resignation what the Gods send , and to Face one's Enemies with Courage"
Thank you President Trump
We’re nationing so hard right now.
Right again!  That's why we voted for you!  YOU WORK!
Sont give in to this penis pump congress!!!
Don't back down on Wall funding or the republican party is finished in 2020. Forever.
Sont give in to this penis pump congress!!!
We voted for Pres Trump, but since he won't build a wall, and shut down the border, we're not sure at this point if we will vote for him !
That wall was just a campaign gimmick to remind Trump to talk about immigration at his rallies. He didn't even intend to build a literal wall, but when he tried to back off and say he just meant border security, his base screamed no, we want a real wall. So now he is stuck, being brought down on an issue he didn't even care about.
Right again!  That's why we voted for you!  YOU WORK!
The democrats dont understand this even though Homeland Security and top border personal have stated publically we need a fricken wall including Obama's formal top border agent but this is too confusing for the democrats to grasp.
Just declare emergency what’s so hard about it just DO it♥️🇺🇸🇺🇸
I agree, but it is also being destroyed from within.
Thank you Mr President..my family is alot safer because of you❤️
A little Photoshop goes a long way.
Sen. Jon Tester. You should listen to the smart guys.
Our Nation has three equally powered bodies! Respect our constitution!
And WE support you fully!  🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸❤️
When's this guy gunna get taken out
That wall was just a campaign gimmick to remind Trump to talk about immigration at his rallies. He didn't even intend to build a literal wall, but when he tried to back off and say he just meant border security, his base screamed no, we want a real wall. So now he is stuck, being brought down on an issue he didn't even care about.
That’s what the democrats are trying to accomplish
Give ‘em HELL President Trump!! 👍 🇺🇸
If it weren't we wouldn't have an Army or the oath of office.
Nice photoshop on the stomach 😏
Your tie needs to be longer #realdonaltrump to compensate for your flabby neck.. Just sayin'
Then stop siding with the NRA to ban stuff Bloomberg does't want The People to have. A rifle behind every blade of grass...
The best President in the wall is trump  end I Will vote For hem again
Me I Will vote For Trump in 2020
Agree. This shows he is a great leader.
When's this guy gunna get taken out
Agree. This shows he is a great leader.
Thank you!  Defend the border, at all costs.  Build a quality wall to do the job.  Thanks again.
Move to Russia, traitor.
Me I Will vote For Trump in 2020
Move to Russia, traitor.
Stand Strong. The people who count are with you!
Now Arliss when you "count" do you just use your fingers or do you take off your shoes and use the toes as well?
Thank you!  Defend the border, at all costs.  Build a quality wall to do the job.  Thanks again.
This is what i have said MANY times.
So what do you think a wall will do? People go over, under and around walls. Yet there are no walls at Area 51 and you cannot get within a mile of the border without getting caught by military police! Why? Because they use 21st century surveillance and tactics. We are a 21st century super power, time we start acting like it!
Resign or be impeached Putin's puppet!
It's Pelosi and Schumer ' s least important duty.
No other like my brother.
We are not under attack by Mexico what in the world are you talking about ?
God Protect President Trump,
Now Arliss when you "count" do you just use your fingers or do you take off your shoes and use the toes as well?
God Protect President Trump,
Best president ever! In parallel, most insulted president ever! Thank you Fakenews for ruining (with your lies and nothing burgers) the image of this great man.
Jaimie McCammon You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
He could use executive order or his "humanitarian crisis" yet he seems to want to have the parties unifying and agreeing for it. The Democrat party members used to want that wall, Obama, Schumacher ,Pelo etc, did.  Why the change of mind? Why ?
Althought when Rep had both the majority in the House and in Senate, it requires 61/100 approving votes to pass a bill to fund the wall in the Senate, (which did not happened.) So no, he still couldn't do anything without Dems support. But I'm sure you knew that, right?
Yes it is and we finally have someone doing the right thing and for that I thank you, stand your ground we are with you.
It will only cost $5.7 billion to open the government back up! DO IT!!!!
I just hope the Wall isn't meant to keep US in.....LOL
IT DAMM SURE NOT THE DEMOCRATS!
Yes, it is.  And now you have to fight the left-wing loonies too.
The only wall America needs is between church and state.
All u care about is yourself
Not enough shares of this post!
Stay the course, we are with you.  #istandwithourpresident, #buildthewall
And all true americans stand with you.  Defend our country with whatever means are available for you.  and put the blame where it belongs, on the socialist demonrats.
Althought when Rep had both the majority in the House and in Senate, it requires 61/100 approving votes to pass a bill to fund the wall in the Senate, (which did not happened.) So no, he still couldn't do anything without Dems support. But I'm sure you knew that, right?
And all true americans stand with you.  Defend our country with whatever means are available for you.  and put the blame where it belongs, on the socialist demonrats.
President Trump defends his country.  God Bless him.
Stay the course, we are with you.  #istandwithourpresident, #buildthewall
Were getting sprayed like bugs. Stop the Chemtrails.
God Bless President Trump
Besides Mexicans who else coming? O thats right you dont know?    I dont want any more 9 11 incidents.   Our country under attack.   Build wall keep my family safe also people live here and country.   Thats priority!!
Thank you, Mr. President.  Please stand strong!!  Build the wall.
Hold paychecks from Congress a Senate..............
Thank you for doing your job right for the American people!
Do it then, "Build the wall"!
TREASON IS PUNISHABLE BY DEATH.......
President Trump defends his country.  God Bless him.
TREASON IS PUNISHABLE BY DEATH.......
Please provide the budget for how the 5.4 billion will be spent.

Alexander James wrong not just a wall, technology, eminent domain...
Do it then, "Build the wall"!
I like Trump but he's screwing up like Nixon did......
Now is time for national emergency Mr trump build the wall
Thank you sir for being so strong
Airbags and walls protect...TRUMP 2020!👍🇺🇸
Thank you President Trump! #buildthewall ❤️🇺🇸
God bless Mr.President Trump.
Am, at long long proyd of our country and the best ever leader..Urah
Trump loves América.Pelosi loves globalists.
I'm so proud to call you Mr Trump my President...youre hitting Pelosi right where she needs to be hit..in the wallet !
Alexander James wrong not just a wall, technology, eminent domain...
We have a TRAITOR as our President.
then RESIGN go live with Putin in Moscow
I concur. When will TERM LIMITS be on the ballot????? We insist upon it.
Thank you President Trump. Praying that your administration and America will stand strong on border security.
We that  voted for you are behind you a 100%, build that wall.
Stand tall, stay strong and never back down!
Its amazing that we lasted 245 years without borders, but now "we will cease to be a nation" because of it
Aren’t the thousands of miles of coastline considered borders ? And ceasing funding for the coast guard. As well as border patrol itself is not showing that you care about border security.
One would think that would be the priority of every citizen of this country. If not... why not???
I'm so proud to call you Mr Trump my President...youre hitting Pelosi right where she needs to be hit..in the wallet !
The end is near prisoner Trump!
You can't argue with that!
I think that's why the bill that the house passed, the senate did a voice vote with 100% support, and YOU agreed to sign included $1.6 billion for border security isn't it?
Our nation has a stronger backbone than you would care to consider. If we only had a leader of the caliber she deserves!
To preserve and protect is the President s job.  Ignore nonsense Nancy and her political agenda.   Build the walk.  Give your State of the Union address
If you dont open the government we have no nation.
people need a broader news intake; too many Americans simply refuse to pay attention to what's actually happening, and that's the only thing you have to rely on for 2020.
i think you should go on strike
Yes it is and Thank You for keeping it number 1. ❤️🇺🇸💪🇺🇸❤️
One would think that would be the priority of every citizen of this country. If not... why not???
The countries that DO have open borders have nothing to lose.
The way you’re running the country, there won’t be much left to protect
86/45........make America less embarrassing again.
Thank you, sir. Best President in my life time since John Kennedy! Build the wall ❤
THANK YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP FOR PROTECTING THE AMERICAN CITIZENS THAT VOTED FOR YOU!!
They photoshopped you nice in that photo
How did we become a notion again 🤔
Yes Mr President, that’s your 1st duty!💕💕💕🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🙏🏻🙏🏻🙏🏻
😂😂😂 His selection of pictures on these posts is comical! Are they supposed to be action shots or something??
The Wall is going to happen, like it or not and you may see on your water bill or your cable bill an added charge,  then what? They will call it " mabe environmental or such, but it is going to happen!
Yes it is and Thank You for keeping it number 1. ❤️🇺🇸💪🇺🇸❤️
Lol probably, trump one day u will vacate that seat, others have come and gone is not a family inheritance
Mr President please build that WALL.
Be strong Mr. President and don't let Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer control you !
And the Dems know it which is why they are trying to stop it
Huaa All the last 9 President's were in it 4 the $
I will vote for him again in 2020 also!
I'll leave Will Hurd right here...Republican Rep.in Texas...ask him his view...it's been well quoted.
We’ve done alright so far 😕
Thank you President Trump, we appreciate you. Don't back down from the traitor progressives/socialists.. 👍
The supporters should pay for the wall just sayin
The Wall is going to happen, like it or not and you may see on your water bill or your cable bill an added charge,  then what? They will call it " mabe environmental or such, but it is going to happen!
Well, after lining my own pockets of course. Mueller is coming!
Britain has failed to defend our borders and we are in danger of ceasing to be a nation! We are actually in danger of becoming somebody else's nation! Build the wall!
We don't deserve such an awesome President.
Thank you President Trump!! God bless you!!  #presidenttrump2020 #buildthewall
Stop voter fraud  Stop paying for foreigners  Stop paying welfare for people who don’t deserve it  Stop welfare fraud
You are right. We need the Wall. We are with you all the way 150%. Go for it.
Keep up the great work, we are behind 110%
Considering that roughly a third if the populous believes you are a great President, maybe we should cease...j/s.
AMEN!  Thank You President Trump!
The supporters should pay for the wall just sayin
President Trump please save our country.
He is the only president in YEARS to actually want to do the right thing for the AMERICAN public. If it saves just one life Isn't it worth it!
So the 21,605 people guarding the SWB aren’t enough?  Asking for a friend!
THANK YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
and it's the dems least cared about duty!
thank you Mr. president, we support you. a new group of illegals heading our way right now.
EXACTLY MR PRESIDENT...BUILD THE WALL
President Trump is our choice. He has the best interests of our country at heart. God bless his efforts and our country.👍🇺🇸🙏🏼
AMEN!  Thank You President Trump!
How about paying those who are defending the borders!
Article 1 section 7   Side not Trump is only 1 of 3 branches of Government. Congressional representatives speak for us. Let them Vote
Look at all these paid Russian trolls .
False it's the constitution #fakepatriot
Last 4 Presidents have wanted the same thing ..   so I'm not sure what the big deal is
Build the wall Mr. President " we're standing with you against these spineless democrats!
put   Schumer on  no  fly  list
Yes we will cease to be a country when mexico invades and takes over
AMENDS! C U OVER AT Christian Conservatives for Trump.
We were doing just fine without you criminal.
President Trump is our choice. He has the best interests of our country at heart. God bless his efforts and our country.👍🇺🇸🙏🏼
What’s so bad about that ?!!!   TRUMP 2020🇺🇸
In order for the US to be safe, you need to resign. I'm tired of you running this country like you ran your bankrupt casinos.
Doing the job and doing it right.  Citizens first, America strong.  MAGA!
We are already ceasing to be a nation letting these muslims in Congress
Arrest them for attempting the first coup this country has known.
PRESIDENT TRUMP don't give in we need the WALL.
if the gov wont build the wall we will build the wall!
So I see you've had them photoshop you somewhat,
What a man, what a mighty, mighty man!
Certainly Logical... Where are the Constituted Laws
We were doing just fine without you criminal.
Certainly Logical... Where are the Constituted Laws
Praying for wisdom for the President.
Lisa Helvey Poole that will require one hell of a lot of prayers
What a man, what a mighty, mighty man!
Lisa Helvey Poole that will require one hell of a lot of prayers
Everything else is waste if our boders aren't safe.
Latonya Risinger most of the drug enter by mail and in vehicles at points of entry and must illegals just overstay their visas. A wall, which u already have, will do crab to d problem.  Use your brain!!!
Praying for wisdom for the President.
I honestly don't think you even understand what it is that makes us a nation, which is why you will never be considered a great president. For everyone else, though, here's a reminder: http://constitutionus.com/
Do not back down.  No money for the wall.  Keep it closed down.
"Donald Trump was the dumbest student I ever had." - William T. Kelly, former professor at the University of Pennsylvania, Wharton
AMEN God Bless Mr President Trump
Yeah cause apparently getting the people their money isn't
Please make it so that congress won't get paid during a government shutdown.
Love my president!! Makes me proud!!
Thank you! God Bless and guide you!
Latonya Risinger most of the drug enter by mail and in vehicles at points of entry and must illegals just overstay their visas. A wall, which u already have, will do crab to d problem.  Use your brain!!!
Use El Chapo money to pay for Wall..
Take security from the DNC see how they like it...
The group, consisting of 247 people, turned itself in to authorities near the Antelope Wells Port of Entry just after midnight on Wednesday, January 16, 2019.  The Border Patrol said the majority of individuals in the group are from Central America.  After they turned themselves in, the group immediately claimed the need for medical care.
Thanks Pres. Trump stopping the flow of taxpayer money to countries that dislike us and squander it.
#openthedamngovernment This is ridiculous.
Y'all know it's not up to Trump and he works for Putin right
Exactly what is needed Mr President
I’m behind you Mr President!
Why has America ever been attacked?
Hold the state of the union address at the border.
Thank you! God Bless and guide you!
Keep laughing  Darrell James
It is tyranny from inside instead of outside if we don't. We have to much of that already, Donald J. Trump.
Yes!!!! My President My Vote  ❤️🇺🇸❤️
Keep standing your ground Sir. Thankyou for protecting us President Trump.
Build the wall Mr President
At least he love our America! Thank God for our Great President Trump!!!! 🙏🇺🇸
Have to secure and defend the border!
Does that include Russia ?????
I support you Donald Trump and pray for this country daily....Thank you...
Hold the state of the union address at the border.
I support you Donald Trump and pray for this country daily....Thank you...
Thank you Sir for being a true Patriotic American hero and for being a man of his words to keep our great nation safe for all true Patriotic American citizens by standing firm on BUILDING THE WALL and knowing Sir that we all love you and respect you for all that you have done for all of us and our home that we all call the U.S. of America 🇺🇸. God bless you Sir, my 6th Commander-in-Chief that I am very proud to work under and it is truly an honor for me to call you my President as well Sir. May God always bless our country the U.S.A. 🇺🇸🗽, Amen 🙏
Lo Hir You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Does that include Russia ?????
Take  back  the  deal  and  declare NE. I  think   it’s clear they  will  not  do  anything but  obstruct  any  promises you made  to  the  American people. 🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸
Thank you Mr. President! We stand with you. Trump#2020
If sheep could vote, they'd probably pick the guy that feeds them.....Even if it's the same guy that'll slaughter them later..
We love you Mr. PRESIDENT.  Build the Wall and take down the obstructionist
Praying for President Trump, America and all us Americans 🙏🏼🇺🇸🙏🏼
Thank you, Sir! We're behind you 100%!
The Da Fence of our nation!
Keep up the great work Agent Orange! Love Vlad
You keep using that word. I do not think it means what you think it means.  (Nation)
Lo Hir You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
you're everything the establishment hates and we love you don!
Let’s hope he takes the SOTU to a friendlier venue and fills it with real patriots
It is sickening  to see people giving  fake news that they made up & giving opinions on it...all for money.  One day when your country doesn't look like it once did because of your lies, you will reap what you caused! Lacey 🙏
The democratic stance against secured borders indicates that they are involved in drug and human trafficking.
what about people over staying visas? wall wont help that, i aint saying a wall wont help with the border but its not the only problem
If we do not get this treasonous lying piece of crap  out of our government we will no longer exist as a free nation!
woah dont give the democrats any ideas now, lmao
That’s the reason why we voted for you,because of your Patriotic spirit of loyalty to our Country ,and braveness to defend’t,for all of that Thank you Mr President and people on your side. Blessings to all .we love America.
Drones can be deployed at a far less cost than a wall to be climbed and swam around.  Think smarter, evolve with technology not stubborn old ways.  Drones do not have to be paid - do not have to eat and can be your first line of defense.  Keeps our border patrol safer.
President Trump's The Best Commander in Chief!
You keep using that word. I do not think it means what you think it means.  (Nation)
President Trump's The Best Commander in Chief!
Love My President, He is thinking about you and me!
Karen Clemovich No...he's thinking about himself and the fact that knows nothing about governance, deal making, or any other quality that a good leader would have.  He is a pathetic waste of space.
Drones can be deployed at a far less cost than a wall to be climbed and swam around.  Think smarter, evolve with technology not stubborn old ways.  Drones do not have to be paid - do not have to eat and can be your first line of defense.  Keeps our border patrol safer.
Dear Madame Speaker:  Due to the Shutdown, I am sorry to inform you that your trip to Brussels, Egypt, and Afghanistan has been postponed. We will reschedule this seven-day excursion when the Shutdown is over. In light of the 800,000 great American workers not receiving pay, I am sure you would agree that postponing this public relations event is totally appropriate. I also feel that, during this period, it would be better if you were in Washington negotiating with me and joining the Strong Border Security movement to end the Shutdown. Obviously, if you would like to make your journey by flying commercial, that would certainly be your prerogative.  I look forward to seeing you soon and even more forward to watching our open and dangerous Southern Border finally receive the attention, funding, and security it so desperately deserves!  Sincerely,  Donald Donald J. Trump
Go Trump for 2020! Build your wall! It's important for everyone. Stop drugs! Stop metamphetamines and crack on borders plz!
I would like to see a bill introduced that would take all pay checks from elected officials in the event of government shut downs. I mean ALL ELECTED OFFICIALS, from county to nationals. Also they forfeit them days of pay so you don't get it back. This would get them to the table quick. The people we elect hurt us so it's time we reverse the favor.
Putin loves this site, he, the Saudis and the KKK own it.
Well our airport are in danger so that defending our country Your hard to deal with god help you're putting our country in danger.
Justice has fallen in the streets and truth has turned away backward, pretty well describes where our congress has finally struggled and has reached.  From the Bible.
SO QUIT RUINING EVERYTHING LIZARD FACE !!!
We have more than one border. Why is it you only worry about the one where the brown people cross?
Mr trumpo  we are all nations in America..   that is how we become  Americans.   Yes we need security.  From corruption.
Karen Clemovich No...he's thinking about himself and the fact that knows nothing about governance, deal making, or any other quality that a good leader would have.  He is a pathetic waste of space.
BUILD THE WALL, MR. PRESIDENT!!!
I’ll volunteer for a Years duty patrolling our southern boarder
YES IT IS AND WE PUT YOU IN AS PRESIDENT , you have kept your PROMISES!!!
Go build that way, that is why we voted for you. Thank you for all you can do in spite of all the hate. My President Donald J. Trump
How about telling the truth? Where does that land on your priority list? Does it even make the list?
Yes Sir!! That's right!! Thank you President Trump!!
Than how come the tax break for the wealthy was forced through while there were no checks and balances instead of your useless wall?
Yes because actually running the country isnt in his job description...dont have to run the country if its shutdown. 🤔
Good job Trump and may God bless you.
Mr trumpo  we are all nations in America..   that is how we become  Americans.   Yes we need security.  From corruption.
Mabey he should put up his billions to pay for it.
Then why talk about leaving NATO?
I live by the border and this is the huge waste of money ego ploy.
Walls dont work,  Joshua 6;20,  wall of Berlin.  Name it. Hatred walls wont do good.  But hey lets waste money on it its cool.
And that sir was my number one priority!   So many coming in and trying to change our ways. As ILLEGALS.
So declare a Sate of Emergency and BUILD THE WALL ALREADY !!!!!
Thank God for President Trump.
So do it and the hell with the Nancy's. And chucks. Don't buckle , they need to listen to the people.
Instructing people to lie to congress is a fun way to be remembered.
Good job Trump and may God bless you.
Stick to your guns...let everyone know where NANCY IS...
The single most important role of the Government is the protection of its citizens
Ummm the only way sovereignty is taken away is if a nation marches on our nation and no one tries to stop them. Nice try feat mongering my guy. That’s not how it works
Thank you Mr. President for taking the responsibility of keeping the people of our nation safe.  It appalls me to see how lightly congress is taking this matter.  May God bless you and keep you strong through this battle.
What fancy propaganda pics he has.  Wonder if he has "propaganda pics" penciled in his schedule
Question...why doesn't he build it?
#DonaldTrump you have Got to STOP the chemtrail spraying and the HAARP machines!!! It is killing everything on this planet!!!!!
Now, who could possibly have a problem with his statement? People who don't care about their country...😠
Can we stop calling it a wall, or a barrier? Let’s call it what it really is, a filter.
We the People want the Wall!
Instructing people to lie to congress is a fun way to be remembered.
We the People want the Wall!
President Trump please keep standing strong against these anti-American, Globalists, Open Borders people! "We The People" want you to build the Wall for our protection! Thank you and God bless you, Sir!💖
Karen Myrick You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Charlie Daboub you do realize it took 10 Democrats from the Senate to pass any Bill that included money for the Wall. The Democrats refused to work with the Republican Senators, not counting the several RINOS in the Republican Party who also refused to vote for the Wall. I have never understood why the RINOS are even in the Republican Party other than to help the Democrats block real Conservative Bills. These are some of the reasons why the Wall was not built in the last two years.
Can we stop calling it a wall, or a barrier? Let’s call it what it really is, a filter.
Charlie Daboub you do realize it took 10 Democrats from the Senate to pass any Bill that included money for the Wall. The Democrats refused to work with the Republican Senators, not counting the several RINOS in the Republican Party who also refused to vote for the Wall. I have never understood why the RINOS are even in the Republican Party other than to help the Democrats block real Conservative Bills. These are some of the reasons why the Wall was not built in the last two years.
Can you please repost this BS twice a week?.... 3 times a day is too much border security already!
https://www.dps.texas.gov/administration/crime_records/pages/txcriminalalienstatistics.htm
Karen Myrick You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Thank You President Trump, may God Bless you.
Please start a civil war!
As a filthy rich and cold blooded businessman...... my priority is???????
YES...and that's why we love you and voted for you and will vote for you again.
Maybe you should build a army base at the border & patrol from there ( guess the Congress would be opposed to that also)
Thank you, President Trump. ♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️
Why is your AJ choice agreeing with Maxine Waters over red flag laws and said he's for gun control. Making it hard for me to see voting for you again.
That’s what democrat leadership wants.
https://www.dps.texas.gov/administration/crime_records/pages/txcriminalalienstatistics.htm
Alright enough I agree with the wall but that's a little dramatic
Love ❤️ God bless you (English) אַלוהום יברך אותך (Hebrew) خدا خیرت بده (persian)
The bell tolls for thee. Impeachment is around the corner
Then passing executive order and build the wall we need it
We have your back and Proud to call you President!!!
Get it done!!!! Thank you for doing what is good for America
But  pease  look  into  GMO  foods  which  are  killing  us  &  the  FDA  is  behind  so  many  coverups https://explainlife.com/top-5-additives-banned-in-europe-and-russia-but-approved-by-the-fda-in-u-s-7609/?utm_source=Explainlife.com+Newsletter&utm_medium=email
BUILD THE WALL OR SHUT IT ALL DOWN!
A nuclear capable country without strong borders? Build the wall ;)
That’s what democrat leadership wants.
Absolutely.    Declare State of Emergancy and get our Wall built !!!  Get this crap over with. That’ll Shut Down Pissy Palosi and Commi Chuck.
Weapons of Mass Destruction have been found in Mexico! #MAGA
Stay strong Mr. President. This is our only chance to add to our existing fence. Thank you for all you do.
Gooooo President Trump!!!  We are with you sir.
Wow you’re hands look so extra towards tiny in this poster. You need a better graphic designer.
We will always prevail with Trumps keen political skills
We've been a nation all this time. It takes this dude to come and tell us we're not?? I'm really getting tired of you bad-mouthing American Trump
Save our daughters from abduction, sadism, and slavery. Safe Borders, Safe Life
You left all the ports unguarded
Why did you let bump stocks get banned? Don't act like we conservatives didn't notice.
A nuclear capable country without strong borders? Build the wall ;)
The same happens if we don't defend our 2nd amendment sir. You AG nomination is an enemy of the 2nd.
Thank You my/our President Donald Trump. Blessings
Yes , Can’t wait until the 30 days are over new changes!
If we don't impeach this crook, we cease to be a nation!
Well, as pence said: they’ve caught 17,000 ppl trying to enter illegally. Seems the boarder we have now works just fine.
Isn't your job to be president for all of the people and not just one party. OPEN THE GOV'T,  unless, of course you need Ann Coulter's permission? How about Hannity's?
Unfortunately, My President is starting to kowtow to the Democrats.
@realDonaldTrump @SenateMajLdr Ted Dobias Time: Secure our Nation’s Security & Border, Army Corps of Engineers should build/maintain southern border: "Mission to "Deliver vital public and military engineering services; in peace & war to strengthen our Nation's security." https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_Army_Corps_of_Engineers
Trump, STOP waiting for permission and BUILD THE WALL. “Get Er Done”. Then change every law that gives illegals all the freebies that Legal Migrants never ever had. Then replace our federal tax system with the FAIRTAX. You’re the Best for America.
Why did you let bump stocks get banned? Don't act like we conservatives didn't notice.
Thank you President Trump!!
Put them on the no-fly list until we have America’s borders safe
Time to fire people,  30 days of shutdown approaching fast😂
This is the beginning of martial law
Ok so what about north border hey they are coming in from Canada...😒
President Trump Is Right !!
You put a wall over our exonomy
Thank you Mr. President! Keep Texas Safe.
Stopping using poor Americans as pawns for political gain
Trump, STOP waiting for permission and BUILD THE WALL. “Get Er Done”. Then change every law that gives illegals all the freebies that Legal Migrants never ever had. Then replace our federal tax system with the FAIRTAX. You’re the Best for America.
Stopping using poor Americans as pawns for political gain
All you are looking for is to line your pockets.... if you were concerned with the boarders why did you wait 2yrs????
Jarrod Williams I would reply...but you’re obviously a Nancy.  Good day
Lee Grant  you are obviously a trump cocksucker.... if you mean the current speaker no not a fan but I wouldn’t support trump because he could careless about you or me trust me I have seen his 20 plus years of destruction from AC to Fort Lauderdale so don’t come at me you little cocksucker..... I served my country unlike the draft dodger 🖕🏻
Lee Grant well bitch I replied so go f your self
Lee Grant  if the Nancy thing was referring to something else I would love for you to say it....rather begging for you to say it because it would prove you are just as worthless as he is
Thank you Mr. President! Keep Texas Safe.
I am with all Trump voters who will vote for him in 220.:-)
Thank you President Trump 🇺🇸
Is this the PHOTOSHOPPED photo everyone is talking about? Making your waist look smaller (not possible with all that fast food you eat) and making those baby hands look BIGGER?
IF THE BORDERS ARE NOT PROTECTED THERE IS GOING TO BE AN INVASIVE INMIGRATION!!!!!!
We support you and thank you for your tireless efforts toward our safety and security. 2020 🇺🇸🇺🇸
I don't trust William Barr.
Why the delay on implementing sanctions on Russia, and lack of funding for a cyber security task force to prevent further election hacking?
What good are borders without a functioning government.
Hahaha ignorance at it's finest.
Lee Grant  if the Nancy thing was referring to something else I would love for you to say it....rather begging for you to say it because it would prove you are just as worthless as he is
I see the trolls are out in force to try to negate the amazing accomplishments of President Trump.  Trump 2020!!!!
We are the American people support you appreciate you and pray for you and God bless you
He is focused on the right stuff.
That's what the demorats want!
Just do it. you're the president. but REMIND the German's wall went dawn, the china wall is a barrier for the development and communication.  use intelligence, use technology. use ELECTRIC FENCE, SOLAR ENERGY, CAMERAS, BUILD  houses for soldiers. every five miles, do a better job. stop to talk. act. 🇲🇾
Yes build the wall then we can start fixing other problems.  Keep up the good work sir
enough already call for a  state of emergency and  be done with it.
That is the whole point as the elite and super rich want cheap labour that is easy to control and won't stand up and fight back.
The American people say thank you for putting our safety first. Best President ever.
Stay strong!! Never give in!! Keep the faith! We’re behind you and love you!!
Hahaha ignorance at it's finest.
Stay strong!! Never give in!! Keep the faith! We’re behind you and love you!!
Keep fighting for what we need, Mr. President. This could be our last real chance to get the wall that we need and start doing things right at our border, which is best for all. The folks missing pay now will eventually get paid. This goes beyond that for so many reasons, like our children’s future. Don’t give in. That’s what the Left is hoping you’ll do, but you can’t. 💪🏼💙❤️🇺🇸🙏🏻
Rachel Hokanson You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Charlie Daboub you realize that he needs the Democrat’s support to fund the wall right? And you realize that the Democrats and Republicans and our last handful of presidents could have also built it, and done other things, but failed to do so. And they claimed they were in support of it until Trump got elected. 🤷🏽‍♀️ He has done what he can so far with it.
The American people say thank you for putting our safety first. Best President ever.
Just keep doing what you're doing President Trump!!
I voted for Trump and he has fixed a lot of lingering problems and done a lot of good BUT...it is so easy for us who are not Federal employees to say "Build The Wall" while some are losing their homes and going to food banks because they cannot even buy food right now. There has to be a better way of doing this than causing such good hard working people with children to suffer greatly....:(
Funny how many families are going without food so they can get to work or medicine he thinks this is a joke bc he aint going without I bet he couldn't live one day in the wk of the average citizen therefore has no empathy as to what they are going through open the dam government pay your employees and then discuss the stupid wall......If it was so important than why not do this when you had both the house and congress instead you feed your wealthy friends like the poor lil boy at school who had no friends until he bought them
Very True!  Thank You President Trump!
Just another lying politician.   Backstabber.   Putin’s B****.  39% approval rating.  🤣
True so stop wasting time and SECURE OUR BORDERS
He's CAPTAIN AMERICA  to me !!!
Thank you President Trump!
Thank a lot my president !
Charlie Daboub you realize that he needs the Democrat’s support to fund the wall right? And you realize that the Democrats and Republicans and our last handful of presidents could have also built it, and done other things, but failed to do so. And they claimed they were in support of it until Trump got elected. 🤷🏽‍♀️ He has done what he can so far with it.
Thank a lot my president !
Then maybe you shouldn’t have conspired with Putin.
dumbass,   you believe everything you're told obviously
Thank you President Trump!
He will get it done he's a business man👊👊🙌🤜🤛
Yes it is.  If only you would really do your duty, instead of trying to divide the nation with paranoia
With you 100% Sir.  Stand your ground!
Please mr president u r our last hope to bringing peace in afganistan do more
bless our country mr, president truimp . the ppl . loves you
Well, that is actually what you were elected to do...
Ummm your finger looks longer...strange
I agree, President Trump is trying to do this inspite of the DEMOCRAT'S.
Many forget the scope of the government is almost limited to public safety only. Not socialized programs or “moral” issues.
dumbass,   you believe everything you're told obviously
Many forget the scope of the government is almost limited to public safety only. Not socialized programs or “moral” issues.
Why not get the government open so TSA can do its job then????
Matthew Zabor tsa has already stayed that they are doing the job and have yet to encounter a problem
Andrew David Johnson  clearly you didn’t hear the story about the guy who flew with a handgun two days ago...  https://www.nytimes.com/2019/01/14/us/delta-passenger-gun.amp.html
Loaded Gun!
I agree, President Trump is trying to do this inspite of the DEMOCRAT'S.
Extinction is knocking at our door .....and borders
Keep standing strong Mr. President.  We are behind you all the way 100%.
Some want wall, and I just want for cholesterol to hurry up.
Let him do his job! He is protecting all our interests!
I think that this isn't best shot with that corner piece of the flag 😁
Who is going to split the ham
GOT YOUR BACK MR PRESIDENT - also please fix healthcare Obamacare 🤢
Agreed!  Keep fighting President Trump!
Yes I agree very strongly. There is the legal way do get to America. My president Mr trump is our fist good good president in a long time. And if you don't see that your not for the rule of law or for America. You just want to destroy our nation.
Loaded Gun!
People don't give up on him, there are 5 other very happy years coming up with President Trump😁👌
Which country is that? Asking for a friend in Russia.
Yes we must defend our boarders. And our hamburgers!
#TheLyingBullyingBuffoon is incompetent.
As indeed every democratically elected leader should do.
So you want me to put mo cheese on my burger for wall tax
You can add cheese to my burger ..tax me baby I want that tax . immigration is your yelling for da wall
We ceased to be a nation when YOU got elected by the Electoral College, NOT the American People.
So why is CPB working without pay, if they are not defending our border? Thought that's what they do. Resign, putz.
Yes I agree very strongly. There is the legal way do get to America. My president Mr trump is our fist good good president in a long time. And if you don't see that your not for the rule of law or for America. You just want to destroy our nation.
I support you your excellency
Cheap fast and dirty, President Trump... first 10 miles inside the border is a temp military base... new rules, no cost... What happens when you trespass on a base without authorization? No Congress needed, executive order... done and done
You must be the people that's got it made already you forgot the people that work everyday who suffers out here but don't forget I asked the Democrats to go to the table and resolve this wall situation which day is right we do need to build a wall but the thing is is that we got to make sure that nobody is lining their pockets with money can you agree with me on that one
Do anybody remember when he had that show on television he was firing everybody just think about it for a minute he's the same way as he is now he should not be president of the United States
Amazing #MAGA #2020 Mr President
You are not doing a good job . Time to lockdown the Democrats no movement out of the country until the wall is built
Stay with it Mr. President. We want border security.
Tell the Dems to stick it where the sun don't shine, We want money NOW for the wall.
Truly, there is never a secured nation without border security.
So why is CPB working without pay, if they are not defending our border? Thought that's what they do. Resign, putz.
Praying  for our President  and our Nation
Thank you, President Trump.
🦅❤️🇺🇸🙏🏻✝️🙏🏻🇺🇸❤️🦅 GOD bless America!
We stand with you Mr President
Will c when were homeless without pay but still have to be at work by 4. Trump 2020 all the way but boss you give me a check and I help protect this county I can't do it on E.
In the last election I don't see how anyone could have voted, the people were not given an adequate selection of candidates yet, forced to vote for what they think is the lesser of 2 evils, sad neither side can still get anything done,.. Years later the same thing is happening thus proving the systems broken. Yall think its going to get better you are sadly mistaken
And why is your suit only wrinkled on your left side all the time?  Is that the side you sleep on when in the Oval office?
Defend it against the liberals 1st ...
If we don't impeach this imposter, we cease to be a nation.
I believe only you and God can save our nation.
Don't give up Mr President
I believe only you and God can save our nation.
Use your power and build the wall. Clearly the dems will not concead
Why should they?So Trump can build a worthless wall?
If we don't impeach this imposter, we cease to be a nation.
All of them voted to Trump as refugees Mohamed Coméz and loe chan  WTF
Hope she cancels your so called state of the union! We all know what state we’re in these days!
Thank God for our President..strong and powerful
Praying for our faithful President!💖
History will not be kind to Trump and rightfully so.
So declare a state of emergency already!
Our nation needs a defense from you!
I do not see anything wrong by securing our borders.  Entering LEGALLY was and is always an option.  God bless you MR. President.  Hold your grounds in Making America Great Again.  Looking at Europe's current crime crisis from illegal immigration only praying that wall will be built and built soon.
let's put Hillary on the other side😉😁
Why should they?So Trump can build a worthless wall?
this country has been a free for all for decades!!!! Build that wall Mr. Trump!!! America supports you!!! TRUMP 2020!!!!
Mr PRESIDENT,  PLEASE FORCE the IRS to immediately STOP  giving tax refunds to illegal aliens!
Just give him the ok for the damn wall. So government employees can have pay
Good thing they're not under attack
do the wall -do the wall  do the wall,,,,,, with snipers too,,,
We need to get Flint clean water, fix are D rated infrastructure,  stop gun violence, and pay people a living wage.
Your most important duty is to resign and leave the fuckin country bc YOU AINT JACK SHIEEET!!! 😂😭
Great president..you are true. You can protect the earth
let's put Hillary on the other side😉😁
Great president..you are true. You can protect the earth
Stay tough President Trump! We know you truly  have the best interest for our nation unlike the rest of the government officials. Go in fighting... you got this
The Mexicans are digging tunnels so they can enter the US big tunnels...don't waste our tax dollars..
Your most important duty is to resign and leave the fuckin country bc YOU AINT JACK SHIEEET!!! 😂😭
This has to STOP! https://insider.foxnews.com/2015/03/02/irs-defends-giving-refunds-illegal-immigrants
Your most important duty is to resign and leave the fuckin country bc YOU AINT JACK SHIEEET!!! 😂😭
****" 100% "American and Love His People , Great Lion Rora Our Beloved Lion King....!!!! :) " ****
OMG does this really need explaining.
You should just resign: it would protect our nation a whole lot.
Sheldon I just see a man not a color. Thank God we are free to vote for who we want. God bless the USA.
Hmmm. So Nancy won't let Trump give the SOTU speech in the House. Sen. Rand Paul says Trump should do it in the Senate. Both those venues suggest seats filled by "tickets" given to radical protestors (like at hearings) liable to be disruptive and removed. On the radio yesterday, Rush suggested Trump rent a gynormous stadium like he does for his rallys, let the American people fill it, and give his SOTU there. Imagine a captive audience of constituents who WANT to hear what he says, viral videos on the internet so Americans can see and hear what POTUS wants us to know, and what the MSM will cut with commercials or edit out.
America safety at risk ! Need Trump Conservative Common Sense !
The Mexicans are digging tunnels so they can enter the US big tunnels...don't waste our tax dollars..
Amen to common sense and love of country.
We need you in Sweden. Our prime minister is like a pajamas boy.
Just say no to open borders.
Stand you ground, build that wall
Maybe fund the TSA so every boarder is better protected?
Thank you Mr.President!!!Stay the course...Build that wall!!!
Of course-Any Country should have safety.
You are the only politician working for the people to protect our country.
If we don’t have people to defend our nation, a wall is just a wall
Perhaps we could simply buy a trillion American made LEGOs for the wall?
America safety at risk ! Need Trump Conservative Common Sense !
Donald J. Trump is the best President & Leader we ever had.
Russia has you in their pocket. That’s why you can’t stand up to Putin.
The  real  enemy  is  within. Trust  me.
Agree need wall, but don't keep punishing the working class to get it.  If shutdown keeps going, the next thing we'll face is a major Recession.   No money to pay bills, let alone buy anything or even go out to eat.  Use your executive order and end the shutdown
Mr president Trump the great 👍
Hold the line . Leadership like a boss. I am so proud you are my President.
It’d just a campaign promise to your base.  Keep it up your base isn’t enough to get you elected in 2020 .
Which nation is he talking about? Russia or the U.S.?
We need protection from you and your criminal administration!!.
people maybe Pelosi can give her pay to people for shut down its only 194,000
Perhaps we could simply buy a trillion American made LEGOs for the wall?
people maybe Pelosi can give her pay to people for shut down its only 194,000
This is the soul purpose of the government.
* sole Dumbass.
We need protection from you and your criminal administration!!.
The Canadian border is open because it's okay so far.  The Mexican border is far from safe and needs to be walled!!!
Nancy wants protection for her. Trump wants protection for the whole country!
Another name for the NWO EU, is Fourth Reich. PLEASE keep us out of it.  https://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/2016/05/15/the-fourth-reich-is-here---without-a-shot-being-fired/
Stop letting Pelosi walk all over you. just do it......
I stand with President Trump! 👍👍
...Yes sir, Mr President, if we don't protect our borders, we will not be a good nation state but a poor globalist state like the EU members.
Thank you for putting America first President Trump! God bless you! #MAGA 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Im just very curious,im not rep or dem! But i would love to understand how the fck is a wall ever guna hold anyone back from coming to US did we forge they can also come threw ocean or tunnels?! 🤦‍♀️ i really don't understand gow this stupid wall is guna change anything
At a time when Deep State NWO socialists have worked so hard disarming our nation - between weakening our military, police, and borders, it absolutely is.  It won't be easy working with a Congress that has been infiltrated by anti-Americans, and intentionally filled all leadership positions with socialist hacks, but you can do it. They are attempting a coup not only against you, but against the sovereignty of our country and I truly believe the LORD has put you in office for this very reason. You're doing a GREAT job.  Thank you from We The People.
* sole Dumbass.
Stand Strong the Nation of Patriots are behind you! AND most importantly GOD is with you.
The biggest attack we have ever had came through the airports which are unprotected with this shutdown.
Are you guys building a wall from Canada?
Declare the emergency. Build it and end this. Only way!
Pay our Coast Guard Trump!
Did trump lose weight?  And his shoulders are much broader......he must have been working out.....wait...I think he's taller too.....
Now see if you can make a priority of the Dam ...sorry Dems
Time to step down and bring President Bush back...people are loosing health insurance and can't pay for car insurance car payment...
Just exercise your right to exercise a national emergency.  Build the well needed wall and move on.! Stop the war between Pelosi and you!  Serve the American people!
Keep the great job Mr. President!!!!
At a time when Deep State NWO socialists have worked so hard disarming our nation - between weakening our military, police, and borders, it absolutely is.  It won't be easy working with a Congress that has been infiltrated by anti-Americans, and intentionally filled all leadership positions with socialist hacks, but you can do it. They are attempting a coup not only against you, but against the sovereignty of our country and I truly believe the LORD has put you in office for this very reason. You're doing a GREAT job.  Thank you from We The People.
Why then, did you not defend your nation when called and instead manufactured bone spurs that didn't exist?
This rat would crap his pants if called to duty, that’s a responsibility unfamiliar his entire life.  Big office big talk!  He really would not know how to keep a tight ass when Hell happens.
What nation are we if you continue to take away the funding that Americans need and depend on to live and survive in this country? The shutdown is doing damage to many families outside of the reported 800,000 federal employees! People are going unpaid, USDA loans for homes and so much more frozen, school’s reimbursements for feeding children of low income for free are at a halt and just beginning to feel the effects of the shutdown, families that struggle daily and live pay check to pay check that pay taxes and do all they can to provide are going to lose food stamps, College students that have school loan via government funding are now not getting funded and are at cross roads (impacting employees funding and students), people that work and need assistance for childcare are at cross roads doing to funding being at a halt, farmers, and so many more! This shut down is sickening to me to think it is the fix to “Making America Great Again”. I am not for or against the wall but what I do know I am for is opening the government back up sooner than later as it is doing no favor to a huge some of Americans and their families!
Then pay TSA agents for protecting our nation's Ports of Entry
So your a “nationalist” then white guy...
Put military bases on the border. Military exercises, desert training, live ammo, drones, etc.
If he builds a steel wall he's just wasting our money.
Can we deport the demonrats - please?  If only!
Yes I agree #realDonaldTrump #buildthewall
Thank you President Trump for cancelling Nancy Pelosi's trip!!!  Let her fly commercially but she should stay here and NEGOTIATE... We want the wall.
Keep the great job Mr. President!!!!
"American's will not pay for the wall they will"
What about selling us out to the Russians? Is that defending our nation?
The enemy always on your back.
No problem right now president AMLO will help more to México.... Thank you for nothing.... And Good luck with CHRYSLER and GM automotive taxes...
Stand strong Mr. President; we are with you!!!
So what are you waiting on
Cross China or North Korea borders n you get shot.
Everything about this administration is a lie: https://www.reddit.com/r/PoliticalHumor/comments/ah26x0/trumps_facebook_page_slimmed_him_down_and_made/
Sorry but your fighting a loosing battle. https://www.theguardian.com/news/2018/apr/05/demise-of-the-nation-state-rana-dasgupta
The only people in America who have a brain and heart is those who loathe everything your trump stands for and supports: The promotion and propagation of bigotry, hate, ignorance, fear, divisiveness, violence, and fascism.
Thank you President Trump for cancelling Nancy Pelosi's trip!!!  Let her fly commercially but she should stay here and NEGOTIATE... We want the wall.
Lol back in 2020 lol man you're funny
Good make some arrest on capital Hill for being enemies of the state
100% have your back!!! Stand firm Mr. President!! You're doing awesome!!!!
Simple to find. Even for a dumbocrat https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Border_barrier
God's blessings will be with the United States. The power of the United States with God 's temple is great.
So happy we are not fighting over what bathrooms are!!!
If we dont protect our endangered species then we wont have an earth to live on. You are destroying their protection. I voted for you, but you have signed away protections for jobs. Jobs are not everything, there is a balance and you are incapable in seeing that. Look up rulers and the consequences of their actions when it comes to the destruction of their environment or protections. When the bees are gone, what is your family going to eat? Everybody knows money isnt everything. There is a balance, you in business should know that.  I'm for the wall, for tariffs that have been extremely off set, I am hoping there will be someone running that is a business man AND AWORLD WILDLIFE MAN
Agreed!!! We'd like the infringement on our 2nd Amendment Rights day after day to go away also!!!
The only people in America who have a brain and heart is those who loathe everything your trump stands for and supports: The promotion and propagation of bigotry, hate, ignorance, fear, divisiveness, violence, and fascism.
And let no one convince you any different !
Its funny how so many are flipping to being common sense Republicans. And so many Democrats are losing base..
unfortunately nothing is being done to protect us from within, don't be fooled into thinking all is well
Dear Mr. President... I have been informed that Mr Barr "supports"  "Red Flag Laws"..... these laws are UnConstitutional and he should know that and respect our rights according to the Bill of Rights  especially the 2 and 4th as it applys to this issue.  Please do not support such Constitutional attacks on our Rights!
After honoring God, the security of our nation must be our first priority. What does it matter if we have health insurance if we are under attack?  What does it matter how good our schools are if our children are not safe? What does it matter what minimum wage is if our country is going broke from supporting illegals?  What does it matter if we protect the environment if we don't protect our people?  The people and "leaders" of this nation must understand that defending our nation must come before all other issues - that all issues become meaningless without  a strong military and secure borders.  Honor God, Protect our Borders, then everything else can be addressed.
👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼  People need to understand this. A President’s job is Commander & Chief, his primary job isn’t solving social justices etc it’s protecting our nation!Something other Presidents clearly didn’t do a good job at. Finally a president doing his job!
I voted for you in 2016 and will vote for you in 2020. Keep up the good work !!  We are behind you.
you President Trump haters need to stop eating the tide pods, so your brain functions normally....you're the reason we have to put instructions on shampoo
God Bless and Protect you Sir.  And, Please, Get That Wall Built!!!  The whole thing... all the way!
Agreed!!! We'd like the infringement on our 2nd Amendment Rights day after day to go away also!!!
God Bless and Protect you Sir.  And, Please, Get That Wall Built!!!  The whole thing... all the way!
You are the greatest danger to our country.
Kerry Flint Button wait...he’s not a communist imbecile like the neo-Bolsheviks of the left
Thank you President Trump 🇺🇸❤️
Thanks for standing up for the American people Mr. President Trump!
Government shutdown needs to end.  Compromise or do something please
President Trump is a man our nation can count on to do the right thing for our United States.  He is the best.   Thank you President Trump and God Bless You.  💕🇺🇸️💕
Canada have no borders because of Justin Trudeau
Why are your fingers long and your skin toned whitened?
You can defend ur borders but not building a wall fence! If each country builds a wall, what do u think will happen?
Yes the Mongol hordes are massing at the boarders, don't buy in to this BS folks
That's right Mr.President with you all the way I will vote for you again in 2020
Kerry Flint Button wait...he’s not a communist imbecile like the neo-Bolsheviks of the left
That's right Mr.President with you all the way I will vote for you again in 2020
I have the view of the US soap opera from outside. And can't believe how pathetic and ridiculous this country has become, tks to the 45th. U guys have no shame? The whole world is watching. 👀
Agnes Salgado you think it come to be this way in the last 2 years?? Well you haven't watched long enough. I actually live here, and it's only become better since 45 took over. So stay on the outside and shut up. Puro Pinche Puta.
Yes the Mongol hordes are massing at the boarders, don't buy in to this BS folks
🇺🇸🇺🇸2020!!!🇺🇸🇺🇸 This election should be called perfect vision 20/20
My family and I are standing behind you. God always has your back!!!! No weapon formed against you shall prosper. All the. evil talk coming against you and all the hatred can't stand up against God!!! God Bless you!!!! Heavenly Father please soften the hearts of the ones prolonging building the wall. I pray they realize the importance of our safety for our country and come in agreement with President Trump to build the wall. In Jesus name Amen.
Northern border is a really big threat to our security and safety, but you don't care about that...
-Hang tough President Trump, We The People are with you.
Nice how you spit on the work of the CBP.
The thing is, people will argue about this, even though that is one of, if not the most important job of ANY president.
That is exactly what the democrats are trying to do.
Pretty sure  thats that’s what  they  want .    ☹️
Built the wall so high they get crawl over it with spikes. Bless you President trump.
Agnes Salgado you think it come to be this way in the last 2 years?? Well you haven't watched long enough. I actually live here, and it's only become better since 45 took over. So stay on the outside and shut up. Puro Pinche Puta.
We are with you to the end Mr President.
Photoshopped fake news because you are alot fatter in real life.  Hamberder
You are ceasing our nation either way it goes.
Bi pass the Dems .  Don’t let them stand in your way.
Someone lock this Treasonous Trump up before he destroys the US.
If feel he is holding this country hostage because he’s not getting his way. I try to be opened minded but not on this wall issue.
Ha! They made his fingers longer and took off 20 lbs.
Thank you President Trump. I know you’ll get it done. Build the wall.
Stand your ground. Build the wall! MAGA🇺🇸
When you hate somebody  to  much then he getting better and better i think he is one of those
Built the wall so high they get crawl over it with spikes. Bless you President trump.
Yes, MR. PRESIDENT:  You said it, and we know you MEANT I T:  Thank GOD FOR PUTTING  YOU  THERE  IN  THE  FIRST  PLACE.  Americans are blessed  because of God choosing you as His President of the United States of America.  We are praying that Gods will be done through “you”.  Amen!!!!!!!
The most important issue for border protection !!! White House policies. Policies should not produce an enemy.
President trump why don’t you just fine everyone who doesn’t want the border wall like Obama fine everyone who didn’t want healthcare that’s one way to get the money
America First Mr President...
Then end the shutdown so our TSA agents can get paid.
Who is President not Laura kelly LoL
I love you trump  I am indian
30 of shutdown & you can start draining the swamp... just a few days to go!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
You know he googled how to spell "cease".
Yet the Coast Guard and the Border Protection Employees are not getting paid due to a partial Govt Shutdown...seems a bit hypocritical - Open the government and then work on negotiating for the border security but do not hold all these employees hostages in the negotiations.
When you hate somebody  to  much then he getting better and better i think he is one of those
Yet the Coast Guard and the Border Protection Employees are not getting paid due to a partial Govt Shutdown...seems a bit hypocritical - Open the government and then work on negotiating for the border security but do not hold all these employees hostages in the negotiations.
You know he googled how to spell "cease".
YES! MAKE AMERICA SAFE AGAIN. USA, USA, USA!!
You have opened our eyes on how corrupt politicians are. Gas prices are at an all time low, unemployment all time low, I'm saving a lot of money on my land taxes..and I thank you for all of that. Washington is mad because you have shown the American people we don't need big government and you are hurting their purse strings. I can't see why anyone would vote for a crooked politician again.
If we go to other country we can't go in the way these caravan want to come in we have to go the right way thats why we need the border
Build the wall and immigration reform
He seems to be the only one in D C who knows that
The Dems are playing reverse psychology , ppl will now have empathy and compassion for immigrants looking for a better life; especially, for children walking for weeks, without food. SMH, President Trump's fell right into that trap. Ppl have been without a paycheck, and becoming scared; imagine not being able to support your family for years..
We Need the wall approved NOW!
Liberals want more power but America isn't big enough. They're hoping for world domination so dissolving America is their first step. Of course the borders and the constitution have to go.
Make an action figure of this. Major sales guaranteed!!
Great real word @ Respect the real Government and keep Happiness to all the  country in 2019 till our Life end......God bless you.....we are the world !
Voted for Trump and still happy I did.  He is a business man trying to exist in the world of politics.  Business people set goals and try to reach them along with bringing profits to their stock holders.  I consider myself to be a stock holder in America and I hope our President can bring our country to its full potential like any other business.  On the other hand all the Dems seem to be interested in is getting reelected, get with it guys, if you can't help make America great go away, we won't miss you!
We’ve sustained this long. Your idea isn’t so awesome
That's right! And then who will help the world! Love our President and First Lady!!!🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸❤️ Our President standing for our country to keep us strong, and then we can continue to help the world. America first so we can, as always, help the world.
Stay the course, build the wall!!
I'm with the Government shutdown. It sucks but the Dems are to blame. With you 100% Mr President.
God bless our President Donald J Trump 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Defend against Russian interference, punk! Traitor
We Need the wall approved NOW!
Defend against Russian interference, punk! Traitor
Don't be surprised if he does an assault weapons ban cause he already ban bump stocks. He use to support the assault weapon ban years before he ran for president. He has already went against the promises he has made.
Adonus Lloyd define assault weapons.
the real definition of an assault rifle is a full auto with a select fire but the liberals say anything that holds more than 10 rounds. My point is that he banned something and is not going to refund anyone for them which is thief.
The law was rewritten on the definition of machine guns. Which could lead to something else being ban.
Adonus Lloyd I’m not worried about it. If they wanna get our guns let them there are over 5million Americans with guns who would laugh at them trying to get them. No one is going to put them down I say about out of the 5 million maybe 100 thousand would disarm them selves that’s about it.
I do support the border wall.🙂
God bless our President Donald J Trump 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Exactly what liberals and our enemies want.
....after your collusion with Russia and numerous blunders, of course
I thought you defeated isis and we have more terrorist threats?
I voted for you Mr Trump and felt you have been awesome but right now hearing on the news people who work for the government like coast guard are not getting paid I don't understand how making the little n poor people suffer will get the Senate n Congress to back the wall they are not suffering they still collect their pay the don't care about the less fortunate step on Congress toes take care of the lil peeps 💖
Thank you President Trump
Stay strong Mr President 💪. Millions of us stand with you.  Forgive the haters and keep on doing a great job. Some would disagree with me on that, but that will not change my mind. Thank you and God bless you.
Stand your ground.  If we can give 12 billion in foreign aid, we can spend 5 billion on border security.  Better than the 25-40 billion Dems proposed in the past.
Stand strong President Trump. 🇺🇸
THE PROBLEM IS YOUR NOT DOING ANYTHING BUT TALK
I do support the border wall.🙂
THE PROBLEM IS YOUR NOT DOING ANYTHING BUT TALK
Stand strong President Trump. 🇺🇸
Absolutely!!! America is starting to repeat history that didn't go well. We came to this country from England and wherever seeking freedom. We came here and the native Americans fed, clothed, and helped us survive the beginning of this great nation. So obviously we killed them drove them away and took their land for ourselves. If they don't approve the wall, it's going to happen again, except this time, we'll be the native Americans. I may be wrong but I doubt it.
Commander Bone Spurs always comes up with a good one.
Sorry, my bone spurs are acting up. Cant help today.
How sad ! Maybe the US will be great again someday.....perhaps.
EXCLUDING YOUR SELL-OUT TO RUSSIA!!!
This bad hombre is a good campaigner!
PLEASE DON'T GIVE IN - DELIVER THAT STATE OF THE UNION TOO!!!!! WE HAVE A RIGHT TO HEAR IT!!!
All these people out of work should be your priority, it's way more imortant
Jason  he looks like he’s just about the unleash [The Wall] on everyone who opposes his stand.
Defending America!!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Me to í voted for DONALD TRUMP as Hispanic woman I love you My president
Lmao, dumbest thing to say.
If we don’t pay our working people we cease to be humanitarians and weaken our economy
Absolutely mr trum is Right.  Congress need to take steps back and release funds for American Border. Every country need there security then why not America? Support mr Trum... 🙏🏻
Donald J. Trump, thank you for securing our borders! Please END the assault on the Bill of Rights and our Right to Bear Arms.
Thank you President Trump!!
President trump is the best President go Mr President so the liberals you mean business
SHUT THE BORDER DOWN NOW.
He pis not the only Great person, or president to say that,check the history!!
Jason  he looks like he’s just about the unleash [The Wall] on everyone who opposes his stand.
build an Electric wall its hot enough in Arizona to put up solar panels to keep it electric
We cease to be a nation when you don’t support the people that actually live in it and work for you! End the shutdown and let your people get paid and get the economy back!
Bye, I have to go look for work.  Ramona Jeannine
This is the greatest President we ever had!  Doing the right thing is always controversial.  But doing what is right,is always the Best way to go.
How do "they" not see this?
We need too!!! I am with you all the way.
Totally with you!  America first!
Since youre mostly bots  Heres my password  FUTrumpTheTraitor1234
I agree!   If WE don't  defend our Nation, then WHY bother with  anything else!  😠  It will not matter anymore!     They all say SAFETY FIRST>>>>>>>🙏👊
He pis not the only Great person, or president to say that,check the history!!
WHAT ABOUT THE ARCTIC SEA YOU WERE GOING TO FUND TO PROTECT
So true and for all we know ISS will try to slip in with them.
Sorry y’all aren’t getting paid tell Nancy to give the money to us right here not to foreign aid USA 🇺🇸 first always 👍👍
You’re the best 😘 ...I agree 👌🏼
Mr. President you can do anything.
Voting for @trump was the proudest thing I have ever done ...sir shine on
Nancy is going for a Coup de ta
If we don't pay our employees this country could pile on more issues!
Did the democraps take a different oath of office to ruin and disrespect Americans? Apparently so !
I agree!   If WE don't  defend our Nation, then WHY bother with  anything else!  😠  It will not matter anymore!     They all say SAFETY FIRST>>>>>>>🙏👊
IT SHOULD & MUST BE!  Thanks my POTUS.
It is news when Trump doesn’t lie.
Build the wall!!! Stay strong President Trump!
Uh, Canada doesn't defend its border.  Does that make it no longer a nation?  What is the definition of "nation"?
You a billionaire that’s so generous , how about you put the 5 billion since your so worried? Oh your not really a billionaire 🤔
I am standing up with you you are doing the right thing for our country
Keep it closed. We're all still doing fine.
So then why did you conspire with Russia to destroy it?
We need a wall.  Why because these people are being used to over run our country.  They are taking our country not with guns but by over running us.  This is a act of War against the United States.  Wake up people before it's to late
So do what needs to be done! Without Congress if necessary!
Did the democraps take a different oath of office to ruin and disrespect Americans? Apparently so !
So do what needs to be done! Without Congress if necessary!
But our National Security is at Risk and giving Putin our National Secrets!
The immagrants will find another way to get to this country...
We need a wall.  Why because these people are being used to over run our country.  They are taking our country not with guns but by over running us.  This is a act of War against the United States.  Wake up people before it's to late
Love you so much President Trump !!!
Build the wall and stop all immigrantion until this mess is figured out.
I want chicken nuggets on a sliver platter
Why Pelosi has to go for the trip ??? Isn't she ...speaker???
MR. PRESIDENT ! , So Nancy P concerned about security for the state of union ... hmm but NOT SECURITY for our country !!!
stay strong sir and hold your ground with the dems, they are killing this country
Border security is an endless money pit.
Don't give an inch to Pelosi and her band of flip floppers!!
Thank you President Trump.
The immagrants will find another way to get to this country...
Thank you President Trump.
Instead of a wall why can’t we build a canal stretching from Texas to California instead? Just a different idea idk!🤷🏻‍♀️
Crystal Ward because there's already the Rio Grande that is part of the border... And a lot of them can swim!
Michelle Hagler true but let’s make it deeper and wider then and add sharks lol but in all seriousness people need to come together and figure this crap out!!!
Don't give an inch to Pelosi and her band of flip floppers!!
I voted for you, and you are doing exactly what needs to be done. PLEASE KEEP IT UP!
This statement is soooooo true........there is no more room in my payck to cover  police costs or any other costs for people who run over the line looking for free help or to get into the sad illegal trades
No....you are wrong.  If we don’t show humanitarian acts the we cease to be a nation.  Border security yes ...wall no!!!!!!
Don’t cave to the Demoncrats
Keep up the good work, President Trump. And thank you for being such a good president in spite of all of the opposition you are having.
you're an a****** we don't need no wall and now I just seen that wick is shut down because of you I said shut down because of you and federal employees ain't getting paid because of you so what good does that wall do
I believe you took an oath to uphold the constitution...have you read it yet?
He's a BEAST and he's eatn the dems alive! I love it! Winning, winning, winning!
Reubs had control for 2 years. What’s the emergency?
Michelle Hagler true but let’s make it deeper and wider then and add sharks lol but in all seriousness people need to come together and figure this crap out!!!
Chain migration was stopped right after your wife got her parents into the country.  Hippocrates.
AMEN and PLEASE pay no attention to these trolls that are clueless to what is REALLY going on - they want to ignore what is going on.....If Dems have their way we will be a socialist country - DON'T LET THAT HAPPEN!!
From day one your emergence as the president was a divine mandate and not by popular demand. We know they don't like you but keep the good work. for if it were to be man power for you to be elected the president you wouldn't near the premises of the White House. No hard feelings just the Good work!!
THAT'S RIGHT MR. PRESIDENT. ALL OF US MUST HELP TO DEFEND OUR BORDER.
Absolutely!! Stay strong Mr President. ❤️
President Trump told you all that he would get Mexico to pay for the wall
U need to stop this shut down.  We the America people r getting hurt for what a wall get your money and pay for it.
GOD BLESS PRESIDENT TRUMP ‼️‼️‼️🤗👍👏🏻🙏🏻
This is the first PRESIDENT who care for this nattion , is like when Our LORD volunteer to die in the Cross for The SIN of the world they look as a feliar o LOSSER , is like Mr PRESIDENT TRUMP people look him his the problem  are you blaine
Reubs had control for 2 years. What’s the emergency?
This is the first PRESIDENT who care for this nattion , is like when Our LORD volunteer to die in the Cross for The SIN of the world they look as a feliar o LOSSER , is like Mr PRESIDENT TRUMP people look him his the problem  are you blaine
Democrats I love America is made in China....Trump all the way...
Yonathan Dereje does that include twitlers shirts and ties?
Noop!! but it will include Chiness great wall:)
GOD BLESS PRESIDENT TRUMP ‼️‼️‼️🤗👍👏🏻🙏🏻
Noop!! but it will include Chiness great wall:)
What nation, Russia? You’re making Putin proud.
dumb
Yonathan Dereje does that include twitlers shirts and ties?
Keep the United States citizens safe Mr. President.God  Bless You
I thought it was my little pushy disturbing me here in Uganda. Mr president bravo #donald j trump. I wish you became our President too
ANYONE CAN SAY ALL THE BAD THINGS.BUT BE SURE I AM VOTING TRUMP 2020
Laser blaster Paradise California
if we are a nation that does not like our president ...we cease to be great
Shivam Kaushal, your not a American!
Legalize cannabis you can build that wall.
Not getting a check is worth it to me when it’s for a good reason  Trump /Pence
dumb
And the whole time we have Americans sneaking to Canada for free health care.
Why don't you start tobrun the country instead of building walls. Control don't need a wall.
SOTU should be held at the Statue of Liberty!
God bless you Mr president 🇷🇺🇷🇺🇷🇺🇷🇺
We aren't solving anything by holding government aid hostage. Many have died, more will too, over aid cuts. Its important to make a friggen decision and MOVE FORWARD before section 8, food, and water are unavailable to the group's and individuals who need it.
Unfortunately our nation is self destructing and may be too far gone for you to save. I am praying for you and our nation
Get it done. Screw what they think. Is was important to all of them. Till you came into office. They will oppose everything you do.
Stand strong Mr President...we need you now more than ever!!
As it should be. Thank you sooooo much Mr President
Open the government and close the southern boarder.
Not getting a check is worth it to me when it’s for a good reason  Trump /Pence
Open the government and close the southern boarder.
Its called gather as much cash before you're locked up. POS POTUS
As it should be. Thank you sooooo much Mr President
GO DONALD. NEVER NEVER GIVE UP!,  ANS NEVER STOP!!!
I said this before with all the jobs auto and candy makers in Mexico that country should be a boom town for jobs   Oh I forgot Uncle Sam has FREE Aid while WE the tax payers have to fight tooth and nail for help
So... US is not a nation from the past up to now???
I'd rather us cease to be a nation than have you continue to "lead" it. Cuz youre gonna end us anyway.
Fundamentally, you are a great person whom keeps his promises. Yet, you should understand the implications of the government shut-down. A handful amount of federal workers are struggling disastrously due to your stubbornness, these people need to feed their family everyday .you and I both are well aware of the fact democrats will never approve to fund for your walls. You’d better come up with a better idea.
Stand strong we are with you Mr. President
The people are with you President Trump go keep going you're doing a great job
Its called gather as much cash before you're locked up. POS POTUS
It is time for President Trump to cut a wall for dreamers deal. It is also time for our Congressman to stop embarrassing themselves by not making a deal
dick.  figure out why the people are coming.  dick.
Gun down all those innocent civilians seeking asylum, screw the US Constitution!!
I wish I could take credit for this but I copied it from another poster The US Southern border is approximately 1935 miles in length, however a physical wall/fence is only feasible on approximately 1600 miles. Recently (2018) the GAO issued an estimate that was similar to a 2017 Brookings Institute study on construction of a US Southern border barrier estimate of $20 million per mile in easily accessible areas and where there were no land/property acquisition issues and would take over 7 years to complete. The construction costs per mile for difficult to access some areas is estimated to run $70+ million per mile.  Regarding private land disputes (land usage, access and eminent domain) along the border area the legal costs for the US government could easily exceed $10 million per disputed mile per incident and take decades to resolve. On top of the legal fees, there would be annual lease payouts to the private land owners estimated at $1-2 million per mile or one-time purchases of approximately $10-16 million per mile. Some Texas land owners have previously petitioned for and received special border barrier access portals because they own and operate agricultural/farm/ranch/oil/gas land on both sides of the border that cost approximately $3 million each to construct and cost approximately $300K annually to operate and approximately $100K annually to maintain. There is precedence regarding Eminent Domain on the Southern border stemming  from the Secure Fence Act of 2006 signed into law by GW Bush 43. Any Eminent Domain assertion is challengeable in court and historically those court challenges have ended projects or stopped projects from starting and or progressing for decades. Previous federal Eminent Domain attempts along the Texas border have led to more than a decade of court battles where the federal government has so far lost practically every case.  Estimates for total annual maintenance and repair costs on a mixed concrete and steel barrier were estimated at $1 to $12 billion annually depending on age, needs and damage.  Bernstein Research estimated the easily accessible area construction costs at $17 million per mile and did not estimate costs for difficult to access areas and or legal disputes.  DHS estimated the construction costs at $13 million per mile and did not estimate costs for difficult to access areas and or legal disputes.  You can perform the math to project the total cost for each possible scenario.
Pray for our leaders 1 Tim 2
That’s the most freaking photo shopped image of you I’ve ever seen. His gut and frazzled hair just went away.
You look different. Is this you in the pic or Alec Baldwin? Since when do real public servants manipulate their photos to make them look better? But of course, you ARE the #FakePresident.
Stop paying senators and congressmen and this will end
The border is not the problem it's you allowing all these radical mu@_#__s in this country. there the ones going to hurt the American people.
I voted for Trump and will again.  He is doing what we elected him to do.
The people are with you President Trump go keep going you're doing a great job
How about a fence with African lions inside so if they climb over into starving lions.cheaper
When are you going to start? Just curious.
And your trying to do a good job. If the jerks would leave you alone!
Build the wall to secure our borders.  Americans safety is #1.  Thank you Mr. President for standing firm and not caving to the Dems!  They are hippocrites!
Well, you had better resign then. No?
TRUMP IN JAIL! Thats how US will be safer!!
If we elect an Immoral, Dishonest, Narcissistic Sociopath to President, do we cease to be a nation too???
Your doing great Mr President! Thank you for standing up for the USA and defending our borders and not backing down. Build the wall!!!
the defense of the country is more important than the well-being of the citizens that makes no fucking since throw the whole damn government away
God bless President Trump and America and it's citizens
I voted for Trump and will again.  He is doing what we elected him to do.
Thanks for doing what it RIGHT  & NECESSARY.... despite the evil opposition 🙏🙏🙏 Amen
less russia plus united states
I support the wall! But it is time for ALL of them to come to an agreement!! If not!!  STOP ALL OF THEIR PAYCHECKS!!
Actually to protect the constitution...
From Germany , you are my Präsident , help us please .
Keeping the finance sector closed is not wise. Something needs to be done. SBA and people need loans to keep the economy healthy. I agree with the defense spending including a physical barrier.
What about funding the Coast Guard..?
Stand firm on border wall 🇺🇸
We keep voting for trump, it means we keep our nation great and the safest world.
That's the action figure pose I want. Make it happen!
God bless President Trump and America and it's citizens
Keep fighting President Trump. You are doing the right thing.
No two ways about it. God bless President D. Trump.
Great, defend your  own  nation and can you please stop "defending " Europe ! ! !
We lock our houses,we lock our doors. Where's the disconnect?
He’s awesome no filter cus I don’t have one either  And that is what we need! Keep being a dbag trump nobody cares
Fight on Mr President. Safety first, America first
WRONG. His most important duty is to uphold the Constitution. Committing crimes is a betrayal of that duty and the oath of office he swore.
Fire Trump, Pence n McConnell 🤔🖖
NEED TO BUILD THAT WALL ON THE CA.-AZ.  BORDER, CA IS GOING TO BE A FORIEGN ENTITY VERY SOON...!!!
What’s about Mexico paying for it?
That's the action figure pose I want. Make it happen!
Faith Is Trust God even though you cant see what hes doing
Love you president Trump,
Gee we've made it just fine since Rev. War without your medieval wall!
Brilliant so that means you are resigning
Thank you, President Trump, for defending America!
Tell Pelosi the illegItimate
So many triggered people in this thread 😂😂
And that means protecting all Americans black white and everything in between. We are all Americans. Unless your here ileagly . God bless America and the defense of freedom!
Same goes for BRITAIN.
What’s about Mexico paying for it?
Same goes for BRITAIN.
If we are a good nation we work with other nations and not shut them out
LEGALLY !!!  Not all at once.
And that means protecting all Americans black white and everything in between. We are all Americans. Unless your here ileagly . God bless America and the defense of freedom!
Look at the good deal with the Turks president....
Yes Master commander in chief. You are absolutely correct.
I get that but taking food stamps peoples pay checks and so on your creating chaos people will steal for food and be living on the streets put troops at the border give men jobs wall is to expensive unreasonable
Don't give in to demented dems!
" I have the best words..." "I'm a stable genius..." "Hamberder..."
Please “ , Don’t forget the Real Reason you was voted in. DRAIN THE SWAP!!!!!!!! And then the Border. Thank you. God Bless You and keep up the great work.
At the expense of Americans.
Don't open the government for three weeks or 3 days until you get at least $5.9 billion for the wall!  The Dems & MSM are trying to play our President and he is to smart to be duped by them!
Amen praying without ceasing for you all Mr.president Trump 🙏❤
LEGALLY !!!  Not all at once.
God bless you Mr president
I hate selfies  are people to lazy  to say what they mean  just put a picture
You act like we don’t do anything at all.   Rhetoric
Please be the BIGGER MAN and open the government!
Why is it on HGTV ~~House Hunters International - so many Americans are buying houses in Mexico? So it can't be all bad. And the Mexican President already told "them" they can stay.
keep up the great work making America great again!!
Definitely agree. Our freedom are taken for granted.
Our family appreciates your strength and desire to fight for the people!
Amen praying without ceasing for you all Mr.president Trump 🙏❤
Our family appreciates your strength and desire to fight for the people!
Cosmin Vcn s-a văzut în politica externă. Tu doar de pe media de stânga te informezi? Putin e cel mai bun prieten al UE din motive de gaz.
Cristian Marius Bunea ba o sa vedem in viitor cine are dreptate. Initial am fost incantat de el dar pe plan extern e jale. Strica tot ce s a construit de la Reagan incoace. Si daca nu vezi asta inseamna ca tu te uiti numa de o singura parte a mediei
Cosmin Vcn ce strică?
S a facut de ras la Helsinki in vara cand a zis “i think it wasnt putin” si dupa acasa s a cacat pe el ca a zis de fapt “it was putin”. Sau asta nu se da la russia today?
pt mine momentu ala a umplut paharu. Nu vreau sa ne calce iar rusii frate. Daca tu vrei asta zi drq pe bune si hai sa nu mai ne contrazicem atat. Agree to disagree si gata
Cosmin Vcn frate, relațiile SUA vs Rusia sunt la cel mai grav nivel din ultimii ani. Uită-te la înzestrarea rapidă și scumpă a armatei române, uită-te la ce se întâmplă prin orient... Lasă presa aia care te manipulează, că nu e ok
Definitely agree. Our freedom are taken for granted.
You are not under attack by Mexico what in the world are you talking about !! All you are looking for is to line your pockets.... if you were concerned with the borders why did you wait 2 years????
You're the man! I know you will get this done!  Proud to be an American!  Protect our borders PRESIDENT TRUMP!
Thank you Mr. President God bless you ❤️🇺🇸
This is no power play by us ;WE NEED THE WALL FOR SECURITY!!!!
you said you dident need your income for being a president  so take that and put it on the wall
I c u not paying the other wall the coast guard
I voted for DJT because unlike the ‘others’ he RETAINS !!!!! his OATH of OFFICE !!!!!
Cosmin Vcn frate, relațiile SUA vs Rusia sunt la cel mai grav nivel din ultimii ani. Uită-te la înzestrarea rapidă și scumpă a armatei române, uită-te la ce se întâmplă prin orient... Lasă presa aia care te manipulează, că nu e ok
I voted for DJT because unlike the ‘others’ he RETAINS !!!!! his OATH of OFFICE !!!!!
I kind of feel with those who aren't getting paid, like there being punished for the acts of people coming over to USA. It's all sad
Jeri Hendren Guess you never went on strike on a company you work for. Like 92days!
AMEN, What can I do to help?
Calling May in UK . Can U C See .We Need Him  NOT U  ?
On the Right Path Mr President. My President. My Pride.
we also need protection in our homes.  Not giving up any Second Amendment rights.
I voted for Trump because his policies are for women, especially unborn women.
My Heart... Cancel US withdrawal... And promise revenge... This shy politics must end... 2019 will be the year of revenge and the destruction of all the oppressed...
So what have you done for the firat 2 years and 17 days of your administration.  Left the borders unsecure?
We stand with you Mr. President 🇺🇸
The only ones hating is those from another country. But when terrorist attacks there family they will thing otherwise.
You look like an ABBA dancer
Jeri Hendren Guess you never went on strike on a company you work for. Like 92days!
Great Leader President Donald J Trump ❤❤❤
Charge each time they say TRUMP.
Agree with border security! Since they are against a physical wall, why don’t we try invisible electrical partition? Like those in sci-fi movies?
We stand behind you President Donald J. Trump!  We want a safe nation and we love what you're fighting for.  Stay strong...we love you :)
God Bless you, President Trump!
Mr Trump....Tell it to Mrs.Merkel
Thank you President Trump !
If we don't get our boarder completely secure, our country will be taken over and then it will be to late to do anything.
Impossible to make everyone happy but thank you for trying to protect everyone.
Couldn't agree more!  Thank you, Mr. President.
You look like an ABBA dancer
Donald J. Trump , listen man, I need you to open the FAA for a day so I can talk to them.  Please!!   Then I’ll help you with the wall
America needs to stand United to be strong and safe. The Dems have created one plan after another to divide and conquer us. The more we fight with each other over things that they have brought up or to attention, the less we are United. Our laws need to be plainly defined and strictly enforced. Corrupt  officials, law enforcement, etc, should be held accountable at the highest punishment bc they have no respect for the very laws they swore to uphold. People should fear the consequences of crime. Our nation should promote safety and peace due all those who uphold the laws that keep it that way.
awesome! i wish here in finland was the same. :)
Please anyone can help me.   How can contact with trump
Dear Mr. President,  Why do we continue to produce so much rhetoric about illegal immigration, without truly recognizing the root cause of the problem.  Th major reason we have so many illegal immigrants is because these people are desperate to find a better life for themselves and their families.  Why build a wall?  This is an ancient idea that had a specific purpose in mind.  The Great China Wall was built to ward off intruders from the north that were warriors on horseback.  Our intruders from the south are not warriors.  They are a desperate people lookimg for relief from a life of extreme hardship.  They are more apt to be a people armed with a shovel and maybe a Boro.   They will start to dig tunnels as soon as the wall is being erected.  If we were to establish an economy based project that would benifit both countries it would be more beneficial.  I would propose a system of reservoirs along the Rio Grand River with pumping stations in the mountains to pump the water up and over the continental divide to flow through a series of reservoirs on the border south of New Mexico and Arizona.  A wide and deep canal could also be established at the southern border of California.  This system could produce hydroelectric power, could use windmills to pump the water up, could use the water for irrigation in a very arid desert on both sides of the border and could provide a better source of water for fighting the south west wildfires.  This project could generate an economic boom for both sides of the border, and could be accomplished in a state of cooperation with our neighbors to the south.
Good Morning My Beloved Friend... My Dear... Two days ago Mr. Chuck wanted to negotiate and open the government... This delay causes damage to you alone... You should meet and open the government today... And they will finance the wall... Trust that...
Not having borders is how we became a nation... 🙈
Yeah Mexico and Canada will finally invade your country!
Wrong, defending and preserving the rights of US citizens is.
Why didn't you fight for her?  Draft dodger?  Why don't you pay  your fair share of taxes. Cheat?
Couldn't agree more!  Thank you, Mr. President.
Get it done Sir! Real America is with you!
Bruh, Donald Trump looks so Badass in this post 😎🇺🇸
Am an African i don't support evil America is for Americans period close the borders for the safety of your nation
What happens if the debt becomes unsustainable?
Stand your ground Mr President !
Y'all really trust that a wall will save us? Lmao #ImpeachTheCrook
Boy u sure stirred them up with this!
I cant believe that many cant understand this
Before Trump was born,the American borders were secure, how did his ancestors got to America?
Presidents are a joke. Anyone with half a brain knows we're owned by banks that want open borders. "One World Government"
Why didn't you fight for her?  Draft dodger?  Why don't you pay  your fair share of taxes. Cheat?
Keep up the good work Mr President.  You've got  millions of people praying for you a d your whole administration.  You are a great leader which is something our country hasn't had in a long long time.  God Bless  you and thanks again.
THE IDEA OF THE WALL IS GENIAL IT WILL BE GREAT IF TRUMP CAN MAKE IT REAL
if walls don't work ..... then why does China have one that can be seen frome space!!!!!
God, I love this President, elect him again in 2020 and 2024 what hell , the Dumocratic try it all the time, sometimes they even get away with it. 🤔
Just  do  an  executive order  and  stop  this  nonsense.    It  is  not  fair  to  the  people  who  depend  on  their  salaries  to  exist.    Stop  this  government  shutdown.
Yeah, ....well how about defending our borders from your russian counterparts
God Bless The President!
We love you President Trump. God Bless You. Keep up the great jobs .
Presidents are a joke. Anyone with half a brain knows we're owned by banks that want open borders. "One World Government"
I think its time to change the channel on Celebrity Apprentice. A government can not be run like his TV show. He should return to NY while he still has a business to run  with all the swamp he brought with him .
You have many people hoping you don’t get week we know you are best president in long time
I love President Trump!i will vote for him again
Trump you had 2 years when Republicans controlled BOTH the House & Senate.  Why didn’t you get the wall money then? Why wait to ask Dems who already said they don’t want a wall?  And why has the Senate proposed nothing as they are STILL controlled by Republicans. I don’t blame Pelosi for this shut down.  This is on you Trump!  And on Republicans who don’t really want the wall or they would have done something about it when they controlled everything 😡
Well lets see now. How high did it rank when you dodged the draft 5 Times?
By the way stand your ground on the wall !
While you just give away everything to the Russians instead!
I'm sorry but you need to take care of the thousands of workers that are not being paid. I voted for you Mr President but having my husband work for over a month now with no check well that's just not right. Please get the government back opend
Correct! We’re so glad our president got balls. Stand up for Americans! MAGA 2020
We love you President Trump. God Bless You. Keep up the great jobs .
God bless you President Trump
Stand your ground Mr President you are doing a fantastic job. Thank you.
This is coming from an orange Russian agent sitting in the oval office!#putinspuppet#impeachthemotherfucker!
Except when it comes to Russia
Europe and England had open borders before African and Muslims try to enter Europe.
Stay strong Mr. President - we voted for you and we will continue in 2020
I don't understand what the Democratic Party is about anymore, Protect our Nation!!!
You have already stopped us from being a nation
Your a joke you just want your % of the money
You should also include healthcare 😑
Correct! We’re so glad our president got balls. Stand up for Americans! MAGA 2020
You should also include healthcare 😑
Enough talking about it. R u going to get it done or what?
Anthony Lococo exactly. Do whatever it takes to get that thing built! The dirty libs would!
Your a joke you just want your % of the money
Anthony Lococo exactly. Do whatever it takes to get that thing built! The dirty libs would!
Joseph goebbels would be proud
Enough talking about it. R u going to get it done or what?
Joseph goebbels would be proud
Never give in, never surrender! Build the wall
Why? It's a waste of money and wont do anything more than border patrol is doing now. If there is a section of the wall not being supervised anyone can go over or under it.
You have already stopped us from being a nation
According to Donald Trump  , If I say it people believe it.
I'm glad Trump has accepted full responsibility for the shutdown of the government.
Fear mongering has always worked ig
AMEN,THANK YOU LORD FOR SENDING PRESIDENT TRUMP
But I though Mexico was going to pay for the wall...
Im the best player here and left end!
Why? It's a waste of money and wont do anything more than border patrol is doing now. If there is a section of the wall not being supervised anyone can go over or under it.
Why do so many people not understand this?
who pelosi and schumer
that's right "borders" both South & Northern borders and ask for a real wall 50ft high and 10 billion or build nothing! Don't make a joke out of this important national crisis BUILD THE WALL or resign
Trump you look like a college basketball coach about to take your team to the final four I love it
If we elect a Putin Puppet, we cease to be a nation
I thought that to be a "great nation"  We have to take care of our veterans? I guess i wrong.......
The power grab has been made. Be ready for defense of your family and nation. God be with us all.
We the people elected you as our President and we are behind you all the way. The Democrats in office that are trying to stop you were put there long ago and seem to have lost there way as to what is good for America as a free country. The only thing i can see the Democrats are trying to do is push socialism and one world order on Americans. The sad thing is a lot are falling for it. Now my question is " what is in it for those trying to stop the President from doing his job" . It definitely can't be in the best interest of Americans.
You're doing a great job, Mr. President. Stay strong,
Im the best player here and left end!
Why is there an invading army coming? Last time I checked it was refugees and woman and children
B.true d..weather..she said.papa.bad.
Mr. President thank you for all your are doing for our country. I have a solution how to pay for the wall don’t fight Pelosi all you have to do Tax the money sent to Mexico .
Might wana check Pelosi for a UTI..she talking crazy.
Yes! And "Support and Defend" means absolutely nothing to the Democrats their leadership and some Republicans. Disgraceful!
Second, is fu@@ing  with  the  libtards.🙃
Do a CLEAN Governemnt Pay Bill.  To get the workers paid and back to work.  Then fight over the rest.  CIV PAY ONLY
Yes, and so says our constitution. Problem is, its not their constitution.
Ronald Regan stated; "when we forget that we are one nation under god, we will be a nation gone under" .
Well you're surely NOT defending the people in it
You're doing a great job, Mr. President. Stay strong,
Well you're surely NOT defending the people in it
Ronald Regan stated; "when we forget that we are one nation under god, we will be a nation gone under" .
We cease to be a nation when the elected head of government colludes with a foreign power to diminish our democracy.
you can only say this here on his page
Seems like a pretty obvious thing
‍‍‍‍‍‍ ‍‍  ‍‍‍‍‍‍ ‍‍ “I’m going to surround myself only with the best and most serious people. We want top of the line professionals."  Donald Trump  "...revolving door of deeply flawed individuals -- amateurs, grifters, weaklings, convicted and unconvicted felons -- who were hustled into jobs they were never suited for, sometimes seemingly without so much as a background check via Google or Wikipedia."   NEW JERSEY FORMER GOV. CHRIS CHRISTIE- R, a member of Trump's presidential campaign staff, has a book coming out. In it he writes of Trump's appointees: (Source: Axios)
Pelosi is only House Speaker and Donald Trump is the President of America, you have all the power Pres Trump dont give up. Fight
I WILL BE VOTING FOR TRUMP IN 2020! BEST PRESIDENT!
The most important duty to you is to buy berders with many many fries.
Fuc# Nancy pistole and chuck gutter ratscumer. They are holding the country hostage. ASSINATE THEIT ASSES
God bless president Trump. From Africa
borders a must to be protected #pray for us Kenyans to b safe
11 days later dad. 4 days remain. Still waiting...
Mr Trump the correct Nazi salute is with the palm flat. a wall to defend the US is a wall on the northern border next?
Amem. Build the Wall & PUT YOUR NAME ON IT. THINK THAT WOULD  REALLY TICK PALOSE OFF?
Millions of Thanks President Trump.
#DonaldTrumpTheGeek.. Build that wall sir nothing will happen, no more debates.
My highest duty is to take care of ME then maby thee country if I feel like it maby
That is his primary duty under the constitution.
Except the problem is people coming in on legal visas and then not returning home, thus becoming illegal. You know, like Melania did with her modeling career. How about going after the models? 🤣
Here is an idea if an illegal women has a baby give baby citizenship. Then send them home because a baby can’t be raised alone. Then at 18 then that child can come here legally to get an good education job. That give mom 18 years to become legal  and come with her child  common sense
The wall will not stop drugs.  Maybe a few on foot.  Some come in at regular ports of entry.  I say stop holding the country hostage for purely political reasons.  Look up Trump on immigration 2012.  He must have needed them to work his hotels.
fb://nt_screen/FB-SCREEN-FB?a=%7B%22analytics_module%22%3A%22charitable_giving%22%2C%22title%22%3A%22Fundraisers%22%2C%22hide-search-field%22%3Atrue%2C%22pull-to-refresh-enabled%22%3Atrue%2C%22custom-story-render-location%22%3A%22fundraiser_page%22%7D&p=%2Ffundraiser%2F&q=%7B%22fundraiser_campaign_id%22%3A1954885174817328%2C%22post_id%22%3A1954889914816854%7D&b=%5B%5D
He looks like a basketball coach on the photo.
SIIR...build the wall...you don't have to ask for permission...
You are definitely not interested in AMERICA
Be an online nation. Cyber nationalism. Tax the world. Feed em with hamberders
Trump 2020! America First president Trump!!! Thank you for going through hell for us!!!
I need 5 minutes of your time... Mr Trump... 5 minutes... MAGA
My highest duty is to take care of ME then maby thee country if I feel like it maby
I need 5 minutes of your time... Mr Trump... 5 minutes... MAGA
Say's the man who won't pay 800,000 of his government employees
Says some lefty soy boy, try asking your heroes nancy and chuck about that, oh wait they are all partying in P.R. while all those useful employees await pay lol
Andrew Webster House has approved budgets, the Senate has the authority to approve the budget as well - they just won't without trump's "permission" (which is not how it works BTW) Trump is holding our citizen's pay hostage while you act like a butthurt child.
Trump 2020! America First president Trump!!! Thank you for going through hell for us!!!
I agree with border security- but get rid of all the specialty visa”s and stop allowing wealthy people from around the world to come here for 3 months and have their anchor babies as well - it is a very multifaceted problem - chip away at the loopholes.
Our president is absolutely correct, if you guys don't understand what he said, or what the consequences will be without the wall, read his statement slowly, think about it imagine it in your mind, who's going to pay for all of these people, where are they going to live. And most but not least who are they? It's that easy folks, no wall, COMPLETE CHAOS, CIVIL WAR and the United States will never be the same again. In fact your constitutional  rights  will be gone. There has to be some control over this you're not all that stupid? Are you?
That's what Germany fails to understand
I'll vote for Donald a 2nd & a 3rd time if I neef to.The Dems are trying to destroy this country.
How is this hard to understand?
this is wall you should be promoting https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Inner_German_border?fbclid=IwAR1TUt7-FKrtqe7FWduRreN7VZXXnS3tv7JSqhGKczRDGt45ZnhWBecjdnQ
Defense is how you win games👍 Do your thing Mr. President.
Andrew Webster House has approved budgets, the Senate has the authority to approve the budget as well - they just won't without trump's "permission" (which is not how it works BTW) Trump is holding our citizen's pay hostage while you act like a butthurt child.
Thank you for standing firm!
Federal workers can get paid if they will go to Navy federal bank get up 2 2 thousand plus 5 hundred dollars and they get their money back when u return to work doesn’t get any simple then that but u r not going to see this on your nightly news who would thought .
WOW!!! What a bunch of moronsllll
PLEASE HELP THE PEOPLE OF ZIMBABWE!! 😔
We the People need to get Mexico out of our butt.
So says the man with bone spurs who never fought for his country
No, the people of the Great America need money to survive, we are talking about people who work, so do what is right, must not what you want, give these people a chance to survive ... I voted for you, but you have let me down ...
The media's new censorship is to have the hosts talk over the live speech as they use his speech as background
I am ok without a border but do something to make them pay taxes just like me. I wish I could get paid in cash, tax free for working my ass off.
Defense is how you win games👍 Do your thing Mr. President.
Go get 'em, President Trump!  We're with you.
Go, Mr. President,  GO! stay FIRM and DETERMINED... what do you have to lose!? If it's going to be is because GOD  already said so... the dems have nothing to do with it...
Not your fault its in you're jean
Anybody here actually live near the border?
I agree with u dear president, best wishes—-a Chinese guy who is eating watermelon.
Trump is selling out and letting illegals become US Citizens and I won’t be voting for this draft dodging weakling in 2020
Keep standing your ground sir! We the people stand behind you and want the wall.
Peace be upon the Commander of the Believers Ali bin Abi Talib (peace and blessings of Allaah be upon him)
and it's even in the Constitution too !!!
I am ok without a border but do something to make them pay taxes just like me. I wish I could get paid in cash, tax free for working my ass off.
and it's even in the Constitution too !!!
Josh Lancer SAD!
Peace be upon the Commander of the Believers Ali bin Abi Talib (peace and blessings of Allaah be upon him)
Atta President 👏👏👏👏.  she should've been back on the bus a long time ago
Keep up the fight Mr. President ........  STAND FIRM #BUILDTHATWALL
Anyone against Trump needs to move to Canada
Keep going Trump! This shut down directly affects my income. I still support you.
God Bless President Trump.
OK trump won the election  in 2016 why didn't  he build the wall then why did he wait so damned long to decide to build the wall if he thought  our country  was in such danger of illigal  immigrants  from Mexico  and other places down past Mexico  the republican had the house for a long time he could  have gotten his money then why the hell did he wait so long to cry wolf now that he can't get what he want he's making  the American  people  suffer he's trowing a tatrum  my 2 year old grandson  acts better than he does grow the duck up trip open the government  up so the people  can go back to with  stop holding American  hostage  just because  you can't  get your  way
Yo Trump inbox  me   I help u build dat wall for 80$ a hour
You tell him President Trump
Josh Lancer SAD!
You tell him President Trump
Im sure he did.
Yo Trump inbox  me   I help u build dat wall for 80$ a hour
Here’s how to end the shutdown:  All Trump has to do is just ***SAY*** that the Wall is being built and his supporters will believe it.
lets build the wall,  now i feel i need security, when i used to be young i never needed any security any walls
Naziism at its finest.  Wake up people.
Tell Nancy Pelosi to ride her broom on the junket trip
Close...but your most important duty is to preserve, protect, and defend the constitution.   “I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the Office of President of the United States, and will to the best of my Ability, preserve, protect and defend the Constitution of the United States."
Thank you For that Mr. President , Build the WALL ! Use the confiscated Drug Money All Of it on the WALL! And keep working on Funding we do have 4 sides. Keep it going. 🇺🇸💰💰💰💰💰
I Like How You Are Rulling Your Country, Trump
Im sure he did.
I Like How You Are Rulling Your Country, Trump
He sits on his fat arse tweeting all the time.
Thank you For that Mr. President , Build the WALL ! Use the confiscated Drug Money All Of it on the WALL! And keep working on Funding we do have 4 sides. Keep it going. 🇺🇸💰💰💰💰💰
Mr. President Donald j Trump . Why can’t you’ll meet in the Middle an make a decision about the Boarder Wall or Walls Security. An open back up the GOVERNMENT PLEASE.....ENOUGH IS ENOUGH...
Don't give in, build the wall! This Ohioan and many others want you to stay strong!
Please ride on Mr President. Keep doing the right thing for Americans God' s got your back
5.7 billion dollars is the start up money so ur saying that Americans is going to have to be in danger of starvation and homeless to put a wall up all these years we haven’t had a wall just wake up or even better all of the supporters if they donate money you can have the wall build
What about the families that will be going without food.
God Bless President Trump.
Mr. President, your pick for Attorney General said he is for these unconstitutional red flag laws. Nobody should have a right to search your house and confiscate your guns without due process. What I mean by that is facing your accuser in court in front of a judge. Anybody that wants to get you in trouble or is just afraid of guns can make up anything. One of my neighbors saw me putting my shotgun in a case in my trunk and approached me and said she doesn’t feel safe because I have guns at my house. If we had red flag laws then I’m convinced she would have called the police and reported me. My gun collection is an investment for me. So if someone falsely accuses me my collection would worth a lot less when I get them back because you know the police aren’t going to take care not to damage them and if you read some of these laws they aren’t responsible for any damage. You promised before the election that “the attack on your 2nd amendment rights is over”. So far you’ve have been worse than Obama in his 8 years in office.  These laws put law enforcement at unneeded risk. I know I won’t let them in my house and I’ve always supported them. We already had one death in Maryland because of this law and I don’t think it will be the last. I was appalled that the democrats made Brett Cavanaugh prove his innocence and this law is doing the same thing to gun owners. I thought in this country that you were innocent until proven guilty not the other way around. The gun owners put you in office on your promises to have our backs and you would fight these anti-gun laws that do nothing other than infringing on the legal gun owners in this country. I don’t see any politician suggest we go after all of the gang violence where most of the shootings occur. The other thing is if you look into a lot of these shootings the person had weapon charges against him or her but they seem to always plea-bargain down to a lesser offense because the prosecutors feel this aren’t that important. I hope you take this to heart because you need us to win in 2020. Thank you and take care.
Which nation is the dotard talking about? Russia or the USA?
He sits on his fat arse tweeting all the time.
I feel like this picture of him was photoshopped, something seems off
.....Then position more workers at the ports of entry!!!!!!
Yes thank you Mr.President for being a real leader.
Stupidity is everywhere..
I have only voted once in my life, and I voted for Mr. Trump, we were needing a big change, the government is so crooked and we needed change, Not saying that Mr. Trump can get this place cleaned up but it is  a start.
Continue to fight for the United States, don't back down Sir, don't ever back down!!!...  Continue to invite the democratics every morning to negotiate and tell us every evening if they show up.  Keep the American Public informed Publicly so that all know.  Keep up the fight, make the Congress take responsibility for their actions.  I am a federal employee and am willing to go through this with you, Stay the Course Mr. President.
Keep up the fight Mr President.God Bless you And protect you and your family
God bless you President Trump!!!! God sent you to us patriotic Americans!!!! We Love You!!!!!!
Is this ever going to end this I getting way out of hand for everyone we need pray for a miracle to happen
Stay strong! We support you all the way! God bless you and your family
Which nation is the dotard talking about? Russia or the USA?
And get rid of Republican and Democrat parties and be a team player as one
Donald, admit it... the Washington bureaucrats live on negotiations, and you are no match.
On point Mr. president. I love saying that.
That goes against the Demonrats. They seem to care more about non citizens.
Stay Strong President Trump
All alone or in twos the ones who really love you walk up and down outside the wall
Declare an emergency and start the Wall!
Absolutely Right. We need to stand with our president.
It the President, Any Presidents Main Job. Protect Americans 1st, everything else later.
Stay strong! We support you all the way! God bless you and your family
I know you read these, Mr President so you should know we support you and WE WANT THE WALL.
I am for the wall, but the longer it takes to make a decision and to act on it knowing the left will never approve. It will also take time to physically build it why aren't we considering that. Time is of the essence .
Yes defend our borders. But Mr. president how much longer on the government shut down?  The first of March it will start effecting housing. It shouldn't effect anything.  If it effects anything at all  take pay cuts in all government officials.
here comes caravan number 5 from central america and yet no wall
look at this nigga deadass hitting that Jotaro stance
No joke I thought this was an action figure standing next to the text haha awesome!
we're okay being a non-nation, ty.
Best thing that happened in America in my lifetime. Somebody not in the pockets of big business. Politicians  can't understand what he's doing because he runs the country like a business. Brilliant.
It the President, Any Presidents Main Job. Protect Americans 1st, everything else later.
Best thing that happened in America in my lifetime. Somebody not in the pockets of big business. Politicians  can't understand what he's doing because he runs the country like a business. Brilliant.
Kathy Solomon the land of the free hand out is over
we're okay being a non-nation, ty.
Nancy is on the Tarmac could you send her an Uber?
Why don't you defend the 800,000 federal employees whose lives you a ruining with your infantile shutdown? Border security and your wall are two different things.
Quit manufacturing a crisis where none exists.  Goodness, how have we survived as a nation for 243 years?  You want a wall? Negotiate and compromise.  You didn’t need to cause our nation problems by shutting down portions of the government. It’s called bipartisanship.
Kathy Solomon the land of the free hand out is over
Quit manufacturing a crisis where none exists.  Goodness, how have we survived as a nation for 243 years?  You want a wall? Negotiate and compromise.  You didn’t need to cause our nation problems by shutting down portions of the government. It’s called bipartisanship.
yup, go back to Suckistan and fix it there , yes
Why don't you defend the 800,000 federal employees whose lives you a ruining with your infantile shutdown? Border security and your wall are two different things.
yup, go back to Suckistan and fix it there , yes
Tricia Ann Bakley-Kralik oh so your the whore that’s sucking Putin’s frozen balls
Go home Mexicans and towelheads.
Tricia Ann Bakley-Kralik oh so your the whore that’s sucking Putin’s frozen balls
Our borders are fine.... worry about healthcare, jobs, and roads
Build That Wall no more land of the free handout
Wrong again trumpy...  if a country allows foreign hostile countries to buy their so called president and interfere with our democracy and elections and instruct that so called president to cause chaos and division....then we cease to be a free country....its time for you to go back to your  mother land...Russia
Build That Wall no more land of the free handout
Leslie Reyes I think they used too long of a needle when they injected her Botox... accidentally injected her brain.
Maybe you should talk about trump and his orange hair, his fake tan and his lack of intelligence !
Our borders are fine.... worry about healthcare, jobs, and roads
Maybe you should talk about trump and his orange hair, his fake tan and his lack of intelligence !
You are a friggin idiot !
Leslie Reyes I think they used too long of a needle when they injected her Botox... accidentally injected her brain.
We fully support you President Trump!
Until someone pays him to do otherwise like Russia, Saudi Arabia, UAE, etc etc etc!!! Our Nation is for sale!!! All for Trump pocketbook!!!
to many chiefs ,,not enough indians,,,,,drain the swamp
I stand with President Trump BUILD the WALL
You are a friggin idiot !
I stand with President Trump BUILD the WALL
to many chiefs ,,not enough indians,,,,,drain the swamp
If you spent more time on policy than conjuring up MEMES, maybe you wouldn't be well on your way to impeachment... No, you'd still be a ruthless, spineless traitor.
James Campbell ISIS the military force is defeated. ISIS the idea lives on, and the idea is what the radicals are loyal to. Expect to see a lot of sleeper cells popping off in the coming days, as they run out of options with their supply chain and leadership destroyed and default to "blaze of "glory"".
Nick Lorica  oops.  https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.businessinsider.com/republicans-slam-trumps-syria-retreat-after-isis-claimed-attack-2019-1
If you spent more time on policy than conjuring up MEMES, maybe you wouldn't be well on your way to impeachment... No, you'd still be a ruthless, spineless traitor.
And 4 Americans were killed because he said that. ISIS was sending trump a message that they are not defeated! Trump wont listen to the people he should be listening too. Mattis tried to tell him and trump thinks he knows more than the Generals. NOT ! Trump thinks he knows more about everything than anyone. Typical Narcissist!
Wow!
And 4 Americans were killed because he said that. ISIS was sending trump a message that they are not defeated! Trump wont listen to the people he should be listening too. Mattis tried to tell him and trump thinks he knows more than the Generals. NOT ! Trump thinks he knows more about everything than anyone. Typical Narcissist!
Wow!
You should stop typing like you're six years old.
i love USA & the President of our Country.   He did not to go through all of this crap you guys put him through bc he is wealthy yet he still does it, why ?   bc he loves our country !!!
Reda Haas, I think that you are confused. Obama's no longer our president.
Then RESIGN before you cede all to Putin!
Too many delusional people out there that want to keep the status quo.  This needs to get done.
Put down the french fries and open the government.
Reda Haas, I think that you are confused. Obama's no longer our president.
We love you!!!!   Commander in Chief! Leader of the free world! ❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️
A hundred miles of 30-50 feet high steel. Will stop illegals 100% more often then an open valley with a drone or camera. THE WALL IS COMING #Trump2020  #Buildthewall
Your FENCE is:  1) INCOMPLETE  2) EASILY CLIMBED  3) EASILY DESTROYED  4) BUILT ABOVE EXISTING TUNNELS  5) Nothing but a waste of OUR tax dollars  You're a fucking JOKE.
If you want money for the wall you should declare all Military flights by. Legislators Dry Flights.  Nancy will come to the table faster than the Road Runner.  No wonder she is still here. Alcohol is a preservative.   .https://www.businessinsider.com/nancy-pelosis-in-flight-food-and-drink-costs-101000-2010-1
LOVE THIS GREAT PATRIOT PEOPLES PRESIDENT ❤️🇺🇲❤️
Thank you President Trump.
Democrats are not democratic. They are a bunch of diaper babies and have proven this time and time again.
Let me fix this for you: If we allow foreign assets to govern this country, then we cease to be a nation! #Resign
Real Americans want the wall.
Let me fix this for you: If we allow foreign assets to govern this country, then we cease to be a nation! #Resign
That is just a small fraction of the total cost. Trump would have to pitch another tantrum every time the budget comes up for a vote.
Democrats are not democratic. They are a bunch of diaper babies and have proven this time and time again.
Then give my native American ppl our land back
God is with you President Trump.....Protect America....
How old is this picture this isn't the man that's in office right now LOL
GREAT JOB, MR PRESIDENT,,,,,,NEVER NEGOTIATE WITH THE FOSSILIZED FOOL,,,,,,,
Behind you 100%!!!  BRILLIANT move today dealing with ol' Nasty Pelousey!  Been LMAO all afternoon!!  You should've told her to take her broom!!!  😁😃😄😀
If this Buzzfeed story is true you’re done, Donnie.
Half of the people here don’t realize what you doing for us. 2016-2020 man of year right here.
That is just a small fraction of the total cost. Trump would have to pitch another tantrum every time the budget comes up for a vote.
Half of the people here don’t realize what you doing for us. 2016-2020 man of year right here.
How did Mexico paying for your wall become not paying Americans to blackmail taxpayers for paying for your wall? #Trumpshutdown
Spoken like a true Liberal.
If this Buzzfeed story is true you’re done, Donnie.
#Trumpshutdown day 27 (Longest in US history). Stop your temper tantrum and end it. It's all on you, as you said yourself. Federal workers and their families are hurting and this is not about national security.
What have we been the last 250 years?
Stand firm and address our Nation ❤️
cease to be a nation?  hmm...your puppetmaster would LOVE that.
If Pelosi wants the SOTU address postponed, just go live from the Oval Office!
I am with you on this!  Stay strong and force Congress to do the jib they promised Reagan if he would grant amnesty to 11 million illegals! They promised absorbing 2006 but failed!  STOP PAYING CONGRESS UNTIL THEY GET THE JOB DONE!
Executive order, President Trump.
Repost Nancy's number 202-225-4965 build the wall. Here's Chuck's 202-224-6542. Be professional but demand the wall funds.  Repost numbers. Let's do this
Spoken like a true Liberal.
Thank you. Drop leaflets for the caravan saying their not getting in. Dems hands are covered in blood
Good point.  Maybe we should start defending our borders dinner day, Mr. Hyperbole.  🙄🤣🦆🦆🦆
Get FOX NEWS do a interview with you and have them put it on TV..
EMOJI POLL says Trump 2020🇺🇸
You were given 40 billion over 2 years for border security...
Declare a national emergency, build the wall and be done with it.  What's the hold up??
If the U.S. can build hundreds of miles of wall to protect Jordan why can't we build one here?  I'm pissed.
Keep giving them hell Big Don!
Physical barriers are pointless when you’re selling us out to Putin and his minions.
Repost Nancy's number 202-225-4965 build the wall. Here's Chuck's 202-224-6542. Be professional but demand the wall funds.  Repost numbers. Let's do this
Then bypass congress and build the wall.
Your doing a great job Mr. President. Apparently most Democrats are eligible for a Darwin Award.
Trump.... Creating new Democrats with every missed paycheck!    2020 can't come too soon.
if we don't secure our country from RUSSIA.....🤔✊
44,000 people have liked this post. 7.6 thousand loved it.  Only a few hundred have disliked it.  We are not the minority.  We are the majority!  TRUMP build that wall!!  TRUMP 2020!!!  I love my President.
Cognitive dissonance on display yet again. Fallacies r trump.
We Support You 100% BUILD the USA WALL.
Omg.  How did America make it through the first half of its existence???
Pelosi wants Open Borders. She is on the take from Drug Cartels.  She makes millions on drugs.
Physical barriers are pointless when you’re selling us out to Putin and his minions.
Pelosi wants Open Borders. She is on the take from Drug Cartels.  She makes millions on drugs.
That’s a crock of bullshyt!!!! Your killing the American dream!!!!!!! Your very untrustworthy!!!!
Joey Montaña said the illegal haha!
Tonja Tyree Suck a dyck!
Omg.  How did America make it through the first half of its existence???
1. Cut taxes.  2. (Try) to repeal ACA  3. Shutdown over national security  Soooo, if you know how to count, we see that security comes after money.  Security is his 3rd priority.  Please, tell me how counting is fake news or a liberal conspiracy...  Sad thing is I can break it down to literally 3 steps, hold your hand through it, and you still will refuse to grasp the painfully obvious and mathematically proven point!
Then, by what you've said countless times, we haven't been a nation these last couple hundred years...
So glad we have you! Just having things be how they always were, doesnt mean you should keep it that way!!! I am so happy you are IMPROVING our country. I love how so many are loudly against you, and its brushed right off of your shoulder. Keep right with God and we can have a wonderful nation! Thank you from my household. My name is Mercy and I am praying for you!
Truth. It's an existential question facing us.
exactly Prez we can defend everyone one else but not our own borders...stupid
she says open gov and then we will talk border.no. you tell her secure border and then open gov. this is a  dig from them cause they never have held up to their part in the past
Defend them! Only morons would say otherwise!
Thank you President Trump.
Tonja Tyree Suck a dyck!
Thank you President Trump.
You are doing what we elected you to do!  Build the wall and drain the swamp.  Keep it up!
Shelly Burgess learn.  🛑 👽 a 🐑
Tell Russia and NKorea that, not Mexico.
God bless you!  PRESIDENT DONALD J TRUMP 👑  🍁
I guess we have not been a nation from day one.....hmmmmmm
Meanwhile, the airports are more compromised.  From the "stable genius."
That is correct. Nations are mainly defined by borders.
Yes vote for us President! Together make America great again! I love it!!!!! 👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼
That's what the radical left wants.
WALLS ARE FOR DEFENSE ALSO.
love you TRump -may the lord bless u against the democrats
Shelly Burgess learn.  🛑 👽 a 🐑
love you TRump -may the lord bless u against the democrats
Absolutely, wall pls and thank you!
Stephen Pierson I m an immigrant, a legal one that is! ✌🏻
WALLS ARE FOR DEFENSE ALSO.
Stephen Pierson I m an immigrant, a legal one that is! ✌🏻
Ryan Gerhart. thank  you m

Absolutely, wall pls and thank you!
Said the Russian troll mole president.
I adore reading all the pro-Trump posts and noting all poor the grammar and spelling. Don’t forget, all you pitiful fans of the dope, that Trump openly said he LOVES the uneducated. LMFAO  And there you go, he LOVES you. Hope that thought pays your bills! 🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣
Thankas for hospitality... :* Anna is importent
So defend our nation and end the shutdown!
Stand strong Mr.President!

Democraps have went all in on globalism and the destruction of this country.   Make them cry again. Give them nothing.   🇺🇸
Democraps have went all in on globalism and the destruction of this country.   Make them cry again. Give them nothing.   🇺🇸
Carsten Adsersen, 5.7 billion from Pelosi and Schumer take care of that! To put it in perspective, Trump wants about 1/60th of what our annual interest is on 22 trillion in debt
Common sense says build a wall for the USA. Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Shumer needs to go simple as that... 👍
Trump 2020
Carsten Adsersen, 5.7 billion from Pelosi and Schumer take care of that! To put it in perspective, Trump wants about 1/60th of what our annual interest is on 22 trillion in debt
Nancy Pelosi, talking about someone told her about how she couldn’t buy her insulin because of the shut down, I’m thinking, well my god Nancy, why don’t you do something about it, come to an agreement instead of going to Hawaii vacationing. She don’t give a damn either about this persons insulin or her health. POLITICS.
SO GLAD he's our PRESIDENT!!!!
Right.. so stop fooling around with other nations and let them feel like the way you want your people to feel.. arrogance at its best !
Words from one who dodged the draft....
could build the wall easily and have money left over if we made 2 new aircraft carriers instead of 3.  we would still have like 10x more aircraft carriers than other countries too
Really. What about us simple people having food on our table. Is that not ur first n foremost responsibility. Look n listen to the cry of the people. Boarder can wait but hunger cannot. We r only humans I don’t know who u are. U enjoy ur food everyday n when u eat don’t u think of us who are not paid n have no food to eat.???
Use all seized cash from drug busts to fund the wall. In a sense, this is Mexico paying for it. Done.
You should declare a national emergency  ! And pay the 800,000 people not getting paid . And stop the politicians pay that will not negotiate .
Trump 2020
Then why are selling us out to Russia 🇷🇺?
Trump for president for South Africa👍👍👍👍☝
The days of " give us your tired and weary " are over.  Sorry. Try getting into Switzerland.
Mr. President I thank GOD you are the Commander
Keep up the fight Mr President the true Patriots have your back!!!
As President your duty should be to the people and to the Constitution
Stand fast, Mr. President! We support you wholeheartedly, don't give an inch to the Democrats! Thanks for all you do.
Stay Strong, Mr. President, Stay Strong! We support you!!
That’s true actually. Surprised how it’s turning out
He is trying to keep us safe and stop free loaders. It's amazing how he is keeping his promises and making America great again.
You should declare a national emergency  ! And pay the 800,000 people not getting paid . And stop the politicians pay that will not negotiate .
The photo is edited so many ways to make this joke of a president look better  https://www.reddit.com/r/PoliticalHumor/comments/ah26x0/trumps_facebook_page_slimmed_him_down_and_made/?st=JR2135E8&sh=03c4d92b
Thank you very much for caring us Mr President, God bless you!
The best solution to deport so-called illegal immigrants would be ceasing to be No.1 in the world.
Call a national emergency and just build the wall!
Donald Trump needs to be impeached and removed from office!!
Where are American Billionaires in three digits (Example Jeff....)?  One of them can sponsor the US southern  border wall and end this damn government shutdown.
The most important thing  The wall
Im canadian, please tell me what I dont understand. Are you starving your people because you cant build a wall?
Dear mr. President I defend your policies to a point I support you until you go against your oath of office shall not be infringed upon means exactly that please reconsider your opinion unread flag laws shall not be infringed upon is in our constitution not take them and some poor busted up veteran can't afford to get his rights back or her rights back is not right
So basically, if the citizens don’t fund the border wall, the United States won’t exist?
He is trying to keep us safe and stop free loaders. It's amazing how he is keeping his promises and making America great again.
this president has no time for politics he wants to deliver on his promises to the amerian people starting from his first tenure
My SON AND HIS HUSBAND voted for Trump!  Don't believe the democrats' lies!
PROTECT 2A!!!  I see what you up to.
You have now become a one trick dog
Blessings and peace be upon you Mr Trump..
I think when we have a shutdown we should take the Congress and the Senate pay check off also and see how fast they come together
Long Live, President Donald J. Trump. May the almighty God continue to guide, protect you and complete the "WORK" ahead, of you, in the mighty name of Jesus Christ, "AMEN".
Does collusion with the enemy fall into that category?
So basically, if the citizens don’t fund the border wall, the United States won’t exist?
You want to open unsecured channels to people who leave their country, go to another country, "earn" money and send it back to the country they left behind , shallow lending sounds risky to me but the people that cause it are suspect at the very least, wait.... They're not American? $&#@!!?
I stand with President Donald Trump.
I am maybe from Czech Republic but i am grateful for you Mr. President Trump. Yuo are fighting for the entire Christian world. Dont stop, keep in your way.
My kids father was murdered by an illegal immigrant right here in the US. Build the Wall Mr. President! I still want to remain in this nation called the United States of America! No open borders!
I support you.  I want the “State of the Union Address”.  Give it to them!
This civilian salutes you Sir!!  thank you for your strong care and concern for the safety of this country, please don't back down about the wall
Absolutely, Mr. President! Thank you for standing up against the Washington Party!
I'll bet he would open the government back up if all air traffic controllers go on strike. Hint.
I don’t care about getting paid and providing for my family and my two year old daughter who needs food. But I know if my president wants to protect our nation then it’s ok.. it’s ok if I starve and my family. It’s all for GREAT cause right? Trump is always looking out for me
Very good mr president trump  We are we you 100 percent  You are the number one presodent End unite state of american  We love you end you family too God bless you for ever mr President end the family trump
I don’t care about getting paid and providing for my family and my two year old daughter who needs food. But I know if my president wants to protect our nation then it’s ok.. it’s ok if I starve and my family. It’s all for GREAT cause right? Trump is always looking out for me
Course it is when there is no more pussy to grab.
Keith Vaz  Aw jealous because your not getting any!  Best President Ever! Vote Trump 2020! We the people back you 100%!
Dora Gumpher Not likely dear. I’m into men.
I'll bet he would open the government back up if all air traffic controllers go on strike. Hint.
Donald, just build the damn fence.
why are ALL the people in Congress getting there pay there are part of the Government while the little people don't get paid they just get screwed
i wish nigeria can learn from you
Border security is the best answer!Build the wall.Stand Strong!!!
This picture looks like um pull my finger I’m in 5 th grade 🖕
We need to have the ability to remove Senators and Congressmen when their are not for America and it's people. I want to remove them at any time, not just at Voting time. Also the lifers. Term limits! Congressmen for the most part are all for themselves? Not for us, never were.
You’re highest duty is to make money 💰 for yourself. That’s it. You will break the law, lie and cheat to that end !
Trump is so awesome! Thank you for keeping America safe! Democrats were elected to shut down the government Stand strong gladiator Trump
Dora Gumpher Not likely dear. I’m into men.
Could Trump soon be getting to pick another Supreme Court Justice?? 🇺🇸️🇺🇸️🇺🇸️
You better start defending then.  Why are you fixated on the wall?  You do know that border security measures include added personnel, drones and smart tech...why not use those?
Cathy Bellin tell that to the people who risk their lives every day. They need walls or barriers as well to help them do their jobs more effectively to keep us all safe. Ask any Angel mom.
Sam Godin there are already 650 miles of wall at the border.  How do walls find people or drugs smuggled in at ports of entry?  Why do you folks insist on one solution to a problem?
Could Trump soon be getting to pick another Supreme Court Justice?? 🇺🇸️🇺🇸️🇺🇸️
Why is your picture edited to have a longer finger?
You have balls Trump!! All of this is hilarious to us.  So glad you are standing your ground against yhe Dumocrats!
So you are going to hold hard working government workers pay hostage to get funding for a wall that has an amazing chance of never being finished
Isn't what they want? No more United States of America.
Hehehe the infiltration is seating on the throne and eating KFC McDonald's what bitter does he eat only what he ordered himself?
Keep going President Trump we have your back!
Making libs breakdown & meltdown since 2016 #MAGA
Sam Godin there are already 650 miles of wall at the border.  How do walls find people or drugs smuggled in at ports of entry?  Why do you folks insist on one solution to a problem?
#If Jesus is God how he struck,where is His Power ? #You worship someone like you👍👍👍
Updates with the world on "climate change" as usual.
https://www.accuweather.com/en/videos/california-storms-leave-5-people-dead/rlodqzade6c6pooc5izlxxgv6el6hb05?fbclid=IwAR2m97rphT_BAU64PDug2GhMrLncNBE9Ou_15O1mHTmYFucz5KEKGPz7Qm4
#If Jesus is God how he struck,where is His Power ? #You worship someone like you👍👍👍
Liberals say it's ok to have an abortion at 20 weeks . That's murder , so why would you trust any of them who support that?? Hillary is for it  This world is gone nuts
Are. U coming out and announcing one world goverment. With this statement
Quit talking about it and do it
Go ahead President Donald Trump and always with.
Howdy.  To recap: I’m a licensed structural and civil engineer with a MS in structural engineering from the top program in the nation and over a decade of experience on high-performance projects, and particularly of cleaning up design disasters where the factors weren’t properly accounted for, and I’m an adjunct professor of structural analysis and design at UH-Downtown. I have previously been deposed as an expert witness in matters regarding proper construction of walls and the various factors associated therein, and my testimony has passed Daubert.  Am I a wall expert? I am. I am literally a court-accepted expert on walls.  Structurally and civil engineering-wise, the border wall is not a feasible project. Trump did not hire engineers to design the thing. He solicited bids from contractors, not engineers. This means it’s not been designed by professionals. It’s a disaster of numerous types waiting to happen.  What disasters?  Off the top of my head... 1) It will mess with our ability to drain land in flash flooding. Anything impeding the ability of water to get where it needs to go (doesn’t matter if there are holes in the wall or whatever) is going to dramatically increase the risk of flooding. 2) Messes with all kind of stuff ecologically. For all other projects, we have to do an Environmental Site Assessment, which is arduous. They’re either planning to circumvent all this, or they haven’t accounted for it yet, because that’s part of the design process, and this thing hasn’t been designed. 3) The prototypes they came up with are nearly impossible to build or don’t actually do the job. This article explains more:  https://www.google.com/amp/s/mobile.engineering.com/amp/17599.html  And so on.  The estimates provided for the cost are arrived at unreasonably. You can look for yourself at the two-year-old estimate that you see everyone citing.  http://fronterasdesk.org/sites/default/files/field/docs/2016/07/Bernstein-%20The%20Trump%20Wall.pdf  It does not account for rework, complexities beyond the prototype design, factors to prevent flood and environmental hazard creation, engineering redesign... It’s going to be higher than $50bn. The contractors will hit the government with near CONSTANT change orders. “Cost overrun” will be the name of the game. It will not be completed in Trump’s lifetime.  I’m a structural forensicist, which means I’m called in when things go wrong. This is a project that WILL go wrong. When projects go wrong, the original estimates are just *obliterated*. And when that happens, good luck getting it fixed, because there aren’t that many forensicists out there to right the ship, particularly not that are willing to work on a border wall project— a large quotient of us are immigrants, and besides, we can’t afford to bid on jobs that are this political. We’re small firms, and we’re already busy, and we don’t gamble our reputations on political footballs. So you’d end up with a revolving door of contractors making a giant, uncoordinated muddle of things, and it’d generally be a mess. Good money after bad. The GAO agrees with me.  And it won’t be effective. I could, right now, purchase a 32 foot extension ladder and weld a cheap custom saddle for the top of the proposed wall so that I can get over it. I don’t know who they talked to about the wall design and its efficacy, but it sure as heck wasn’t anybody with any engineering imagination.  Another thing: we are not far from the day where inexpensive drones will be able to pick up and carry someone. This will happen in the next ten years, and it’s folly to think that the coyotes who ferry people over the border won’t purchase or create them. They’re low enough, quiet enough, and small enough to quickly zip people over any wall we could build undetected with our current monitoring setup.  Let’s have border security, by all means, but let’s be smart about it. This is not smart. It’s not effective. It’s NOT cheap. The returns will be diminishing as technology advances, too. This is a ridiculous idea that will never be successfully executed and, as such, would be a monumental waste of money. 🤷🏻‍♀️  This is set to public. Have a blast sharing it.
https://www.accuweather.com/en/videos/california-storms-leave-5-people-dead/rlodqzade6c6pooc5izlxxgv6el6hb05?fbclid=IwAR2m97rphT_BAU64PDug2GhMrLncNBE9Ou_15O1mHTmYFucz5KEKGPz7Qm4
Donald J. Trump - Partial Government Shutdown Comes As A Boon To American Taxpayers And American Economy - for those who Preyed-On-American-Taxpayers by Misusing-Governmental-Authorities 'by implying illegitimate-rules-on-tax-deductions using yet-to-be-passed-tax-legislation-clauses-in-the-then-yet-to-be-passed-tax-overhaul-bill on to legitimate-tax-deductions-that-adhered-to-the-legitimate-rules-of-tax-deductions-from-legitimate-legislated-clauses-of-legitimately-passed-past-year-tax-bills' have Now Become The Prey Of Justice Served Via Partial Governmental Shutdown - for the newly elected house majority under-non-National-Emergency-state have a maximum glass ceiling of close to $2 Billion to be allocated in the or any budget for single clause of expenses, when breaks that glass ceiling risks-in-becoming-the-establishment-itself against which they have fought to come to power in the first place - US House Majority Leaders are-in-minority-amidst-their-own-current-majority-in-house to take a stand to break that glass ceiling on budgeted expenses yet-remain-patriotically-safe-from-being-tagged-as-the-establishment-themselves - for the event of declaration-of-National-Emergency gives the required leg-up to those US House Majority Leaders who-have-willingness-to-break-that-budget-glass-ceiling and pumping up votes on patriotic grounds for even higher amount of budgeted expenses for any single item clause that can be budgeted, when such an event reaches where Nation is in Emergency/Crisis double-digits-in-billions can be passed via budgets for Border Wall 'as was done during the previous administration(s)' - Please Let The Partial Governmental Shutdown Continue & Please Get US Taxpayers The Best Deal In This Texas-Hold'em Play Of Waiting Game On Political Mongering Over National Securing Essential 'The Border Wall'...
Donald J. Trump - Partial Government Shutdown Comes As A Boon To American Taxpayers And American Economy - for those who Preyed-On-American-Taxpayers by Misusing-Governmental-Authorities 'by implying illegitimate-rules-on-tax-deductions using yet-to-be-passed-tax-legislation-clauses-in-the-then-yet-to-be-passed-tax-overhaul-bill on to legitimate-tax-deductions-that-adhered-to-the-legitimate-rules-of-tax-deductions-from-legitimate-legislated-clauses-of-legitimately-passed-past-year-tax-bills' have Now Become The Prey Of Justice Served Via Partial Governmental Shutdown - for the newly elected house majority under-non-National-Emergency-state have a maximum glass ceiling of close to $2 Billion to be allocated in the or any budget for single clause of expenses, when breaks that glass ceiling risks-in-becoming-the-establishment-itself against which they have fought to come to power in the first place - US House Majority Leaders are-in-minority-amidst-their-own-current-majority-in-house to take a stand to break that glass ceiling on budgeted expenses yet-remain-patriotically-safe-from-being-tagged-as-the-establishment-themselves - for the event of declaration-of-National-Emergency gives the required leg-up to those US House Majority Leaders who-have-willingness-to-break-that-budget-glass-ceiling and pumping up votes on patriotic grounds for even higher amount of budgeted expenses for any single item clause that can be budgeted, when such an event reaches where Nation is in Emergency/Crisis double-digits-in-billions can be passed via budgets for Border Wall 'as was done during the previous administration(s)' - Please Let The Partial Governmental Shutdown Continue & Please Get US Taxpayers The Best Deal In This Texas-Hold'em Play Of Waiting Game On Political Mongering Over National Securing Essential 'The Border Wall'...
Evelyn Warren I absolutely feel the same as you ! I was raised in a democratic house & was a registered democrat for more years than I care to remember .  Even then I voted for Ronald Regan . I shutter to think what kind of shape our country would be in had Crooked Hilary won & all that has been uncovered never saw the light of day !!!
Maybe you are on drugs ,then make sense your comment.
Paul Chiplock, let me ask you a question about this immigration on the border being at a decline. If immigrants are crossing into America undetected in the first place, then living here under the radar, how can they be calculated? Therefore by what logic can a decline narrative be created and be even somewhat accurate?
Paul Chiplock, that’s the point! How can any entity create a statistic when the premise itself means one would have to include immigrants that came in undetected? How do you account for someone in a statistical way you never saw or otherwise discovered after the fact?   Why do you think there is such a big range in calculating the overall cost of illegal immigration? It’s from a low of 54 billion to a high of almost 175 billion. That’s because no one really knows! All of it are estimates based upon supposition without facts. It’s based on an estimate of 14 million, but if they are in hiding, how does one really know?
Evelyn Warren I absolutely feel the same as you ! I was raised in a democratic house & was a registered democrat for more years than I care to remember .  Even then I voted for Ronald Regan . I shutter to think what kind of shape our country would be in had Crooked Hilary won & all that has been uncovered never saw the light of day !!!
So why don't the people who voted for Trump, stand up and march on Capital Hill?
So stop making sneaky backdoor deals with Russian oligarchs. #MAGA8645
How are things in Crazytown today Donald? BTW, aren’t you do for your annual physical? Borderline obese. Too many BigMacs? The Trump shutdown is damaging the people you claim you care about! Loser!
Tell the Democrats to stop smearing Lindsey Graham who is standing up to them.
I want to see professors of Texas A&M in jail.  That bullshit i was attacked with an electronic arm it could do you hear into your mind voices o noisy it happend me in the university of texas at austin  I was attacked with an electronic arm from i was doing a postdoc in physics department at texas university at austin. They followed to mexico, the night before came back i was attacked and tortured into my mind during all night. I remind i went for a dinner to a small restaurant after i went back to hotel i started to heard voices of women and men talking all the night it looked how if they were outside of the hotel room. I couldnt sleep but my mind was damaged now but i had courage to left austin so i took airplane and flied to mexico. I arrived to mexico at night so i accomodated at hotel because the first idea comes to my mind perhaps i am sick so i hope to go with a neurologist to check my brain tomorrow. But that night in the hotel in mexico was worst because in the night started to hear voices again but now they laughed of me and talking during all the night thay they were from police that night i couldnt sleep. The story is long now my mind is quiet and after ten years i understood they just say stupid things. How did it begin? It started in the lab where i was the phd students started a game very strange so in the building of the university everybody knew me and i just took a couple of weeks. When i saw the behaviour of phd students were anormal i talked with them: i said them: you all have a problem with me and they answered that they had not troubles with you jesus. So i forgot everything. But they went on with the same: i dont know how they knew about all i talked with my family by cellphone. The had information about my activities in the university that was dangerous said myself. So i had to talk with my postdoc chief and i said : i think the phd students are doing something very bad very bad because they know about my cellphones. He answered: i dont think so perhaps it is a bad understood. Twice times i said this to my chief he always gave me the same answer. If you want a proof there is a call phone i did to my Banorte bank for changing my credit card because i found the phd students talking about all i talked with my family in mexico. The story is longer but it is truth, phd students in the physics department did this to me one day heard two students fight about how they had to go back a lot money .. the professors guilty are alex lozanne morgan berg frank rijka alfred lee neliza brito ans student called bryant.
Trump is pulling troops out of Syria so his friend Putin could walk all over Syria and before you know it they will be as they were in the70' s to 80' s
Paul Chiplock, that’s the point! How can any entity create a statistic when the premise itself means one would have to include immigrants that came in undetected? How do you account for someone in a statistical way you never saw or otherwise discovered after the fact?   Why do you think there is such a big range in calculating the overall cost of illegal immigration? It’s from a low of 54 billion to a high of almost 175 billion. That’s because no one really knows! All of it are estimates based upon supposition without facts. It’s based on an estimate of 14 million, but if they are in hiding, how does one really know?
Trump is pulling troops out of Syria so his friend Putin could walk all over Syria and before you know it they will be as they were in the70' s to 80' s
This old fool doesn't care anything about America, he only cares about himself and money.
Dorrie Reed Peaco if he cared that much about money he would be taking his pay as president, but yet he isnt doing that 🤔
I want to see professors of Texas A&M in jail.  That bullshit i was attacked with an electronic arm it could do you hear into your mind voices o noisy it happend me in the university of texas at austin  I was attacked with an electronic arm from i was doing a postdoc in physics department at texas university at austin. They followed to mexico, the night before came back i was attacked and tortured into my mind during all night. I remind i went for a dinner to a small restaurant after i went back to hotel i started to heard voices of women and men talking all the night it looked how if they were outside of the hotel room. I couldnt sleep but my mind was damaged now but i had courage to left austin so i took airplane and flied to mexico. I arrived to mexico at night so i accomodated at hotel because the first idea comes to my mind perhaps i am sick so i hope to go with a neurologist to check my brain tomorrow. But that night in the hotel in mexico was worst because in the night started to hear voices again but now they laughed of me and talking during all the night thay they were from police that night i couldnt sleep. The story is long now my mind is quiet and after ten years i understood they just say stupid things. How did it begin? It started in the lab where i was the phd students started a game very strange so in the building of the university everybody knew me and i just took a couple of weeks. When i saw the behaviour of phd students were anormal i talked with them: i said them: you all have a problem with me and they answered that they had not troubles with you jesus. So i forgot everything. But they went on with the same: i dont know how they knew about all i talked with my family by cellphone. The had information about my activities in the university that was dangerous said myself. So i had to talk with my postdoc chief and i said : i think the phd students are doing something very bad very bad because they know about my cellphones. He answered: i dont think so perhaps it is a bad understood. Twice times i said this to my chief he always gave me the same answer. If you want a proof there is a call phone i did to my Banorte bank for changing my credit card because i found the phd students talking about all i talked with my family in mexico. The story is longer but it is truth, phd students in the physics department did this to me one day heard two students fight about how they had to go back a lot money .. the professors guilty are alex lozanne morgan berg frank rijka alfred lee neliza brito ans student called bryant.
Dorrie Reed Peaco if he cared that much about money he would be taking his pay as president, but yet he isnt doing that 🤔
If we don't defeat Pelosi we cease to be relevant.
You are stuck with her for 2 years, just like we are with Trump.
We will see how stuck we are.
Stephen Pierson thanks for upholding the very low standard of discourse you Leftists are noted for. P.S. I noted you have no photos on your page. Why not ? 😉
This old fool doesn't care anything about America, he only cares about himself and money.
We are 1 United nation under Russia 🤣🤣🤣
Lol, all the Democrats are concerned about the ‘Costly Ineffective Wall’... Where were these same people’s concern when Obama drove us into Trillions of National Debt?? 😂🤣#Hypocrites
Indian Opposition Leaders learn from this by Criticizing Modiji in his pursuit to Make the Defense of our Nation impenetrable u r doing harm to Nation’s Security
I'm praying for you Mr. President! I know the Lord will give you the strength you need to keep fighting for our country!  God Bless you and your family!
A wall would make it harder to get in But are you hiring
Stephen Pierson thanks for upholding the very low standard of discourse you Leftists are noted for. P.S. I noted you have no photos on your page. Why not ? 😉
A wall would make it harder to get in But are you hiring
Kimberly Fransesca Chapman Consider the 80k employees of the Department of Health and Human Services.  The CDC is great... 14,000 employees... Indian Reservation Hospitals.. 15,000... who makes up the REST of the 51,000? States need the employees, not the feds.
A furlough of more than 30 calendar days, or of more than 22 discontinuous work days, is also a RIF action. https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/workforce-restructuring/reductions-in-force/
If we keep Trump as president, we cease to be a nation.
Why didn't the Republicans give you the money for the wall for the two years they controlled the House and the Senate?
OMG why should anyone believe you, seriously you can't even put up a real picture of yourself and the people doing your photo shopping need glasses.
It's time to build the wall without Pelosi. She's not going to move on this and we need the wall with all the other immigrants coming. I think declare an emergency and get it done. Yes, there will be a court fight but that's going to happen if you wait to do it too, better to get on with it.
President Trump,Many people in the no, know.  you are the man.
Take Charge, & declare the National Emergency!!  Bypass ALL who oppose you, Mr. President!  That way, once "You are in control", all issues can be taken care of....fast!
A false man that you are not defending your borders but crossed your borders for your ambitions, lover of money🖕🖕🖕🖕
Security of our people and nation SHOULD be the most important thing.
A furlough of more than 30 calendar days, or of more than 22 discontinuous work days, is also a RIF action. https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/workforce-restructuring/reductions-in-force/
You're the best, President Trump!  #MAGA !!
If I may make a suggestion Mr. President, take action in the face of the Democrat's inaction, call for an emergency to fund the wall, end the Gov.shut down on your terms.
Let's build the wall then send Democrats to the other side to inspect it... and don't forget to call the Mexican federales.... then the democrats can learn first hand how immigration laws work..
WALL THE ENTIRE COUNTRY IN SO NO BAD GUYS CAN ESCAPE
Without a functioning government, we've pretty much already ceased to be a nation.
The US-Canada border is 5,525 miles long and it receives less resources and fewer border agents than the US-Mexico border (which is 1,954 miles.) The number of illegal border crossings along the US-Canada border has increased by 142% in just one year. Fenatyl, Marijuana, Ecstacy and coke are the most common drugs smuggled into our country from Canada. It also serves as an easy entrance for terrorists to enter into the US. Border agents along the US-Canada border have made statements about how easy it is for human trafficking and drug smuggling to slip through, due to the lack of man power and resources. Thousands of traffickers and smugglers illegally cross, completely unnoticed by border security and drawing all of our attention on the Southern border only makes it easier for them to do so. The Northern border is currently a bigger threat to us than the Southern border, so why is it we choose not to pay attention?
If you don't get rid of the corruption from within your nothing more than a phony.
Open the government back up and stop the extortion.
Security of our people and nation SHOULD be the most important thing.
President you're saying write.  Our defence is the highest powerful.
Obviously a lot of those furloughed jobs are not really necessary for the country to function. I say, let them go permanently.
That's weird. I didn't realize that from 1776 to the present day, we were never really a "nation" because we didn't have a wall all the way around us.  I also didn't realize that no other country on earth is truly a "nation" because none of them have such a wall either.  I'm bored. Guess I'll write down all of your names again.
🇺🇸THE EL CHAPO ACT🇺🇸  This Act would take funds seized from El Chapo when he was arrested and use them to pay for Trump's border wall.    Ted Cruz lays it out step by step.
Open the government back up and stop the extortion.
🇺🇸THE EL CHAPO ACT🇺🇸  This Act would take funds seized from El Chapo when he was arrested and use them to pay for Trump's border wall.    Ted Cruz lays it out step by step.
Democrats turning their backs on their own constituents, the poor, the working class...... Well the American ones.  Only a Democrat would stick their neck out for everyone but Americans.  Those already here who need government assistance in any form should be opposed to open borders. They will be bankrupting the very programs they depend on and stealing your children’s seats in the classroom.
That's weird. I didn't realize that from 1776 to the present day, we were never really a "nation" because we didn't have a wall all the way around us.  I also didn't realize that no other country on earth is truly a "nation" because none of them have such a wall either.  I'm bored. Guess I'll write down all of your names again.
The Border Is Pretty Safe Border cities get a bad rap as violent, but the Rio Grande Valley is extremely safe. Of the 24 Texas metro areas ranked by the FBI, Brownsville comes in dead last, with 240 incidents of violent crime per 100,000 people. Nearby McAllen comes in at #18, with 286 per 100,000.  Things are closer to the middle of the pack in El Paso and Laredo, which place at #13 and #10, respectively. The murder rate in each city is low, at 1.4 and 1.5 (Brownsville also comes in at 1.4, which is the second-lowest behind Abilene at 0.6). The numbers in El Paso, Laredo, and McAllen are all slanted heavily toward aggravated assault. In Brownsville, meanwhile, though the overall numbers for everything are very low, robbery crimes make up a surprisingly high number of cases, at 58.1 per 100,000, good for almost 25% of the violent crime in the city.  The Parts Of South Texas North Of The Border Are Somewhat Less So Corpus Christi, Victoria, and San Antonio all place within the top 10 on the list (at #7, 8, and 9, respectively). The numbers for all three cities are pretty similar—although Victoria, like Amarillo, has a surprisingly high number of reported rape cases, at 71.5 per 100,000. The average for all Texas cities listed is 36, which means that, again—either Victoria (and Amarillo) have more than twice as many rapes occurring than the rest of the state, or they’re being reported more frequently in those cities than elsewhere.  That statistic aside, there’s not a lot to parse about those numbers: Corpus has the highest murder rate, at 5.4, of the three, while San Antonio has a lower robbery rate than the other largest metro areas in Texas, Houston and Dallas.
Latest Trump Approval Poll Reveals: His Base (Cult) Is Turning on Him  On Thursday,the results of a recent NPR/PBS Newshour/Marist Poll were published showing that Trump’s approval rating is currently 39 to 53 percent. This means the president’s approval rating has gone down seven points from December when it was 42 to 49 percent.
“Don’t give up... If there’s a concrete wall in front of you, go through it, go over it, go around it, but get to the other side of that wall.” -Donald Trump Wagner College, 2004
LET'S PUT YOU AT THE BOARDER THEN!
USA TRUMP ALL THE WAY 2024!! BUILD THE WALL!! DEPORT ALL ILLEGALS!!
This wall is not an emergency. It takes 10 years to build knock at the f*** off and pay them people.
Well said!!
Emigration is a state of rules and regulations of life in a country, an organization to establish order and security in the community, mainly on the border, that our President focuses on the behavior of the illegal, with a border wall . Families that cross the border using children, knowing that our president does not separate children from their parents, it is right to return to where they came to Mexico or their country, it is unfair that parents have traveled with innocent children, to continue living as illegal immigrants
Is this a common Paranoia for people with small penises?
"Commander And Chief Of The Armed Forces"....I would definitely say it's about defending our Nation!
That is the goal. They disrespect our flag and National Anthem. They hate the founding fathers and the Constitution. Why does it surprise you that they want to weaken our borders? It kind of fits a pattern.  Oh and just a reminder. Lock her up. Good day Mr President.
We need  Donald  in  N.Ireland  right  now👊
Another Outstanding message to those who truly rely on the President.
We r 20 TRILLION in debt !!!   We can Not take everyone in the world in all at once.   Protect. US Citizens 1st !!    COUNTRY b4 PARTY POLITICS !!!    COME HERE LEGALLY.
How are you so concerned about the defense and safety of our country when your butt buddy is putin everybody knows you blow eachother kisses at night before you go too sleep
You are the cause of the destruction of the United States of America and will fall under your rule, Trump
Democrats have ceased to be Americans. They only care about illegal aliens for their voting base.
Best president we’ve ever had!!  He cares about YOU!  The American citizens, Republicans, Democrats and all!
Our entire family supports you, President Trump. My Facebook profile is discreet, but I represent hundreds in our community who support all of your efforts. Please stay strong. Don’t believe the negative polls. We need your strength, your country needs your strengths. Bless you Sir.
WE NEED A BOARDER CONTROL ALL AROUND USA
How are you so concerned about the defense and safety of our country when your butt buddy is putin everybody knows you blow eachother kisses at night before you go too sleep
WE NEED A BOARDER CONTROL ALL AROUND USA
Emmanuel Emmy Etim Putin bless him already.god don't bless traitors
Our entire family supports you, President Trump. My Facebook profile is discreet, but I represent hundreds in our community who support all of your efforts. Please stay strong. Don’t believe the negative polls. We need your strength, your country needs your strengths. Bless you Sir.
Emmanuel Emmy Etim Putin bless him already.god don't bless traitors
Andrew Vincent, then what you are saying is you aren’t interested in Pelosi or Schumer taking some of the 54 billion in discretionary spending available to fix the water issues in flint? If not, what would you like them to do with the money?
Andrew Vincent, last century? Unless you also live in a last century house, technology has improved all we build, even using sensors to help see tunnels and other things. To use a medieval analogy isn’t being very truthful   But how do you process people legally if they can walk in undetected nearly everywhere? Plus how do you guarantee work for amounts of immigrants you can’t control their entry?
Andrew Vincent, ok, let’s examine all you said...  1) by not having a better solution other than a wall, you’d rather take a pragmatic approach and do nothing. This means illegal immigration, which costs anywhere between 54-125 billion annually not only continues, but grows in expense. Do you think such a response will increase, decrease, or have no affect on 22 trillion in debt?   2) what does “enhanced border security” mean? Democrats can’t even come up with a number of how many agents would be required, much less generate an annual expense.   3) I’d rather spend 30 billion today on a wall, about 10% of the interest alone on our debt (that no American benefits from) to possibly curb the obvious increase in illegal immigration costs. Then if years later, some resident genius comes up with a better solution, then let’s go for it!
Andrew Vincent,   1) either be proactive or reactive about immigration. Your entire foundation is reactive because it doesn’t come with a better plan   2) meet halfway? You mean by Pelosi and Schumer saying no wall is meeting halfway?   3) I put Mexico paying for the wall in the same bucket with shovel ready jobs and affordable healthcare. Mine is now $1,440 per month and I have bern taking it on the chin for years. Some ideas just can’t be fulfilled! Let’s not act like politicians haven’t failed us in the past!
Andrew Vincent, no one said there was one solution to fix illegal immigration. But the wall will be a beginning.   While it’s not your job to be proactive, it is the job of Americans to evaluate what solutions our representatives come up with to see if it is feasible and makes sense. Isn’t it how we evaluate coworkers and even family members, to say nothing of ourselves?   Pelosi said on tape she will oppose Trump’s wall. Now she did use some nebulous references about some kind of barrier in certain places. But in February 2018, wasn’t it Pelosi who said we should cut the grass instead?   You want to talk about a sales pitch? You mean like passing the ACA even without fully reading it? Are you serious?
God bless the POTUS. #FUND THAT WALL
Andrew Vincent, no one said there was one solution to fix illegal immigration. But the wall will be a beginning.   While it’s not your job to be proactive, it is the job of Americans to evaluate what solutions our representatives come up with to see if it is feasible and makes sense. Isn’t it how we evaluate coworkers and even family members, to say nothing of ourselves?   Pelosi said on tape she will oppose Trump’s wall. Now she did use some nebulous references about some kind of barrier in certain places. But in February 2018, wasn’t it Pelosi who said we should cut the grass instead?   You want to talk about a sales pitch? You mean like passing the ACA even without fully reading it? Are you serious?
The President --> Waahhhhh Nancy won't let me come to Capitol Hill for SOTU and Lie about my useless border wall. Booohoooo! Somebody please change my Diaper!
if you dont stand up solid against the dems they will weaken you to their way of thinking AND BESIDES YOU WOULD BE LETTING THE ONES PROTECTING THE BORDER THAT AND OTHERS DOWN take some of that money in the bill that they want to pass (50some billion) to send to other countries and use it for the border . why should we support countries that hate us?DO NOT SUPPORT A BILL THAT FUND ABORTIONS, AND WASTED MONEY TO COUNTRIES THAT HATE US
Democrats are proving themselves Communists more everyday.  Stand for America President Trump.  MAGA!!
Stand strong Mr President.
The report released Wednesday by the Center for Migration Studies of New York finds people who overstayed their visas accounted for 62 percent of the newly undocumented, while 38 percent had crossed a border illegally. The study also finds that the undocumented population from Mexico fell by almost 400,000 people in 2017 and that since 2010, the number of undocumented from that country fell by 1.3 million. "We have made tremendous progress since the year 2000 in reducing undocumented immigration into this country,"  "Since more than one half of all US undocumented residents arrive by air, visa-issuing posts have become the real frontline deterrent to undocumented migration," the study concludes. "This report suggests that more attention and resources should be given to that crucial mission of the US Department of State."
Amen despise the evil devils www.magapill.com
Andrew Vincent, yes and 5.7 billion is only 1/60th of the annual interest of 22 trillion in debt
Amen despise the evil devils www.magapill.com
This is the Netherlands and Belgium border.  I don’t see any wall, built during a time of record budget deficit. They are still very much independent nations.  https://commons.m.wikimedia.org/wiki/File:Baarle-Nassau_frontière_café.jpg#mw-jump-to-licenseFile:Baarle-Nassau frontière café.jpg - Wikimedia Commonscommons.wikimedia.org
Gavin Rey the Netherlands have never had an issue with Belgium having half of the economic structure nor has Belgium had cartels running the country killing and beheading teachers in the middle of the street for their beliefs. 333000 people from Belgium or not rushing to change citizenship to the Netherlands anyway and refusing to work don't pay taxes, these comparisons idiotic.
Luke Wade, killing and beheading teachers?  In Mexico?  Are you sure you aren’t confusing Mexico with Afghanistan?  Even if it was actually Mexico that you speak of, its a Mexican problem.  Not ours.    I don’t care if 333,000 people are “rushing” to change citizenship when Canadians are the greater share of illegal immigrants.    I’ve also never met a lazy Mexican.  On top of the fact that I thought they were “stealing our jobs”,  or was that a lie?  You can’t have it both ways.  They cannot both be stealing our jobs and simultaneously refusing to work.  They do jobs that you or I would only do as a last-ditch effort to stave if homelessness at best.    They also DO pay taxes!  Just not federal income taxes.  They pay sales taxes on everything they buy.  Where’s the outrage over major employers choosing to knowingly employ these people anyway?  There is a creation of an attractive nuisanice in ignoring that kind of illegal employment.  But, again, why waste that kind of money on a wall that won’t stop drugs or gangs?  Especially when we are facing a record budget deficit.
The report released Wednesday by the Center for Migration Studies of New York finds people who overstayed their visas accounted for 62 percent of the newly undocumented, while 38 percent had crossed a border illegally. The study also finds that the undocumented population from Mexico fell by almost 400,000 people in 2017 and that since 2010, the number of undocumented from that country fell by 1.3 million. "We have made tremendous progress since the year 2000 in reducing undocumented immigration into this country,"  "Since more than one half of all US undocumented residents arrive by air, visa-issuing posts have become the real frontline deterrent to undocumented migration," the study concludes. "This report suggests that more attention and resources should be given to that crucial mission of the US Department of State."
no, your ego is.. and a big phallic wall.
Cool then lets start rounding up all your white supremacist supporters and put them in jail before they commit more acts of terror. Sadly those white supremacist will disagree with this comment because they support hate.
Finally a president who cares. Thank you President Trump. I’m proud that your my president. Keep up the good work.
Be honest.  This isn’t about border security.  This is about TRUMP security.
Just took 2 years to get around said duty
HE IS RIGHT ...they were ALL for it until they realized THIS MAN WOULD DO HIS SWORN DUTY ....THANK YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP
Luke Wade, killing and beheading teachers?  In Mexico?  Are you sure you aren’t confusing Mexico with Afghanistan?  Even if it was actually Mexico that you speak of, its a Mexican problem.  Not ours.    I don’t care if 333,000 people are “rushing” to change citizenship when Canadians are the greater share of illegal immigrants.    I’ve also never met a lazy Mexican.  On top of the fact that I thought they were “stealing our jobs”,  or was that a lie?  You can’t have it both ways.  They cannot both be stealing our jobs and simultaneously refusing to work.  They do jobs that you or I would only do as a last-ditch effort to stave if homelessness at best.    They also DO pay taxes!  Just not federal income taxes.  They pay sales taxes on everything they buy.  Where’s the outrage over major employers choosing to knowingly employ these people anyway?  There is a creation of an attractive nuisanice in ignoring that kind of illegal employment.  But, again, why waste that kind of money on a wall that won’t stop drugs or gangs?  Especially when we are facing a record budget deficit.
I suppose Old Man Trump knows Just how much Racial Hate He stirred up In the bloodpot of human hearts When he drawed That color line...  Woody Guthrie 1954
Build the WALL, the ENTIRE WALL, from Brownsville to San Diego. CLOSE THE BORDER and keep it closed until THE WALL IS COMPLETED!
Then let the people who keep us safe back to work
FORMER CIA DIRECTOR AGREES DONALD TRUMP IS A 'CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER' TO U.S. NATIONAL SECURITY BY TIM MARCIN ON 1/16/19  John Brennan, former director of the CIA, on Tuesday agreed with an assessment that President Donald Trump presented a "clear and present danger" to the United States's national security.   (Does he agree with former Department of Justice counterintelligence head David Laufman, who assessed that Trump was a "clear and present danger" to U.S. national security?)  "I know David Laufman well. I worked with him for many years and have tremendous respect for his intellect as well as for his judgment," said Brennan. "A number of people have been saying for quite some time that the actions, and the policies, and the statements that Mr. Trump has been making undermine our national security. So I think David Laufman brought it together in a very crisp and succinct way."  Hayes followed up by pressing for a more direct answer. "So you don't think he's wrong?" the host asked.  "I don't think he's wrong at all, no," Brennan said. "If Donald Trump is thinking about taking the United States out of NATO, the organization that the United States and our European allies have, in fact, formed in order to prevent the Soviet Union's expansion for so many years, and now stands in the way of Russia moving westward. This is something that is just totally mind-blowing, that the president of the United States would actually entertain this notion."  Laufman had earlier told MSNBC host Rachel Maddow that he felt a "moral obligation" to speak out when a Washington Post article reported that Trump had concealed notes and details from a meeting with Russian President Vladimir Putin.  “The notion that the president of the United States would be trying to conceal the details of conversations with the leader of our principal foreign adversary was positively chilling,” Laufman said.  Trump pushed back against the idea that he was working for Russia, which, The New York Times reported, had been the subject of an FBI inquiry.
Understand that PUT-IN has offered "PUT-IN's BARREL BUDDY BOY / TOY" the use of the Kremlin for The State of the Union Address.
Other than selling us out to the Russians, of course.
Let the Immigranfs pass, but must go straight to Canada, and collect two hundred to help them stay. No more wall just guidance and everlasting to.
lol bone spurs all i got to say.....coward
"What you've just said is one of the most insanely idiotic things I have ever heard. At no point in your rambling, incoherent response were you even close to anything that could be considered a rational thought. Everyone in this room is now dumber for having listened to it. I award you no points, and may God have mercy on your soul."
Real News: When #BigotPresident meets #MoronPresident: San Antonio does not have a border wall and is 157 miles from the U.S.-Mexico border.  President Trump incorrectly claims San Antonio has a border wall  Speaking to reporters Saturday, the president cited San Antonio's nonexistent border wall as the source of improved security in the city.  January 19, 2019 WASHINGTON, D.C., USA — Ahead of his "special announcement" Saturday on the government shutdown and the border, President Trump told reporters that "walls work," citing San Antonio's security improvement since putting up a wall.  "You look at different places," Trump told members of the media, "they put up a wall, no problem. You look at San Antonio, you look at so many different places. They go from one of the most unsafe cities in the country to one of the safest cities immediately. Immediately. It works, we have to put them up, and we will put them up. We've got to."  San Antonio, however, does not have a border wall and is 157 miles from the U.S.-Mexico border.  Trump visited the Rio Grande Valley along the edge of the U.S.-Mexico border last week. During his visit, the president took part in a roundtable discussion on border security and met with Border Patrol agents stationed along the border.  Throughout the government shutdown, which has lasted nearly a month, Trump has insisted that a crisis exists at the border which would be fixed by a border wall.  During the president's visit, Texas Lt. Gov. Dan Patrick told him the state will build a wall along parts of the U.S.-Mexico border if the federal government pays Texas back.
DAY BY DAY YOUR PRESIDENCY IS CORRODING!!!!! YOU WILL SOON HAVE A 0% APPROVAL RATING!!!!!! Putin has already whispered that he is going to spill the beans on you. He is nearly done using you.   STAY TUNED!!!!!
Maybe trump should start fining people who don't want the wall, like obama did with Obamacare. Funding would be available fast...
KEEP PRAYING TOGETHER  One Nation under God. Prayers, Praises & Faith. May God protect and guide our President! MAGA 2020
You have a funny way of defending Americans, by keeping the government shut down putting many of their lives in jeopardy.
lol bone spurs all i got to say.....coward
# need work & end shutdown ☆ strong w/- 202045K a trillions toast!
As long as u don’t pay TSA workers to protect the airports which is proven to be a port for terrorist, you continue to prove this wall is all about you and not national security.And let’s not forget our borders which connect to the seas that coast guards protect without being paid. Brilliant plan!!
“Sen. Mitch McConnell is blaming Democrats for the government shutdown. Yes, the same person who won’t even let the Senate vote on a bill he knows would pass with a veto-proof majority and reopen the government is accusing Democrats of keeping the government closed.” - Allen Clifton
Ummm...right???? Is that Why Major Political descions seem to aling with Russian Interests....say Asbestos for 1, Syria, Um inviting them into The G7, turning our backs on Nato, Hmmmmmm need we go on.....how about the undisclossed Plans For A Russian Trump Hotel with a Vlady Penthouse, or burning the tapes from the "Private"  meetings wuth Putin 🤔🤔🤔🤔🤔🤔Right.....alll of this is completely Normal......for ....a.....TRAITOR!!!!!!!
The skin colour thing is real still in this world ,God come and rest the case.
Americans are so lucky to have a real leader! In the meantime in Canada it’s all the opposite!
BUILD THAT WALL!!!!
Americans are so lucky to have a real leader! In the meantime in Canada it’s all the opposite!
18 people (here) posted a hate emoji to defending our nation. Wonder who they are!
Use DOD budget to build the wall and move on already.  Seal the border... all of it.  Can't count on the demoncrats to keep us safe.  Do it to it.
Cindy Bock dumbasses
Trump is making America a third world country. He is dividing and mail g America hate everyone
Cindy Bock dumbasses
Facts are the only thing that combats ignorance.   https://www.npr.org/2019/01/16/686056668/for-seventh-consecutive-year-visa-overstays-exceeded-illegal-border-crossings
According to Texas Department of Public Safety (DPS), 251,000 criminal aliens have been booked into local Texas jails between June 1, 2011 and April 30, 2018, according to DHS status indicators. These criminal aliens were charged with MORE THAN 663,000 criminal offenses.  Just in TEXAS ALONE:  > 1,351 homicides;  > 7,156 sexual assaults;  > 9,938 weapons charges;  > 79,049 assaults;  > 18,685 burglaries;  > 79,900 drug charges;  > 815 kidnappings;  > 44,882 thefts;  > 4,292 robberies  https://www.justice.gov/opa/pr/departments-justice-and-homeland-security-release-quarterly-alien-incarceration-report  Anyone who opposes the wall is giving warrant and sanction to mass murder, rape, violent crime and human trafficking - and there is just no way for them to spin themselves out of it.
National Vote. Lets get it over with already. There is no way 535 Ivy League people can't come to an agreement yet both Republican and Democrat civilians can agree on a national vote. May the best team win. That simple. 🤷‍♂️
Walls DO WORK!!....  SAN Diego wall Built in 1992 Illegal Immigration down 92%  El Paso Wall Built 1995 Illegal Immigration down 95%  Tucson Wall  Built 2000 Illegal Immigration down 90%  Yuma Wall  Built 2005 Illegal Immigration down 95%  🇺🇸💪🇺🇸#BUILDTHEWALL
Trump is making America a third world country. He is dividing and mail g America hate everyone
Buck Strunk Ever heard of Ellis Island? Never forget: we are ALL immigrants here. Under tRump, we’ve all become meaner and uglier to one another. Make America Kind again!
President Trump, I think you will find super interesting things in our Alibaba Shop: www.yftsextoy.en.alibaba.com
Buck Strunk Ever heard of Ellis Island? Never forget: we are ALL immigrants here. Under tRump, we’ve all become meaner and uglier to one another. Make America Kind again!
VoicesImportant📞SendACall too leave msg Now 📞Security is Priceless💲Call Pelosi NOW Fund Wall 202 225 0100 📞📞
Please keep America Shutdown! More Federal Employees hating you 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂❤️
Come to the UK and sort our Fkn mess out please !!
President Trump, I think you will find super interesting things in our Alibaba Shop: www.yftsextoy.en.alibaba.com
Shutdown the rest of the government.
Oh look, another triggered snowflake
Brett White Do you believe all of Trump's lies?
At least he cares about American citizens more than illegals !!!
Shutdown the rest of the government.
At least he cares about American citizens more than illegals !!!
Brett White Do you believe all of Trump's lies?
ISIS DEFEATED MISSION ACCOMPLISHED SYRIA BIG BOOM AMERICANS DEAD
Your obstinate stance to obtain a border wall is perverse as you hold the lives of 800,000 federal workers and their families hostage in this dispute with Democrats.  Shame on you! So cruel!
Thanks for actually doing what you said you would do and working so smart and hard to MAGA President Trump! Praying God's protection, blessings and favor for you, your family, America and all citizens!
Action speaks louder than words
It's that simple!
Thanks for standing strong. You will win just like with Kavanaugh if you  just keep holding the line!  #TRUMP2020
Nana Adwoa Christabel Piesie They have try everything else it’s HAS NOT WORKED it’s TIME ❗️❗️TO CHANGE THE demographics🤷🏻‍♂️🔥🙏🏼🗝⚖️✅,,,,,,,,,🇺🇸💥
Thanks for standing strong. You will win just like with Kavanaugh if you  just keep holding the line!  #TRUMP2020
Nana Adwoa Christabel Piesie They have try everything else it’s HAS NOT WORKED it’s TIME ❗️❗️TO CHANGE THE demographics🤷🏻‍♂️🔥🙏🏼🗝⚖️✅,,,,,,,,,🇺🇸💥
ThanQ ~ STAY TRUMP STRONG <3 <3 <3
ThanQ ~ STAY TRUMP STRONG <3 <3 <3
Says the turncoat! What a joke he turned out to be!
https://amp.businessinsider.com/immigration-myths-open-us-borders-debunked-2018-8 7 myths about immigration and open US borders, debunked
Build a wall.. Build a giant gate in Texas.. Shaped in the shape of the Alamo.. Put a sign on both sides.. Remember the Alamo....lol....no joke
Waiting for your call
Build a wall.. Build a giant gate in Texas.. Shaped in the shape of the Alamo.. Put a sign on both sides.. Remember the Alamo....lol....no joke
Arshad Hamed your not even from or live in OUR country!! FO!!
We want a WALL.
Quit trying to scare the people. We are not a frightened populace!!!
Very hard to come back in the next term please stop your failing The US management, ruling and directing More umbigity with you   You are not honesty for the world
I think it's good for the wall because I can see that the people who do not have a respect because they say that it goes to the good and the bad, and I think that when a person wants help, please ask, not so rebellious, and I think that the democrat only wants to see the people who are below.
Arshad Hamed your not even from or live in OUR country!! FO!!
The job of the federal government is to protect the people. That was to be their only job.
all you got to do mr president is give the patroits the word and they will fix the damn democrats for you period
I think it's good for the wall because I can see that the people who do not have a respect because they say that it goes to the good and the bad, and I think that when a person wants help, please ask, not so rebellious, and I think that the democrat only wants to see the people who are below.
God bless you Mr President Trump
Mr. PRESIDENT,  You are not alone, You do what GOD sent you to do, and "WE THE PEOPLE" are 100% with you since day 1,   we will obey what God sent us to do in his word ( 1 Timothy 2:1-2) to pray at all the time for those in power , you, and your administration, and all those in authority, pray   for wisdom, protection and strength. You will overcome in the name of Jesus, if we understand what 2 Chronicles 7:14 says " if my people, who are called by my name, will humble themselves and pray and seek my face and turn from their wicked ways, then I will hear from heaven, and I will forgive their sin and will heal their land."  WE THE PEOPLE WILL SEE THE HAND OF GOD, how will destroy all this barriers ( " enemies") that are in the way in the name of Jesus . Amen 🙏 God bless you  and God bless🇺🇸 America 🇺🇸❤🇺🇸
Mary Dios T Ama   Our government is SECULAR nor a theocracy.  This, deciding policy in the name of God is not allowed.  These are the same rules that ensure you will always be able to  worship as you please.  God did not elect Trump...unless you feel he also elected Obama.
Timothy Norton, You are so right, ANY GOVERNMENT IS SECULAR, but let's don't forget THE SOVEREIGNTY OF GOD;  I love how king David says in Psalms 103:19 "The Lord has established his throne in heaven, and his kingdom rules over all."  Also the word says in Daniel 2:21 "He changes times and seasons; he deposes kings and raises up others. He gives wisdom to the wise and knowledge to the discerning."  Have a blessed day ❤
God bless you Mr President Trump
Imagine that, a US president taking his oath of office seriously. It's about time. So glad we don't have the apologizer-in-chief any longer. More US politicians need to do the same.
Okay so lets be totally honest to ourselfs the wall will not solve all the human trafficing issues or prevent anybody from coming when clearly there are plenty tunnels that have been found is it really necessary to have ppl working without pay the same ppl that probably voted for you just so you can feel better about yourself get over it... I know at the age you are in its hard because your once again in your toddler stage your throwing a tantrum, Im a caregiver so I deal with ppl like you everyday sadly its a part of growing old
In September 2018 trump submitted his budget requests to Congress for the year 2019...in it he asked for $1.6 billion dollars for 'border security", which Congress approved.   Not my opinion, the congressional records tell the tale for all who want to know that truth of what really happened.  Trump came back 4 months later with new demands, was told NO, and is temper tantruming because that childish strategy has always worked for him before.  Mean old Nancy Pelosi however, has decades of experience dealing with old white entitled rightwing males and young children.
With you President Trump.
Your most important duty is to Putin and associates : https://www.google.com/amp/s/mobile.reuters.com/article/amp/idUSKCN1GE1C0
Timothy Norton, You are so right, ANY GOVERNMENT IS SECULAR, but let's don't forget THE SOVEREIGNTY OF GOD;  I love how king David says in Psalms 103:19 "The Lord has established his throne in heaven, and his kingdom rules over all."  Also the word says in Daniel 2:21 "He changes times and seasons; he deposes kings and raises up others. He gives wisdom to the wise and knowledge to the discerning."  Have a blessed day ❤
Your most important duty is to Putin and associates : https://www.google.com/amp/s/mobile.reuters.com/article/amp/idUSKCN1GE1C0
Ash Hamdane how about invaders from Honduras, Islam or any other country that would like to kill us or take over?
With you President Trump.
$10 billion bucks and you can't get a suit that looks good on you. Sad. 😂
Why don't you pay attention to things that actually matter?
President Trump I did not vote for you but in my opinion you are doing an outstanding job....let this man have his wall....if you want my vote in 2020 you should end The Federal Reserve.....keep up the good work
Ash Hamdane how about invaders from Honduras, Islam or any other country that would like to kill us or take over?
Amen build the wall
Kelly Belden While I find your inability to provide any defense of Dumb Donald at all hilarious, your inability to do it without bringing up a party I didn’t vote for either makes laughing at you even more fun! Sad!
Presley Mark That’s because the average person who comes over the wall using a ladder has more to offer America than you, the supporter of a democrat who wants to build a socialized wall using eminent domain, stealing property from Americans to build a wall that will stop virtually zero illegal immigrants or drugs. Have fun with that, ya lib!
Presley Mark I think you're so stupid that you don't know what your own position is. Have fun with your liberal, socialized, anti-private property wall.
Kelly Belden I always enjoy when a snowflake who is unable to defend Dumb Donald on his own merits (as he has none) makes something up about the person they talk to and thinks they've done anything but make themselves and their candidate look like trash. Enjoy!
Amen build the wall
Kelly Belden I always enjoy when a snowflake who is unable to defend Dumb Donald on his own merits (as he has none) makes something up about the person they talk to and thinks they've done anything but make themselves and their candidate look like trash. Enjoy!
Chris Jackson Wait to see what freedoms you have after these idiotic new Democrats tweak things.
Bill Klein, you must really hate America if you think any of what you just spouted off was a bad thing.and btw Russia wouldn't have wanted him to do any of that. What he has done is the best thing for America. TRUMP 2020 MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGAIN.
Timothy Betts Thanks for your comment. You must hate humanity if you think what I spouted off is a good thing, or best for America. Trumps shut down of the government is something we are ALL going to pay for. I agree to disagree with your comments.
Chris Jackson Wait to see what freedoms you have after these idiotic new Democrats tweak things.
Let's defend our borders  Trump all the way I stand with Trump🤩🤩🤩🤩🤩
Kinda seems like the defense of your ego is your priority but okay.
TRUMP 2020!!! MAGA AMEN! !!!! GOD BLESS AMERICA!!!!
Keep on Trumpin!  Mr. President
Timothy Betts Thanks for your comment. You must hate humanity if you think what I spouted off is a good thing, or best for America. Trumps shut down of the government is something we are ALL going to pay for. I agree to disagree with your comments.
Don't back down Mr. President!  The majority of this country wants the wall!
If our president is a russian asset then we cease to be a country
Agreed Mr President.
What is a waste of money is to leave the border open but add more border agents and technology.Democrats want to make this a high tech game of the road runner vs Coyote.
Trump can’t badmouth the RINOs but I will do it right here for him.  OUR REPRESENTATIVES, R AND D, ARE BOUGHT, PAID FOR, AND ARE JUST FINE WITH NOT SUPPORTING OUR LAW ENFORCEMENT AND ALLOWING HEROIN TO COME OVER THE BORDER  “sanctuary” was a step too far
Keep on Trumpin!  Mr. President
Trump can’t badmouth the RINOs but I will do it right here for him.  OUR REPRESENTATIVES, R AND D, ARE BOUGHT, PAID FOR, AND ARE JUST FINE WITH NOT SUPPORTING OUR LAW ENFORCEMENT AND ALLOWING HEROIN TO COME OVER THE BORDER  “sanctuary” was a step too far
Yes I do.  I'm not a traitor.  Bet you can't say the same.   Ypour boy stinks of treason.  And now you do too.
ABSOLUTELY CORRECT SIR
We ceased to be a Nation when you Shut Down our Government! FOOL
Dr. T.D Tommy,"In Nessland on a Mull for you are in John O'Groats above Shetlands Islands never; kuna Central Princes Shetlands Primitive Princes wakiwa Aberdonian." transformers.hasbro.com
Yes I do.  I'm not a traitor.  Bet you can't say the same.   Ypour boy stinks of treason.  And now you do too.
Dr. T.D Tommy,"In Nessland on a Mull for you are in John O'Groats above Shetlands Islands never; kuna Central Princes Shetlands Primitive Princes wakiwa Aberdonian." transformers.hasbro.com
DRUNK AGAIN?
Thank you Mr. President.  Stand firm.
Truer words have never been spoken!  America's sovereignty hangs in the balance. The choice is to secure our border now, or allow the U.S.A. and everything that millions fought and died for to perish from the face of the earth. There is no higher priority at this point in time. I choose to stand with President Trump. 🇺🇲️
Don’t back down. The patriots of this country stand behind you and are cheering you on
DRUNK AGAIN?
BEST President ever MAGA
You make me cry!
Jenny Reisner it is so pathetic!
BEST President ever MAGA
Let the traitorous opposition further sink.  Speak to us citizens, that know that to stand is the only way forward, if our nation is to be saved.  God bless and guide our President, and America!
Jenny Reisner it is so pathetic!
As your statement says, defending this nation against foreign nationals is your highest priority so then, declare this situation a high security risk. Leave those Dems in your dust.
Maybe you could end this childish shutdown so the people who defend us can get paid?
donate 5 $ for a head count after reading the page...Check donations..send to We Fund the Wall, Inc. PO Box 131567 Houston, Texas 77219-1567  credit card donation.. GoFundMe page by Brian Kolfage..and if you have donated, you can opt to move to the main fund or have a refund..https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Truth maga
Tricia Ann Bakley-Kralik  if they could just photoshop his spelling...
Truth maga
Post pone the Union Address  because of Goverment Shutdown  Says the LADY Who Didnt PostPone Her Chistmas Beach Vacation in Hawaii  Because of the Government Shutdown
Handsome 💜 💛💛 💛💜 💜
Tricia Ann Bakley-Kralik  if they could just photoshop his spelling...
#BuildTheWall #SecureTheBorder... We The People have your back President Donald J. Trump - get'er done!
LOVE MY POTUS !!!!   TRUMP 2020
#BuildTheWall #SecureTheBorder... We The People have your back President Donald J. Trump - get'er done!
LOVE MY POTUS !!!!   TRUMP 2020
"A person without self control is like a city broken into, left without walls." -Proverbs 25:28  "He who is of a proud heart stirs up strife, But he who trusts in the Lord will be prosperous." -Proverbs 28:25
Go Trump! Keep fighting.
"A person without self control is like a city broken into, left without walls." -Proverbs 25:28  "He who is of a proud heart stirs up strife, But he who trusts in the Lord will be prosperous." -Proverbs 28:25
Trump you are awesome!  MAGA
Trump you are awesome!  MAGA
No it isn't.  Getting your way is the most important thing for you so you can put Putin first
Why spend hundreds of billions abroad to "protect" the USA if an invasion can easily occur from the south?
So shut down the people that protect our borders?
John Mudri what lies?!
You mean distracting while you crimes and treasonous acts are becoming clearer.
Thank you Mr. President!
dont  worry  Mr.  President  we  are  behind  you  100%,  keep  it  up,  the  only  thing  we  would  like  to  see  is  them  evil  ppl,  the  weeds,  go  to  jail  for  a  change,  we  are  waiting.
Trump I'm glad ur shutdown everything  at least people will open there eyes see that ur not playing  good Joe keep the good work up
Keep it up!  Build the wall!
Lookin pretty sharp DJT
God bless our President
As they vote to take away sanctions of a Russian oligarch while our government is shut down
Never Give In !!
Love my President Trump
Start the IMPEACHMENT ,,,TRUMP IS UNFIT FOR OFFICE
Who's attacking you?
This is so very true.
Who's attacking you?
You are doing a horrible job for Americans. End the shutdown, let people go back to work!
Andre Rebel Chiaradia hows does it feel to have a fifth grade education?
Nicholas, don’t hold back, tell us.
BBB! Bravo, brave "bonespurs"!
Everybody on the face of the earth wants  safety, so Trump must be presenting himself wrong to make democrats rebel against him.
yes that is really your work mr president
Nicholas, don’t hold back, tell us.
If we don’t defend our borders, then we cease to be a nation.  If we don’t defend our Republic from those who do not enforce and uphold their Oath of office. They should resign as per the House committee on Ethics.
Nice one Mr president do not back out...
Ask an Indian.
He's actually right about this, so it's unfortunate that he is too incompetent and corrupt to carry out that duty.
It looks like Sphincter Pelosi takes the Birdbox Challenge every time she puts on her face in the morning.
hello sir am asking for your help am martha taulo lungu am form zambia plz help my childere they need to go back to school they we don't have money to pay for there school fees there is a balance for last year my husband his not work me am not working
Then open.the government so the coast guard can get paid
Build the south wall than build the north wall!! Thank you sir!!!
With you 100% President Trump time to settle all loop holes & build the wall/ barrier 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
or if we allow Putin's puppet to keep calling the shots, we will cease to be a nation
Somebody get him a chill pill.
No building an idol for the deplorable.  Impeach the russian backed traitor.
BUILD THE WALL. Call today BUILD THE WALL Pelosi's # 202-225-4965 Schumer # 202-224-6542 US Capitol Switchboard 202- 224- 3121 - request Senate. COPY and PASTE!
Dr. T.D. Tommy,"Much of the aerial perspective is a system that it is a place." go.nasa.gov
TRUMP  2020!!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Awesome PRESIDENT
I agree it should be
We need Trump action figures!
Someone needs to tell trudeau
That's Why You're There.. GREAT LEADER.. Don't Trust Any of them Lying DEMO'S. BUILD THAT WALL > MAKE IT HAPPEN.
President Trump’s Attorney General nominee William Barr made his way through Senate confirmation hearings this week.   I knew Barr had previously endorsed gun control policies when he served as Attorney General under President George H.W. Bush in the early ‘90s.   But when Senator Dianne Feinstein (D-CA) asked about his views on gun control today, I never imagined I’d hear a response like this.   Barr began by discretely referencing “ERPOs,” which stands for “Extreme Risk Protection Orders” before wholeheartedly offering his endorsement for a nationwide gun confiscation and registration scheme.
hahahahahaha.  What a joke.  IMPEACH!
Mr.Trump❤❤❤ go on.....
Pelosi and Schumer’s plan
Nice photoshop.
Oh no, owe know, current see currency flow, nay shun. Death algorithms, owl go rhythms, ssS5ss5Ssscream it all. President "ray gun", & oblivion claimed him, hem, hymn, in front of the herd, heard. mmm mm m
Nice photoshop. XD
Amen.  Stand Steadfast
President Trump’s Attorney General nominee William Barr made his way through Senate confirmation hearings this week.   I knew Barr had previously endorsed gun control policies when he served as Attorney General under President George H.W. Bush in the early ‘90s.   But when Senator Dianne Feinstein (D-CA) asked about his views on gun control today, I never imagined I’d hear a response like this.   Barr began by discretely referencing “ERPOs,” which stands for “Extreme Risk Protection Orders” before wholeheartedly offering his endorsement for a nationwide gun confiscation and registration scheme.
Thank You, Sir.
Thank You!!
Proud of my President.
So what’s your point thick orange skull?  Borders are drawn on maps and you don’t need a wall to defend them.
Thank God, Amen....
You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress.
Stand firm 45
President Trump, I think you will find super interesting things in our Alibaba Shop: www.yftsextoy.en.alibaba.com
Keep em scared Donnie. Can you defend us against your EPA? Rolling back Mercury requirements really? Sad
President Trump, I think you will find super interesting things in our Alibaba Shop: www.yftsextoy.en.alibaba.com
POLL: Marist Poll Finds Donald Trump’s Approval Rating at 39%, Losing Support Among Republicans, Evangelicals, Suburban Men & Voters Without a College Degree
BS and you are going to believe a poll.
Martha Pickens I am. It's 100% more believable than a verified pathological liar.
Stand firm 45
Thank you Mr. President.🇺🇸
I'm with him 2020 baby
good for you.
100% Agree build Americas Wall.
Polls dropping. You need to end this shutdown
Ya one pager lmfao
He said "duty" lol
Your time is up pal
Martha Pickens I am. It's 100% more believable than a verified pathological liar.
Border security is a must
Love the numbers
I don't mind adding the DREAMERS to the WALL NEGOTIATION but I want the PRESIDENT to up the WALL price to $50 billion so it can be DONE RIGHT the first time, so we DON'T KEEP GIVING AMENISTY every FEW YEARS for ILLEGAL ACTS with the SAME ISSUES and maybe he should be ADING IMMAGRATION REFORM with the DEAL also to further stop the LOOPHOLES.
Thank You Mr. President!
Please CLOWN
absolutely right
Amen God Bless you President
LOVE THIS PRESIDENT!!! 😊
The whole country should go on strike
Artificial crisis
Your time is up pal
correct what are you waiting for?
This is why the people elected you! Don't back down, you have the support of the people behind you!
Keep pushing Donald..
Closed your Eyes M.r Trump 🌸
As it should be.
That’s right
He'll get her done!
Thank you Mr.President !
Artificial crisis
Thank you Mr.President !
Why didn't you have the Republicans fund your wall when you had the chance to? It's too late for a wall now you piece of waste.
Joshua Yang Thanks To President Trump, the Asian workers have the highest job rating EVER!
Sophie Tkacz Wildrick no. Thanks to Obama for turning things around a few years ago. Trump hasn't done anything and shutting the government down for almost 30 days ain't no better.
He'll get her done!
Thank you Mr.President
Amen.  Keep up the good work
Shut up, Donnie
Not one penny.
Your a 5 deferment draft dodger
Absolutely! Stand strong!
Get over yourself Trump!
Trump 2020!!!!
Oval Office SOTU. Problem solved.
Sophie Tkacz Wildrick no. Thanks to Obama for turning things around a few years ago. Trump hasn't done anything and shutting the government down for almost 30 days ain't no better.
Oval Office SOTU. Problem solved.
Trump 2020!!!!
Great leader and commander.   USA USA😇🇺🇸
#BuildTheWall Nazi Pelosi, now!!
Spaseeba, comrade!
Nixon2 is coming..........
President Pence?
Photo shopped.  Then man's obese.
thank you.
Build my wall
Yes very true flush all Dems
SO TRUE !
very very true
What a joke....
common con artist
A chump President for a chump type of America
Exactly, look at europe...
We are with you.
GREAT JOB, MR. PRESIDENT! BUILD OUR WALL!!!
ONWARD! CRUSH THE COMMIES!
No one disagrees
Yes very true flush all Dems
Don the Con
Build the Wall Sir
Fake President and Liar in Chief
He's doing that Jotaro pose
True!    Trump 2020!!!!!!!!!
Ever hear obama say this??
Promote constitutional carry.
Resign, comrade...
Trump's administration has more criminal indictments and convictions, after only two years in office, than any of the past ten presidents accumulated in their entire terms of office.  Explained in simple English for the benefit of Trump supporters:  THIS IS THE MOST CORRUPT ADMINISTRATION OF YOUR LIFETIME.
Thank you, Mr. President!
No one disagrees
Agreed! Don’t back down!!!
thank you mr president
Go President Trump 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Put  pelosi  on  no  fly  list
THANK U SIR!!!!
Amen!! Wake up, people!
Defend our nation from Putin's Russia
Nancy pelosi wants president Trump to postpone the state of the union because she wants security for herselfwell what about America security Nancy call her out on this president Trump we need more people to go to the capital or to real news and tell their stories
What about the Chinese moon landing!
Thank you, Mr. President!
Thank You Mr President 🙏
This is very true
OUR OWN BACKYARD 1ST   .☆´¯`•.¸¸. ི♥ྀ.
Yes, it is!
25th Amendment
Oh wow is somebody threatening a war at the border
Thebgreat faker.
What is going on????
Photoshopped longer fingers 😂😂😂
Thank you Mr. President.
What about the Chinese moon landing!
Thank you.
Build the wall!!!! 👍👍💪💪🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸❤️
Absolutely!!!
Love my President!!!
EXECUTIVE ORDER THE WALL POTUS.
America will not be America anymore...after 2024...
Is that photoshop? Lmao
And this guy probably votes...
Thank you Mr. President.
And this guy probably votes...
We ceased to be a nation when YOU took office.
all he cares is himself he does not care about the American People..ROT
Is that photoshop? Lmao
Think, then type.
Thanks President Trump
Go Trump Go
Absolutely true.
The illusion of hope
Thank you!
Great American
Including the influence of Russia. Stop posting pictures of yourself!!!
Quit screwing around Mr. Pres. go ahead & exercise those emergency powers & get cracking on that wall. Waiting for the dems to play ball is like waiting for hell to freeze over. You DID hear about the new “caravan” on its way right? WHAT ARE YOU WAITING FOR?! (I’m Marshall Pope & I approved this message.) & while you’re at it, can you PLEASE put Gillette in their place in your next  State of the Union? PLEASE?!
all he cares is himself he does not care about the American People..ROT
As it should be .
Please keep trying
Right on!!!!
Voting for Trump 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸
He is the enemy!!! Get him out!!!
Defend or destruct
Thank you President Trump.
God bless you presdent trump voto 2020
Thank you Mr President
Quit screwing around Mr. Pres. go ahead & exercise those emergency powers & get cracking on that wall. Waiting for the dems to play ball is like waiting for hell to freeze over. You DID hear about the new “caravan” on its way right? WHAT ARE YOU WAITING FOR?! (I’m Marshall Pope & I approved this message.) & while you’re at it, can you PLEASE put Gillette in their place in your next  State of the Union? PLEASE?!
Thank you Mr President
Keep on fighting, Mr. President!!
Heather Hegge
God bless you presdent trump voto 2020
Get it done then Mr. President.
He the best
Not a very smart statement!
And so it should be.  Thank u Mr President!
Standing with President Trump, very proud of him.
READ ABOUT THE WALL IN REVELATIONS
Thank you Mr. President!!!
Thank you 🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸
Heather Hegge
Thank you 🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸
Build that WALL!
Thank you Mr. President!!!
Trump #2020 🇺🇸
I agree!  MAGA 2020!
Why don’t you have lips ?
Fbuild that wall
I say the same thing! BUILD IT!!!
Open the governement
Vote of NO CONFIDENCE
Build that WALL!
Did you... photoshop yourself?
My president
THANK YOU PRESIDENT
GO MR TRUMP!
God bless Robert Mueller
STAY ON 'EM BULLDOG
Doesn't make sense
Great...then resign!
You’re lying stop it.
Yes Jesse Lee Billings Jr
Vote of NO CONFIDENCE
Somebody's border.....
Rod Novoa ur just jealous u can't get free money
I love You somuch Daddy Trump🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹
I agree with you, Mr. President!
We do and we are.
Nice joke for tonight 😂😂😂
Against  an  imaginary  enemy?
Thank you!
Your doing an amazing job.
Don’t give in.   We need the border wall!
Yes Jesse Lee Billings Jr
Doing it well
Even Heaven has gates!
Mexicans are digging tunnels right now.
We want the wall
Blessings  from Belgium
Impeachment is coming.
Tax returns as promised.
then fund the coast guard
T H A N K   Y O U
Anyone play roblox?
Don’t give in.   We need the border wall!
The best president,keep being determined the way you are the previous ones didn't do anything for the people of America.
Drones, RVs, and ATVs.
#MAGA - AKA a deplorable!!
overexagerrated..stfu grow up
Keep up the great work..
You do squat!!!!!!
STAND FIRM,NO WALL,NO DEAL
Rock on ! Thank you !
TY President.
Roll call who is actually stupid enough to believe that?
Anyone play roblox?
No it doesn't.
TICK TOCK Donnie
*Bone-spurs permitting.
Absolute Genius move today, Sir! that’s why REAL AMERICANS LOVE YOU! BEST PRESIDENT EVER! ❤️🇺🇸 KEEP UP THE GREAT WORK! AND THANK YOU FOR FIGHTING THE GOOD FIGHT FOR US! #MAGA2020 #TRUMP2020 #DemocratShutdown
Trump knows that :"The winter is coming" so for that he needs the Wall and it will be built. Until now why The America didn't need any walls? Why only after 54 years the UK leaved the EU. They know what is coming. Less vital resources means fight for survival.Have a nice day and don't forget to smile.😁
That's Right!!!  #maga!!!
Pay our Coast Guard
It's to late
Ur my budd boomer
Protection thank president Trump . We need the wall.
Roll call who is actually stupid enough to believe that?
The Liar in Chief!!
Absolutely true!!!
What doing that fur
Where dem yankees at
Thank you Mr. President
Amen to that
Taking a quick break from the lies and exaggerations about the border situ, let’s take a Check In on the other lie about Coal Country.  These facts are startling: https://youtu.be/KRKIqTmmhcA
Wish others felt that way
What is a nation?
Protection thank president Trump . We need the wall.
Amen amen amen Halleluia
NOW -----NO OPEN WITHOUT.......
Love My POTUS!!
Keep on winning.
That's actually true
i have to go pee
30 ft razor wall
Demos dont want to be a nation,how sad is that?
So true and we are behind you 100%.
#MAGA🔴🔴🔴USA🇺🇸2020👏🏻
What is a nation?
TRUMP 2020!! 👍🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Then start paying TSA
Stay the course Mr. President !
Thank you President Trump
Great PRESIDENT!!! ✌🍷🤗
Together we stand. 🎯
Thank you Mr. President! 💯❤️
Watching rep Hoyer from Maryland speak......sir, it's you holding back the gov opening up.   We need to stop the dangerous flow from other countries over our border.
Thank you President Trump
#MAGA🔴🔴🔴USA🇺🇸2020👏🏻
STAY TOUGH BOSS
Trump is the best
Love u President Trump
Just cave in. We won’t hold it against you.
TRUMP TRAIN ALL ABOARD!CHOO!CHOO!2020AMEN!
I salute you sir
Thanks President Trump
God bless our President!
Rule with fear
Amen to that !
Thank you President Trump
Amen to that !
Rule with fear
God bless always 💐💐
The Senate Judiciary Committee hearings for Attorney General nominee William Barr have focused heavily on Barr’s views on Special Counsel Robert Mueller. But nobody is asking about Barr’s legal crusade for blanket immunity for federal agents who killed American citizens.   DO NOT CONFIRM WILLIAM BARR. NOT ONLY DOES HE SUPPORT MUELLER, HE WAS INVOLVED IN THESE CRIMES.  https://ussanews.com/News1/2019/01/16/william-barrs-connection-to-ruby-ridge-defending-fbi-snipers/
Thank you my President!!
Thank you Mr. President
Build the wall.  Trump 2020
I love my President!!
USA under president Trump is Saying to China..'WE WERE FOOLED..BUT WE WILL OUTSMART YOU IN EVERY REGARD FROM NOWONWARDS'
God bless my nigga President Trump
God bless you Sir. MAGA 🇺🇸👍
All empires fall
We love our president
#GREAT PRESIDENT45.
.  .  .  or at least, cease being a SAFE  NATION.
I love my President.
Want to move to Canada
thats a fuckin jojo pose
We love our POTUS
Trump!Trump!!Trump!!!
God bless you Sir. MAGA 🇺🇸👍
build bridges rather than walls 🤕
I with you, Honey.
Thank you Mr President
YES WE NEED THE WALL
God Bless you Mr. President
Absolutely TRUE
Yes sir. Thank you
Thank you Mr President !
TRUMP IS THE BEST !!
Trump!Trump!!Trump!!!
we are behind you all the make america grt again
Sunday February 3rd... State Of The Union @ the SUPERBOWL!
Standing with you Mr. President!!  ❤️❤️❤️👏👏👏👏👏👏🙏🙏🙏🙏
Good job. Trump 2020.
Build the wall. Build it tall
Thank you Mr. President
Love you Prez!!! YOUR SIMPLY THE BEST!!! Salute!!
WE CAN HELP MR. PRESIDENT !!
Love the pose on this pic!! 🤴🏼
Quite fucking around.
TRUMP IS THE BEST !!
Great Leader!
Build the wall higher deeper stronger today
POTUS is absolutely right
Representing all nations
Reagan said almost the same thing
Thank you!!
what ever dotard
WTG PRESIDENT TRUMP.
God bless President Trump
Quite fucking around.
Stay strong!
Thank you, Mr. President!
Where can I get poster
Stand Strong Mr. President!
Thank you Sir.Trump
Action now mr president.
Your right on
Congratulations God trump card
Trump 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Yes, true speech.
God bless President Trump
Yes, true speech.
Trump 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Make America Great Again
Iies and propaganda.
Go Trump!!!
boarders*   right?
Hold the line Sir
Keep on Keeping on !!!
Amen Mister President
The same holda true with the SECOND AMENDMENT
We ceased being a nation when you sold us out to Putin
Pay the coast guard!!
Eat a dick Donnie.
NO WALL EVER!!!!!!!
Thank you Mr. President
Democrats are aiming for that
God bless Mr Trump
Stay strong!
And that's the truth
Listen to him. Please
GOD bless the president.
As it should be! Thank you!
Fucking joke.
choose one....defense or attack
PLEASE RELEASE GERMANY
Nice photoshopping.
Don't give in!  Build that wall!
I am so proud of you!
He will be impeached.
Truly said!!!
Happy birthday
Listen to him. Please
God bless you Mr President
Yet you are failing to pay members of the coast guard, TSA, and border patrol agents. You’re a #Failure #UnfitForOffice
Hey Trump, how about protecting our own country from these lone gun massacres people. There are more in our own country than come in from MEXICO
MAGA TRUMP 2020!
TRUMP  TRUMP  TRUMP.     2020 ❤️🙏🏻🇺🇸
Open the govt
Mr.Trump are u an ex-army veteran..?
I agree l be praying
Right Mr  Trump is...
he is going down in 2020.
Happy birthday
he is going down in 2020.
Small hands. Small brain.
actually I think there is only one brain cell left.
Right Mr  Trump is...
I am a TRILLION PERCENT BEHIND YOU!  That is Your primary duty, and You do it Excellent!  Don’t budge even a little; or they will know You can be intimidated, just like all the Presidents before You!  Tell Linsey, “THANKS, BUT NO THANKS”!
LUV THE TRUMPS.
Is this a Jojo reference
Fight the good fight Mr. President
Stay strong!
Very beautiful wonderful man
Apparently, both sides pan Nazi Stephen Miller’s border script, read by Emperor Fullofshiticus:  News Analysis In Trump’s Immigration Announcement, a Compromise Snubbed All Around WASHINGTON — Immigrant advocates denounced it as cruel. The conservative right howled that it was amnesty. What President Trump billed on Saturday as a compromise to end the country’s longest government shutdown pleased neither the Democratic congressional leaders whose buy-in he needs to strike a deal nor the core supporters whose backing has always been at the heart of his insistence on a border wall. Instead, in offering temporary protections for about one million immigrants at risk of deportation in exchange for funding for a wall, Mr. Trump did something rarely seen during his presidency. He tried to reach beyond his base of supporters — which polls have begun to show is losing patience with him as the partial shutdown drags into its fifth week — and speak to a broader swath of Americans. The Saturday afternoon speech from the West Wing was an attempt by Mr. Trump to, at the very least, shift the narrative of the past several weeks and show that rather than spoiling for a longer shutdown fight or making unreasonable demands, he was looking for a broadly acceptable way out of a morass he once boasted he was proud to wade into. “I think you could tell by the president’s remarks today,” Vice President Mike Pence said, “that we’re reaching out.” Yet in seeking to inch toward the center, Mr. Trump alienated portions of his hard-right base, the core supporters he most depends on and the group he and his closest aides have most feared losing. That raised the possibility that, in his zeal to get out of an intractable situation, he may have landed himself in the worst of all worlds, without a clear solution or the support of his most ardent followers. The tensions and anger over the policy have been quietly playing out in the West Wing as well, as Jared Kushner, the president’s son-in-law and senior adviser, fended off Stephen Miller, the architect of much of Mr. Trump’s immigration agenda. Mr. Kushner has long been a proponent of protections for undocumented immigrants brought to the United States as children, while Mr. Miller has pressed for aggressive measures to crack down on both legal and illegal immigration. In recent days, as White House officials had been working out the details of the compromise, Mr. Miller intervened to narrow the universe of immigrants who would receive protection, according to people familiar with the internal discussions who described them on the condition of anonymity. While the original idea had been to include protections for as many as 1.8 million undocumented immigrants eligible for Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals, the Obama-era program known as DACA that protected those illegally brought to the United States as children, Mr. Trump ultimately proposed shielding only the 700,000 who are enrolled. Mr. Kushner conceded in a briefing after the president’s speech that he did not see the proposal as a solution for the DACA program, which Mr. Trump moved to rescind in 2017. “At this moment in time,” Mr. Kushner said, “this is a good path forward.” Many conservatives did not share that view. “Trump proposes amnesty,” the conservative commentator Ann Coulter said on Twitter. “We voted for Trump and got Jeb!” she added, referring to Jeb Bush, who challenged Mr. Trump for the Republican nomination in 2016 and supported a broad immigration overhaul that would have given undocumented immigrants a path to legal status. Still, in the eyes of many White House officials, the prospect that Mr. Trump could use the proposal to shift blame for the shutdown and pressure Democrats to end the impasse was worth trying. Mr. Pence argued on Saturday that the speech was a “sincere effort” by Mr. Trump to break the logjam, and he and other White House officials suggested that the measure could attract enough support to succeed from centrist Democrats fed up with the shutdown and willing to side with Republicans. But such a coalition did not appear to be forming, and courting one bears considerable risk for a president who is most comfortable when he is defying convention, eschewing compromise and being hailed as a hero by supporters who often equate bipartisan deal making with weak-kneed capitulation. The vast majority of Democrats knocked the approach. While many of them have pressed for measures to protect DACA recipients and immigrants living in the United States under Temporary Protected Status enacted when their countries were destabilized by war or catastrophe, most regard the proposal he put forth on Saturday as woefully inadequate. It offers only three years of protections for the DACA recipients and those who hold T.P.S., which the Trump administration has also moved to end for several countries. “This is not an amnesty bill,” Mr. Pence said. “There is no pathway to citizenship in this proposal.” That was high on Speaker Nancy Pelosi’s list of reasons to call the plan “unacceptable.” That is unlikely to matter to the president. Despite saying publicly last month that he would be proud to own a shutdown over the wall, and privately displaying confidence that his base would stick with him through the fight, Mr. Trump has been dismayed to find otherwise in recent days. An NPR poll released last week showed Mr. Trump’s approval ratings down and the first cracks in backing among critical supporters, including whites without a college education and white evangelicals. Such pressure from what he has called the forgotten men and women who elected him and chant “Build! The! Wall!” at his arena rallies has swayed Mr. Trump before, including last year, when the conservative news site Breitbart branded him “Amnesty Don” for considering a similar deal that would have provided $25 billion in wall funding for a path to legal status for those the DACA program was created to help. The president ultimately abandoned that agreement, concerned about angering his base and after Mr. Miller and others advised him he should insist on additional immigration restrictions. On Saturday night, Breitbart panned Mr. Trump’s latest idea with the headline “Three-Year Amnesty, Most of Border Remains Open.”  Reported by The (We Are Doing Very Well, Thank You Very Much) NY Times
He is doing Great!
actually I think there is only one brain cell left.
Don't give in President TRUMP
Movie/TV stars sooo mad!!!
We appreciate you!
Thank you Mr President!
WAR or WALL! come on....
WAR or WALL! come on....
We are behind you.  🇺🇸
Smoke and mirrors.
I agree Sherri
As it should be!
He is doing Great!
BBB!!! (Bravo, brave "bonespurs")
yes sir! thank you!
TRUMP = WHITE SUPREMACIST
The wall is coming !! MAGA
142 people have 0 common sense
'This is witness intimidation': Internet gasps after Trump threatens Michael Cohen's father-in-law in angry tweet https://www.rawstory.com/2019/01/witness-intimidation-internet-gasps-trump-threatens-michael-cohens-father-law-
Crazy fear mongering dotard.
Very good, one and all
Ok ok, it is a good idea President, holy duty
Totally agree.
As it should be!
Totally agree.
What a joke. Thank god he will soon be gone.
Roger Anderson - https://trumpatwar.com/
Ok ok, it is a good idea President, holy duty
You are so right! 👍
As it should be!
Snowflakes are flying
Opinion only folks....
In Syria? Run away.
We are behind you 100 %.
There he is!
I’m with Trump
Roger Anderson - https://trumpatwar.com/
Still making America great,2020
Absolutely!
Never truer words.
Change your suit
your creating chaos
AMEN TO THAT!!
Build our wall!!
What about the People
soooooooooo your nuts too?
Quit golfing then
I’m with Trump
And you are AMAZING at it!!!
Thank you Mr.President.
Thank You Mr.President!
We do not. What rubbish
That’s right
Damn straight
That's my President
2020  all the way
Your tie is too long.
Quit golfing then
STAND TALL!!
Donald J. Trump, persevere! We're praying for you!
We love you Mr. President
Thank you Mr Président 👮
President Trump, you are the best! ! !
You pay my part jerk
Give em hell boss!
Your tie is too long.
I wish we had a president like that
You are our HERO 🍀💚
I believed The President Trump.
Ur the best mr. president ❤️🙏🇺🇸
7880910964-9532443357-India
you very good person
All hail the king
Damn that's all it takes
Build  the  wall  Sir.
Give em hell boss!
Not the people?
Putin says what?
Hamberder Helper
God bless United States of Kenya
BUILD THE WALL! GO TRUMP! 2020 🇺🇸
Good work I lol vote for hen again go Trump
Yeah, Russia world
Why only you who come with such idea
Damn trump! Lookin’ good!
Livechannel8.com for #DonaldTrump
Build  the  wall  Sir.
Livechannel8.com for #DonaldTrump
You’re well done.
Stick a fork in him?
Damn trump! Lookin’ good!
Stick a fork in him?
Build that wall!!
You’re well done.
We have 2 borders dum ass
Send to the request of his friendship I need your arrow
https://giphy.com/gifs/snl-trump-bannongreat-GX4DUEze7yVnG.   berserker.  Hahahahahahaha
(y) YES (y) YES (y)  YES (y) YES (y) YES (y)
Hang tight, we love you!
Trump2020❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️
Love you Mr President
Kenny Kats u and I will build it with cardboard paper 😂😂😂
Heaven has a wall with a Golden Gate how will you enter ?
Stay strong!
Spreading fear again?
Wtf over a fukin wall nigga u pay for it
Absolutely  right "
FUND the WALL!
Amen to that!!
MAGA President Donald J. Trump. Why is no one talking about impeaching Pelosi and Shoe-mer?
If the "defense of our nation is my highest and most important duty" said a pathological hypocrite and there is no waring body threatening the US on our Southern border but one entire arm of our defense system, the United States Coast Guard, for the first time in history is not being paid, and screeners protecting our airports are being forced to look for paying jobs and calling in sick leaving the most vulnerable point of entry open for penetration what kind of DEFENSE is he providing!  A diversion from his real crimes is the only answer for subjecting the US to real danger.
Love you Mr President
If the "defense of our nation is my highest and most important duty" said a pathological hypocrite and there is no waring body threatening the US on our Southern border but one entire arm of our defense system, the United States Coast Guard, for the first time in history is not being paid, and screeners protecting our airports are being forced to look for paying jobs and calling in sick leaving the most vulnerable point of entry open for penetration what kind of DEFENSE is he providing!  A diversion from his real crimes is the only answer for subjecting the US to real danger.
borders are defended
Mark Warren How about talking to the Border Patrol, they are saying they need the wall!!!!
Mark Warren talk to the Border Patrol, their saying they really need the wall!! Their there every day not us or politicians!!!!
You ever lived near the border. I actually know a retired Border patrolmen
Defending our borders does not only mean having a wall. It also means ensuring we are not attacked by foreign enemies that compromise our democracy. In short your collusion and hidden discussions with Putin are a far greater threat than refugees wanting to be part of our country.
Stand your ground Mr President, the country is with you!
just declare a national emergency and build the wall, the slats and get this over with. the longer this non payment of workers goes on the worse it gets and NP says no to everything so just do it. I read where Kuschner said not to do it. well who are you going to listen to.
What bullshit!!!
am a liberal who will vote for #TRUMP
And you suck at it 😂😂😂
Totally agree
We do need defenses.
You ever lived near the border. I actually know a retired Border patrolmen
We do need defenses.
Jesus Saves!
Totally agree
I love Donald Trump
Trump 2020 #MAGA #1
Thank you Mr. Trump !
Thank you my president  DONALD TRUMP
Ronaldo is better than u
The number of fake acounts claiming to support Trump is alarming! How come this is accepted by the same people that claims to protect american borders? You are fighing over a fence! Meanwhile Putin is invading from inside. Please be smarter than that!
He needs a new tailor.
ABSOLUTELY RIGHT!!
Jesus Saves!
Agree! Please secure!!! Don’t give in!
Love my president
Thank You Mr. President
""WE NEED HEALTHCARE""
Yes sir, I agree.
You are doing a great job
You got the power.
You’re doing a great job!!
Slow n make it long.
That’s the facts jak.
ABSOLUTELY RIGHT!!
We are with you.
Get er done then!
The best one ☝️
Never give up
Stop immigrants also from MUslims countries you have enough
Representing all American citizens and doing what's best for them as a whole is your civic duty. Not pandering to your base and fearmongering to get your way.
Rabbi rabbi can you heal me said the peasant yes my child said Jesus if you can pay me in full or have insurance said Jesus looking down on the peasant as she crawled to the gutter.
Trumpaganda Style.
Let the Border Security Workers decide how to spend the 5 billion. Then it wont be Trumps Wall-it will be the people on the front line deciding where it is best spent!
That’s the facts jak.
Tens of millions of loyal supporters are behind you, Sir. Stand fast and don’t give in to the traitorous Dems. #Trump2020 #MAGA #FirstPrezToKeepHisPromises
Tens of millions of loyal supporters are behind you, Sir. Stand fast and don’t give in to the traitorous Dems. #Trump2020 #MAGA #FirstPrezToKeepHisPromises
Hang tough, Mr. President.  You're doing the right thing.  God bless you and protect and give you wisdom!
I love my President!!!
DAD MADE, VLAD PAID
Meanwhile, hardworking Americans are starving while their life savings are dwindling down to nothing, all over petty political stubbornness on both sides of the aisle. There's nothing to celebrate here.
If we don’t defend America against you, then we cease to be a nation.  If you cared you would open up the government!  But, you sir can careless.  Lies, corruption and a traitor. Your future looks bright. Till your exit,  we true Americans will fight for “our” nation and it’s people!   You’ll be a dark ugly spot in History. And nobody knows better about ugly darkness then you.
Absolutely correct!!!!!!!
I need my food stamps💁‍♀️
Strong words 100% true. #G
sanders 2020Ξ
Online shopping Is it your dream to shop online or play free online games . then look no where else .. This site can help you shop online with btc you don't need to have credit card before you do shopping though you can shop with those cards and also it has a very affordable delivery services. No matter which part of the world you are, you can still go for this site.   I personally recommend this convenient site for you. Do all your shoppings and play all your online games here.  👇👇👇 http://www.tripleclicks.com/19539144TripleClickstripleclicks.com
Stay strong Mr. President!
Mr president 👍
Mr President God Bless you.
Disaster smh 🤔🤔🤔
Public Law 85-804
Our president is very very Wright
words obummer never spoke
Pay the Coast Guard!!
Impeach Nancy Pelosi.
Yes you are right big boss
sanders 2020Ξ
Ms. Pelosi, tear down your walls!!
Meme granny
Real News: Two very sober and thoroughly argued calls for the House of Representatives to launch an impeachment investigation (to see if impeachment is warranted):  https://www.washingtonpost.com/opinions/michael-hayden-and-neal-katyal-the-house-should-investigate-impeaching-trump/2019/01/18/0588e84a-1b70-11e9-88fe-f9f77a3bcb6c_story.html  https://www.theatlantic.com/magazine/archive/2019/03/impeachment-trump/580468/  The first is written by Michael Hayden and Neal Katyal in the Washington Post. The second is written for The Atlantic by Yoni Appelbaum, who notes:   “Impeachment is a process, not an outcome, a rule-bound procedure for investigating a president, considering evidence, formulating charges, and deciding whether to continue on to trial.”  “As a House Judiciary Committee staff report put it in 1974, in the midst of the Watergate investigation: ‘The purpose of impeachment is not personal punishment; its function is primarily to maintain constitutional government.‘ Impeachable offenses, it found, included ‘undermining the integrity of office, disregard of constitutional duties and oath of office, arrogation of power, abuse of the governmental process, adverse impact on the system of government.’”
Thank you President Trump Stand strong, it is time to stop voting for the lying hypocrite communiste socialiste liberal democrats that are holding this country hostage BUILD the WALL.
AMEN.  Have to stop the invasion of our country!!!  Thank God for President Donald J. Trump.
If we don't have an OPEN government, we cease to be a nation.   OPEN the Government.    NOW....................
Why can't you work for citizens insteed you are busy working russians
Trump forever!!!!!
Walls are built to confine, most countries with walls are war ridden and it is to keep their enemies out.. Mexico is not our enemy.. other wall are built in communist countries and are meant to prevent their people from leaving 》》 welcome to the Republican agenda!
Yes you are right big boss
MAGA 2020!! HE IS YOUR PRESIDENT!!
Which Nation are you defending? It seem your are doing everything you can to help Putin.
WELL SAID MR PRESIDENT DONALD Donald J. Trump
Where do you want to spend the money? Spend a little at the front end on a barrier or spend a lot at the back end on bureaucrazy and crime?
Actually I am not American citizen but my full support and best wishes with you Mr Donald Trump because you and your team doing work well that's why I am doing Appreciate you all team work                                                  God bless you                                                                  Mr. Donald Trump                                                                                                  God bless you                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                  American citizen                                                                                                               God bless                                                                                                                                       America                                                                                                     your well wisher                                                                             SYED ZEESHAN HUSSAIN RIZVI                                                                    Passport Number                                                                                             GE 9892312                                                                                                              National Identity Card Number                                              41204_8988231-3                                             Contact Number                                                                              +923323684027                             +923003841734                                             Email Address                                                       szhr.1980@hotmail.com          szhr1980@gmail.com                                      szhr.1980@yahoo.com                                                         House No R-245 Block 20 Fb Area Karachi Pakistan
People need to contact legislators and tell them to fund the barrier and open the government. Democrats want to fund foreign aide to the tune of $18 billion but can't take $5 billion to fund the wall? I think we should be taking care of our own country and citizens before any other country.
You spelled "profit" wrong.
Walls are built to confine, most countries with walls are war ridden and it is to keep their enemies out.. Mexico is not our enemy.. other wall are built in communist countries and are meant to prevent their people from leaving 》》 welcome to the Republican agenda!
We must have border security and the wall! We support You President Trump!!🇺🇸🇺🇸
You are doing the right thing, President Trump!  Stand strong!   Doing the right thing is not usually the most painless thing, as any of us know.  We are with you!
Your a joke!! https://www.cbsnews.com/news/government-shutdown-claims-immigration-judge-paychecks-as-court-morale-hits-a-historic-low/?ftag=CNM-00-10aab6a&linkId=62718789
R we going to build a wall around the whole usa or just mexicos border?  Jerk
Wonder why the DNC was trying to delay the state of the union? Are they afraid Trump will get direct media coverage, or is Disney still fine-tuning their new Ginsburg animatronic?
Stay Focus on our Borders. .........Mexico is Not Our Friend they are partners with Drug Cartel .   They love the American $$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$&$$$s  Corrupt just like Venezuela 😡👎🏽
But you become IN Fucking SANE!!!!!
Why  can  Congress fund 10 billions for foreign countries ABORTIONS........But will not fund 5 billion for the wall............
Real News (Axios):  Republican Rep. Will Hurd, whose district shares 820 miles of the border with Mexico, says Trump's border crisis is a "myth," and that his wall is the "most expensive and least effective way to do border security."  (Read the full story on Axios.com)  Tell the Senate to pass the House spending bills and end the #TrumpShutdown here: http://bit.ly/2TtVTwr #NoWall
You spelled "profit" wrong.
Real News (Axios):  Republican Rep. Will Hurd, whose district shares 820 miles of the border with Mexico, says Trump's border crisis is a "myth," and that his wall is the "most expensive and least effective way to do border security."  (Read the full story on Axios.com)  Tell the Senate to pass the House spending bills and end the #TrumpShutdown here: http://bit.ly/2TtVTwr #NoWall
We don't need the wall.  Most Americans don't want it. Be a President,  not a pandering politician.
Proud to be a trump supporter. Trump 2020!
call emergancy and build that wall before the rest of the trash gets here, arm military with real amo.
Imagine if #Trump fined everyone who didn't want the Wall. Just like #Obama did with ObamaCare...🤔 #thedoublestandartisreal
Mr President PLEASE use this and spit in the Demonrats faces and have the State of the Union anyways!!!  https://www.usconstitution.net/xconst_A2Sec3.html
Fact: Trump lies about the length of his fingers like he does about everything else  Source: https://www.reddit.com/r/PoliticalHumor/comments/ah26x0/trumps_facebook_page_slimmed_him_down_and_made/
DECLARE MARTIAL LAW DISSOLVE CONGRESS
DingDingDING WRONG! Your most important duty is to be ethical. Add honest. Then throw in some knowledge and the ability to actually speak like an adult.
Milton Freeman how do we stop illegals from coming in. In recent times large numbers.
The freshman congresswoman said Wednesday the shutdown was not really about Trump’s demands for a wall on the U.S.-Mexico border or “the well-being of everyday Americans.” Instead, she said, it was “about the erosion of American democracy and the subversion of our most basic governmental norms.”  ”It is not normal to hold 800,000 workers’ paychecks hostage. It is not normal to shut down the government when we don’t get what we want. It is not normal for public servants to run away and hide from the public that they serve,” Ocasio-Cortez added. “And it is certainly not normal to starve the people we serve for a proposal that is wildly unpopular among the American people! https://news.yahoo.com/alexandria-ocasio-cortez-torches-trump-114238067.html
Yes we have to.. we lost the borders en Vietnam , we lost the border in Siria.., we are  in venezuela protecting our border...We need walls all over the world...before Mexico take back  all their land.
Well cease to be the nation we are for many other reasons other than this border "crisis". Only difference is the border crisis would take longer to ruin us. Right now because of your shut down, people are suffering and losing everything NOW!! And you don't care!! https://www.cbsnews.com/news/colorados-forests-at-risk-for-wildfires-due-to-government-shutdown/?ftag=CNM-00-10aab6a&linkId=62572813
Trumpateers, I’ve seen the debates on both sides of who’s to blame for the shutdown. For 2 years Republicans were in power and this could have been settled. Then last fall,up comes the Cohen thing and Manafort thing and possible collusion by Russia. Mid term elections came and Democrats win the house. All of a sudden, there’s a big border wall crisis. Trump shuts down the government and Republicans leave the house Dec. 13 cause there is no use. January 1st comes Democrats are in power with no government,meaning further inquiries into trump’s allegation go nowhere. That’s why trump is going to make this last and why Mitch McConnell is hiding. Make any sense?
Plummeting in the polls  ... what's next Donnie? How's the ego holding up? Is it worth the pain and suffering you are causing so many folks? Bye bye  Donnie! #TrumpResign #TrumpShutdown
Dear Sir! Having taken a recent vote, at that time 71% are in favor of  what you're doing, and the others favor the Dems .It's apparent you are constantly referring this as being a National Security issue,  and apparently have the means of getting the sufficient amount to complete it,  Don't talk yourself out.. We see  Dems digging their grave and will become all the more obvious now they' have the House.
He'll defend the nation even if it destroys the country.
DingDingDING WRONG! Your most important duty is to be ethical. Add honest. Then throw in some knowledge and the ability to actually speak like an adult.
Look at those tiny hands
WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! \
Declare a national emergency 🚨Mr President you are doing a great job,keep up the good work🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
THIS IS RIDICULOUS.  YOUR RELATIONSHIP WITH YOUR BUSINESS PARTNER PUTIN HAS PUT OUR COUNTRY IN DANGER.  YOU ARE WORKING FOR PUTIN, NOT AMERICANS.
MR. PRESIDENT! WE CANNOT GET ONE GOVERNOR IN THE WHOLE UNITED STATES TO TALK TO US ABOUT 800,000 CHILDREN DISAPPEARING IN THE UNITED STATES EVERY YEAR. CAN WE GET A LETTER TO THE GOVERNORS TO ADDRESS THE CRISIS?
I wish Facebook would do their job and protect us from YOU.
Free shares of stock! Sign up using my link! https://share.robinhood.com/davidh6058
He'll defend the nation even if it destroys the country.
In order to protect us against terrorist, Mr. President, I would strongly urge you to expel their leader Nancy Pelosi . . . and her sidekick, Chuck Schumer.
THANKS SHELDON GREAT CHOICE HOPE TO SEE MORE VOTES WE SURE NEED TO GET THE HOUSE BACK ,THE SENATE AND OUR GREAT PRESIDENT THAT OUR LORD JESUS CHRIST BLESSED THIS NATION AND HER PEOPLE WITH
GO GETT'EM DON. KEEP MAKING AMERICA GREAT AGAIN.                             #MAGA.                           #STILLWINNING
Ya take your 5 billion & build afford able houses along border. Call Trumps Border. B the first 2 solar wind free frash water.
Hey you guy who think solutions from 771 BC are still good solutions, your wall is useless:  https://www.ifsecglobal.com/smart-home/drone-patrols-ai-surveillance-15-home-security-innovations-ces-2019/ #yourWallisUseless
https://youtu.be/S-Jjb94G5ls  King James Version  Rev 22:18-19 This Book  Exodus 24:7 The Book  One Matthew 23:9 Father  Jerusalem Galatians 4:26 Mother of us all  One Matthew 23:8 All ye are Brethren  Exodus 23:20-22 Behold  Isaiah 29:15 Woe unto them that  Seek Deep to hide  Their counsel from  The Lord, and their  Works are in the  Dark, and they say,  Who seeth us? and  Who knoweth us?  John 8:17 It is also written  In your Law, that  The testimony of  Two men is true.  One Genesis 41:25 Pharaoh  1 John 1:5 Light  1 John 5:7 The Holy Ghost  Zechariah 14:9 His Name One  Luke 3:21-23 The Holy Ghost  John 5:35 Light  John 1:13 Which were born,  Not of Blood, nor  Of the will of  The Flesh, nor of  The will of man,  But of God.  Revelation 19:4 Alleluia  Revelation 4:2 One sat on The Throne  Isaiah 29:28-29 Bread  Corn is bruised;  Because he will Not  Ever Be Threshing  it,  Nor Break  it  With the wheel of  His cart, Nor Bruise  it  With his Horsemen.  Romans 9:17 Pharaoh  Ezekiel 10:20 This is Pharaoh  John 1:49 Thou Art  Exodus 16:15-16 Omer  Acts 8:6 Philip  Daniel 2:31-38 Thou Art This Head Of Gold  Job 30:30 Black  Ezekiel 10:20 Living  Revelation 1:15 Many Waters  Isaiah 28:29  This also cometh  Forth from the Lord  Of  Hosts, which is  Wonderful in Counsel,  And  Excellent in Working.  Psalm 137:5 If I Forget Thee, O Jerusalem,  Jerusalem Galatians 4:26 Mother of Us All  One Matthew 23:8 All ye are Brethren  Ephesians 4:6 One God  Psalm 119:105 Light  Psalm 136:15 But overthrew  Pharaoh  And his host in  The Red Sea: for  His mercy Endureth  For Ever.  Job 35:1-4 it  Psalm 35:5 Let  Them Be As Chaff  Before The Wind:  And  Let the Angel of  The Lord Chase  Them.  1 Thes 5:5 Light  Ephesians 5:8 Light  John 12:34-36 Light  Job 34:27 Because they Turned Back From Him, And Would Not Consider Any of His Ways:  Ecclesiastes 4:8 One
There are eight hundred thousand people suffering for not getting paid for this big ego. Instead of buying lunch for a team that you paid for just pay them as many of these employees are governing our safety. Hope you are proud of being the President to have the longest shut down. All for a wall that you said Mexico would pay.
SOME ARE CALLING PRESIDENT TRUMP EVERY NAME IN THE BOOK TOO!  DON'T LISTEN TO THE HATERS.  PRESIDENT TRUMP SEES NO COLORS---ONLY WHAT IS BEST FOR ALL THE PEOPLE OF AMERICA!!  YOU CAN COUNT ON THAT!
Safe, & mosquitoes being the biggest killers of human lives. Born to G_O_D, come pew tour, sigh, ants. Were, whir, shipping energy, inner gee,. Ask a dock tour. Sir cull, circle, oh, owe, O.
Free shares of stock! Sign up using my link! https://share.robinhood.com/davidh6058
Safe, & mosquitoes being the biggest killers of human lives. Born to G_O_D, come pew tour, sigh, ants. Were, whir, shipping energy, inner gee,. Ask a dock tour. Sir cull, circle, oh, owe, O.
I mean Bigly Mac!
SOME ARE CALLING PRESIDENT TRUMP EVERY NAME IN THE BOOK TOO!  DON'T LISTEN TO THE HATERS.  PRESIDENT TRUMP SEES NO COLORS---ONLY WHAT IS BEST FOR ALL THE PEOPLE OF AMERICA!!  YOU CAN COUNT ON THAT!
MR. PRESIDENT,I SUPPORT YOU AND WILL VOTE FOR YOU IN 2020---I HAVE CONCERNS ABOUT MUSLIMS IN CONGRESS---WHY IS THE 1952, MC CARRAN WALTERS ACT NOT BEING ENFORCED?---IF MUSLIMS ARE ALLOWED IN OUR GOVERNMENT WE WILL LOOSE OUR COUNTRY.----PLEASE ENFORCE THIS 1952 BAN ON MUSLIMS IN OUR COUNTRY.
Donald tell the truth, you really believe your most important duty is to line your pockets with cash.
They altered his finger to look longer😃 https://youtu.be/ujqHCanoJZg
Don’t let others enter and dictate your laws ... stand strong on immigration ... and shame on shonky Dems and self interest
TURN UP THE HEAT ON THE DEMONCRATS PRESIDENT TRUMP. LETS DESTROY THIS CORRUPT PARTY.
Stand firm Mr President
Rigged Polls in his favor! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
The Federal Government does not care about their citizens.
#BLOTS Biggest Liar Of The United States
I mean Bigly Mac!
#BLOTS Biggest Liar Of The United States
Kellie Spieges Mexico well pay for it just because they not gonna give a check to trump don't mean Mexico won't pay
You're extremely uneducated, reading that travesty of a comment gave me a migraine.  No, Mexico isn't gonna pay for it. Get over it... Kathy Werbickiwere I  Oh no, you come back to the party. Did my awful truth make you angry... 😭😭😭😭😭😳😱
The Federal Government does not care about their citizens.
I'M WITH YOU ON THE WALL... MAKE AMERICA SAFE AND GREAT AGAIN. PAY HOMELAND SECURITY NOW.!  THE USCG WORKING WITHOUT PAY IS A DISGRACE!
pray for trump, pray for the USA
Rigged Polls in his favor! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Says wealthy people who threatened to take their wealth out of the US.
SO YOU SAY YOU NEED TO  DEFEND OUR BORDERS IN ORDER TO BE A SAFER NATION BUT YET YOU ARE USING THOUSANDS OF AMERICANS AS HOSTAGES FOR YOUR SO CALLED DEFENSE FOR THE AMERICAN PEOPLE  !?!?!? IT SOUNDS LIKE WE NEED PROTECTION FROM YOU INSTEAD!?!   THIS IS THE PERFECT DEFINITION OF  CONTRADICTION AT ITS FINEST. DO YOU EVEN BELIEF THE PRINCIPLES YOU PREACH? OR DO YOU JUST USE THEM IN ORDER TO MANIPULATE? OR MAYBE YOU ACTUALLY DO BELIEVE THE CRAP THAT YOU SAY? IF SO....THEN YOU ARE ALREADY LIVING IN YOUR KARMA. YOU ARE LOST, SOULESS AND CONFUSED. WHICH MEANS YOUR FUTURE DECISIONS AND CONSEQUENCES ARE PREDICTABLE.  THEREFORE. I CHOOSE NOT TO REACT IN FEAR AND INSTEAD REACT WITH FAITH AND TRUST THAT WE AS A NATION WILL GET THROUGH THIS AND WE WILL BE STRONGER BECAUSE OF IT. SO THANK YOU FOR SACRAFISING YOUR SOUL SO THAT AMERICANS CAN LOOK MORE PAST THE BLACK AND WHITE SPECTRUM AND REACH  MORE INTO THE GREY AREA OF SOLUTIONS AND TOGETHERNESS.  I KNOW YOU WANT ME TO BE AFRAID, AND I KNOW YOU THINK YOU KNOW US. BUT I HAVE NEWS FOR YOU TRUMP.... IT'S NEVER TOO LATE TO LEARN SOMETHING NEW!!!  MOST OF US KNOW STRUGGLE ALREADY, WE LIVE(D) IT... AND CAN SURVIVE THINGS THAT YOU, YOURSELF WOULD CRUMBLE FROM. YOU UNDERESTIMATE OUR CAPABILITIES AS A PEOPLE.   WE MAY HAVE BEEN DISTRACTED BECAUSE OF THE OBSTACLES PLACED AGAINST US BEFORE THIS SHUT DOWN, BUT YOU HAVE OUR FULL ATTENTION NOW AND I PROMISE YOU...WE WILL SURVIVE!!  WOULD YOU THOUGH???
Rigged Polls in his favor! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Why and how is it, that we the workingman get little back in taxes, but if youre an illegal you collect up to $25,000 if not more on a tax refund. This tax system is broken and needs fixed NOW !!!
You're extremely uneducated, reading that travesty of a comment gave me a migraine.  No, Mexico isn't gonna pay for it. Get over it... Kathy Werbickiwere I  Oh no, you come back to the party. Did my awful truth make you angry... 😭😭😭😭😭😳😱
"We cease to be a nation" ?????????  WTF??
Party Of Crime???  https://pbs.twimg.com/media/DNbkp33UQAAnM7a.jpg
Go Mr president!
Yes it is! And you sir are the only who seems to care.
I love you trump.
Google say:idiot,haha
We hear you Nehemiah
The great divider!!
Thank you, Mr. President for all that you do!
Why and how is it, that we the workingman get little back in taxes, but if youre an illegal you collect up to $25,000 if not more on a tax refund. This tax system is broken and needs fixed NOW !!!
Altered photo fake black supporters.
STAY THE COURSE
Best President ever
Lower the age for retirement then the wall
Thanks Mr. President !!!
PHOTO SHOPPED crisis
AMEN TO THAT!!
Yes. Rational people agree. Now do it,
Thank you POTUS !!
Thank you, Mr. President for all that you do!
I'd live here, anyway. Wally West
Stay strong! We've got your back!
Greatest president ever
I agree with you Mr. President.  Wholeheartedly.  But please don’t attempt to divide God’s Land, Israel, in any way.  West Bank, Jerusalem, or any portion. It belongs to God Himself.  Peace plan or no peace plan, help to keep Israel intact.  You’re doing a great job Sir, but please STAND with an INTACT ISRAEL.  God bless you, your family, the USA, and His land Israel.  JERusaLEM jerUSAlem 🇺🇸♥️🇮🇱
If we won't defend ourselves, then we cease to be human. That goes for all of you who sit back and allow the corruption in the government to continue. We need a change and it's not another president we need another leader. Who can format a better system, that doesn't rely so heavily on money. Yeah that'll still be a currency, but there's so much that should be free. Instead of having to pay for food and water people could volunteer time to work. It's natural resources people grows from the ground that means it is free. Stop allowing them to charge you to live here.
How much money are the cartels paying the swamp to keep the borders open ? #askingforafriend
The politicians holding our money and country hostage make me sick. This is why nothing gets done in our government,because they want to play party politics,instead of doing their job.
Israel  https://www.facebook.com/268108602075/posts/10156099687857076/
America - a gated community
Israel  https://www.facebook.com/268108602075/posts/10156099687857076/
Toni Scavo Whats taking so long?
Toni Scavo your brainwashing is complete sunshine. Bow to your democratic masters.
Kevin Lake... facts. Read and learn. Perhaps you should advocate not giving visas to anyone because a good majority  enter legally. A wall won't stop that.  https://www.npr.org/2019/01/16/686056668/for-seventh-consecutive-year-visa-overstays-exceeded-illegal-border-crossingsw
The politicians holding our money and country hostage make me sick. This is why nothing gets done in our government,because they want to play party politics,instead of doing their job.
Kevin Lake... facts. Read and learn. Perhaps you should advocate not giving visas to anyone because a good majority  enter legally. A wall won't stop that.  https://www.npr.org/2019/01/16/686056668/for-seventh-consecutive-year-visa-overstays-exceeded-illegal-border-crossingsw
Very true your Excellency Sir. Protect  United State Of America boundaries. Build the WALL
سوف يقع الجدار في النار
Toni Scavo your brainwashing is complete sunshine. Bow to your democratic masters.
Stfu. You have done so much damage to our country we will be running you out of office asap.
Rigged Polls in his favor! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Rigged Polls in his favor! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Rigged Polls in his favor! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Oh... here's another one
And shutting the govt down for a walk doesn’t help that matter.
If we don’t fix health care, poverty, gun control, and inequality, we cease to be a nation. Much more important than Southern border, where illegal entry is already at all time low. Why does our President focus on wrong issues??
سوف يقع الجدار في النار
President Trump if you really care about the denfense of our nation you would open the government back up.  Our government is less secure when it is closed.  Praying for you.
WALL WALL WALL WALL      WALL WALL WALL  WALL WALL WALL WALL      WALL WALL WALL WALL WALL WALL WALL      WALL WALL WALL WALL WALL WALL WALL ✊✊✊✊✊✊✊✊✊
From a recently retired veteran (USArmy):  I URGE EVERYONE TO STOP VOTING FOR POLITICIANS THAT HAVE NO IDEA ABOUT NATIONAL SECURITY/FOREIGN POLICY.  THIS IS TOO RECKLESS FOR OUR COUNTRY.  PEOPLE HAVE BEEN KILLED BECAUSE OF POOR DECISIONS!!!!!!!!!!!!  ALSO, NATIONAL SECURITY AFFECTS ALL OF US.  NOT JUST WEALTHY POLITICIANS THAT WORK IN WASHINGTON D.C. AMERICA PLEASE START PAYING ATTENTION TO THE DECISIONS THAT WE ARE PURSUING ABROAD.  I KNOW THAT DOMESTIC POLICIES ARE A PRIORITY. BUT THE PRESIDENCY'S PORTFOLIO IS 50 PERCENT DOMESTIC POLICY AND 50 PERCENT FOREIGN POLICY.  PLEASE DO A BETTER JOB EVALUTING THE CANDIDATE BASED ON THEIR FOREIGN POLICY BACKGROUND AND NOT BASED ON YOUR EMOTIONS.   BY THE WAY, I AM NOT VOTING FOR A CANDIDATE THAT IS WEAK IN NATIONAL SECURITY/FOREIGN POLICY FOR #2020.  I DO NOT CARE ABOUT HOW POPULAR THE CANDIDATE IS.  NO ONE SHOULD OCCUPY THE OVAL OFFICE WITH NO FOREIGN POLICY CREDENTIALS.    AS THE COMMANDER-IN-CHIEF, YOU NEED TO KNOW ABOUT NATIONAL SECURITY/FOREIGN POLICY.    WE NEED BETTER GLOBAL LEADERSHIP.........CURRENTLY, WE LOOK STUPID ABROAD.  STOP SUPPORTING OR ENABLING (NO ACTION) RECKLESS POLICIES ABROAD.
Weird, because you fucking that up really bad.
my name is Timothy Gadberry .... a 52 year old white male who was born and raised in Oklahoma city.  I am a American citizen.  I am asking if you too are American Citizens.   from what I understand, ...the Russian government have been working hard to divide the people who make up our democracy, .. claiming to be American Citizens throughout social media outlets.  the goal is to sway public opinion as well as causing division within our United population of men and women who have faith in our great democracy. are you guys American Citizens  ??
God bless you president Trump
How much of a nation will be left as the poor begin to starve because food stamp benefits will stop.
Promises made must be kept, we are willing to shut down government for a year unless we get  the wall!
Keep the government shut down long enough and the borders won't matter... #worstpresidentever
Now THATs a laugh! Don’t let Vlad hear you say that.
If we don’t fix health care, poverty, gun control, and inequality, we cease to be a nation. Much more important than Southern border, where illegal entry is already at all time low. Why does our President focus on wrong issues??
Now THATs a laugh! Don’t let Vlad hear you say that.
Defense by shutdown- your logic is nonsense
Keep the government shut down long enough and the borders won't matter... #worstpresidentever
#MAGA Trump 2020
So pay Border Patrol. You are the one withholding their pay. Disgraceful !
we are not dead more
and if 800k Americans are not getting paid the heck with them right?
He’s like the sheriff of the country 👍👍
Stand strong President Trump. Thank you for protecting us, The left has lost their minds. How anyone can't see it this crisis @ our border is beyond me. Progressive democrats have become so out of touch with America that they have become a danger to our nation.  We are standing with you, President Donald J. Trump.  Do what you need to:   #BuildTheWall   🇺🇸#Safety 🇺🇸#Sovereignty
Jessica Manoo . Women’s March tomorrow. Look up locations in the city
Thank you President Trump save us please this crap is getting out of control stop the infiltration of the destruction of America at the hands of the democrats
Jackie McHugh Neither he nor his administration has submitted ANY form of legislation addressing the specifics for his vanity wall or a larger immigration reform plan.
Thank you President Trump save us please this crap is getting out of control stop the infiltration of the destruction of America at the hands of the democrats
yes it is very important and that is why we need a President of sound mind to keep us safe, not a President who is just wanting adulation. Scary.
Just another NOPE! You know the rest. 💩Resign💩
You spelled offense wrong
President  trump I don't know you
"Defense of our nation is my highest and most important duty" YEAH RIGHT  Except you dodged the draft so you couldn't defend your fellow americans in Vietnam.  Except you conspired with Russian agents to fix an american election.  Except you shut down the government, leaving airport security understaffed and cancelling safe-food inspections.  What is it you are protecting again? Other than your own tax returns and your criminal family?
There is NO crisis at the border!!!!   The issue now is NOT the border, nor the stupid wall!!!!   The crisis now is this crybaby President hijacking not only our government, but almost a million of our citizens' livelihood!     #WorstPresidentEver  #Crybaby #CaresNotAboutTheCitizens
That's exactly what we miss on the leader of our country's. Mister Donald J. Trump, the German people  need your help.
Yes yes yes yes always thank you President Trump hang in there we all need you and have a great new year and another 6years please keep the faith we need you more than ever now please build the wall now we need it more than ever now please.
Jackie McHugh Neither he nor his administration has submitted ANY form of legislation addressing the specifics for his vanity wall or a larger immigration reform plan.
Yes yes yes yes always thank you President Trump hang in there we all need you and have a great new year and another 6years please keep the faith we need you more than ever now please build the wall now we need it more than ever now please.
Mr President I agree with you however there are people working without pay meanwhile Congress an Senator's are still being paid so who are you out to punish the American people who voted for you I hope that isn't your intention we love the work you are doing just please don't punish us.
If we started a go fund me page and everyone who wants the wall donated at least $20 the wall would be no problem
That's exactly what we miss on the leader of our country's. Mister Donald J. Trump, the German people  need your help.
KEEP US SAFE MR.PRESIDENT TRUMP, WE THE PEOPLE VOTED YOU TO USE ALL YOUR POWERS TOWARDS KEEPING AMERICA SAFE AND SECURE AT ALL TIMES. WE WHO VOTED FOR YOU TRULY BELIEVE YOUR DOING GREAT, SO DON'T STOP, DO IT...
President Trump takes a working vacation at the White House and its called a Shutdown.  Muslim Obama took a NON-WORKING vacation and its called golf. @@@
we have your back, because you have ours
Photoshopped to hell XD what a fucking joke. The slimmed him up and made his finger longer XD  https://i.redd.it/arl9gme5n1b21.gif
Under democrat leading, we will NOT be the United States of America - we WILL be KNOWN as the Socialist States of America
Your the Man ,Mr.Trump I really appreciate your loyalty to our nation and the American people.God bless you Mr.President!Keep it up sir,the Democrats have been underestimating you right from the start !
IF WE DON"T TELL THE TRUTH WE GO TO HELL BYE BYE FATTY!!!
If we started a go fund me page and everyone who wants the wall donated at least $20 the wall would be no problem
IF WE DON"T TELL THE TRUTH WE GO TO HELL BYE BYE FATTY!!!
You are failing us who supported you, by damaging our second amendment, if this continues I will not vote for you
Jill Travassos  bump stock ban and his attorney general is against guns
Your the Man ,Mr.Trump I really appreciate your loyalty to our nation and the American people.God bless you Mr.President!Keep it up sir,the Democrats have been underestimating you right from the start !
If we don’t build the wall it it is a open invitation to all drug dealers , human traffickers, violent gangs , diseases not to mention expense
If you don’t get the hell outta office.  There isn’t gonna be a America or government
Now Playing Buzzfeed: Sources say Trump directed Cohen to lie to Congress  https://www.cnn.com/2019/01/17/politics/buzzfeed-trump-cohen-lie-congress-moscow/index.html
Give them DACA, only IF they fund the wall, fix the loopholes and end Birthright Citizenship.
We could probably just run that goddamn tie you're wearing the length of the border and call it good.
That’s what the left and the UN want! The US not to exist anymore! They are the enemy and need to be treated as such
Jill Travassos  bump stock ban and his attorney general is against guns
I stand 10.000%  Mr. DONALD TRUMP,  President of the United States of America !!!!
There has been borders before you became President and America never ceased to be a Nation. Small hand
SHUTDOWN the Gov for as long as it takes Donnie..its time the corrupt anti american party to know..people can continue to live their lives without eating the poisonous cakes of lies..one does not compromise with the insanity of the corrupt globalist minions! #MAGA
to protect our country
Individual 1 trashed Comey for being a good friend of Mueller which is not true. Comey and Mueller did not socialize, they had working relationship. What is true, his AG nominee, William Barr, admitted that he has been a friend of Mueller for 30 years. #Donthecon
Pelosi didn’t you take an oath to protect the American people (not the Mexican cartel).  I took the oath to protect and defend my country and even though our pay was delayed because the military wasn’t always given their minute raise we were still at our assigned post.  What makes you any difference?  Oh yea, you’re STILL GETTING PAID while other aren’t.  President Trump Homeland Security has support this security event.  HAIRY PELOSI YOU LIE!!!!!!Taking after your sister Hiliary.
President Trump is the best President in a long time. He's doing everything that he said during his campaign for President. Go Build the Wall and leave President Trump alone so he can finish making America Great Again
Yes, and thank you
That’s what the left and the UN want! The US not to exist anymore! They are the enemy and need to be treated as such
Yes, and thank you
Why is it Republicans can not fight, while Nancy Pelosi, Chuck Schumer, and the Democrats can sell 💩 to the American People?
https://www.facebook.com/photo.php?fbid=10213924611209252&set=a.1342520242914&type=3&theater
President Trump is the best President in a long time. He's doing everything that he said during his campaign for President. Go Build the Wall and leave President Trump alone so he can finish making America Great Again
https://www.facebook.com/photo.php?fbid=10213924611209252&set=a.1342520242914&type=3&theater
Finally a PRAYING PRESIDENT... Donald Trump My President & GOD BLESS U.S.A....
you are joking right? The Heathen President maybe ...lol you really think he has any belief in your god and praying.  Really ? How deluded are you? What has he ever done to make you believe that he's a "praying president".  He can't even sing the anthem you think he knows the bible?  lmao ... deluded is an  understatement
Why is it Republicans can not fight, while Nancy Pelosi, Chuck Schumer, and the Democrats can sell 💩 to the American People?
For two years you had both Senate and the House and you thought it best to give your top 1% a $1 trillion tax cut. And now when the House went away your pathetic drama LMAO.
When you fail as a president, you become irrelevant
Pay your taxes. Don’t expect us tax payers to pay for the wall out of our money when you don’t even want to pay your taxes to cover the expense as well.
All CODEL Postponed....  This is a Great Opportunity for Mrs. Pelosi and President Trump and other's to get together and take care of the situation at hand in regards to the 800, 000 American Citizens and our Security at Our Border.  Get to the compramize of getting our government reopen and give our border Agent's what they need to do their job.   Country Before Party! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
It is the responsibility of the Commander in Chief to protect our National security against all foreign and domestic threats.   Pelosi is a domestic threat.   President Regan spoke to America for 4 min. from the Oval Office after the Space Shuttle Challenger disaster in place of giving the SOTU address.  President Trump, if necessary, ought to speak of our National Security Emergency also from the Oval office and forgo addressing Congress, and ridiculous Pelosi's antics.
He means empire. And undoubtedly the economy will crash so badly that this will lead to the fall of Rothchild.
you are joking right? The Heathen President maybe ...lol you really think he has any belief in your god and praying.  Really ? How deluded are you? What has he ever done to make you believe that he's a "praying president".  He can't even sing the anthem you think he knows the bible?  lmao ... deluded is an  understatement
He means empire. And undoubtedly the economy will crash so badly that this will lead to the fall of Rothchild.
Lil Donny, your at a point where you are losing biggly! Good luck with that wall idea of yours. 🤗🤩🍾🥂 Also I agree, his address should first be put on paper.
Jason Martinez your ass should be put on a bus back south
Unless you're Natave American, you can STFU! Those crayons you're eating are effecting your IQ.🤡
Its obvious what the dems are doing, I'm quite tired of the BS, its time to take back America!! Who knew it was our own holding America back. Truly a sad sad time in life. Glad to know who our enemies really are.
Trump is a fighter and he will win no matter what the cost is or who it affects just so he can get his TAX BREAKS, oh sorry WALL
Stop it with the 🐎 💩 and open the government
Imagine if Trump fined everyone who didn't want the wall. Kinda like Obama did with Obamacare.
We love you POTUS! Glad to see you put an end to Nancy Pelosi's Vacations. She should be worried about Americans and our safety. She is selfish and careless with American lives. You postponing her trip 30 minutes to take off is Priceless. President Trump - you are as my kids would say - Savage af. Thank you sir, you made our day.
I little bit mistake it was
I’m giving you a FINAL WARNING https://youtu.be/ToOFtvvFGGo
Unless you're Natave American, you can STFU! Those crayons you're eating are effecting your IQ.🤡
No. The arresting and prosecution of judges and other officials that commit and enable these crimes by repetitively refusing to enforce the law is what should be you priority to "keep us safe". However, you and EVERY elected official REFUSES to do so in spite of our continued peaceful requests to do so.  Therefore, We the People hereby declare a vote of NO CONFIDENCE for the ENTIRE United States Government, including the states and local government entities.
The south shall rise again
May God send Trump back to the hell he crept out of!!!  MAKE AMERICA SANE AGAIN  #MASA
Trump said when he gets into office he will get rid of all the lazy people referring to those on government assistance! Schools are running out of funding which means lunches. SNAP is releasing the last of it’s funds the 19th, after that no more funds. Commods will be done as well. Housing developments aren’t funded so people who are on housing and HUD will be evicted due to non-payment. Prisons aren’t getting food. Not to mention nobody will get PELL right away which means a lot of families will go without. Farmers are seeing an effect by not being able to pay their bills. Medicaid/IHS will be limited as they will use the resources they have.. Families will go hungry enough to start robbing food and riots will start breaking out! Crime rates are going to increase too. All thanks to those of you who voted for Trump! 🤡 Pat yourself on the back... real proud of your President ain’t cha! I’m waiting for the simpsons episode to come true! I’m ready for impeachment!
My Album support of: @FBI @WhiteHouse @FLOTUS @theresa_may @AbeShinzo @ecoyuri @realDonaldTrump YouTube, Billboard,@Twitter @instagram @Spotify @SoundCloud ,@PaulMcCartney , @ladygaga ,@StellaMcCartney,, @BBCWorld @RyanAFournier @SaraCarterDC http://www.kurrentmusic.com/artistalbum.html?artist-id=undefined&album-id=7CkonTCkstYZg2fOWpFyrS&artist-name=undefined&artist-album=Strictly+Rhythm+House+Space
Four Americans died yesterday at ISIS hands. "ISIS has been defeated" trump
This statements is nothing but the truth: AS A PRESIDENT THE DEFEND OF OUR NATION IS THE HIGHEST & MIST IMPORTANT DUTY. President Trump has proved it!
So you support russia and a traitor now. Good luck a-holes.
This statements is nothing but the truth: AS A PRESIDENT THE DEFEND OF OUR NATION IS THE HIGHEST & MIST IMPORTANT DUTY. President Trump has proved it!
Stay strong mr. President hundred million Americans are behind you
Dean Templing hundreds of millions of fools and ignorant suckers behind Trump.
Four Americans died yesterday at ISIS hands. "ISIS has been defeated" trump
Why Walls are good for immigration:  https://piusarinzehas.blogspot.com/2019/01/walls-have-gates.html?m=1
You are right Mr. Trump
your  in to make money dam cheater crook.
Defense of our nation is most important?? 5 TIMES! Not 1 but 5 times you used your privilege to dodge the draft. Sit your orange ass down n stfu.
And stop all payment to all Democrats while they are on strike in a government shutdown if our men and women who are defending our country are not getting paid then those worthless pieces of garbage should not get paid either
Cohen is gonna make Dumpster fall to his flabby orange knees. Hang on.
Loved you in Family Guy.
Syria: Leave our sand and take our death
Thankfully every reasonable person does want to defend the borders just not with you lousy ideas! We have ceased to be a nation because of your failed leadership, ego posturing, and attempts to divide us! #TrumpsFakeNews #TemperTantrunTrump #DumpTrump #TheTrumpShutdown #Kasich2020
Dean Templing hundreds of millions of fools and ignorant suckers behind Trump.
Thankfully every reasonable person does want to defend the borders just not with you lousy ideas! We have ceased to be a nation because of your failed leadership, ego posturing, and attempts to divide us! #TrumpsFakeNews #TemperTantrunTrump #DumpTrump #TheTrumpShutdown #Kasich2020
What about banning guns from your country so your children and other children will have a safe country to live in
STFU!! Stay in your country you fake snowflake......
you live in Russia.....
Syria: Leave our sand and take our death
The Dems opposing him need to be rounded imprisoned and/or executed.  They are treasonous and it's time to put an end to them.
I feel sorry for trumpsters they are like a battered women They never want to believe the truth . Every bruise and black covered up. They continue to lie to cover his crimes. As  the  walls close in on individual one which slide of history will you be you be on ? Im guessing there will be alot of you feeling like fools when it all goes down. Trump=treason
Why didn't tRump do something about it when he had the House & Senate behind him for over two years???   Why has his ridiculous wall suddenly become a crisis perpetrated by Democrats???  Why isn't Mexico paying for it like HE promised they would???
and our voting machines, and  the fake charities everyone has for  pay to  play... and the blackmailing of  politicians and judges, and stopping child trafficking (thank you Mr. President for that!), and stopping the  corruption of our intelligence agencies and  subversion of  Five Eyes, and  going after the  Rogue CIA and  unfair targeting of IRS and well , all the evil in Washington!
In my itchy bitchy teeny winnie polka dot opinion, President Trump should give the Executive Order to Nancy Pelosi, Schumer, and all democrat and republican politicians to work WTIHOUT PAY during this Partial Government Shut Down Period......To use their pay to pay all 800,000 federal employees working during such period. Furthermore, No back pay must be pay for them!
Your highest and most important duty is to protect and defend the Constitution. That was the oath you took when you were sworn in. But you have never been good at keeping oaths, have you?
You ARE the man, Sir!
GO TRUMP JUST LOOK AT THESE TRUMPED COWARDS.. MAGA!
you live in Russia.....
You’re FOS and here’s why From total defeat to miracle comeback in less than 30 days!!!  Trump Today: President declares ISIS defeated in Syria as he relents on border wall By Robert Schroeder Published: Dec 19, 2018 2:34 p.m.  ISIS Attack in Syria Kills 4 Americans, Raising New Worries About Troop Withdrawal By Eric Schmitt, Ben Hubbard and Rukmini Callimachi * Jan. 16, 2019  Pence says ISIS is 'defeated,' hours after attack in Syria By Dave Boyer - The Washington Times - Wednesday, January 16, 2019 “Vice President Mike Pence said Wednesday that the Islamic State “has been defeated,” hours after U.S. soldiers were killed in Syria in attack for which the terror organization claimed responsibility. “The caliphate has crumbled and [the Islamic State] has been defeated,” Mr. Pence said in an address to the Global Chiefs of Mission conference at the State Department.”
No, appears your highest priority is getting your way.
Own it Trumpers.You got scammed by a New York con artist indebted to Putin and his fellow oligarchs. Don't let his shutdown distract you from his imminent impeachment proceedings.
OPEN THE GOV YOU RUSSIAN SPY‼️
But what we really need is protection from the likes of you people.
His oath with GOD & You try to all Americans legally.
No, you made making us the puppets of the Russians your highest priority, over covering your sexual indiscretions.  https://www.buzzfeednews.com/article/jasonleopold/trump-russia-cohen-moscow-tower-mueller-investigation?ref=hpsplash
yall not understand a wall thats trying to keep us in he dont care about yall and you voted for this bum this guy that basically gonna put us back into depression he not making america great he making america broke n depressed
Thank you Mr. President for standing up to evil giants in our government! I pray God bless you and help you and protect you! You stand for the Americans that voted for you! Thank you! #POTUS #TRUMP #USSS Can you please show Him my comment 🙏
We ceased being a nation when you became president and the Russian party took over...right trump, you are Putin's puppet.  America knows you only serve Putin trump.  Da Comrade
Helen Stein didn't hear of Clinton or Obama serving in the military either.
We ceased being a nation when you became president and the Russian party took over...right trump, you are Putin's puppet.  America knows you only serve Putin trump.  Da Comrade
Martha Pickens here we go again. Just have to mention Clinton and Obama. Nothing better to come up with I guess! The defense of our nation should not be dependent on a lying, draft dodging con man. He would not know how to defend our nation nor does he have the mental capacity or intelligence to learn. You can‘t say that about Clinton or Obama. Funny how we are always less safe when it is a Republican President with the scare mongering! Last time I checked 9/11 happened under a Republican. Oh and Clinton and Obama were not in bed with the Russians!
Martha Pickens here we go again. Just have to mention Clinton and Obama. Nothing better to come up with I guess! The defense of our nation should not be dependent on a lying, draft dodging con man. He would not know how to defend our nation nor does he have the mental capacity or intelligence to learn. You can‘t say that about Clinton or Obama. Funny how we are always less safe when it is a Republican President with the scare mongering! Last time I checked 9/11 happened under a Republican. Oh and Clinton and Obama were not in bed with the Russians!
No she-it? No wall equals no nation? What is it, you got a team of monkeys thinking of these slogans?
Do Not go for the 3 week open for a possible talk on some kind of border resolution. The Dems are Liars and do not go for it.
Trump is building a sheep coral to keep you all safe or the coyotes will get you BUILD THE WALL
Hold your ground! These traitors want another 20 million that we all end up paying for!!!
Forcing people to work, without pay, will help us cease to be a nation
Hey pussy-grab, remember that time you told us Mexico was going to pay for the wall?  Was that "fake news"?
Trump is making America crazy!...not great again!! Am I the only one who can see that!!
Hey pussy-grab, remember that time you told us Mexico was going to pay for the wall?  Was that "fake news"?
So walls are obsolete? What holds up your roof?
Forcing people to work, without pay, will help us cease to be a nation
So walls are obsolete? What holds up your roof?
trump is not a president he is a dictator wannabe, and is so uneducated he cannot see that a wall is obsolete, and  technology is the answer.
Exactly what the socialist commies want an globalist open borders society, well except for the rest of the nations. It only applies to us!
America coude do much better it coude be a country of biggest oportunities its nation coude do much better but America has been supporting to everyone around to millions of emigrants and many of them came to US just to live on peoples taxes Trump is the one who wants to stop this ! all he wants is to see his country grate !
We are not a nation now. We are a crybaby country.
National Emergency do it and stop talking about it..they will not budge so do what has to be done Mr. President.
#رسالة استغاثة من اهالي البصرة الى رئيس الولايات المتحدة الامريكية ترامب...الترجمة في الاسفل... A message of distress from the people of Basra province to the President of the United States of America. Trump respectable.  We are the people of Basra province. We ask you to rescue our province of Basra from the Militias  Gangs who have been stealing the oil of Basrah since 2003 and to this day, they are sending it to Iran and to the terrorist organizations that fund them with weapons. We have been carrying out large demonstrations against these gangs, but they respond to us with repression, torture, murder and assassination. We lack the simplest means of living, such as water and electricity. We demand reforms and appointments for the unemployed youth, many of them graduates and holders of higher diplomas, but the armed groups monopolize appointments for themselves and their parties and gangs. They are killing all those who speak a word and stand against them and they take the presidential palaces in the province of Basra, a place known to the Iraqis, and in the recent demonstrations have fired live bullets at the demonstrators and killed many innocent young people who claim their right, and the assassination of civilian activists In front of their homes and in the streets and markets, We are asking your presence to intervene quickly to rescue us from these dirty armed gangs. We know that the US military has entered Iraq and we welcome this very welcome because we believe that the US military has the ability to rescue Basra, Iraq and Iraqis from these gangs. We hope you will receive this message and respond. Because you are the only hope now for all Iraqis. Thank you Mr. Trump. Youth of Basrah Governorate...........  مترجم الى العربية. رسالة استغاثة من اهالي محافظة البصرة الى رئيس الولايات المتحدة الامريكية ترامب المحترم. نحن ابناء محافظة البصرة نطالبك بأنقاذ محافظتنا البصرة من العصابات المسلحة الذين يسرقون نفط البصرة منذ سنة 2003 والى يومنا هذا ويريسلونه الى ايران والى الجهات الارهابية التي تمولهم بالاسلحة. لقد قمنا بالتظاهرات الكبيرة ضد هذه العصابات ولكن كان القمع والتعذيب والقتل والاغتيالات هو الرد علينا, نحن تفتقد الى ابسط وسائل العيش مثل الماء والكهرباء, نحن نطالب بالاصلاح والتعيينات للشباب العاطل عن العمل وكثير منهم الخريجين واصحاب الشهادات العليا ولكن المجاميع المسلحة يحتكرون التعيينات لصالحهم ولصالح احزابهم وعصاباتهم, انهم يقومون بقتل كل من يتفوه بكلمة ويقف ضدهم وانهم يتخذون من القصور الرئاسية الموجودة في محافظة البصرة مقراً لهم وهو مكان معروف لدى العراقيين, وفي التظاهرات الاخيرة قاموا بأطلاق الرصاص الحي على المتظاهرين وقتلوا الكثير من الشباب العزل الابرياء الذين يطالبون بحقهم, وقاموا بأغتيال الناشطين المدنيين امام بيوتهم وفي الشوارع والاسواق, فنرجوا من حضرتك يا ايها الرئيس التدخل السريع لانقاذنا من هذه العصابات المسلحة القذرة, نحن لدينا علم بان الجيش الامريكي قد دخل الى العراق ونحن نرحب بذلك كل الترحيب لاننا نعتقد بأن الجيش الامريكي له القدرة على انقاذ البصرة والعراق والعراقيين من هذه العصابات الفاسدة, نأمل ان تصلك هذه الرسالة وتستجيب لنا لانك انت الامل الوحيد الان لكل العراقيين. شكراً سيادة الرئيس. شباب محافظة البصرة.  من بريد الصفحة كما وردت
You’re working for Putin and yourself, you don’t care about America. Resign, traitor.
#رسالة استغاثة من اهالي البصرة الى رئيس الولايات المتحدة الامريكية ترامب...الترجمة في الاسفل... A message of distress from the people of Basra province to the President of the United States of America. Trump respectable.  We are the people of Basra province. We ask you to rescue our province of Basra from the Militias  Gangs who have been stealing the oil of Basrah since 2003 and to this day, they are sending it to Iran and to the terrorist organizations that fund them with weapons. We have been carrying out large demonstrations against these gangs, but they respond to us with repression, torture, murder and assassination. We lack the simplest means of living, such as water and electricity. We demand reforms and appointments for the unemployed youth, many of them graduates and holders of higher diplomas, but the armed groups monopolize appointments for themselves and their parties and gangs. They are killing all those who speak a word and stand against them and they take the presidential palaces in the province of Basra, a place known to the Iraqis, and in the recent demonstrations have fired live bullets at the demonstrators and killed many innocent young people who claim their right, and the assassination of civilian activists In front of their homes and in the streets and markets, We are asking your presence to intervene quickly to rescue us from these dirty armed gangs. We know that the US military has entered Iraq and we welcome this very welcome because we believe that the US military has the ability to rescue Basra, Iraq and Iraqis from these gangs. We hope you will receive this message and respond. Because you are the only hope now for all Iraqis. Thank you Mr. Trump. Youth of Basrah Governorate...........  مترجم الى العربية. رسالة استغاثة من اهالي محافظة البصرة الى رئيس الولايات المتحدة الامريكية ترامب المحترم. نحن ابناء محافظة البصرة نطالبك بأنقاذ محافظتنا البصرة من العصابات المسلحة الذين يسرقون نفط البصرة منذ سنة 2003 والى يومنا هذا ويريسلونه الى ايران والى الجهات الارهابية التي تمولهم بالاسلحة. لقد قمنا بالتظاهرات الكبيرة ضد هذه العصابات ولكن كان القمع والتعذيب والقتل والاغتيالات هو الرد علينا, نحن تفتقد الى ابسط وسائل العيش مثل الماء والكهرباء, نحن نطالب بالاصلاح والتعيينات للشباب العاطل عن العمل وكثير منهم الخريجين واصحاب الشهادات العليا ولكن المجاميع المسلحة يحتكرون التعيينات لصالحهم ولصالح احزابهم وعصاباتهم, انهم يقومون بقتل كل من يتفوه بكلمة ويقف ضدهم وانهم يتخذون من القصور الرئاسية الموجودة في محافظة البصرة مقراً لهم وهو مكان معروف لدى العراقيين, وفي التظاهرات الاخيرة قاموا بأطلاق الرصاص الحي على المتظاهرين وقتلوا الكثير من الشباب العزل الابرياء الذين يطالبون بحقهم, وقاموا بأغتيال الناشطين المدنيين امام بيوتهم وفي الشوارع والاسواق, فنرجوا من حضرتك يا ايها الرئيس التدخل السريع لانقاذنا من هذه العصابات المسلحة القذرة, نحن لدينا علم بان الجيش الامريكي قد دخل الى العراق ونحن نرحب بذلك كل الترحيب لاننا نعتقد بأن الجيش الامريكي له القدرة على انقاذ البصرة والعراق والعراقيين من هذه العصابات الفاسدة, نأمل ان تصلك هذه الرسالة وتستجيب لنا لانك انت الامل الوحيد الان لكل العراقيين. شكراً سيادة الرئيس. شباب محافظة البصرة.  من بريد الصفحة كما وردت
Absolutely !!! The President of my country should protect, defend, & love the country he is Leader of.. And you are the 1st President that is doing it ! God Bless You !!! 🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸🇺🇸❤️❤️
Rose Lee what country are you from ?? America also needs a man like that
Dear Mr. President…please bring all of the Angel Families to the State of the Union address. Tell each individual story of horror, sadness and loss of a loved one. Go into detail. Then have the family stand holding the picture. When you are done with all the families, share all of the staggering facts you were told by border security agents. Crossings of people from countries other than Central America, Gang members, drug seizures, deaths from overdose; go into detail because most Americans are not aware of the true numbers. Then ask “if what I just said is true will are brave border patrol officers please stand to affirm those numbers as accurate”. Then on National TV declare the National Emergency and build the damn WALL. We are behind you 110%. Thank You for saving our country and trying to repair the devastating intentional damage caused by the previous administration. God Bless you and your entire family.
Rose Lee what country are you from ?? America also needs a man like that
Cindy Sue wrong about 11,000,000 illegal immigrants are currently in America only about 55% are Mexican but chump wont tell you that. Chump does not mention any illegal immigrants that have white skin.
Cindy Sue they don't care. They will argue to a brick wall that anchor babies (15k plus if tax payer pays for birth) free healthcare (worth $400+ a mo.), Gov assistance (welfare $300+ per family member a mo.), public schools (7k plus a year per child) doesn't cost us that much.  Over 200 billion a year is just to far fetched...rrrrright.
Fyi they take care of themselves for the most part. They work and pay over 300 billion in taxes.   http://immigrationimpact.com/2018/04/16/undocumented-immigrants-pay-taxes/
Cindy Sue no illegal immigrants do not get social security. Your so clueless! They pay their bills, they buy things, they work, they eat.  Just how do you think anyone that lives in America gets out of all taxes, work, and bills?   https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/fact-checker/wp/2016/08/20/trumps-false-claim-that-undocumented-immigrants-collect-social-security-benefits/?utm_term=.b87654fbfa1b
Another chump supporter informed, check.
Absolutely !!! The President of my country should protect, defend, & love the country he is Leader of.. And you are the 1st President that is doing it ! God Bless You !!! 🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸🇺🇸❤️❤️
If Americans of all "democrat" don't respect their own country, they can't demand respect from others!!!
Obvious you don’t care about people not getting paid  It’s all about you Donny
It amazes me how democrats are so unwilling to see any good in Trump even when he mimics all their favorites from the recent past. Some who want to run for President against him are truly dangerous. Beto wants to eliminate the constitution and others are willing to institute sharia law
Build a solid wall with electrifying razor wire on both sides all the way to the top.  The piece of crap that's there now is a joke.  I could climb over that
These are looking more and more like dictator propaganda posters. I’m totally out of this mess in 2020. This is why the GOP, and America is losing.
If you'll kindly stop spewing these chaotic defecations of reality about the border from your grass hut skull we can get to the higher priority of protecting our constitution from you,  Mr. Russian Asset.
If we don’t take care of our veterans who is going to protect the nation?   Why don’t you fix that first instead of a wall the majority don’t want.
Another chump supporter informed, check.
Start demanding equality .. Civil right of people give identies back to the people .. Stand up for people . every thing I have said spoke stated I have personal experiences in this ....people want justice for all .. Kids that are molested in foster care .. Human trafficking that occurs in our system . when reported nothing done just like someone using ur number and it being reported nothing done all the proof is there .....
Donnie  does that  include  our  northern  border  or  just  the  one  where  the  brown  people live  ?
Yes sir it is! Thank you so much for putting our country & the safety of American citizens first! Also, thank you for taking the time to meet with all the Angel moms who have PERMANENTLY been separated from their children and not ignoring or hiding from them like Nancy Pelosi did! God bless you sir for keeping your campaign promises and for standing firm on doing what is right! I know its been hard with the Democrats constantly opposing everything you work so hard to achieve for us, but God is with you! He sees it all, the way they treat you and how the MSM constantly lies and deceives! Many Americans are on your side as well and so many of us keep you, your beautiful family, and all those who are working for the good of this nation in our prayers! You are truly the peoples President!! We love you President Trump!! Keep fighting the good fight! #Trump2020Landslide 🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸
President Trump GOD is with you and so are the American people.  Praying for you, your family, staff, and the American people.
In all reality it should be all the crime happening in the United States you’re worried about stuff that hasn’t even happened yet
We will cease to be a nation the longer putin controls you.  Right now putin is in charge of our nation thanks to you,, traitor.....
If we don't get rid of Trump, we cease to be taken seriously as a nation.
Build  the  wall...Make the  SOTU  as  scheduled...America  FIRST!
Your highest and most important duty? How about right after your first priority of fleecing anyone and everyone of every last dollar you can? They don’t call you Don the Con in Manhattan for nothing Mr. President.
Peter Arnold  You r jeolous you don't have the ability that are Great President Trump has! Too,too bad! Keep pushing the Mc Donalds burgers and fries!
Sophie Tkacz Wildrick 😂 Holy Jesus I needed that belly laugh. Donald Trump was born into wealth. His first car was a limousine. He hasn’t wiped his own ass in decades. His handlers do it for him. What’s tragic though is you admire and worship  him. He’s nothing more than a two bit thief. He will go down in history as the most corrupt person to ever occupy the oval office. Live with that Sophie dear
Build  the  wall...Make the  SOTU  as  scheduled...America  FIRST!
If Americans can't defend themselves in their homes our borders won't matter! In 2016 you pledged to defend the 2A and now support Red Flag laws and an anti-gun AG! We'll remember this in 2020! #CONVENTIONOFSTATES
fb://nt_screen/FB-SCREEN-FB?a=%7B%22analytics_module%22%3A%22charitable_giving%22%2C%22title%22%3A%22Fundraisers%22%2C%22hide-search-field%22%3Atrue%2C%22pull-to-refresh-enabled%22%3Atrue%2C%22custom-story-render-location%22%3A%22fundraiser_page%22%7D&p=%2Ffundraiser%2F&q=%7B%22fundraiser_campaign_id%22%3A396590294410571%2C%22post_id%22%3A396599124409688%7D&b=%5B%5D
Tell the Democrats the Russian issue is a "manufactured crisis". And they come right Back at ya with "several thousand people invading our country is a manufactured Crisis."   Reminds me of childhood games.   "I am rubber.  You're glue.  Whatever you say sticks to you."   God, give me strength. And this is our government?
I've just realised. President Trump could apologise for all the things he's ever done "wrong" in the eyes of the left, post it on Facebook and people would still react with that laughing emoji
MR. A GREAT GENIUS PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP ALL COME TO THE TABLE LET ALL  SHARE THERE DESIGNED IDEAS ON HOW TO BUILD THE UNIQUE SPECIAL MONUMENT BORDER WALL. MAKE SURE IT GOES IN THE WORLD GUINNESS BOOKS  RECORD FOR ITS UNIQUENESS ECT. WE'RE WAY OVERDUE FOR ONE MORE WONDER . REMEMBER THE SEVEN WONDERS OF THE WORLD. DESIGN THE MONUMENT BORDER WALL WITH ALOT OF LOVE. BUILT THE MONUMENT BORDER WALL TO BECOME THE 8TH WONDERS OF THE WORLD !!!
INVITE A FEDERAL WORKER OVER FOR DINNER~  Trump is telling people who live paycheck to paycheck to "make adjustments" to live with no pay because he wants a wall.  You can’t adjust what you don’t have. One of the only good things to come out of this shutdown is that Trump is showing how out of touch and indifferent he is to the lives of ordinary people.
Dont back down. Declare a national emergency,  and do the job the unamerican democrats wont do. They should be the ones NOT GETTING PAID during a shutdown.
It’s the president right and is his first responsibility in his job to keep our home land secure for the safe of his citizens. Build the wall you are doing what they push you to do Mr president Donald trump. Keep strong and build the wall we all want the Big and safety Wall.
Funny how the government workers arent getting paid.... Similar to the many contract he defrauded trying NOT to pay the workers on his projects.. this is the dummies of middle americas doing chasing a reality star.. idiots
Sophie Tkacz Wildrick 😂 Holy Jesus I needed that belly laugh. Donald Trump was born into wealth. His first car was a limousine. He hasn’t wiped his own ass in decades. His handlers do it for him. What’s tragic though is you admire and worship  him. He’s nothing more than a two bit thief. He will go down in history as the most corrupt person to ever occupy the oval office. Live with that Sophie dear
Funny how the government workers arent getting paid.... Similar to the many contract he defrauded trying NOT to pay the workers on his projects.. this is the dummies of middle americas doing chasing a reality star.. idiots
Engnr Abdiqani Boodhle ,No BUT sure look great on YOU IDIOT.
It’s the president right and is his first responsibility in his job to keep our home land secure for the safe of his citizens. Build the wall you are doing what they push you to do Mr president Donald trump. Keep strong and build the wall we all want the Big and safety Wall.
Engnr Abdiqani Boodhle ,No BUT sure look great on YOU IDIOT.
Isn't idiot your nickname prsdnt? 😂😂
if so,why are your people in foreign countries...Afganistan,Sirija....and  are conducting violence and crime,especially drugs which they bring to U.S.A
DISGUSTING - MORE GOP LIES Thousands More Migrant Children Likely Taken From Families Than First Reported  https://www.nytimes.com/2019/01/17/us/migrant-children-inspector-general-family-separation.html?emc=edit_na_20190117&nl=breaking-news&nlid=53388860ing-news&ref=cta&fbclid=IwAR1mviIZgwrvygJMSq3rrn_7Q9_FSB85QMZBjSZfM98gWpOBtMuuDH406sY
Some Suggest, Shutting Down the Legilatures funding.  Unfortunately Trump signed a bill to fund the Legislature before the shutdown.  Legislators have the power to get things passed even if the President Veto's it.  Regular government workers have no such power.  All Trump asked is that Congress send him a package that includes $5 Billion for a Wall for Our Border Security and he will sign it, and the DEMS refuse.
If we dont defend our democracy, we end up with a white nationalist dictator like you. RESIGN-do it now, get yr pardon and GET OUT of the people's house!!
Since you stole the Presidency that’s when the US ceased to be a nation !!! Get it !!!
makes sense. when you put up the wall put pelosi on the other side of it. thanks in advance.
Then why didn’t you get your wall the last two years when Republicans controlled the House and Senate? It’s only an issue now to take attention off the investigation of you- and create chaos as Democrats take over the House
Cam Fedun Senior next election Northern friend...I hope your Country gets away from the liberal agenda happening currently. You guys need someone like Trump. He is a fighter, but the liberal agenda is thick here...its very irritating to say the least 🙄
YOU'RE RIGHT AS USUAL PRESIDENT TRUMP
Stop congresses pay they will be willing to come to an agreement than!  Stand strong president Trump!  Just reopen the rest of government like they want and shut down congress! They will stop fighting you than!  You’ve done what they want by opening up the govt but until they can act like adults they get no pay!  Problem solved!  If they all quit than swamp is clean!
Amen! Keep Standing Your Ground! So proud of you President Trump!
Please keep America Shutdown! More Federal Employees hating you 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂❤️
Please keep America Shutdown! More Federal Employees hating you 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂❤️
When have we stopped defended our borders. Maybe when you closed the government?  Are you trying to create a problem so you can justify the wall.
And fix the voting system. Or all is lost by democrat socialists & Soros cheating.
Then why didn’t you get your wall the last two years when Republicans controlled the House and Senate? It’s only an issue now to take attention off the investigation of you- and create chaos as Democrats take over the House
2nd - doing something with the people who call you names-- 2020
STAND YOUR GROUND! BUILD THE WALL! SCREW THE DEMS! CALL FOR A NATIONAL SECURITY EMERGENCY NOW!
use El Chapo's $ to build the Wall
If only the Dems would admit the truth about border security.
I just read these pro trump comments and it really is just amazing, hook  line  and sinker
I certainly want to hear the State of the Union Address, so don’t let Pelosi intimidate you, and deny this to the Patriots of the USA.
A Trump government shutdown should NEVER be used as a negotiation.
we all know Chucks Anal dildo collection says "made in Mexico" .
Build the Wall! Trump 2020!
Are you really suggesting the USA will collapse without a wall? How weak ARE you?
No. Protect, defend, and uphold the CONSTITUTION is your highest priority.
Are you really suggesting the USA will collapse without a wall? How weak ARE you?
Barbara Davis That would be awesome!
Build the Wall! Trump 2020!
Barbara Davis That would be awesome!
This will be Trump's biggest problem. He is demonizing Democrats, but since the House now has a Democratic majority, he can't get a single bill passed if he can't get any Democrats to vote with him.
Phoebe Cassandra Smith and even though I'm not a great Trump fan I think this politics as usual is a disgrace to this country. The Democrats can end the shutdown just as easily as the president can there's absolutely no doubt about that. and I'm not asking them to go against their own beliefs I'm just asking them to think about coming up with a compromise for something that they themselves have pushed over the past 10 years.
I would love to see a "fireside chat" on TV, with only the American people. No press, no Congress and definitely no papers sent to Pelosi ahead of time.
your ego is in the way of doing what is right for the country. I will be glad when the republicans grow a pair and do what they know is right SHUT YOU DOWN ! what a waste of space and air
Cure For PTSD  Rub dab of coconut oil on  2 inch circle  Top of brain stem on back of head  NOW Rub rice size dosage of RSO into circle  ✌️☮️✌️☮️✌️
BREAKING: Former Trump lawyer Michael Cohen asserts that he paid a tech firm to rig online polls in Trump's favor during the 2016 campaign "at the direction of and the sole benefit of" Trump.  It's clear that Trump and his cronies will go to extreme lengths to undermine our elections and bury the truth.
Phoebe Cassandra Smith and even though I'm not a great Trump fan I think this politics as usual is a disgrace to this country. The Democrats can end the shutdown just as easily as the president can there's absolutely no doubt about that. and I'm not asking them to go against their own beliefs I'm just asking them to think about coming up with a compromise for something that they themselves have pushed over the past 10 years.
But we're not being attacked. Mexico and Canada are our allies, in spite of your many attempts to antagonize them. They have not declared war on us.  If you want to spend billions on defending our nation, spend it on effective, evidence-based ways to treat drug addiction. Spend it on mitigating and adapting to climate change.
trumpneill spend his life giving rallies telling everyone the USA is going down the rabbit hole cause hole cause  he is no  longer prez .
Right  so  are  you  going  to  build  a  wall  on  our  northern  border  ?  Or  just  a  border  between  us  and  the  brown  people  ?
Real terrorist is not the Latino look at 9/11 who was the real terrorist Islamics and now when have one in the white house who is destroying our rights our families he cuts out free lunch and now food stamps for what a wall that's why we have brothers and sisters in arms
R.I.P. United States of America!!! You raised the cost of living so high that both parents are always at work, rather than spending time with their children (single parents stand no chance). You took God out of schools. Parents were told 'No you can't discipline your kids'. Well, America, our kids are disrespectful. You shall reap what you sow, and we have lost a whole generation and turned them into rude, selfish, brats who have no respect for people, property or authority! You deemed people with terminal illnesses and some with only a few months to live…fit for work!!! You allow our veterans of war to go homeless and hungry but give out millions to foreign aid!!! You save drug addicts over and over again but refuse to give free diabetic supplies. You bend over backwards to be politically correct, too scared to say enough is enough, in case you offend. You put the retirement age up so people must work until they drop!! People depend on handouts and food banks, while we give aid to others who can work for it. Our retired generation rely on inadequate state pensions, their thanks for working hard. Things need to change!
No reason we can't build our Wall, continue supporting our Kurdish allies in the Middle East, And investigate Nancy Pelosi (treason?) on why she would rather shut down our government than spend just 5 billion on Border Security!!
Oh lovely,lam happy to hear this powerful comments by USA action president trump,sir,truly you are dependable,and can be trusted.
You are a Russian operative!  The KGB said it would destroy the USA from the inside and you're how they're doing it!
What nation always over the top in every thing you do losers.
If you don’t pay your employees you cease being human.
Dr. T.D. Tommy,"Much of the aerial perspective is a system that it is a place." go.nasa.gov
Cannot do it  money comes from congress. He is a multi billionaire. If he wants it that bad, pay for it, with his own money.
What a great gift it is to finally have a president who believes his most sacred duty as President of the US is to defend and protect America! #KAG! Behind you 10,000% #BuildThatWall
Bull as president you seem to only be interested in making money for yourself and to hell with the people who pay your salary
Please end the shut down... Put more energy into the these 800,000+ Americans that need you to end this so they can work... This is detrimental for our economy and our lively hood... that's  almost 1 million people out of jobs, that's not what you promised, please put your pride away and do the right thing by us...that's almost 6 billion we could use for so much more for our country , that is more important than a wall
Obama gives 150 billion $$$'s to IRAN and President Trump cannot even secure 5.7 billion $$$'s for the WALL/FENCE/BOLLARD - what is wrong with this picture?????  GO PRESIDENT TRUMP and stop NANCY and CHUCKIE.   🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
If that dip sh*t Pelosi & her caucus are so worried about people not being paid, she would park her Liberal a** in a chair in a meeting with the President ready to compromise. The reality is she does NOT care. She ONLY cares about making sure President Trump doesn’t fulfill his promises to Americans. 😡  It’s time President Trump had a ‘Come to Jesus Meeting’ with Pelosi & Schumer to remind them of their job descriptions & remind them who is the President of the United States of America. Those two dingle berries have forgotten their place! 😡
🇱🇷❤️'s  President Donald J. Trump  Thank you for all you do!
ISIS is not coming through the southern border... they are attempting to FLY in... Let's build a ceiling !
What nation always over the top in every thing you do losers.
Stop saying the Dems don't want border security. It's a lie. They want EVERYTHING, including sections of wall where needed, except a useless waste of money from SD to Brownsville. And, please, Trump fans, read/listen to something else besides POtuS, Faux, etc. THEY ARE NOT TELLING YOU THE TRUTH. YOU LIVE IN A FANTASY WORLD.
if we cease to be a nation then there is a world full of rogue soldiers
Rogue - vagrant Tramp
Stop saying the Dems don't want border security. It's a lie. They want EVERYTHING, including sections of wall where needed, except a useless waste of money from SD to Brownsville. And, please, Trump fans, read/listen to something else besides POtuS, Faux, etc. THEY ARE NOT TELLING YOU THE TRUTH. YOU LIVE IN A FANTASY WORLD.
"There is nothing manufactured about children arriving at our borders dehydrated and sick. There is nothing manufactured about migrants being exploited and abused by human traffickers. There is nothing manufactured about lethal drugs pouring across our border." ~Sec Nielson WOW
Trump, just saw released photos of various slat wall designs you've supported where the we're defeated with saws...  Middles of the fences just missing?   Why are you suppressing these failures and still promoting this failed technology that now has been shown not to work?  Is this yet another Trump Inc deal with some builders?
Indeed!!!! God bless and keep you Mr.president. Thank you!!!!
you to https://www.cnn.com/2019/01/17/politics/trump-team-prepares-response-mueller-report/index.html.
As an African and living in Africa, I think The President is 100% right in building a wall. Protecting your country  is your duty sir. All those fighting to enter USA illegally should return and work for the betterment of their countries.  I have only one plea from you sir, Help us institute good governance in Africa. That way Africans will not be trying to enter USA or any other country illegally.  Courage and Bravoooo
I appreciate your defending us.   We’re up against people who actually want us to cease to be a nation.  They refer to us as “nationalists”, using the term (which I consider to be patriotic) disparagingly.   They loved Barack Hussein Obama — he was a citizen of the world who bowed before Arab princes.  These people are our enemies.
Agreed. Why do people have walls and locks in their houses ? This country is American home. It should be protected
Rogue - vagrant Tramp
Every Custodian of a Country should have to say this confirmation to his Countrymen, I see nothing wrong with His Excellency President Trump here. Well done.
Mr.  President Donald J. Trump please take note. Dale Jelinek said and I agree 100%.    "Trump/Sarah Sanders should have a sign always at hand that reads something like:  "For the xxth day in a row, the White House invited Chuck Schumer and Nancy Pelosi to a working lunch today to discuss the border security and government shutdown. They once again refused to attend. The invitation was extended to lunch tomorrow as well." The daily press briefing should start and end with that message. Mr. President Donald J. Trump  should say it whenever a microphone is shoved in his face.  For myself Mr. President Donald J. Trump, I stand behind you 100%. The Union should be standing behind their workers with a fund for strikes shutdowns etc.  It's not like this issue isn't threatened 2x a year every year for the last 22 years.  If they don't have catastrophic events coverage for their members they are not protecting their members in the spirit of what a union is supposed to be for.
🐄💩  that's another lie so many vital personnel being furloughed because the government shutdown you're not interested in true security of this country you're interested in keeping your 2020 vote because Fox called you out on your stupid wall
Thank Russia for this stooge,,and dumb people that voted for him,
It is funny all this started when you started is you are doing the same thing they did in the 50 and 60 trying to keep people afraid
That's why his best friend is our ally, you know, because he cares about our safety and all
This is the stupidest post I’ve seen in a long time.  Is he trying to pretend he’s some sort of hero?
Do you really care about America or Americans or is it just the money? I see that your going to greatly increase pollution, your going to allow more asbestos from Russia btw and stop testing for it. How is this better for Americans?
Agreed. Why do people have walls and locks in their houses ? This country is American home. It should be protected
Do you really care about America or Americans or is it just the money? I see that your going to greatly increase pollution, your going to allow more asbestos from Russia btw and stop testing for it. How is this better for Americans?


This is the stupidest post I’ve seen in a long time.  Is he trying to pretend he’s some sort of hero?

From 2009 through 2014, there was a net loss of Mexicans. More migrants left the US than came here. Who was President back then?
Phoebe Cassandra Smith we are talking about NOW. There are caravans coming. Not all immigrants are Mexican.

Phoebe Cassandra Smith we are talking about NOW. There are caravans coming. Not all immigrants are Mexican.
Who's going to defend us from Russia
Fred Shope our media is the immediate threat. China and Russia are just sitting back and waiting for us to destroy ourselves from within. Then they move in without firing a shot. If you happen to be a liberal you are aiding in the process.
From 2009 through 2014, there was a net loss of Mexicans. More migrants left the US than came here. Who was President back then?
Trump didn't you say Isis was destroyed??? yet again you know nothing, Pay your own first ,they do not all have a millionaire DADDY to bail them out like you had.
So you stopped paying the Coast Guard. Yep. You're smart.
Precisely!! the first order of the President is to keep this nation safe.
This piece of s*** can leave the White House at any time you really care about America when you're not paying the same people you swore to protect.  How is somebody supposed to live without the money you don't give a s*** about America if you did then work with the Democrats at some point or at least are paying the federal employees for the jobs they are doing for your America
Still not  sure why the border is such a crisis right now!  Why wasn't something done during the 2 years you controlled both houses?!?   Something is not right here....   OH!   I know what it is!  You're using federal employees as pawns in a political game!   I know you care NOTHING about those citizens not getting paid because how many times have you done this in years and decades past?!?    Well done 45, running this country like your businesses... Into the ground that it!     #FailedPresident #CaresNotAboutCitizens
Fred Shope our media is the immediate threat. China and Russia are just sitting back and waiting for us to destroy ourselves from within. Then they move in without firing a shot. If you happen to be a liberal you are aiding in the process.
Why is Nancy Pelosi living in a house that is fenced in and in a gated community? What a hypocrite.
Then why would you tweet about a trip government officials are planning on taking to afghanistan?  You're such a petty, vindictive man.
You are doing a GREAT and really hard job with all the internal enemies you have to contend with in the USA.My family and I will definitely vote a straight Republican ticket in 2020 as we need bout 8 more years of President Trump at least. Dems are really indifferent  to the suffering and of USA citizens and do not care bout their safety nor  their welfare.
you’ve posted this meme 57 times already. chill out grandpa....
The fact that demorats hate you more than they love the american people says volumes.  Ill never vote demorat as long as i breathe but once im dead im sure to vote democrat!
He needs to hit his head on every brick of the wall he wants to build
Don’t always agree with our President on many issues - believe he’s absolutely RIGHt on this. This is another security measure. Just like cyber threats etc.  These initiatives need to be funded. And by doing so does not make our country less generous.  The generosity of this country is being misused by nefarious folks who are creating a bad name for the good, honest people. Also a wall is better than waging war on people - it doesn’t kill people and actually creates jobs.  If the Democrats are making this such a big issue then they should stop all this Russian interference talk - lift all the funding to cyber security and other types of security.
We should force democrats who dont want a wall to pay for it, sort of like Obamacare
We've been defending our borders for hundreds of years. We will always defend our borders. Stop trying to create a fake crisis to distract from your obvious Russian collusion and conspiracy.  https://www.thedailybeast.com/cohen-hired-it-firm-to-rig-online-polls-for-trump-says-report?source=articles&via=rss
Why aren't Texans along the border more interested in building miles and miles of walls along more than a 1000 miles of unfenced border? Land ownership issues?
you had the senate, congress, and presidency from 2016-2018...so are you saying you were not defending the country for two years???  you said Mexico would pay for the wall, now you want to force US to....
Trump keep firm.  Evil is unashamed.  Everybody who voted for you are votin for you again
Agree, we also need to pull out of the Middle East. It appears Isreal has been arming Hilary’s creation ISIS. We don’t know who we are fighting over there, not worth shedding any more blood of our children for oil and other nations regional ambitions.
Hold the line, Mr. President.   The caravan is coming -- it will be another powerful example of why we need to secure our borders!
The Narendra Modi of USA
Real News: On Saturday night, Breitbart panned Mr. Trump’s latest idea with the headline “Three-Year Amnesty, Most of Border Remains Open.”  In Trump’s Immigration Announcement, a Compromise Snubbed All Around  President Trump offered on Saturday to trade temporary protections for about one million immigrants at risk of deportation in exchange for border wall funding.  By Julie Hirschfeld Davis Jan. 19, 2019 WASHINGTON — Immigrant advocates denounced it as cruel. The conservative right howled that it was amnesty.  What President Trump billed on Saturday as a compromise to end the country’s longest government shutdown pleased neither the Democratic congressional leaders whose buy-in he needs to strike a deal nor the core supporters whose backing has always been at the heart of his insistence on a border wall.  Instead, in offering temporary protections for about one million immigrants at risk of deportation in exchange for funding for a wall, Mr. Trump did something rarely seen during his presidency. He tried to reach beyond his base of supporters — which polls have begun to show is losing patience with him as the partial shutdown drags into its fifth week — and speak to a broader swath of Americans.  The Saturday afternoon speech from the West Wing was an attempt by Mr. Trump to, at the very least, shift the narrative of the past several weeks and show that rather than spoiling for a longer shutdown fight or making unreasonable demands, he was looking for a broadly acceptable way out of a morass he once boasted he was proud to wade into.  “I think you could tell by the president’s remarks today,” Vice President Mike Pence said, “that we’re reaching out.”  Yet in seeking to inch toward the center, Mr. Trump alienated portions of his hard-right base, the core supporters he most depends on and the group he and his closest aides have most feared losing. That raised the possibility that, in his zeal to get out of an intractable situation, he may have landed himself in the worst of all worlds, without a clear solution or the support of his most ardent followers.  The tensions and anger over the policy have been quietly playing out in the West Wing as well, as Jared Kushner, the president’s son-in-law and senior adviser, fended off Stephen Miller, the architect of much of Mr. Trump’s immigration agenda. Mr. Kushner has long been a proponent of protections for undocumented immigrants brought to the United States as children, while Mr. Miller has pressed for aggressive measures to crack down on both legal and illegal immigration.  In recent days, as White House officials had been working out the details of the compromise, Mr. Miller intervened to narrow the universe of immigrants who would receive protection, according to people familiar with the internal discussions who described them on the condition of anonymity.  While the original idea had been to include protections for as many as 1.8 million undocumented immigrants eligible for Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals, the Obama-era program known as DACA that protected those illegally brought to the United States as children, Mr. Trump ultimately proposed shielding only the 700,000 who are enrolled.  Mr. Kushner conceded in a briefing after the president’s speech that he did not see the proposal as a solution for the DACA program, which Mr. Trump moved to rescind in 2017.  “At this moment in time,” Mr. Kushner said, “this is a good path forward.”  Many conservatives did not share that view.  “Trump proposes amnesty,” the conservative commentator Ann Coulter said on Twitter. “We voted for Trump and got Jeb!” she added, referring to Jeb Bush, who challenged Mr. Trump for the Republican nomination in 2016 and supported a broad immigration overhaul that would have given undocumented immigrants a path to legal status.  Still, in the eyes of many White House officials, the prospect that Mr. Trump could use the proposal to shift blame for the shutdown and pressure Democrats to end the impasse was worth trying. Mr. Pence argued on Saturday that the speech was a “sincere effort” by Mr. Trump to break the logjam, and he and other White House officials suggested that the measure could attract enough support to succeed from centrist Democrats fed up with the shutdown and willing to side with Republicans.  But such a coalition did not appear to be forming, and courting one bears considerable risk for a president who is most comfortable when he is defying convention, eschewing compromise and being hailed as a hero by supporters who often equate bipartisan deal making with weak-kneed capitulation.  The vast majority of Democrats knocked the approach. While many of them have pressed for measures to protect DACA recipients and immigrants living in the United States under Temporary Protected Status enacted when their countries were destabilized by war or catastrophe, most regard the proposal he put forth on Saturday as woefully inadequate. It offers only three years of protections for the DACA recipients and those who hold T.P.S., which the Trump administration has also moved to end for several countries.  “This is not an amnesty bill,” Mr. Pence said. “There is no pathway to citizenship in this proposal.”  That was high on Speaker Nancy Pelosi’s list of reasons to call the plan “unacceptable.”  That is unlikely to matter to the president. Despite saying publicly last month that he would be proud to own a shutdown over the wall, and privately displaying confidence that his base would stick with him through the fight, Mr. Trump has been dismayed to find otherwise in recent days.  An NPR poll released last week showed Mr. Trump’s approval ratings down and the first cracks in backing among critical supporters, including whites without a college education and white evangelicals.  Such pressure from what he has called the forgotten men and women who elected him and chant “Build! The! Wall!” at his arena rallies has swayed Mr. Trump before, including last year, when the conservative news site Breitbart branded him “Amnesty Don” for considering a similar deal that would have provided $25 billion in wall funding for a path to legal status for those the DACA program was created to help. The president ultimately abandoned that agreement, concerned about angering his base and after Mr. Miller and others advised him he should insist on additional immigration restrictions.
you are great bain
We should force democrats who dont want a wall to pay for it, sort of like Obamacare
you are great bain
Michael Peterman, what’s incredible is Trump is asking about 1/60th of what the annual interest is alone on the 22 trillion we are in debt. Let that sink in!
Real News: On Saturday night, Breitbart panned Mr. Trump’s latest idea with the headline “Three-Year Amnesty, Most of Border Remains Open.”  In Trump’s Immigration Announcement, a Compromise Snubbed All Around  President Trump offered on Saturday to trade temporary protections for about one million immigrants at risk of deportation in exchange for border wall funding.  By Julie Hirschfeld Davis Jan. 19, 2019 WASHINGTON — Immigrant advocates denounced it as cruel. The conservative right howled that it was amnesty.  What President Trump billed on Saturday as a compromise to end the country’s longest government shutdown pleased neither the Democratic congressional leaders whose buy-in he needs to strike a deal nor the core supporters whose backing has always been at the heart of his insistence on a border wall.  Instead, in offering temporary protections for about one million immigrants at risk of deportation in exchange for funding for a wall, Mr. Trump did something rarely seen during his presidency. He tried to reach beyond his base of supporters — which polls have begun to show is losing patience with him as the partial shutdown drags into its fifth week — and speak to a broader swath of Americans.  The Saturday afternoon speech from the West Wing was an attempt by Mr. Trump to, at the very least, shift the narrative of the past several weeks and show that rather than spoiling for a longer shutdown fight or making unreasonable demands, he was looking for a broadly acceptable way out of a morass he once boasted he was proud to wade into.  “I think you could tell by the president’s remarks today,” Vice President Mike Pence said, “that we’re reaching out.”  Yet in seeking to inch toward the center, Mr. Trump alienated portions of his hard-right base, the core supporters he most depends on and the group he and his closest aides have most feared losing. That raised the possibility that, in his zeal to get out of an intractable situation, he may have landed himself in the worst of all worlds, without a clear solution or the support of his most ardent followers.  The tensions and anger over the policy have been quietly playing out in the West Wing as well, as Jared Kushner, the president’s son-in-law and senior adviser, fended off Stephen Miller, the architect of much of Mr. Trump’s immigration agenda. Mr. Kushner has long been a proponent of protections for undocumented immigrants brought to the United States as children, while Mr. Miller has pressed for aggressive measures to crack down on both legal and illegal immigration.  In recent days, as White House officials had been working out the details of the compromise, Mr. Miller intervened to narrow the universe of immigrants who would receive protection, according to people familiar with the internal discussions who described them on the condition of anonymity.  While the original idea had been to include protections for as many as 1.8 million undocumented immigrants eligible for Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals, the Obama-era program known as DACA that protected those illegally brought to the United States as children, Mr. Trump ultimately proposed shielding only the 700,000 who are enrolled.  Mr. Kushner conceded in a briefing after the president’s speech that he did not see the proposal as a solution for the DACA program, which Mr. Trump moved to rescind in 2017.  “At this moment in time,” Mr. Kushner said, “this is a good path forward.”  Many conservatives did not share that view.  “Trump proposes amnesty,” the conservative commentator Ann Coulter said on Twitter. “We voted for Trump and got Jeb!” she added, referring to Jeb Bush, who challenged Mr. Trump for the Republican nomination in 2016 and supported a broad immigration overhaul that would have given undocumented immigrants a path to legal status.  Still, in the eyes of many White House officials, the prospect that Mr. Trump could use the proposal to shift blame for the shutdown and pressure Democrats to end the impasse was worth trying. Mr. Pence argued on Saturday that the speech was a “sincere effort” by Mr. Trump to break the logjam, and he and other White House officials suggested that the measure could attract enough support to succeed from centrist Democrats fed up with the shutdown and willing to side with Republicans.  But such a coalition did not appear to be forming, and courting one bears considerable risk for a president who is most comfortable when he is defying convention, eschewing compromise and being hailed as a hero by supporters who often equate bipartisan deal making with weak-kneed capitulation.  The vast majority of Democrats knocked the approach. While many of them have pressed for measures to protect DACA recipients and immigrants living in the United States under Temporary Protected Status enacted when their countries were destabilized by war or catastrophe, most regard the proposal he put forth on Saturday as woefully inadequate. It offers only three years of protections for the DACA recipients and those who hold T.P.S., which the Trump administration has also moved to end for several countries.  “This is not an amnesty bill,” Mr. Pence said. “There is no pathway to citizenship in this proposal.”  That was high on Speaker Nancy Pelosi’s list of reasons to call the plan “unacceptable.”  That is unlikely to matter to the president. Despite saying publicly last month that he would be proud to own a shutdown over the wall, and privately displaying confidence that his base would stick with him through the fight, Mr. Trump has been dismayed to find otherwise in recent days.  An NPR poll released last week showed Mr. Trump’s approval ratings down and the first cracks in backing among critical supporters, including whites without a college education and white evangelicals.  Such pressure from what he has called the forgotten men and women who elected him and chant “Build! The! Wall!” at his arena rallies has swayed Mr. Trump before, including last year, when the conservative news site Breitbart branded him “Amnesty Don” for considering a similar deal that would have provided $25 billion in wall funding for a path to legal status for those the DACA program was created to help. The president ultimately abandoned that agreement, concerned about angering his base and after Mr. Miller and others advised him he should insist on additional immigration restrictions.
Trump suborned perjury which is a very serious crime.
as I lay off the boarder patrol airport security the coast guard and the fbi. You sheep are hopeless!!
A lot of you are absolutely delusional.
President Trump - you are loved by the American people and you have our prayers and support! Thank you for wanting to keep us all safe! The Lord is on your side - God bless you and keep pressing forward! Trump 2020 <3
Well said Sir, Donald J. Trump
TRUMP ALL THE WAY 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸BUILD THE WALL
Um...defending the Constitution comes first...it says so in the oath you swore.
Is there not some way of removing Nancy p and chuck as part of them obstructing national security and causing a risk to all in America
Michael Peterman, what’s incredible is Trump is asking about 1/60th of what the annual interest is alone on the 22 trillion we are in debt. Let that sink in!
Is there not some way of removing Nancy p and chuck as part of them obstructing national security and causing a risk to all in America
Stop with the hostage talk I want my country secured, period
Nicki Michelle Literally not one person is saying the country shouldn't be secured... this is about nothing but an unneeded vanity wall... there are better ways to spend billions of dollars
Jon Chiusano you were dancing on rooftops in jersey on 9/11 weren’t you Juan?
Mark Parsons typical Trump supporter response. Conspiracy theories and name calling. By the way none of those terrorist crossed over the southern border. Planes fly over walls
Um...defending the Constitution comes first...it says so in the oath you swore.
Hang in there Mr. President. Mail them you State of the Union, you won't have to put up with the shout outs, and bad behavior from the Dems and then the press after. Instead have a rally....and show them the people who appreciate the work you are doing to protect our borders.
God bless you Donald J. Trump.
Well, going by the way you -or your staff- has suddenly started posting ralley-rhetoric multiple times per day on this FB page you knew your falsehood-filled con job speech didn't work.
This man obviously doesn't know there is more than one way to protect our borders. We live in a world of electronic aids and plenty of service men to protect our borders. He is obeying the orders of Fox News and his base. You know those folks he bragged about being able to Con. He doesn't care about the destruction he brings to our people.
I SAY THOSE WHO DON'T MUCH CARE FOR THE WALL GO AHEAD AND LEAVE YOUR DOORS AND WINDOWS UNLOCKED...
Hirona ,Harris and Feinstein need to check themselves on their ANTI CATHOLIC tone It is disgraceful. They need to read up on the history of the Klan In America and how they persecuted Roman Catholics.
If our president is in the pockets of Russia, we cease to be a nation.
Mark Parsons typical Trump supporter response. Conspiracy theories and name calling. By the way none of those terrorist crossed over the southern border. Planes fly over walls
If our president is in the pockets of Russia, we cease to be a nation.
We will only be closer to a Nation until the Non American democrats defeat you and us Deplorables. I Pray for God to help you restore USA 🇺🇸 and bring Pelosi and Schumer under His Control for the BETTER of All People. 🙏🇺🇸
Hirona ,Harris and Feinstein need to check themselves on their ANTI CATHOLIC tone It is disgraceful. They need to read up on the history of the Klan In America and how they persecuted Roman Catholics.
The wall wasn't that important  2 years  ago when the Republicans were a majority.  Just now so he can fight with the Democrats
Imagine if Trump fined everyone who doesn't want the wall. Kinda like obama did with obamacare.....
trai·tor  noun a person who betrays a friend, country, principle, etc. "they see me as a traitor, a sellout to the enemy" synonyms:	betrayer, back-stabber, double-crosser, double-dealer, renegade, Judas, quisling, fifth columnist, viper;
You are the single biggest threat to our nation in history.
So you are a hypocrite.
Mr. President,  Sir,  You Perfectly Perform  your Duties to AMERICA Above & Beyond the Call of Duty. You are a Righteous Commander & Chief.  GOD Bless you,  Sir.
Oh, go grow one, Donald. Your most important duty was pretty null and void when you deferred . . .  what was it . . .  five times? What a useless excuse of a man!
James Hindle shut up, boomer. Your generation screwed up America...let it heal from your cancer
James Hindle plus...you’re Canadian. What a joke
Lee Grant  And you're a fool, or a bot. Are you so stupid that you think the rest of the world isn't affected by your country's activities or your mentally retarded President? Get a life, idiot!
Mr. President,  Sir,  You Perfectly Perform  your Duties to AMERICA Above & Beyond the Call of Duty. You are a Righteous Commander & Chief.  GOD Bless you,  Sir.
Lee Grant  And you're a fool, or a bot. Are you so stupid that you think the rest of the world isn't affected by your country's activities or your mentally retarded President? Get a life, idiot!
Obie sent it to his terrorist friends in Iran.
Jill Travassos Call 1800 344 8082 press 1 to Demand THE Wall
James Hindle plus...you’re Canadian. What a joke
Who ever thought that ‘Winning!’ would include so many -Lawsuits -Indictments -Criminal investigations -Testimony  -Dollars in debt -Fear mongering -Brainwashed lemmings  MAGA
Why not just make it a felony with a minimum of 30 years in prison for employers (or anyone) that hire illegals.
Yes, as President and Commander in Chief the safety and security of the Nation is your top priority.  Not handouts and not making friends.  Stay tough on this issue, we need it!  We won't see another no-nonsense president like you in my lifetime.
They altered the picture to make him look thinner they even tried to make his little fingers longer LOL what a phony
I cannot wait until your term is over or you get impeached. You're sick.
Jill Travassos Call 1800 344 8082 press 1 to Demand THE Wall
I cannot wait until your term is over or you get impeached. You're sick.
Every go through the emojis and look at the few laugh and andrybfaces and realize they are all foreigners lmao
Bob Dinius  No, I haven't.  But you thought of checking didn't you?  Why is that, you think?
Timothy Norton justvwanted tonsee who would laugh and be angry over defending our country.
As an observer I will point out to others who are having a problem realizing what you are doing for America.  I am completely and utterly bewildered that immigration reform has not been addressed for a couple of decades.and has been allowed to escalate out of control and affects every aspect in the lives of legal American citizens. Please stand strong , you President Trump are honoring the oath you took when you were elected.. and that speaks volumes.
؜We must construe that wall on the southern border. Now the new president of Mexico is a declared socialist, admirer of Chavez, Venezuela, and Castros Cuba. When Mexico enters the classic Communist socialist crisis of the Cuba type, the ordas of Mexicans fleeing from Mexico through the border will be of biblical proportions. Remember the exodos of Cubans to USA, exodos of Venezuelans to the USA, from Nicaragua to the USA, ETC and these countries are NOT border with USA, analyze this.
Then quit holding the nation hostage. The terrorist trump shutdown is the biggest threat to our safety, but you don't care about that so it's clear Americans safety has nothing to do with this issue. Walls don't work! #ImpeachHim. https://www.usatoday.com/border-wall/story/drug-trafficking-smuggling-cartels-tunnels/559814001/
https://thehill.com/opinion/immigration/393675-americans-have-been-played-again-by-open-border-advocates?amp Americans have been played again by open-border advocates
why not do it before the tax cuts fir the filthy rich
If you're a Democrat you are fighting for your own demise. If you don't believe me just keep an eye on the news the next couple months or so.
"I" am VERY happy with the job the President has done so far, but REALLY feel "the wall" decision is  a "BAD ONE"...! Hopefully, He knows what He is doing...as "HE" will have to answer for it,,,!!  "I" don't believe "a campaign promise" OR "that "THIS" is the right path to pursue"..is a VALID reason...!! We "ALL".. just want what is right..!
He's working hard at staying in line with the Constitutional requirement to protect our citizens. If those who were charged with the same effort work against the law, how can they not be charged for a violation of neglect of duty? Are we a nation of laws or not?
Timothy Norton justvwanted tonsee who would laugh and be angry over defending our country.
If the defense of our nation is your highest and most important duty, END THE SHUTDOWN! Then we can have a civil discussion about border protection.
I would hold the SOTU address in the White House and invite key Senators and Congresspeople.  And ignore Pelosi and her minions as if they did not exist.
Rep. Kevin McCarthy said Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer are "stonewalling" President Trump on border security, and it's "hurting the American public."  MORE: https://insider.foxnews.com/2019/01/10/mccarthy-pelosi-schumer-didnt-want-hear-facts-misrepresented-what-happened-trump-meeting
Then why are you letting TSA go unpaid?
the nation if without decent and look the heyna attack in africa
We cease to be a nation with a traitor as president. #impeachthemotherfucker.
More CRAP from adulterous, hateful, incompetent , OLD, dense, very CORRUPT 45 and  his team of MORONS. Our country needs to be protected from mobster 45 and his reign of CORRUPTION!
Dont back down homie
He's working hard at staying in line with the Constitutional requirement to protect our citizens. If those who were charged with the same effort work against the law, how can they not be charged for a violation of neglect of duty? Are we a nation of laws or not?
Dont back down homie
Didn’t he say isis was defeated and ordered  troops pulled then recently isis just killed a bunch of our troops ?
Frank Valdez wrong stop watching Fake News brother .
Presley Mark really? Prove it didn’t happen. I seen the footage , pictures and interviews.. what do you have, a fake news site ?
More CRAP from adulterous, hateful, incompetent , OLD, dense, very CORRUPT 45 and  his team of MORONS. Our country needs to be protected from mobster 45 and his reign of CORRUPTION!
Honduran Caravan gathers together thousands of people to combat their gangs on their own #you will never hear that
WRONG !!!!   The most important thing for you is ....  to get your way.
Sheriffs around the country support border security.  Christian County is dealing with a lot of the drugs that are coming from Mexico and Columbia.   http://www.christiancountysheriff.net/press-release/sheriff-brad-cole-supports-president-trumps-border-security-efforts/
Stand your ground ,don't ever back down !!!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 #BUILDTHEWALL !! Thank you Nancy and Chuck for having so much HATE you refuse to work with the President. In turn keeping this shutdown going and in turn hurting the people !!!😡😡😡
The Spanish problem has been a problem long enough. A solution to their problem will make your next anniversary happier. Happy 14th Anniversary: President Trump and First Lady Melania Trump also Barron who is blessed with a good father and mother.  Cortez Surname Popularity There was no name definition found for Cortez. User-submitted names:  CORTÉZ-Spanish  https://surnames.behindthename.com/name/cortez   There was no name definition found for Ocasio.  “In this week's episode of the Code Switch podcast, Mora tells the fascinating story of how, in the 1970s, Latino advocacy groups successfully lobbied the federal government to create a separate category for counting Hispanics and Latinos. Before then the government had classified those people simply as white.”  https://www.npr.org/sections/codeswitch/2017/08/03/541142339/heres-why-the-census-started-counting-latinos-and-how-that-could-change-in-2020
keep your stance. state of the union in Arizona, Jeff Flakes home town, Angel moms, large stadium tv with live pictures of the caravans, show live shots of the poop on the streets of Calif invite the leader of china , and then thank Nancy p. for her help. maybe even a large scale model of her homes and wineries in the background. if she wants to play games we'll play. In order to protect us from this invasion no scheme is too outlandish....😁...
Donald Trump’s companies have reached a ten year high in the number of foreign workers that they have recruited for low wage, unskilled jobs at Trump companies.  Trump has long campaigned on restricting immigration to the United States.  The Trump Organization requested and received at least 192 visas for foreign workers in 2018, according to Department of Labor data. That number appears to be the highest for the company going back to at least 2008 and likely much earlier, based on public records.  TPM, which reviewed the raw Labor Department information files.Those visas were almost entirely for the type of low-skilled foreign workers that Trump has claimed drive down American wages. Cooks, servers, housekeepers and farmworkers make up a large chunk of the Trump Organization’s requests, most of them making between $10 and $15 hourly.
Border security is a priority, but we shouldn’t build “Trumps Folly”, President Donald J. Trump.
You are losing us sir. I could not disagree more. Open the government and pay these citizens. This shutdown is political suicide.
Presley Mark really? Prove it didn’t happen. I seen the footage , pictures and interviews.. what do you have, a fake news site ?
You are losing us sir. I could not disagree more. Open the government and pay these citizens. This shutdown is political suicide.
When the US and North Korea negotiate disarmament talks, Trump 's term ends in 2020.
He wants to be re-elected so don't worry and be happy with Trump.
thank you I also know that President Trump is wise. So I'm cheering.
Border security is a priority, but we shouldn’t build “Trumps Folly”, President Donald J. Trump.
Love our President Donald J. Trump!!
But not a wall!   Border security, yes of course, not a wall, and definitely not this wall, this clusterfuk shutdown  for a chunk of red meat tossed out to your rabid base so you can guarantee their blind unwavering support in your bid for 46!?
That's a pretty simple idea unless you have to deal with the Schumer's and Pelosi's of the world. The Dems in today's Congress speak in terms of power mongering, not common sense.Trump is no rocket scientist but even HE can see that border security is needed stat
You Rock President Trump! #trumpdrivers2020
I agree we need to defend our borders and at first I was all for the wall but now that it’s hurting so many people I think discussing an alternative like placing our troops along it enforcing a no enter at all zone or you can fine Mexico. Mexico should be the ones stopping their people from coming or be fined. Americans that work and Veterans should not have to go without a pay check. The economy is going to suffer as well as people voting for you next election. Sit down and discuss another alternative to the wall and get these people back their pay please.
Once again the one who are laughing ARE the domestic Enemies of America..................... God Bless theses United States
TRUMP!  Issue an executive order that STOPS illegals from using anchor babies to get free housing.  This is why they come.
I don’t know why US President Donald Trump does not allow his followers and supporters to protest against these perpetrators of violence to prevent such disruptions. Mr. Trump's opponents have set a new record in shamelessness and impudence and they have spread the violence widely. It is really unbearable! 🇺🇲️🇺🇲️🇺🇲️
thank you I also know that President Trump is wise. So I'm cheering.
I don’t know why US President Donald Trump does not allow his followers and supporters to protest against these perpetrators of violence to prevent such disruptions. Mr. Trump's opponents have set a new record in shamelessness and impudence and they have spread the violence widely. It is really unbearable! 🇺🇲️🇺🇲️🇺🇲️
Troy Watson drugs?
Mark Parsons - what about them Mark?  ICE reports most illegal drugs are being smuggled at ports or through tunnels under the walls in towns.  The Chinese are becoming a problem as well with their smuggling at sea ports mostly with  fentanyl.
TRUMP!  Issue an executive order that STOPS illegals from using anchor babies to get free housing.  This is why they come.
Mark Parsons - what about them Mark?  ICE reports most illegal drugs are being smuggled at ports or through tunnels under the walls in towns.  The Chinese are becoming a problem as well with their smuggling at sea ports mostly with  fentanyl.
Donald J. Trump  did Democrats steal $50 Billion in Border Security Barrier Funds? Please Read the link!!!  https://www.facebook.com/rod.koodray.7/posts/294366554791176Rod Koodray
https://www.facebook.com/rod.koodray.7/posts/294366554791176
Troy Watson drugs?
Republican Congress for 2 years, no wall money in expenditure bills, now a national emergency? Bullshit. Total wall cost $50-60 billion. National debt $23 trillion.  You do t h e math.
Barry weakened America and made us the laughing stock of the world!  Time to make us the greatest nation on earth again!
👑😈👑America can't afford to build a boarder wall Trump.. you can't see that by now..??Some things is just too expensive..even for you..👑😈👑5000 people with a million dollars = 5 billion dollars.. do the math..
Latest poll data: The president also faces some significant headwinds for re-election in 2020. Just 30 percent of registered voters said they will definitely vote for Trump in 2020, while 57 percent said they will definitely vote against him.
such hateful trolls on this page.  BUILD THE WALL!!!  Common sense is till alive just not among Democrats and Liberals.
Then why, mr President, are You wasting our resources on a silly wall. That money could be better spent elsewhere. There are much more effective ways to secure our border than this boondoggle.
If you don't defend the constitution we cease to be a free nation Donald Trump you have turned your back on the very people who voted you into office and your oath to uphold the constitution. You promised no legislation would be passed infringing on our 2nd amendment rights. Your support of the red flag laws is the biggest infringement of our rights in our lifetime and now you support an attorney General that supports these unconstitutional laws. Red flag is illegal imorral and unconstitutional and needs to be abolished. We have a right to due process for a reason.
https://www.facebook.com/rod.koodray.7/posts/294366554791176
Nancy Pelosi was planning to visit her real bosses: the EU cabal HQ, the Muslim Brotherhood HQ, and the opium production HQ. THIS WOMAN NEEDS TO BE OUT OF OFFICE, SHE'S WORTH 200 MILLION BECAUSE SHE'S A TRAITOR
Idiots come out of the woodwork
the money for your Donald Trump in 2020 president not for wall and war and gun and all the thing is for 2020 president Donald Trump right   nobody can do 2020 president this president is only Donald Trump right
It really is.  If your country is not secure, anything bad can happen to it.  Thank God for Pres. Trump.  He puts the country first.
Complete BS given your allegiance to Putin. You practice alternative loyalty. A weak despicable grotesque degenerate.
Not only should we, but have a responsibility to secure our border from all that cause harm to our citizens. This does not mean that we ever refuse immigration. Liberals want people to believe that Republicans don't want immigration that is simply a lie.
Regardless those that work for you are not getting a check and are in welfare lines - you bunghole!
If you don’t open the government we will cease to be a nation. You are completely incompetent and negotiate like a toddler who should have had a nap two hours ago.
If you don't defend the constitution we cease to be a free nation Donald Trump you have turned your back on the very people who voted you into office and your oath to uphold the constitution. You promised no legislation would be passed infringing on our 2nd amendment rights. Your support of the red flag laws is the biggest infringement of our rights in our lifetime and now you support an attorney General that supports these unconstitutional laws. Red flag is illegal imorral and unconstitutional and needs to be abolished. We have a right to due process for a reason.
If you don’t open the government we will cease to be a nation. You are completely incompetent and negotiate like a toddler who should have had a nap two hours ago.
The only thing she’s trying to defend is her ego.  Putin says jump and little Donny boy  jumps.
Randy Bear Putin is trumps bitch
Regardless those that work for you are not getting a check and are in welfare lines - you bunghole!
Randy Bear Putin is trumps bitch
The only thing she’s trying to defend is her ego.  Putin says jump and little Donny boy  jumps.
Like crazy Rudy?
If we sell out to hostile leaders like Putin we cease to be a country even faster traitor.
Jill Travassos how many of her campaign staff have been arrested and convicted of dealing wiht Putin SNOWFLAKE?
Like crazy Rudy?
Why not do your job?
That’s right you lock your doors ....don’t you.....
Wouldn't surprize anyone if trump announced he was giving the "State of the State" speech from Moscow. Putin would stand with him to insure trumps safety.
SHUTDOWN SHELTERS: Domestic violence shelters are cutting services as federal funds run out. It's Day 27 of America's longest government shutdown 'We're going to stay out for a long time,' Pres. Trump said this week as he continues to refuse to re-open the government without $5.7 billion for a border wall.
The State of Florida is playing the President for the fool.... while thousands die.   No exaggeration in the least.....  From: Charles Ankner  Sent: 08/25/2017 2:17 PM  To: Demario, Frank <DeMarioF@pbso.org>  Cc: rick.scott@eog.myflorida.com; jackie.schutz@eog.myflorida.com; mayor@townofpalmbeach.com; daronberg@sa15.org; bradshawr@pbso.org; kblouin@palmbeachpolice.com  Subject: RE: Investigation of Homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER in Town of Palm Beach on Aug 5th, 2017  Thank you Col. DeMario, very much, for your email. Your human and compassionate touch is reassuring.  I am the victim’s blood Uncle, not her father.  The PBPD are not investigating a homicide, either by MCCAULEY or anyone else– and as a man of your background and experience can plainly see – a homicide was committed.   The PBPD has already proven their lack of worth by not complying with the new Florida Law related to opiate deaths recently signed by Gov. Scott. JFK found opiates in Nia’s system. She may have been a high functioning alcoholic; but, Nia did not abuse or even use opiates to our knowledge.  She had recently started a new clerical job for an older couple who attend her church here in West Palm. (Nia worked for the WV Governor’s Office before moving to WBP about 8 years ago) She passed a drug test less than 2 months ago for her new employer; and was soon to qualify for medical benefits.  My brother, I, and the rest of my family including retired FL State Parole/Probation Officer-Investigator Eric. P. Ankner; Nia’s other blood Uncle; formally request any investigation into the death of NIA LEE ANKNER be transferred to the PBSO.  The trust between the surviving Ankner Family and the PBPD has been irremediably broken; and we will have extreme difficulty working with them to a truthful, complete, and just conclusion.  However thankfully, our faith and trust in the PBSO remains intact. We also formally request an investigation into the PBPD’s handling of their investigation into Nia’s death up to this point – particularly for dereliction of duty, suppression of evidence, and obstruction of justice. If such an investigation is not within your Jurisdiction; please advise us of who’s it is.  Please, assume the investigation of NIA LEE ANKNER’s homicide.  Sincerely and Respectfully,  From: Demario, Frank [mailto:DeMarioF@pbso.org]  Sent: 08/25/2017 1:42 PM  To: Charles Ankner <charles@saintbrandcannabis.com>  Cc: kblouin@palmbeachpolice.com  Subject: RE: Investigation of Homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER in Town of Palm Beach on Aug 5th, 2017  Mr. Ankner,  I’m sorry for your loss and your frustration with the investigation of your daughter’s death.  As you know this investigation falls within the jurisdiction of the Palm Beach Police Department and I can assure you they have the ability and expertise to properly investigate her death.  Judging by your letter it appears you are familiar with the law and should understand that toxicology is a vital part of a death investigation and takes a considerable amount of time to receive the results and the ME makes the final determination of the crime classification.  I believe all your questions and requests will be answered by the PBPD investigator, in due time.  To conclude, I see no reason to request, assist or join the investigation that the PBPD is conducting at this time.  Colonel Frank DeMario  Law Enforcement Operations  Palm Beach County Sheriff’s Office  561 688 3018  From: Charles Ankner [mailto:charles@saintbrandcannabis.com]  Sent: Thursday, August 24, 2017 4:07 PM  To: kblouin@palmbeachpolice.com; jtrylch@palmbeachpolice.com; lmenniti@palmbeachpolice.com; dWilkinson@palmbeachpolice.com; gsilvestri@palmbeachpolice.com'; mayor@townofpalmbeach.com  Cc: rick.scott@eog.myflorida.com; jackie.schutz@eog.myflorida.com; Bradshaw, Ric L.; Gauger, Michael E; Demario, Frank; Penta, Louis L III; twills@sa15.org; daronberg@sa15.org; sherrif@pbso.org; rsaccone@pbcgov.org  Subject: RE: Investigation of Homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER in Town of Palm Beach on Aug 5th, 2017  **This email was sent from an external (non-PBSO) source.**.  Director Blouin, Officers,  Forgive me for causing your Department further trouble; however, I must voice my and my family’s extreme displeasure, if I dare say our disgust, regarding your handing of the death investigation, and your communication with the surviving family, of NIA LEE ANKNER.  What your responding Officers knew and were told by your own Department’s Emergency Medical Responders regarding Nia’s condition – blue to black skin color, pin-point pupils, no respiration, etc… indicated severe opiate poisoning; and yet, you/they let the repeat felony probation/parolee offender, prime material witness, who accompanied Nia, and most probably poisoned her…to walk away.  For the most part, your Department ignored information being provided by the victim’s family at the scene. Amazing…  KELLY A. MCCAULEY was not searched, not questioned at length – nothing – a repeat violent offender present during a very suspicious death – and you let her walk away. And then you had the victim’s family drive the crime scene vehicle back to the victim’s home, and the victim’s father to drive the prime witness / suspect to her home!?     As you know, Florida Law now requires homicide investigations related to opiate and other Class 1 Controlled Substance related deaths.   Forgive my USAF parlance; but, you’ve “screwed the pooch” from the arrival on scene up until now.  Your Department also kept communicating to my brother days on end as his daughter lay brain dead in a hospital - “she was only one mile into our jurisdiction and had just arrived”, “we don’t have homicides in Palm Beach”, “the drug problem comes from the mainland”. Should be criminal in an of itself.  Your Department cared more for your convenience and reputation than you did the Constitutional Rights of Nia – that being her right to life.  There are many other examples of your Departments’… how shall I say… ineptness, dereliction of duty, suppression of evidence, and obstruction of justice – which will come to light and be proven in due course.  Please retain, or surrender to the PBSO, all evidence you have and other reports related to your investigation of Nia’s death. We will have our Atty’s and investigators contact your and those Offices for that purpose shortly.  Detective Larry Menitti verbally told the victim’s father George nine days after Nia’s brain-death while collecting her cell-phone as evidence, “This isn’t Mayberry RFB you know. We’ll get to the truth of your daughter’s death.”  Well, we beg to differ Sherriff Taylor. And we want you and Barny Fife off the case.  Charles Ankner,  Greenacres, FL 33415  https://www.linkedin.com/pulse/palm-beach-county-opiate-massacre-reality-over-charles-ankner-cp/
You want to put up a wall by shutting down the government but yet the shutdown is hurting us. You don't care about us just your wall.  Did you even think of what all would happen. No more WIC no more help for families in need and even worse no more safety nets on the websites controlled by the government. This safety net helps stop hackers from getting our info.  People are working without pay and tons have been sent to stay home. You where all for us to have more jobs but yet now you have lowered that way more then ever now.  If you keep this shutdown going babys will go without milk kids will go without food. People will loose there homes and die from the cold.  Stop being so stubborn and stop this shutdown before things get worse. All you care about is the ones who make as much as you do.  Next time think and plan things out before you jump the gun.
Dear President Trump, please just ignore that old biddy Nancy!! Ignoring someone is often the best policy and the ultimate insult! Give your State of the Union address! Maybe the Democrats will stay home! Build our wall as promised!!!
Jill Travassos how many of her campaign staff have been arrested and convicted of dealing wiht Putin SNOWFLAKE?
How about do your job mr. President. You're the one that took the blame for the shutdown. Now you should be the one to start it back up. Or are you waiting for the Democrats to look good because they started it back up.
And this coming from a Republican.... Don’t hold Americans to hostage Mr Trump https://www.facebook.com/1087167058116488/posts/1186991381467388?sfns=mo
You had a year and change with a Republican trifecta and you choose to start the border wall as soon as Democrats tske control? What's your angle?
Geez
Trump 2020
Seems like following putins agenda is your highest priority.
Truth !!!
Then use DOD money ..... oh that would mean Defense contractors can't get their quarterly bonuses.. which in turn hurts your stocks in those Corps...
Big Mac!
Everyone wants border security. But fund the methods that actually work, like more personnel, high tech border surveillance technology, etc. No one wants an expensive, useless monument to Trump's vanity.
Dear President Trump, please just ignore that old biddy Nancy!! Ignoring someone is often the best policy and the ultimate insult! Give your State of the Union address! Maybe the Democrats will stay home! Build our wall as promised!!!
Hi my friends!  It's a situation in Georgia, but you have repeatedly said, "We did not leave you and help you, and where is it? But they have wound up internal divisions, but what are we doing here ?!  The mafia has come into operation and my family is forced to sell the house, and here we are interested in the criminal authorities in Russia who are governing this government.  You leave me here and enjoy where it is and help them to get rid of the car that I can not even get back for a number of years and what is going to be a friend, so that's why Ivanishvili and Saakashvili can not dare to dare.  This is why the crisis, the obstacle, the problem and the back of the country and the country's business as well as the world's politics, because the amazi intrigues are cut down everywhere.  Yesterday the apartment building exploded, the children were killed, and I saw that this is a sabotage committed by the mafia and what we will see will be officially seen together with the mafia method of money laundering.  So please do this if you help us finish this mafia and rest you and we also took the country from the Russian mafia and the tries to keep them back to the source so you are cautious if you want to actually defeat the Russian mafia !!  With respect to me🇬🇪
HereHere
Exactly!!!!
Mexico should just stop exporting drugs to America for a month, the Americans will be the ones climbing over the wall.
Mueller
the upside is we can all stop paying taxes if we don't have a country...and my question is why are you funding the destruction of your country?
Yes
Everyone wants border security. But fund the methods that actually work, like more personnel, high tech border surveillance technology, etc. No one wants an expensive, useless monument to Trump's vanity.
100 percent
you realize he is pointing to nobody when he does that.  it's his idea of looking Presidential   MAGA.
Lol please.
A joke
Amen!!!
Thank you!
Amen!
gotta love the anti-Trump trolls who still havent figured out that they keep losing every time they open their mouth
Russia?
I AGREE.
I rather like President Trump. He is a straight talker. He does what he says he is going to do. In other words he gets the job done when other Presidents just talk about doing it because they are afraid of the outcome. What’s wrong with that. He is a little rough around the edges, but gets the message across. He has brought respect back to this US of A from foreign countries because they know he is not kidding around. I don’t care about his private life or who he did or did not have an affair with. I don’t care about any of this stuff just as long as he does the things he promised in his election campaign. If you think I’m wrong, just look at the total mess Europe is in and for that matter the rest of the world. We should be lucky to have a person like Mr. Trump who wanted to take on Washington and work for the people of this great nation.🇺🇸🇺🇸
Don't drink the kool-aid! It rots your brain.
Yes!!!
Yes.
Oh yes
Amen!
So true!
Amen!
Roger that
Thanks.
Individual 1 is unfit to be a president. He talks politics to the troops and Boy Scouts. Both are apolitical organizations. #Donthecon
Yes indeed
BUILD THE WALL PRESIDENT TRUMP WE ARE BEHIND YOU
PROCEED,
COMMON SENSE
100% correct.
fake news
Amen
So true!
Thank you
AMEN...
Great
Trump 2020
AND THIS, makes the dems angry in so many ways, they don't want WE THE PEOPLE to feel safe, have confidence, be independent, be successful!  They want weak, dependent peaople, unable to think and live for themselves     THANK YOU MR PRESIDENT TO BEING SUCH AN INCREDIBLE PATRIOTIC PRESIDENT
WWG1WGA
I agree
hamberders
Stay strong
We will be a nation long after your pathetic "presidency" spanky boy
Amen
Yep
Yes
Go Trump
Agree
President Trump is NOT a Perfect man...but IS the 'Perfect Man'...for this Job...in Leading America...a President who 'loves' his Country...as he is fighting for Border Security with his every Breath...in getting the Funding for a Border Barrier...a much needed physical Structure ....to Stop the Invasion of ILLEGALS...and the flow of Drugs ...Drugrunners...Coyotes... and  Trafficking...entering through the 'Open Border'...
Riiiiiight
Exactly
Yep! Broken record.
Trump 2020
We will be a nation long after your pathetic "presidency" spanky boy
Common sense.
https://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/425805-cohen-responds-to-report-on-poll-rigging-what-i-did-was-at-the?fbclid=IwAR0_tZW6Jz-u9y5shlvLIXw_KOw4GE7L0yhHQjFzpY-Okn-7PPDrnbjb37I
Clinton and Obama are liars
Snowflake......
Better than being a bigot!
https://www.facebook.com/athousandwordsgraphics/photos/a.600235930111379/1472953932839570/?type=3&theater
Common sense.
Number.  1
Spot on!!
Amen!
Howgh.
We know.
https://www.facebook.com/athousandwordsgraphics/photos/a.600235930111379/1472953932839570/?type=3&theater
AMERICA
Amen!
arrest all the socialists as "Traitors to the republic".
Amen!
Mr. D. YOU Rock!
AMEN
Nonsense
Strong!
Trump 2020
EXACTLY
💯% truth🇺🇸
EXACTLY
Amen! So true.
Trump 2020
true
Go Trump!
Cool meme
Build it
Yes! 🙋🏻
Thank you
I agree
Truth!
Amen! So true.
Agree
Ty#
AMEN!!!
Trump2020
You Bet!
President Donald Trump's former lawyer and "fixer" Michael Cohen confirmed a Thursday Wall Street Journal report that he paid a small technology firm to rig online polls in favor of Trump ahead of the 2016 campaign. "As for the @WSJ article on poll rigging, what I did was at the direction of and for the sole benefit of @realDonaldTrump @POTUS. I truly regret my blind loyalty to a man who doesn't deserve it," Cohen posted to his Twitter account.
So very true!
Truth!
Truth!
Trump 2020
Ours too!
God bless!
Amen!
Very true!
Amen!
YES!
Beautiful
Bwahahaha. 😂😂😂
Truth!
Thank You! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
100%  Correct
The  best
TRUMP 2020!
DEFEND!
Yes
Lies
Bull 💩
Bwahahaha. 😂😂😂
Love Trump.
Amen!
Go trump
Amen
Exactly
Exactly
Thank you
Stop Lying
Great job Mr. TRUMP.
Go Trump ! 2020
Bull 💩
Go Trump ! 2020
James Campbell Why? So Chuck and Nancy can turn this country into a socialist/communist country? Wake up and learn some history.
Sally Cochrane you really just said that? #Cult45
Kevin Lake so that's your best comeback? That I work at Walmart?  So what? It doesn't matter the job someone works, we are all Americans, just like our vote counts.  Attacking someone over their job, that's beyond weak! 😂😂😂
Kevin Lake still searching for a cure for the #Cult45
Great job Mr. TRUMP.
James Campbell wonderful comeback!! I can tell you will be shift manager soon!! Well, as long as there are no suprise drug tests you should be fine.
حسين الحسن هسة يقطك 😁😁
James Campbell wonderful comeback!! I can tell you will be shift manager soon!! Well, as long as there are no suprise drug tests you should be fine.
Pinocchio
Thank you
FAKE PHOTO
Stay strong
Let's do it
Good job
علي بني آلعروس  خل يولي حشاك 😂😂
Thank you
TRUMP IS THE TRUTH. That's why he seems bitter to the other guys.
Sycophants.
FACT!!!!!!
Of Russian
Bullshit
Get 'er done!
Amen
Yep
If Serbia does not defend its borders, then it ceases to be a nation. Kosovo and Metochia is Serbia. So president Trump, please defend also Serbian borders.
Stop
If Serbia does not defend its borders, then it ceases to be a nation. Kosovo and Metochia is Serbia. So president Trump, please defend also Serbian borders.
Ali Mohammed  Avengers return of the wall😂😂💔
Yep
Ali Mohammed bless and take him🙂
Ali Mohammed bless and take him🙂
Indeed
Terry Wilder I mean no disrespect but for your age i am beguiled by your beauty believe me if there's beauty then there's you, please forgive my manners I'm tony
Indeed
Love Trump!!! 2020
So true
Agreed
Apowerfulmen
You are RIGHT, President Trump.
Bull crap
ewww a full shot of the Orange
Terry Wilder I mean no disrespect but for your age i am beguiled by your beauty believe me if there's beauty then there's you, please forgive my manners I'm tony
Thank you
Hang in !
I agree
Thank you!!
Yesss!
My amazing man . . . xo
Build it
Awesome😀
MAGA
ewww a full shot of the Orange
STAY STRONG!
Just wait
MAGA
Thank You
Hi girl 👧
Go Trump
No ,U !
MAGA
Sounds great!
Great
Don't. Give in.
Amen!
Hi Mr. President.
I sgree
yes.
like leon
How?
Liar
Isaiah 54: 17 🇺🇸💗 🙏
AMEN and we support you President Donald J. Trump
Agree  100%!
Yep
true story
100% TRUE !!!
What a pic! 🕵
SO VERY TRUE
EXACTLY
How?
MAGA! 💪  💪  💪  💪
GO TRUMP!
So true
very true
Agreed!
I am so proud
Good luck 🙂
Love TRUMP
Good job.
EXACTLY
Good job.
Amen!!!
Smith's Ellwood
Love TRUMP
Maga
Jennifer Knapic  Yes!!!  BUILD IT BABY!!!
Very very good
I agree
nice
True .  Absolutely
Get em Boss!
Smith's Ellwood
AMEN !!
U r right!!
Amen
Ya Mitch
Yes sir
Amen
Awesome
Agreed.
Amen
Fact
Get em Boss!
Fact
Donkey!!!
Amen
Agreed!!!
I agree 100
YUUPP !!
Amen
Our Respect
MAGA !!!! BTFW !!!!
No wall!!
Donkey!!!
Hamberders
Michael Reed Yes please go to your second home in Russia,we will help pay for the ticket.
Arthur Lagasse  Sure that’s a great idea because if don’t get the wall   You will be under sharia law
Q
Hamberders
Wtf
Agreed
Demagogue
Amen!!
Absolutely
The Art of the Deal: You pout and cry until you get what you want.
LMAF
STFU FATSO
Q
So true
I agree
Fact
Amen
U the man
RESIGN
Yes, amen!!!
Perfect
So true
Fake
STFU FATSO
You The Man That Can! KAG☆
TRUMP2020
Oh, yeah????
Is Agree
Yes Boss
Amen
We Nigerians wish to have your type as our president, people don't know what they have, long live the president,long live America.
Good  morning
Fake
What?
we love you
Get out!
AMEN
yes
Nice
AMEN
11 admins 😉
Agree!
Good  morning
Trump 2020!!
Bullshit
Yes!
Ba
Amen
hi
Amen
Yes! Thank you
Amen!
True?
Agree!
True?
Amen!!!
Amen!
GO TRUMP
Your ties are too long mr trump
Amen
Amen
Absolutely
Absolutely
Thank You
Trump 2020
Right
Amen!!!
I agree
Fake news
Not me
PURGE!!!
Amen
Amen
Get Mexico to pay for your imbecilic wall like you said you would.
Stfu
yes!
Right
Amen!!!!
Hell yeah
Thank you
Gold words
True
Says Fatso.
You're right
KEEP SAFE
Lies
I love you
Amen.
Oscar, what a good looking guy
good man
Buck Strunk.  Who, beside trump and fox news told you the lie that the U.S. has "open border." The fact is we don't so stop spreading lies.
Yes, please defend us against the crooked establishment elected officials in DC and their cronies.  Difficult to drain the swamp when you are up to your ass in alligators..
We cease to be a nation when our president lies about everything.  What about the 4 Americans that died because you said we were pulling out of Syria?????
Simple!
Indeed....
That’s true
KEEP SAFE
rich piana
Very nice
Hell yes
What a JOKE!
SO TRUE
Amen
Amen
Having the National Parks trash picked up and our food inspected are more important than your temper tantrum.  Stop the Trump Shutdown and resign.
Not!
amen
That’s true
Good
I admire many black people I do not admire the ones just like the white dinner anti-america
God Bless u.
Blue 👁 👀
what a puts
I LOVE YOU
Stand Hard
TRUSAMP  ...
Stand strong
amen
Fake
Boom
True!!!!!
Go Trump !! Build the wall! Let the left move to the country’s that these people at the border came for ! And trade spots ! The left wants to help them do bad trade spots with them !! Put your money where your mouth is !!
don't use govt workers as pawns in your fight for a wall.... bad strategy.
If you dont pay the army you cease to be the president!
Fake issue by a fake human being in the role of a fake president.  Thankfully, your jail cell is going to be very, very real.  Soon...
Stand strong
Make no mistake....the wall is to keep our asses in.
So don’t say not to the wall and you will have security like Hungary. Support the wall between Mexico and USA.
Yes !
DISGUSTING - MORE GOP LIES Thousands More Migrant Children Likely Taken From Families Than First Reported  https://www.nytimes.com/2019/01/17/us/migrant-children-inspector-general-family-separation.html?emc=edit_na_20190117&nl=breaking-news&nlid=53388860ing-news&ref=cta&fbclid=IwAR1mviIZgwrvygJMSq3rrn_7Q9_FSB85QMZBjSZfM98gWpOBtMuuDH406sY
You seem to be doing a worse job at it than any President in modern American history!!  If you really believe in defending the US, you should resign, and make room for a real President; someone competent who can do the job.
Sign the CR's and open the Government. Then negotiate the wall and if you don't get it, do your National Emergency. Doesn't make sense to keep it closed for something you are eventually going to do anyways.   #trumpshutdown
i say keep troops in usa and protect usa canada should do same  but trudeau is not strong like you he is sissy which i didn,t elect he got in by pot vote and people tired of previous leader in too long
Its now being reported that 2000 Hondurans rushed the Mexican Border last night and made it through and the activist Alfonso Ulloa stayed...”Gringos we are going to invade you just like you invaded us”  It’s time for Trump to declare a National Emergency!!!
Are all of these faux patriotic pictures of yourself that you post some form of autofellatio?
Fake issue by a fake human being in the role of a fake president.  Thankfully, your jail cell is going to be very, very real.  Soon...
Shhhhh
That’s about the stupidest thing he could say. We’ve been a country for over 200 years. We have always had a southern border and we have been a nation for all of that time. Where does he come up with things like this?
Trump, the Pest with two Legs!
Amen , America finally has a President who cares about our Children’s future!  Democrats could care less and rather keep the Government down for there political gain ! Enough is Enough build the wall ! Trump 2020 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
The southern grease fried food was destroying my appendix! I was so glad when Mexicans moved in and opened Mexican Restaurants with those delicious tacos, burritos, chilaquiles and tostadas.
Head on over to petitions.whitehouse.gov and sign the petitions to remove Pelosi, Waters and Ocasio-Cortez while your at it. Stand firm Pres. Trump real patriots are with you!
**BREAKIN' NEWS** Mueller opens investigation into source of special sauce used on Big Macs infiltrated into The White House by President Donald J. Trump associates. Unnamed sources close to the investigation are rumored to have heard of some talk from 3rd person hearsay gossip that Russian agents with a French connection are involved in the alleged conspiracy. While there is no evidence of an actual crime, prosecutors moved forward based on the seriousness of the charges.
Are all of these faux patriotic pictures of yourself that you post some form of autofellatio?
Listen to this hypocrite Pelosi.                              https://www.facebook.com/vedatgurtan/posts/10158001839223776
Jordanian Border Wall BUILT USING $500 BILLION U.S. TAXPAYER MONEY BUT WE CAN'T HAVE OUR OWN WALL?  "GOP AND DEMOCRATS FULLY FUND A BORDER WALL -- IN JORDAN By Neil Munro, March 22, 2018  The 2018 omnibus provides just enough funds to build 33 miles of fencing on the Texas border — but it also provides $500 million to help Jordan build a wall and defense line against jihad terrorists trying to cross its 287-mile border with Iraq and Syria. The omnibus budget says on page 394:  SEC. 9011. Up to $500,000,000 of funds appropriated by this Act for the Defense Security Cooperation Agency in ‘‘Operation and Maintenance, Defense-Wide’’ may be used to provide assistance to the Government of Jordan to support the armed forces of Jordan and to enhance security along its borders.  On page 375, the omnibus says:  For the ‘‘Counter-Islamic State of Iraq and Syria Train and Equip Fund’’, $1,769,000,000, to remain available until September 30, 2019 …  That these funds may be used in such amounts as the Secretary of Defense may determine to enhance the border security of nations adjacent to conflict areas including Jordan, Lebanon, Egypt, and Tunisia resulting from actions of the Islamic State of Iraq and Syria:  The U.S.-funded, $500 million, 274-mile Jordan-Iraq border wall was described by Vice.com, in a 2016 article titled “The Great Wall of Jordan: How the US Wants to Keep the Islamic State Out”;  The wall, which began as a $20 million project in 2008 to erect a set of surveillance towers along a 30-mile (50 km) stretch of the border with Syria, has since expanded into a program costing half a billion dollars, according to defense officials who spoke to VICE News. Called the Jordan Border Security Program or JBSP, the wall is ostensibly meant to stop weapons of mass destruction from getting out, but since 2013 has refocused on detecting Islamic State fighters and arms smuggling, as well as refugees, on both sides of the border …  The first phase of the JBSP, the erection of the towers, was completed in September 2009. Phase 1B, the beginning of the fence, was completed in March 2014. Phases 2 and 3, the building of a fully integrated and networked fence running along a 275-mile(442 km) stretch of Jordan’s borders with Syria and Iraq and costing some $300 million, are scheduled to be fully operational this year. Further phases will extend the fence along the entire border and improve surveillance and detection gear. Mobile surveillance stations and quick reaction forces will be stationed at vulnerable points or emerging hot spots.  It’s all paid for by the United States taxpayer."  https://www.breitbart.com/immigration/2018/03/22/gop-democrats-fully-fund-border-wall-jordanians/
Then why ruin it?
please go do your "duty" in the bathroom and not crap on the working people that are now w/o pay but still working diligently-most live paycheck to paycheck.
Trump is one of the best, if not the best, presidents this country has ever seen.  Too bad the Republicans in Congress wouldn't act together when they had both houses, because Trump would have cleaned house in the first few months.
where i came from newfoundland canada last province to join canada dad was in second world war with britain we were not part of canada we don.t have much crime or immigrants too cold for people they like ontario where i came to work and vancouver that is hot  spots for  immigrants and mosques . all the people move to subburb
Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is your cost-ineffective wall, Donny.  Agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so your shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
You mean like     "NORTH AMERICAN UNION"  SOON TO BE
A quick civics lesson: 'Just before the government shutdown began, the Senate, led by Majority Leader Mitch McConnell (a Republican) overwhelmingly passed a bipartisan bill that would have kept the government open. The then-Speaker of the House Paul Ryan (a Republican) refused to allow the House to even vote on that bill knowing it would likely pass with a veto-proof majority. For those who might not know, if a president vetoes a bill, if two-thirds of both the House and the Senate vote against that president’s veto, they can override it, thus enacting that bill. That’s called “checks and balances,” a key component our Founding Fathers put into our Constitution. Fast forward a few weeks to when Democrats took power in the House of Representatives. They passed essentially the same exact veto-proof bill the Senate had overwhelmingly approved just a couple of weeks earlier that would reopen the government. Only now, the same Sen. McConnell who let the passage of that bill before, won’t allow the Senate to vote on it — because he knows it would pass, thus forcing Trump to veto it, which would embarrass the party and expose their incompetence. Keep in mind, this all centers around a lie Trump repeatedly told during his campaign (and even now) that Mexico was going to pay for his stupid wall, a wall he now wants the American taxpayer to fund. Republicans controlled all of Congress and the White House for the past two years. If funding this wall was such a major issue, they would have done it — they didn’t. Repeatedly, his own party refused to pass spending bills that gave Trump money for that pointless wall. This isn’t about border security, no matter how many time Trump tells that lie. This is about his ego and his pathetic attempt to distract people from the constantly-growing list of scandals, legal troubles, and embarrassing administration departures he’s been dealing with over the last several weeks. If our government was functioning how our Founding Fathers meant for it to, our government would have never shut down. First it was a Republican, Paul Ryan, refusing to let the House vote on the bill the Senate passed. Now it’s hypocritical Sen. Mitch McConnell, a Republican, doing the same thing with the recently-passed House bill. Two frauds who refused to allow a bill to be voted on to keep the government open/reopen it, not because they opposed it, but because they were afraid it would pass and embarrass their party’s “president.” This is not how democracy works. This is not how our government is supposed to work. Donald Trump and the GOP are the only ones to blame for this political stunt.'
**BREAKIN' NEWS** Mueller opens investigation into source of special sauce used on Big Macs infiltrated into The White House by President Donald J. Trump associates. Unnamed sources close to the investigation are rumored to have heard of some talk from 3rd person hearsay gossip that Russian agents with a French connection are involved in the alleged conspiracy. While there is no evidence of an actual crime, prosecutors moved forward based on the seriousness of the charges.
The Dems do not want to call the wall, "wall".  Compromise then, will call it 'BUILD the WIDGET"
The southern border of the US of A., does not belong to the NATO alliance and the adjacent four states are more Mexican (1846) than the U.S. of A....
Toby Ruiz, true story
Stay strong, President Trump, millions of us agree with you. So glad you canceled Pelosi's plane today. She doesn't need to go overseas to denigrate you. She needs to stay home and create a budget that includes the wall. Hopefully, we stay shut down long enough for you to get rid of 1000s of federal employees. Downsizing the government would be wonderful. #MAGA #pelosischumershutdown
Good!! The outdated concept of nations needs to be done away with. Nations lead to nationalism, and nationalism leads to hate, bigotry, and ignorance, and those things lead to people killing their fellow human beings.
Good job
Best. POTUS. Ever.
So true!
Preach don
I agree!!!
A quick civics lesson: 'Just before the government shutdown began, the Senate, led by Majority Leader Mitch McConnell (a Republican) overwhelmingly passed a bipartisan bill that would have kept the government open. The then-Speaker of the House Paul Ryan (a Republican) refused to allow the House to even vote on that bill knowing it would likely pass with a veto-proof majority. For those who might not know, if a president vetoes a bill, if two-thirds of both the House and the Senate vote against that president’s veto, they can override it, thus enacting that bill. That’s called “checks and balances,” a key component our Founding Fathers put into our Constitution. Fast forward a few weeks to when Democrats took power in the House of Representatives. They passed essentially the same exact veto-proof bill the Senate had overwhelmingly approved just a couple of weeks earlier that would reopen the government. Only now, the same Sen. McConnell who let the passage of that bill before, won’t allow the Senate to vote on it — because he knows it would pass, thus forcing Trump to veto it, which would embarrass the party and expose their incompetence. Keep in mind, this all centers around a lie Trump repeatedly told during his campaign (and even now) that Mexico was going to pay for his stupid wall, a wall he now wants the American taxpayer to fund. Republicans controlled all of Congress and the White House for the past two years. If funding this wall was such a major issue, they would have done it — they didn’t. Repeatedly, his own party refused to pass spending bills that gave Trump money for that pointless wall. This isn’t about border security, no matter how many time Trump tells that lie. This is about his ego and his pathetic attempt to distract people from the constantly-growing list of scandals, legal troubles, and embarrassing administration departures he’s been dealing with over the last several weeks. If our government was functioning how our Founding Fathers meant for it to, our government would have never shut down. First it was a Republican, Paul Ryan, refusing to let the House vote on the bill the Senate passed. Now it’s hypocritical Sen. Mitch McConnell, a Republican, doing the same thing with the recently-passed House bill. Two frauds who refused to allow a bill to be voted on to keep the government open/reopen it, not because they opposed it, but because they were afraid it would pass and embarrass their party’s “president.” This is not how democracy works. This is not how our government is supposed to work. Donald Trump and the GOP are the only ones to blame for this political stunt.'
Good job
TRUMP 2020 !!!!!! 🇺🇸
True...
The citizens of the United States is your main priority not your wall that won't stop any one your a fucking joke
HEY SS, THERE ARE 63,000,000 WHO VOTED FOR TRUMP, AND HE COULDN'T HAVE MADE IT IF HE DIDN'T HAVE THE BLACKS AND THE MEXICANS RIGHT IN THERE VOTING, TOO. HILLARY HAD PEOPLE WHO VOTED MORE THAN ONCE AND SHE HAD THE ILLEGALS VOTING FOR HER AND SHE STILL FELL SHORT. THE ONE THING I LIKE ABOUT HIM, HE SAYS WE DID THIS OR THAT,OBAMA ALWAYS SAID "I DID THIS" AND SAYS IT 20 TIMES IN A 5 MINUET SPEECH. WHEN
Yes
Good
BS
Amen
President Trump you are a very good citizen
I agree!!!
What about the people...L I A R..Should they start to learn Russian !
Indigenous people supposed to talk like this rather than a president from immigrant background.
from iraq how are you mr president
This is a comment from another person on a different post, but the best message yet.  Here's what I wish the Democrats would say to Trump: Mr. President you can have your wall. You can get it the same way that President Obama got Obamacare; the way Lyndon Johnson got Medicare; the way Franklin Roosevelt got Social Security. In each case the president had a project he wanted enacted; so his administration crafted a bill. That bill went to Congress where committee hearings were held; amendments were proposed; studies were conducted that tested the cost, effectiveness etc. of the proposal; testimony was held in Congress; debate ensued and if the measure had enough support, a vote was taken and the measure was passed. That's how you legislate. It takes hard work, planning and the ability to actually negotiate. Your pet project doesn't get to leap frog over the pathway laid out by the Constitution and 250 years of precedent. You have chosen to skip over this entire process (even when you had majorities in both Houses) and have resorted instead to taking the American public hostage in exchange for your wall. You want a wall? Put down the gun you are holding to the head of the American people and get to work.
Shut down the borders until the wall is built
m e n a c i n g
IMO, Putin's puppet, djt, is 'not cooking on all four burners'.......just sayin’! https://shareblue.com/experts-trump-human-trafficking-excuse-wall/?fbclid=IwAR0I_rtDOYQpl0cnO69TOlTBZkX1Yl890CziZaAOgH48YwAJ_bT6q-Z1wgI
Let's cease to be a nation!!! Make America MEXICO Again'
President Trump you are a very good citizen
WE THE PEOPLE AGREE....with PRESIDENT TRUMP...get off  your ass and fund the wall......
Larry Smith hard to believe there are simple people that still believe that bulls hit.... FAIL
Mark Parsons yeah right. I guess that's why your boy Manafort is getting ass raped in prison right now.  Military traitor Flynn is singing to Mueller at a very high decibel level to avoid giving up the booty.  Jared and Don the Con, Jr are next, then the retarded kid.  Keep denying.  Anyone that supports this crook is also a traitor.
WE THE PEOPLE AGREE....with PRESIDENT TRUMP...get off  your ass and fund the wall......
Great idea Tony Tomasino
Your propaganda does not hide the fact that Secretary of Defense, James Mattis - a REAL patriot, resigned because your world view is dangerous to the Republic. Cadet Bone Spurs.
President Trump keep fighting for America...Jesus was persecuted too and we killed him you are chosen to do this job last administration was weak and hate America not wonder why Obama's network before he enter to the WH was only 1 million 1/2 after now his network is 45 millions??? How this happened...this guy didnt wrote a book or invented nothing to make this amount of money as a president with a salary of 400 hundred thou...we can see how crooked he was not wonder why our Country is in a such big whole 👎👎👎
Agree
Yeah
Representatives, please put US citizen’s rights first by starting the process for the following:  Reconstruct the federal court system so that it’s more efficient, and they don’t throw out the appeals, especially misconduct appeals, of US citizens. Also a system that demotes and promotes judges based on their record on being overruled, etc.   Start a constitutional amendment to modernize the Presidential Election process. Start a constitutional amendment that makes: US Representatives elected on odd years, a US Senator term four years long and elected on even years opposite the president, so their constituents have a representative to vote for every year, etc.  Make a law that gives nonaffiliated candidates and voters access to primary ballots. Create a government website for voting constituents to state their concerns, and monthly rank those concerns by their importance to US citizens. Create a Federal Highway Patrol for our interstates and federal highways that gives returning veterans opportunities for jobs, and federal highway laws.  Improve the interstate system by: raising the minimum speed limit, lengthening busy entrances and exit ramps that will make it safer and help eliminate delays, etc.  Mandating more required car safety devices.  Define a minor as someone under 20, and extend free education for dependent minors through a community college or high school college accredited courses, and free public preschool.  Protect employees who make written complaints for improper or illegal company actions. Require public schools and government facilities’ computers accessible to local US citizens. Set up an investigation into updating the future of climate change, etc.  Sincerely,  Cecil James Roth P.S. Constituents, if you ‘like’ this, like it whenever you see it.   https://m.facebook.com/The-Great-1461-Day-Adventure-360025854356893/
President Donald Trump is my President
Mark Parsons yeah right. I guess that's why your boy Manafort is getting ass raped in prison right now.  Military traitor Flynn is singing to Mueller at a very high decibel level to avoid giving up the booty.  Jared and Don the Con, Jr are next, then the retarded kid.  Keep denying.  Anyone that supports this crook is also a traitor.
President Donald Trump is my President
Matthew ELoEL
Simon Gouet i think he's great 🤷🏻‍♀️
LAWL
Yeah so make all the middle class and poor people suffer then right?Because it’s their fault that the stupid wall won’t be built
So whats the hold up? You k ow the dems are gonna go along with you. If its an emergency declare one. Stop the talk and take action. We voted for you and a wall. What are you waiting for?
...or another terrorist attack WILL happen!  Foolish people.  Smh.
Today is the anniversary of a nuclear deal, a deal that did not last long and its main actor pulled out of the deal, the agreement now has no value for the Iranian regime, and they have been severely defeated. We made Twitter work to cancel this agreement and we are proud to have done this great work. Our first move was to prevent the agreement from changing in Congress, and we did not intervene with the influence of this agreement, the lobbyists of Israel were trying hard to change this agreement, but we did not let it work, we worked hard and made it harder. This agreement did not change and we succeeded in that. The next step was the expulsion of two officials from the White House, Tillerson and McMaster, those on Twitter, are seeing how we provided the terms for Tillerson and Mackman to be fired from the White House, and Bolton and Pompeo would take them. And we rushed to the last minute and made the conditions for a catastrophic agreement abandoned. I struggled hard and fought every day, if not for us, this agreement would never be canceled. Those on Twitter are testifying who made the catastrophic agreement canceled, and we are proud that with the help of the people we were able to do this great work and provide the conditions to cancel President Trump without interrupting the nuclear deal, and All sanctions will be restored. If the catastrophic agreement was not abandoned, the Iranian regime would be much more likely to be happy and appreciative than President Tramp at a much earlier date than anyone imagined that he would have a nuclear weapon, and that they would intervene in more countries, and that the Middle East would be very destabilizing. This agreement was withdrawn. Thanks to Pompeo, who supports our people and has announced in the Middle East that until April, Iran's oil exports will be completely cut off. Exceptions to the eight countries were a big mistake, and if oil was cut off completely until November 4th, the oil price would have fallen again, the exemption to eight countries made the Democrats take over Congress, accept President Trump that the mistake And I hope you do not repeat this mistake because people do not forget. We have forgotten the exemption for eight countries and, as you and the US Secretary of State promise, you would say that the breaks will not be renewed, if you do not repeat your promise this time, they will all mock you and the Iranian regime will definitely be a nuclear weapon. And this time, the lives of the Americans and Israel will be at risk, I hope you are wise and until April to complete Iran's oil industry, so far, there is a lot of time spent that does not benefit the national security of the United States. The Polish conference is the end of the Islamic Republic, and it provides conditions for countries to support the free people of Iran in order to protect the suffering people who are demanding change, to create another honor and to celebrate the victory in the Freedom Square.
Christopher Dewayne Jones damn skippy!
Not a penny for a wall! Do not reward chump dump for lying to America! Teach him a lesson!
MAKE AMERICA SAFE AGAIN, TRUMP 2020. Heaven help us the nuts are running the finance committee. Waters, Cortez and Tlaib. The three stooges look intelligent next to those three.
Stop defending Israelis borders and invading all around them or any one that is a threat to the chosen banker's or Zionism Ashkenazis  that run the world cut the cord stop feeding world terror pop a dummy in their mouths help your own people its not all about profit .
Sometimes, it's important to stop and think while keeping an open mind until all of the facts are in. The recent attack in Syria was definitely a horrible tragedy and we have to get these attacks to stop once and for all, but if you think about it, you had just announced that the American Troops would be pulling out of Syria, so why would ISIS attack at that point rather then waiting for the complete withdrawal of the Troops?  ISIS obviously wants America out of Syria because they're not doing very well with us there, so, why would they risk an attack that might lead to the American Troops staying in Syria for longer then necessary. Now, if the Rebels were afraid of losing the assistance of the American Troops they would have to find a way of keeping the Troops in Syria. It would seem that ISIS would tend to reappear once the American Troops have left Syria and that's something that will probably never end and will always pose a threat, especially now in the age of the internet and Social Media. ISIS and other Terrorist Groups will never be completely obliterated and that's why it's so important to put a stop to Terrorism altogether and it must start from within and become law throughout all of the Countries within the Middle East. The Leaders of the Middle East must work together to come up with a plan to stand together and battle Terrorism until it can be ended once and for all. There are ways of controlling Terrorism and it often has to do with effecting the things that they Love and Cherish the most. After all, that's what Terrorism is all about, destroying the things that we Love and Care about the most. One day Terrorism will be eroded from the face of the Earth but it's going to take every Country, around the World, to do their part and work together to protect each other and end Terrorism forever.
LAWL
Sometimes, it's important to stop and think while keeping an open mind until all of the facts are in. The recent attack in Syria was definitely a horrible tragedy and we have to get these attacks to stop once and for all, but if you think about it, you had just announced that the American Troops would be pulling out of Syria, so why would ISIS attack at that point rather then waiting for the complete withdrawal of the Troops?  ISIS obviously wants America out of Syria because they're not doing very well with us there, so, why would they risk an attack that might lead to the American Troops staying in Syria for longer then necessary. Now, if the Rebels were afraid of losing the assistance of the American Troops they would have to find a way of keeping the Troops in Syria. It would seem that ISIS would tend to reappear once the American Troops have left Syria and that's something that will probably never end and will always pose a threat, especially now in the age of the internet and Social Media. ISIS and other Terrorist Groups will never be completely obliterated and that's why it's so important to put a stop to Terrorism altogether and it must start from within and become law throughout all of the Countries within the Middle East. The Leaders of the Middle East must work together to come up with a plan to stand together and battle Terrorism until it can be ended once and for all. There are ways of controlling Terrorism and it often has to do with effecting the things that they Love and Cherish the most. After all, that's what Terrorism is all about, destroying the things that we Love and Care about the most. One day Terrorism will be eroded from the face of the Earth but it's going to take every Country, around the World, to do their part and work together to protect each other and end Terrorism forever.
Trump has no way out if he does not keep his promise on NK.
I just want President Trump to be wise and intelligent.
Stop defending Israelis borders and invading all around them or any one that is a threat to the chosen banker's or Zionism Ashkenazis  that run the world cut the cord stop feeding world terror pop a dummy in their mouths help your own people its not all about profit .
I just want President Trump to be wise and intelligent.
Greg Ho, ho ho ho! How funny!
Greg Ho little georgie Do you actually hear 👂 President Donald J. Trumps footsteps in your head? Asking for a friend. How it feel waking EVERY morning knowing that he’s your personal #LordAndSavior for the next 6 years? I enjoy your pain and anguish too much, but on the other hand, I LOVE IT TOO MUCH.... enjoy 😉 ma’am..... I know I will...
Trump has no way out if he does not keep his promise on NK.
Greg Ho little georgie Do you actually hear 👂 President Donald J. Trumps footsteps in your head? Asking for a friend. How it feel waking EVERY morning knowing that he’s your personal #LordAndSavior for the next 6 years? I enjoy your pain and anguish too much, but on the other hand, I LOVE IT TOO MUCH.... enjoy 😉 ma’am..... I know I will...
Aaron Green, idiot. You don't think that trumps lawyers have not already explored all of this? LOL 😆
Mark Butler aw are you trying to spam me with all the :) and >:( come on.
Mark Butler have fun looking at my page and just don't forget 6 MORE YEARS Trump 2020!
Greg Ho, ho ho ho! How funny!
If we don't hold Hillary Clinton accountable she will fly around the world on her private jet calling Chuck Schumer and Nancy Pelosi and tell them everything she wants them to do to obstruct Donald Trump until she can run against him again in 2020. Oops
Hang in there" We are with you" Go Trump"
2% (Embarrassing) postitive reaction to your disastrous state of the union gimmick, and now the shutdown is baptized as Donal  McConnell shutdown!
Go to work! Stop trying to be the king of social media! At least attempt to look as if you are working in that Big White House. Defend the people who are not working, or working and not getting paid. OPEN THE GOVERNMENT, you big cry baby.
RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN
Mark Butler have fun looking at my page and just don't forget 6 MORE YEARS Trump 2020!
RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN RESIGN
James Boose right...... lol and the dems didn't have any resources to do the same thing! In fact that is why Hillary was so shocked! 🤣
James Boose me too! I pray everyday that Jesus Christ Our Lord, will take Trump to Heaven during his sleep!
Go to work! Stop trying to be the king of social media! At least attempt to look as if you are working in that Big White House. Defend the people who are not working, or working and not getting paid. OPEN THE GOVERNMENT, you big cry baby.
President Trump, keep up the great work!!
WHY ARE WE PAYING N PALOSI -* SHE DOESNT WANT TO WORK THINGS OUT ON BORDER SECURITY - HER ANSWER IS NO NO NO NO  *She doesn't want to come out of her hiding place to meet THE ANGEL MOMS & DADS THAT WAS IN HER OFFICE.  By the way WE SHOULD CALL THE WALL/BORDER THE "ANGEL WALL OR ANGEL BORDER" *She doesnt want to have your night when you talk to the AMERICAN PEOPLE. SO WHY ARE WE PAYING HER ?
❤⚘🌷🙏🌷⚘❤  THANK YOU, LORD, FOR GIVING US PRES. TRUMP!  PROTECT PRES. TRUMP  & THE ENTIRE AMERICAN NATION FROM DEMOCRAT MOBS (DARK FORCES) THAT ARE IN FULL FORCE TO DESTROY AMERICAN LIVES, O LORD, WE PRAY.  AMEN!  IN YOU, DEAR LORD, WE FULLY TRUST!  ❤⚘🌷🙏🌷⚘❤
President Trump personally directed his longtime former attorney Michael Cohen to lie to Congress about the Moscow Trump Tower project, two federal law enforcement officials involved in an investigation of the matter told BuzzFeed cnn.it/2QUjuEF
Trump is a super star right now!
Cohen: Paid Up To $50,000 To Rig Polls Prior To Election To Benefit Trump At Trumps Direction
Trump has two sides of brain. In the left side, there is nothing right - and in the right side, there is nothing left.
Kr. President please don't trust the left.  Don't open the government until they give you the money for the wall.  They are attempting a con job to get you to open the government but they will not give you what you are asking for.  They are liars.
James Boose me too! I pray everyday that Jesus Christ Our Lord, will take Trump to Heaven during his sleep!
Kr. President please don't trust the left.  Don't open the government until they give you the money for the wall.  They are attempting a con job to get you to open the government but they will not give you what you are asking for.  They are liars.
Is Nancy Pelosi Afraid to let president Donald J.Trump address the nation from the Peoples House? Her safety has been guaranteed by the Homeland Security Director.
Daniel Johnson , take a civics class, fat ass has to ask permission to speak to Congress.
Did I write that that didn't happen? ( no I did not ) . I am actually over you peoples heads but the insults always come even though most of you don't really know anything. Just how to attack with emotions.
Trump has two sides of brain. In the left side, there is nothing right - and in the right side, there is nothing left.
"If we don’t defend our borders, then we cease to be a nation."  That's wonderful, then we won't need a President. Bye Bye.
Lov u prez T,, thankful hitlery didnt win her rigged election,, stay strong,, dont give in to the snowflakes,, Americans voted you in for a reason
Precisely Mr. President! That is the #1 priority, to protect "We The People"., you are doing a hell of a job.🇺🇸👊
Trump we need more FREEDOM, give us the bumb stocks back.
If you can't defend your own borders, stop defending other countries. Charity begins at home.
Exactly, middle and Eastern European country are in the same danger. EU is our enemy.
Right or duty...we take duties over rights, you child molesting for entertainment, pedophiles!!! A.o.W.L.
Did I write that that didn't happen? ( no I did not ) . I am actually over you peoples heads but the insults always come even though most of you don't really know anything. Just how to attack with emotions.
Number one duty of the President!  The Americans are behind you!  Stay with it!
Only humans with an IQ of a sawdust will dislike Mr Make America Great Again.
You voted down the bill that would defend our borders because it didn't support your wall.
Not a POTUS, just a POS
You are the president of a wrestling mother
YOU DANG RIGHT SIR ....AND THE TSA DONT NEED TO BE TOUCHING PEOPLES NO NO SPOTS ....................
Call a national emergency already
Right or duty...we take duties over rights, you child molesting for entertainment, pedophiles!!! A.o.W.L.
Distraction!!!! LMAO. Mitch is too busy lifting sanctions on Russians to have a vote to reopen the government! The Senate can probably override your veto now. Your border wall is a waste of money. Let us undertake an honest and serious discussion of immigration and border issues...You Are Very SAD
The only people that shouldn't receive a check during a Government shutdown is; members of Congress, President, Vice President, and the pensions of these retirees. They are responsible and can rectify the situation. No other Government agencies are involved.
build the wall .PRESIDENT TRUMP your the best President ever
5000 comments in less then an hour....Boy the Russian trolls are putting in some serious overtime. Sad that Russians are the only ones Trump doesn't mind paying.
Pigliosi will NEVER compromise. She does NOT care about Americans! BUILDTHEWALLNOW.  Leave the immoral dems in the dust!!!!  #KAG
Defense and a useless wall are not the same thing
yes this is why it is so important to get the Russian asset out of the White House
Stop killing the middle class by giving what little we have to the rich.  Don't you have enough already.  You're rich, YOU pay for the wall.  Put your money where your mouth is.
yes this is why it is so important to get the Russian asset out of the White House
Give 'em h*ll President Donald J. Trump.
Comrad Trump is changing his story on a daily base...
"The time has come to acknowledge spiritual realities: The devil is using the Democratic Party to try to destroy America. If we don’t awaken, our children will soon awaken in a nation unrecognizable to us today."
Peace, we want President Trump's intervention in the presidential elections in Algeria There is a great violation of the freedom of the people and happy invitees Brother Bouteflika violates the post of his brother Abdelaziz Bouteflika because he is sick We want Trump intervention in return The brother of President Bouteflika, whose happy name dominated Algeria under the starvation of the people
Letting the liberal socialists gain a foothold is also a threat to our nation.
Drama Queen! Ever hear of  shovel dig a tunnel? Highest priority? ISIS defeated? This is you shutdown. The people on this thread are working and  not impacted.This shutdown is slowly putting our country into a real crisis. Not a drama filled one.Take your own money and pay for the wall. You are all talk. Keep giving away your hand and stimulate the enemy.
Listen up. It is written The wall is necessary to secure our borders and protect the Nation of United States of America and its population.  Sir, excellent decision. Lets finish the wall necessary to secure our borders and protect the Nation of United States of America and its population.  Israel re-built there wall in 52 days during the Bible OLD Testament time with no modern tools as we have today in the 21st Century.  Nehemiah 6:15-16 New Living Translation  The Builders Complete the Wall  15 So on October 2d the wall was finished—just fifty-two days after we had begun. 16 When our enemies and the surrounding nations heard about it, they were frightened and humiliated. They realized this work had been done with the help of our God.  Definition of enemy plural enemies 1 : one that is antagonistic to another; especially : one seeking to injure, overthrow, or confound an opponent 2 : something harmful or deadly alcohol was his greatest enemy 3 a : a military adversary b : a hostile unit or force  http://biblehub.com/nlt/nehemiah/6.htmbiblehub.com
NO you swore to defend and uphold the constitution. THAT is your most important duty.  SMH!
You're either a Democrat or a Patriot you just cant be both
Mr.Donald Trump A Representative Of Democracy & Missing Pieces 2020 You Have My Support
NO WALL NO JOBS BUILD THE WALL KEEP THE JOBS ..DEMOCRATES JUS WANNA GET HIGH AND SELL DRUGS...VULTURES
gimp
Syria: Leave our sand and take our death
Syria: Leave our sand and take our death
Syria: Leave our sand and take our death
You can’t believe a habitual liar!!
Trump's chief economic adviser to federal workers: Get a loan  https://www.cbsnews.com/news/trumps-chief-economic-adviser-to-federal-workers-get-a-loan/
Thank you President Trump! A complete steel barrier is necessary to defend our borders and great people. Trade restrictions, sanctions and a strong military are necessary to keep peace in the ME and elsewhere. The Senate is a great place for State of the Union addresses. America first! God bless the USA!
PRESIDENT TRUMP,   you are doing a fantastic job... even  with   ALL the  LIBBIES  ganging up on you    ... THEY  JUST FORGOT  HOW MANY OF  US  ARE SUPPORTING YOU.🏋️‍♀️🐘🤺🏋️‍♂️    Time is runing  out⏳   GIVE US OUR  💰  SO WE CAN BUILD OUR WALL.
Yes Mr. President you are right and you care for the people and America's security.
NO you swore to defend and uphold the constitution. THAT is your most important duty.  SMH!
Yes Mr. President you are right and you care for the people and America's security.
Mr.Trump u r ancisters are from Europe...u r ancisters  distroyed Red Indians  cammunity..U.S is country of Imigrates...
Come LEGALLY !!!
PRESIDENT TRUMP,   you are doing a fantastic job... even  with   ALL the  LIBBIES  ganging up on you    ... THEY  JUST FORGOT  HOW MANY OF  US  ARE SUPPORTING YOU.🏋️‍♀️🐘🤺🏋️‍♂️    Time is runing  out⏳   GIVE US OUR  💰  SO WE CAN BUILD OUR WALL.
You are the biggest threat to our national security!!!
Tell em what it is Mr President.  You the man.
Donald J Trump= the Jim and Tammy Faye Baker of the new millennium . Robbing and lying to the good hearted faithful. Good Christian believers taken in by a CON ARTIST SUPREME. Remember folks . MATTHEW 7 : 15
Everyday you say the border is critical to our security. The border this and the border that. Are we moving forward with the border wall or not? I support the protection of the US. Im not necessarily against the wall or for it. Let's just get something done. Rep are blaming the Dems and the Dems are blaming the Rep. Its like everyone is in kindergarten. Figure this out President Trump.
Drugs are such a problem in America- I think that everyone has at least 1 person in their family who is or was a drug addict. If you are lucky enough not to have someone you love hooked on drugs then I feel sure you know someone who has a family member that is. That alone is a great enough reason for the border being secure. Not to mention all the murders-child kidnappings and child trafficking. Everyone in this great country of ours should be for the border wall. I don't want to see another young person hooked on drugs much less an adult. It hurts the entire family not just the user. And 90% of the drugs come Thur the border from Mexico.
A con man who is staging a fight for a wall he does not believe in himself, if so it would have been done 2 years ago......He will go down in history as the con man who put on a false fight to keep the government shut down to protect himself .  If he did not lie to his base and feel embarrassed by getting caught in his own lies this would not happen.  Democrats took the house with no wall or a caravan
Trump stop the hoax.  Open the government you Russia agent!
Come LEGALLY !!!
WELL SAID !!!  ✅
Trump, day 27 of YOUR shutdown!  Innocent people NOT getting paid .. because of you!  YOU should be “IMPEACHED”.. just for this alone!   America is defenseless alright, defenseless from you!  Holding people hostage, withholding pay, (stealing) just to get a Monument to your name, “The Trump Wall”!  Sick .. and totally unfit for office!
If you shut down the whole government, we will be Russians and China will own the Whitehouse. Wile E. West
Donald J. Trump and Vice President Mike Pence: “We have eliminated ISIS and we are pulling out of Syria” Breaking News: “ 4 US service members have been killed in Syria. ISIS has claimed responsibility”  Trump, Pence and their supporters: 🤐🤐🤐... uhhh.. “it’s Obama and HRC’s fault”
STAY STRONG MR PRESIDENT.  While the democrats put ILLEGAL ALIENS FIRST  President Trump says AMERICA FIRST.
Anyone who thinks Trump respects Veterans and the sacrifices they make for this country is sadly mistaken.  https://www.cnn.com/2019/01/17/us/michigan-ice-detains-us-citizen-veteran/index.html
Maybe ??? Give a LARGE Portion of the US Military Budget to US Law Enforcement AND have them Create a More Secure & Safer  North America, Central America & South America🌎
If you keep your government in shutdown, then it cease to be a nation yo!
Republicans are splitting from trump.  They know the end is near for crooked trump and republicans
If you keep your government in shutdown, then it cease to be a nation yo!
Maybe ??? Give a LARGE Portion of the US Military Budget to US Law Enforcement AND have them Create a More Secure & Safer  North America, Central America & South America🌎
Put a sock in it, Donnie. Your days are numbered.
Satchel...if you voted for the Bigly Orange Con Man the only name you need to be called by is STUPID!
you as presdent have the right to build the wall .
Every month of shut down means a decrease in the economy growth of 0.15%, which means alround 1-2% decrease over a year, which is more or less the growth rate of the industrialized countries in this world, not to speak about almost a million state employees taken as hostages ;-(. They do not know, how to pay their bills and how to buy their food and sorry to say, I know what that feels like. The trade war with China also already impacts severly the economic growth of leading US companies like Apple, Tesla and many others as they are loosing market share in one of the most important arrising markets, China. Please let's stop trade wars, populistic nationalistic politics and let's work together with your strong partners in Europe, Asia and worldwide on the real problems ahead, not for walls, weapons and dirty old-fashioned, enviromental doutable technologies like coal.
Then you should google and read 10 USC 311. Militia Compositions and Classes...and stop appointing people who swear to uphold the constitution while planning to violate it. Those people are liars and are unfit for office. They deserve no respect.
No delay on the SOTU address! Americans want to hear from our president & not Pelosi whose agenda is political & anti/American!   The Pelosi/Schumer shut down has taken a toll on govt workers. Americans will not forget this come the 2020 election, as the Dems will be voted out of office! ALL Americans know they voted for the wall under Obama. Don’t punish Americans for wanting safety & security, just because they lost & Trump won!
Your not a black sheep when your a Republican, your just a smart citizen !
The president's current shutdown and tweets about immigrants and our safety are intended to frighten us and bully Congress into funding a border wall. Whether a future wall is a good idea or not is questionable, and the whole situation needs discussion and debate. Ironically, the shutdown is causing real danger and harm right now.  Federal workers, who actually serve the country, are sent home without pay, and now know they will have no raise next year. This occurs while our billionaire president and other well-to-do politicians posture and blame in comfort.  Civil servants, who might help process and care for immigrants at the border, are laid off. This makes the situation more difficult and dangerous for both immigrants and the Border Patrol every day.
With you President Trump
The president's current shutdown and tweets about immigrants and our safety are intended to frighten us and bully Congress into funding a border wall. Whether a future wall is a good idea or not is questionable, and the whole situation needs discussion and debate. Ironically, the shutdown is causing real danger and harm right now.  Federal workers, who actually serve the country, are sent home without pay, and now know they will have no raise next year. This occurs while our billionaire president and other well-to-do politicians posture and blame in comfort.  Civil servants, who might help process and care for immigrants at the border, are laid off. This makes the situation more difficult and dangerous for both immigrants and the Border Patrol every day.
This should read: If we don't stop the Russians then we cease to be a nation.
We need a new President...this is absurd, with holding government employees paycheck...they must be suffering
Yes, they are suffering. This shutdown is exactly what the Republicans have been working towards for decades. They want all government programs outsourced to private enterprise. Don't expect this shutdown to end.
Your not a black sheep when your a Republican, your just a smart citizen !
Yes, they are suffering. This shutdown is exactly what the Republicans have been working towards for decades. They want all government programs outsourced to private enterprise. Don't expect this shutdown to end.
LYING CROOK . . . nice try distracting us from your crimes!!! BuzzFeed: Sources say Trump directed Michael Cohen to lie to Congress about proposed Moscow project   https://www.cnn.com/2019/01/17/politics/buzzfeed-trump-cohen-lie-congress-moscow/index.htmlBuzzFeed: Sources say Trump directed Michael Cohen to lie to Congress about proposed Moscow projectcnn.com
hate much ?  so sad.  We should always put Americans before illegals. We are 20 trillion in debt, come here legally
We need a new President...this is absurd, with holding government employees paycheck...they must be suffering
Stop the bull Trump Stop the lies.  Your corrupt crap is overflowing
To defend your nation you dodged the draft . Must have saved a lot of lives that way
WHEN SOMEONE ROBS A BANK THEY BOARDER HOP TO MEXICO OR CANADA WE NEED A CANADA BOARER WALL AND MEXICO BOARDER WALL
Trump if you remain president we will cease to be a nation.
hahaha...you destroy the whole world..ur father would laughing about u...u are just a slave from putin und and the zions...
So claims the sissy rich boy who dodged the draft and insulted war hero’s like Captain John McCain. President Bush and GW loathed Trump for a good reason
Trump don't need to go to the senate or the house to get a deal he needs to go to the lobbyists they run this country
hate much ?  so sad.  We should always put Americans before illegals. We are 20 trillion in debt, come here legally
Trump don't need to go to the senate or the house to get a deal he needs to go to the lobbyists they run this country
THE trump SHUTSHOW 3.0, Day 27: Can you say “pay for play” ? T-Mobile announced a merger needing Trump administration approval. The next day, 9 executives had reservations at Trump’s hotel. “Last April, telecom giant T-Mobile announced a megadeal: a $26 billion merger with rival Sprint, which would more than double T-Mobile’s value and give it a huge new chunk of the cellphone market. But for T-Mobile, one hurdle remained: Its deal needed approval from the Trump administration. The next day, in Washington, staffers at the Trump International Hotel were handed a list of incoming “VIP Arrivals.” That day’s list included nine of T-Mobile’s top executives — including its chief operating officer, chief technology officer, chief strategy officer and chief financial officer, and its outspoken celebrity chief executive, John Legere. The executives had scheduled stays of up to three days. But it was not their last visit. Instead, T-Mobile executives have returned to President Trump’s hotel repeatedly since then, according to eyewitnesses and hotel documents obtained by The Washington Post.”  FULL STORY BELOW https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/a-place-i-feel-very-comfortable-t-mobile-executives-seeking-government-approval-for-merger-stayed-at-trumps-hotel-repeatedly/2019/01/15/6a114d3e-142c-11e9-b6ad-9cfd62dbb0a8_story.html?utm_term=.af9acc540cbcT-Mobile announced a merger needing Trump administration approval. The next day, 9 executives had reservations at Trump’s hotel.washingtonpost.com
The Emoluments Clause, US Constitution, Article I, Section 9, Clause 8 “Also known as the Title of Nobility Clause, Article I, Section 9, Clause 8 of the U.S. Constitution prohibits any person holding a government office from accepting any present, emolument, office, or title from any "King, Prince, or foreign State," without congressional consent. This clause is meant to prevent external influence and corruption of American officers by foreign States. A similar provision was included in the Articles of Confederation, applicable to both federal and state officers. The language of the modern clause, however, suggests that only federal government officials are prohibited from accepting any emoluments. That the phrase "Offices of Profit or Trust under the United States" applies to all appointed officials is undisputed, however there is much debate as to whether it extends to elected officials. History does not provide a clear answer: When he served as Secretary of the Treasury, Alexander Hamilton produced a list of persons holding such offices at the request of the Senate; the list did not include any elected positions. Further, during their presidencies, while George Washington did not seek or obtain congressional consent for foreign gifts, Andrew Jackson did. The Foreign Gifts and Decorations Act of 1966, on the other hand, enumerates several elected positions in its definition of "employees" who may not accept any gift of more than minimal value without congressional approval. Such "employees" include the President and the Vice President, a Member of Congress, and the spouses and dependents of the same. A constitutional amendment was introduced in 1810 to modify the Emoluments Clause. The effect would have been to strip the citizenship of any U.S. citizen who accepted, claimed, received, or retained any title of nobility from a foreign government. However, this amendment was never ratified, though it is technically still pending before the states. The interpretation of the Emoluments Clause has never been litigated before the U.S. Supreme Court.” https://www.law.cornell.edu/wex/emoluments_clause
So claims the sissy rich boy who dodged the draft and insulted war hero’s like Captain John McCain. President Bush and GW loathed Trump for a good reason
The Emoluments Clause, US Constitution, Article I, Section 9, Clause 8 “Also known as the Title of Nobility Clause, Article I, Section 9, Clause 8 of the U.S. Constitution prohibits any person holding a government office from accepting any present, emolument, office, or title from any "King, Prince, or foreign State," without congressional consent. This clause is meant to prevent external influence and corruption of American officers by foreign States. A similar provision was included in the Articles of Confederation, applicable to both federal and state officers. The language of the modern clause, however, suggests that only federal government officials are prohibited from accepting any emoluments. That the phrase "Offices of Profit or Trust under the United States" applies to all appointed officials is undisputed, however there is much debate as to whether it extends to elected officials. History does not provide a clear answer: When he served as Secretary of the Treasury, Alexander Hamilton produced a list of persons holding such offices at the request of the Senate; the list did not include any elected positions. Further, during their presidencies, while George Washington did not seek or obtain congressional consent for foreign gifts, Andrew Jackson did. The Foreign Gifts and Decorations Act of 1966, on the other hand, enumerates several elected positions in its definition of "employees" who may not accept any gift of more than minimal value without congressional approval. Such "employees" include the President and the Vice President, a Member of Congress, and the spouses and dependents of the same. A constitutional amendment was introduced in 1810 to modify the Emoluments Clause. The effect would have been to strip the citizenship of any U.S. citizen who accepted, claimed, received, or retained any title of nobility from a foreign government. However, this amendment was never ratified, though it is technically still pending before the states. The interpretation of the Emoluments Clause has never been litigated before the U.S. Supreme Court.” https://www.law.cornell.edu/wex/emoluments_clause
No true leader would create suffering amongst a million of their own citizens and their families in order to look like a winner or look strong.  OPEN THE GOVERNMENT.  Then work with Congress to identify which border security enhancements are of highest priority, then ID what are the best approaches for those highest priority needs, then fund those approaches.  Repeat for the next highest set of priorities.  Repeat cycles until pt. of diminishing returns is encountered.  Use truth and fact - not lies and simple-minded propaganda spin messaging.   STOP hurting our own citizens - it is IMMORAL.
Nick Brown Nick, I am the author of these remarks thus I can copy and paste it to any simple-minded propaganda spin message posted by Trump.  Trump in The Art of the Deal: “I play to people’s fantasies.”  Takes a big man to gaslight his country...l.
THE trump SHUTSHOW 3.0, Day 27: Can you say “pay for play” ? T-Mobile announced a merger needing Trump administration approval. The next day, 9 executives had reservations at Trump’s hotel. “Last April, telecom giant T-Mobile announced a megadeal: a $26 billion merger with rival Sprint, which would more than double T-Mobile’s value and give it a huge new chunk of the cellphone market. But for T-Mobile, one hurdle remained: Its deal needed approval from the Trump administration. The next day, in Washington, staffers at the Trump International Hotel were handed a list of incoming “VIP Arrivals.” That day’s list included nine of T-Mobile’s top executives — including its chief operating officer, chief technology officer, chief strategy officer and chief financial officer, and its outspoken celebrity chief executive, John Legere. The executives had scheduled stays of up to three days. But it was not their last visit. Instead, T-Mobile executives have returned to President Trump’s hotel repeatedly since then, according to eyewitnesses and hotel documents obtained by The Washington Post.”  FULL STORY BELOW https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/a-place-i-feel-very-comfortable-t-mobile-executives-seeking-government-approval-for-merger-stayed-at-trumps-hotel-repeatedly/2019/01/15/6a114d3e-142c-11e9-b6ad-9cfd62dbb0a8_story.html?utm_term=.af9acc540cbcT-Mobile announced a merger needing Trump administration approval. The next day, 9 executives had reservations at Trump’s hotel.washingtonpost.com
we the People voted Trump in to make this country safe again, and those of you who don't want this should leave and to go another country, we want our country to be the way it was before the last 5 Presidents were in and made this country the way it is now
Citizens are responding to the mess that your government shutdown is causing.  At our local international airport donations are being received to aid Federal workers who are not being paid.  Your shutdown is shameful.
Bush 41: "We have a border crisis  Clinton: We have a border crisis  Bush 43: We have a border crisis  HRC: We have a border crisis  Trump: Lets build a wall and end the border crisis  Media: OMG...Trump manufactured the crisis.
Dear Donald J. Trump I am sorry to inform you that due to the shutdown, we the people cannot afford the extra security for you to go to your golf resort in Florida.......see you when you open the country!
Then why are you in cahoots with Putin?  Why did you get sanctions lifted from Deripaska?
May the grace of our risen Lord Jesus Christ be always with you president Donald J Trump and the entire administration
Nick Brown Nick, I am the author of these remarks thus I can copy and paste it to any simple-minded propaganda spin message posted by Trump.  Trump in The Art of the Deal: “I play to people’s fantasies.”  Takes a big man to gaslight his country...l.
Christ be with you Mr President.  Keep you safe
"Mr. President you can have your wall. You can get it the same way that President Obama got Obamacare; the way Lyndon Johnson got Medicare; the way Franklin Roosevelt got Social Security. In each case the president had a project he wanted enacted; so his administration crafted a bill. That bill went to Congress where committee hearings were held; amendments were proposed; studies were conducted that tested the cost, effectiveness etc. of the proposal; testimony was held in Congress; debate ensued and if the measure had enough support, a vote was taken and the measure was passed. That's how you legislate. It takes hard work, planning and the ability to actually negotiate. Your pet project doesn't get to leap frog over the pathway laid out by the Constitution and 250 years of precedent. You have chosen to skip over this entire process (even when you had majorities in both Houses) and have resorted instead to taking the American public hostage in exchange for your wall. You want a wall? Put down the gun you are holding to the head of the American people and get to work."
If we don’t defend our borders, then we cease to be a nation. THAT IS THE LEFT'S GOAL!
That.  Right.  Protect.  Kids. Bad. Men. Like. Emmas. Dad. And. John. Stevenson. Sick. Fathers. Molest. Daughters
I disagree with both of you. I believe the Democrats did shut down the government. I don't believe they did it over 5 billion dollars. I believe they did it out of defense for our American values and ideals. America is beginning to look a little to much like a prison. Guns in churches and schools, metal detectors in hospitals, court houses, and government buildings, and now a wall and security wire around the border? What's the difference between our nation and a maximum security penitentiary? We are becoming a little to harden. President Roosevelt feared declaring war for this very reason. He reasoned that the people would become to hardened and that the mentality would replace mercy and forgiveness. Fundamental emotions of all human beings. Defending our country's most sensitive beliefs is worth every loss we will incur during a lengthy government shutdown (showdown). Our virtues are worth defending. It is more important now, in the state our country is in, than it ever has been in America's brief history! Do you really want our values to go extinct? It's about more than border security. It's about more than 5 billion dollars. It's about who gets to determine the nation's system of beliefs. Do we believe in welcoming our neighbors, protecting the weak, sacrificing for the poor, or do we believe in a nation of walls, hardened schools, guns in temples, a nation that is so afraid of its own citizens that it needs metal detectors at the courthouse and even worse at the hospital! I'm for border security but I have to stand against a wall and what it stands for. There is just so much more at stake than a mere barrier between our nations.
Which border are you defending when a once America banned corrupt man from Nigeria just visits your country? A man who in his case your country jailed two high top Americans.
Mr. President as soon as that next caravan hits the US Mexican border declare a national emergency!
SHUT DOWN TILL POSITIVE NATIONAL DEBTS! JUST REPLACE WITH US MILITARY FOR THAT FEDERAL EMPLOYEE POSITIONS TEMPORARY
May the grace of our risen Lord Jesus Christ be always with you president Donald J Trump and the entire administration
SHUT DOWN TILL POSITIVE NATIONAL DEBTS! JUST REPLACE WITH US MILITARY FOR THAT FEDERAL EMPLOYEE POSITIONS TEMPORARY
Ann de Roo-Daly TROLL!! Not from this country...we spell check not cheque!!

Dianne Fitzgerald did you see all the stuff he had to reverse from the previous president if you can call him that. Dummy up Dianne. You should move to mexico if you like it so much. Dianne you can seek professional help for this problem. Good luck and I always tell libertards these symptoms might be from the cat piss in the air.
James Kenney the faceless facebooker. Someone who makes a billion from a few million is a dummy. Ok. What does that make you.
Colleen Kandra that’s all you got Colleen?
James Kenney thanks James.
Ann de Roo-Daly James sick individuals no need to respond. Look at them lame profile pictures. I am me. Bunch of dorks.
Says the man who is robbing hard-working government employees of their pay and holding them hostage like a petulant child.
Clint Backhaus nothing else to do Clint? If that is the case, why don’t you contact the man who is, not only happy but proud, to have government workers go without their pay cheque. If you cannot get trump in the White House, try his golf course in Florida
Ann de Roo-Daly James sick individuals no need to respond. Look at them lame profile pictures. I am me. Bunch of dorks.
What if Trump fined all the people who don't want the wall like Obama did eith Obamacare?  He'd get his funding with or without Democratic support. 😂
Yes, so stop devoting all your attention to border control which is much improved in recent years. Your only interest there, as anyone with a brain knows, is to fulfill a dumb campaign promise to build an ineffective wall. Pay attention to what matters, you mango Mussolini.
Every single person in this country should be for strict borders , if your not your not a American ! A country without borders is not a country !
If we the people dont get your treasonous  clan out of the peoples house . There will be a russian flag flown on the capital lawn!
If you believe trump, you deserve whatever comes from him.
Absolute nonsense. Why all of a sudden is there a major crisis at the Mexican border? LIES!  All lies. You are not getting your wall. You best figure out a way to keep the border patrol from being investigated for corruption.
WANTED FOR PRESIDENT: A NON-LIAR. SOMEONE THAT SERVES THE COUNTRY AND NOT HIMSELF. A MAN WITH MORALS & DIGNITY. WE WANT A MAN THAT FOLLOWS THE CONSTITUTION AND BELIEVES AND FIGHTS FOR DEMOCRACY AND FOR THE GOOD OF OUR GREAT NATION.
Clint Backhaus nothing else to do Clint? If that is the case, why don’t you contact the man who is, not only happy but proud, to have government workers go without their pay cheque. If you cannot get trump in the White House, try his golf course in Florida
lipstick on a pig graphics intern needs to be furloughed
The same people telling you no to $5.5 billion, are the same people who cant account for $21 TRILLION from 1998-2015. So therefore we, the American people are forced to pay a current debt of $21.9 TRILLION, thanks to their carelessness.  But they claim $5.5 billion for more border security is a waste of tax payers dollars? Someone please explain how these people are not in jail...
The wall goes against the American Union. Mexico, Canada and America as one state. That's why the left wing are trying to drop the border.
TRUMP: Coaching a witness to lie is an obstructing justice
You are doing a great job President Trump. Keep up the great work thank you for putting Americans first . And BUILD THAT WALL 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Anyone who does not defend our borders is a Traitor, according to our Constitution.
A careless and arrogant president.  #iwayanwilantara
you dont care about americans, you just want a structure that you can make money off of. You make everyone sick
A careless and arrogant president.  #iwayanwilantara
Tyson Rien dod DHS are still in full operation buddy sorry to burst your crayola colored bubble
Anyone who does not defend our borders is a Traitor, according to our Constitution.
WRONG  your most important duty is to DEFEND THE CONSTITUTION AGAINST ALL ENEMIES FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC ...YOU HAVE DONE A HORRIBLE JOB
You hid from military combat, so how are you an expert on protecting the country?
As president all you care about is your money that you're making off of this presidency and getting attention 24/7. 😜
A black man in Oakland sued one of the biggest corporate in America. They are called Monsanto. Monsanto is a chemical facility plant industrial that synthesized chemicals to spray our crops. Its poisonous and it causes cancer. Early 2017. A man was diagnose with cancer. Doctors gave him 3 months to live. He was a school ground keeper. One of his job requirements was to kill the weeds off by using weed killer. Which Monsanto produces. With science knowledge and prove. Points out it was the weed killer it self that gave that man cancer. He won. One of the biggest law sue in history. Now we are finding out that Monsanto ingredients is in our cereal, oatmeal and another foods we buy in the grocery stores.   In 2009, Obama first term of Presidency. He selected the vice President of Monsanto to be head of the F.D.A.   Obama was also a huge supporter of none labeling Monsanto ingredients on our food. That also passed. Now you ever wonder why we have an cancer epidemic ever in history? Or why they so invested on to passing universal healthcare?   Never have government have full control of our healthcare system.  It's called a death panel.
Not one service men and women would NOT clap for him today😂 that has never happened before! Do you think its because he started pulling our troops out of Syria or maybe he has not mentioned the 4 service men that got killed with a suicide bomber or not paying for the coast guard with HIS shutdown? He defiantly won't get re-elected in 2020. Your little group won't have enough votes. THANK GOD! Nancy is a very strong lady and i wonder where he's going to give his state of the union address maybe the white house or his plane or maybe his bathroom.😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Unless your ancestors were living, breathing, working, loving and dying in this land prior to 1942- you are a descendant of immigrants, and have no right to tell others to stay out.
Speaking of defense-Trump’s choice of lawyers was bad. He would have been better off with Frito Pendejo.,
Tyson Rien dod DHS are still in full operation buddy sorry to burst your crayola colored bubble
Speaking of defense-Trump’s choice of lawyers was bad. He would have been better off with Frito Pendejo.,
YOU ARE A FAILURE SINCE BEFORE YOU TOOK YOUR OATH !
Failure in what.
Martha Pickens FAILURE AND THIEF !
Ignore the haters, Stand strong! This is why we hired you. For the last 60 years,. we have watched. One Republican after another cave. As our country slides into socialism. You are our last hope!!
Martha Pickens FAILURE AND THIEF !
Greg Gray Tell that to the little trumper-tantrum manbaby in the White House.
Failure in what.
The numbers on these posts say it all for themselves.... At the time I posted this there are 54,000 likes or loves  while all the rest barely made  a thousand.  960 laughs, 120 mad, 63 Wow's, and only 27 pouty Liberal faces.... The majority rules... Build the fucking wall already. Sometimes children just need a firm hand.
Trump,  Nancy Pelosi is the boss!  Do as your told and know your place.  Open the Government! !!
I want to talk in English on messenger or any others. It is very important for speaking as a conversation. If any one interested, please add me and we carry on regularly conversation. Thanks.
Greg Gray Tell that to the little trumper-tantrum manbaby in the White House.
CHARGE THE DEMO RATS FOR AIDING AND ABETTING ILLEGALS
Levi Colón illeagal Mexicans should contribute 0% percent of the total crime in this Country. They should recieve 0% of this Countries budget.  If a Tangible representation of the Land we protect discourages even a small percent of those entering to file the paperwork,it will in fact pay for itself. While it might be difficult to see the big picture,the economic loss to this Country is staggering! Time for change.
CHARGE THE DEMO RATS FOR AIDING AND ABETTING ILLEGALS
I hope you see the walls of your prison cell soon.  Who will piss in your hair then??
Best PRESIDENT ever Donald J TRUMP  GOD BLESS you and your FAMILY PRESIDENT TRUMP  AMERICA FIRST ALWAYS and FOREVER
It's now the highest priority of this president to  fund the border wall...a country with an open border is not a nation.. It has to have a border wall to protect the citizenry.from harm and to preserve its sovereignty.against tyrants.
I have a question: If, as Trump claims, the border wall is a "national emergency", why is it that the Governors of Arizona, California, New Mexico, and Texas have failed to declare their own emergencies, and called up the National Guard in their states? I have not seen or heard of any action taken by the states, so it seems absurd to me that the border issue constitutes an emergency.
Levi Colón illeagal Mexicans should contribute 0% percent of the total crime in this Country. They should recieve 0% of this Countries budget.  If a Tangible representation of the Land we protect discourages even a small percent of those entering to file the paperwork,it will in fact pay for itself. While it might be difficult to see the big picture,the economic loss to this Country is staggering! Time for change.
It should be a priority of all elected officials.  Guess pelosi and Schumer have other priorities like catering to illegals instead of Americans.
Oh look, another triggered snowflake
Brett White no snowflake here I am the storm
It should be a priority of all elected officials.  Guess pelosi and Schumer have other priorities like catering to illegals instead of Americans.
Brett White no snowflake here I am the storm
Stella Barrett #fakenews
Jessica Rufus tell me what’s fake???  The ripple effects of the shutdown will have a significant, negative effect in the economy.  Do you know anything or just absorb the pap on Fox State Network?
Oh look, another triggered snowflake
Jessica Rufus tell me what’s fake???  The ripple effects of the shutdown will have a significant, negative effect in the economy.  Do you know anything or just absorb the pap on Fox State Network?
Build the wall already so people can go back to work and support their families.
Jordan Ozzy DeLage, overdosing on fool pills again?
Bob Segal there is no overdosing today unless you're doing illegal drugs which majority of people in this country are on prescription drugs because it works I'm on prescription drugs and I'm not overdosing shows how stupid you are and you should be expected too.
Jordan Ozzy DeLage, murder?? Talk about someone being triggered! You aren’t just a fool but a damn fool.   When you actually believe a president, former or current will ever see one second of jail, much less be executed, you really need to visit your proctologist so they can properly evaluate your level of brain damage.
Bob Segal you should be executed just like Trump..
Build the wall already so people can go back to work and support their families.
Bob Segal you should be executed just like Trump..
Randy Cameron The Democrats are already here.
Randy Cameron is English your second language?  Go Trump
Jordan Ozzy DeLage, murder?? Talk about someone being triggered! You aren’t just a fool but a damn fool.   When you actually believe a president, former or current will ever see one second of jail, much less be executed, you really need to visit your proctologist so they can properly evaluate your level of brain damage.
President Donald Trump's former "fixer" Michael Cohen said Thursday that he paid the head of a small technology company thousands in 2015 to rig online polls at "the direction of and for the sole benefit of" Trump.
Randy Cameron is English your second language?  Go Trump
Stay  strong  Mr.  President.  Please  tweet  all  day long  about  Chuck  and  Nancy  snubbing  Americans  whose  loved  ones  have  been  killed  by  illegals.  You  are  on  the  right  side  of  this  issue.
Marley Dee, sexist much???
Marley Dee  you keep telling yourself that! Trump is the best President Ever! Build that wall and secure our country! Vote Trump 2020! Do you realize Nancy is what’s wrong with our country! She wanted the wall once until Trump promised the people the wall! Now she doesn’t because she doesn’t want Trump to make good on this promise to build the Wall! Problem solved if Nancy was dismissed! She’s going to far! Government could open if she cared about the people! Hey Nancy open your doors and fence your friends are coming! OH wait your afraid of them! What a wacko! ❤️🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸❤️
Stay  strong  Mr.  President.  Please  tweet  all  day long  about  Chuck  and  Nancy  snubbing  Americans  whose  loved  ones  have  been  killed  by  illegals.  You  are  on  the  right  side  of  this  issue.
Build the wall! Blood is on Democrats hands.
Amen, Mr. President and Commander In Chief!  This True American Christian Conservative woman stands proudly with you as you defend and protect our USA Constitution and Rule of Law; as you protect our USA Flag, 'Old Glory', our Pledge of Allegiance and our right to defend and protect our USA sovereign soil.  Without Borders; Without Boundaries; Without Laws a Nation cannot and will not stand.  BUILD THAT WALL!  Enforce our Rule of Law and defend our USA Constitution and sovereign soil from all invaders and from all enemies.
Build the Wall then give DHS workers a bonus and raise for putting up with Pelosi's shutdown and working with no paycheck.
I have a dream of being a President of the World who will be a Good Leader of all the Presidents of the Countries to all over the World @South Africa
Trump is using a historically accurate axiom. "A country without borders is not a country."  We annexed Florida because their inhabitants raided our border towns until we said stop.  Illegal immigrants raid our jobs and don't give me "the Americans won't work the jobs they take" crap. It is an urban legend recently proven false. Americans DO work those jobs and still hold a majority in most of them.  We have been sold lies by political hacks and it has to stop. If people come here LEGALLY, then have at it it is fair game but just say 'no' to illegal immigration
Yet your a fucking draft dodger!!!!!!
Such BULLSHIT.  If We the People do not defend OUR CONSTITUTION and OUR BILL OF RIGHTS from a treasonous Nazi-loving whore of Vladimir Putin -- in other words, from Donald J Trump, Mike Pence, and Mitch McConnell and their co-conspirators -- THEN WE CEASE TO BE A NATION.  TIME TO END TRUMP-PENCE and bring these treasonous Nazi-loving whores of Vladimir Putin to trial for their crimes against We the People of the United States of America!
Trump is selling out our country.  He is NOT defending it. Former Bush Official Richard Painter: "President Donald Trump has fulfilled almost all of Vladimir Putin's dreams and plans to expand the global power of Russia by diminishing the power, respect and influence of the United States."
BUILD THE WALL! TAKE AS NEEDED IT BUILD THE WALL
Marley Dee  you keep telling yourself that! Trump is the best President Ever! Build that wall and secure our country! Vote Trump 2020! Do you realize Nancy is what’s wrong with our country! She wanted the wall once until Trump promised the people the wall! Now she doesn’t because she doesn’t want Trump to make good on this promise to build the Wall! Problem solved if Nancy was dismissed! She’s going to far! Government could open if she cared about the people! Hey Nancy open your doors and fence your friends are coming! OH wait your afraid of them! What a wacko! ❤️🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸❤️
BUILD THE WALL! TAKE AS NEEDED IT BUILD THE WALL
The Election of Trump has pulled the curtain back on The Administrative State (deep state) ...Greatly points to the fact that we don't have a "Justice" system. We have a "Just Us" system (designed to protect criminals like the clintons). I no longer trust any of the alphabet Law Enforcement Agencies including the IRS or the Courts. The whole thing is rigged and corrupt beyond repair. Everybody knows this.  .Democrats are now an adversary of the U.S. and like any enemy of the U.S. they care nothing about National Security and Public Safety..
"Donna Brazile admits stealing debate questions for Hillary, but blames the Russians By Thomas Lifson I give Donna Brazile just a few points for finally fessing up (after lying and denying) that she stole and supplied CNN debate questions to Hillary Clinton, helping the establishment candidate triumph over insurgent Bernie Sanders.  But I have to deduct even more points, because she did so in a context of blaming the Russians and partially exonerating herself. The expression “non-denial denial” has a cognate in her non-apology apology."
"Indeed, what the Democrats and Mueller's team seem to be saying is that the Russians interfered in the 2016 election by hacking into the emails of John Podesta and the DNC to reveal how they were interfering in the 2016 elections.  And they forget how former DNC chair Debbie Wasserman Schultz tipped the scales for Hillary Clinton over a surging Bernie Sanders.  She interfered in the 2016 election in ways Vladimir Putin couldn't even dream of and arguably changed at least the Democratic Party results and campaign timeline."
Trump is selling out our country.  He is NOT defending it. Former Bush Official Richard Painter: "President Donald Trump has fulfilled almost all of Vladimir Putin's dreams and plans to expand the global power of Russia by diminishing the power, respect and influence of the United States."
"Indeed, what the Democrats and Mueller's team seem to be saying is that the Russians interfered in the 2016 election by hacking into the emails of John Podesta and the DNC to reveal how they were interfering in the 2016 elections.  And they forget how former DNC chair Debbie Wasserman Schultz tipped the scales for Hillary Clinton over a surging Bernie Sanders.  She interfered in the 2016 election in ways Vladimir Putin couldn't even dream of and arguably changed at least the Democratic Party results and campaign timeline."
Someone is trolling Trump. This picture is a copy of Lenin era Soviet propaganda, the walking pose with stretched arm in particulair.
"Donna Brazile admits stealing debate questions for Hillary, but blames the Russians By Thomas Lifson I give Donna Brazile just a few points for finally fessing up (after lying and denying) that she stole and supplied CNN debate questions to Hillary Clinton, helping the establishment candidate triumph over insurgent Bernie Sanders.  But I have to deduct even more points, because she did so in a context of blaming the Russians and partially exonerating herself. The expression “non-denial denial” has a cognate in her non-apology apology."
The caravan came across many borders they were all open any more drugs and terrorist come in from Canada than southern and on plains and by sea
trump is lying idiot Period!
Defend our borders. We stand with you. MAGA! 🇺🇸
Oh please Donnie boy! Such a fraud!
Its sad that the demonRATS hate for Trump out weighs their love for America
Build the wall.  Don't wait for congress.
Russian graphic designers.
Build the wall.  Don't wait for congress.
Its sad that the demonRATS hate for Trump out weighs their love for America
For those of you who think a border wall will protect you, y'all are about as dumb as trump thinking it will. Drugs immigrants come in other ways besides Mexico. Most drugs and guns are imported in on boats or planes. Illegal immigrants come the same way lmao so pathetic to think that a wall will prevent it from occurring.
This man will preserve your country  Unlike our useless Muppets in Westminster  Vote FOR TRUMP
Thank you Mr. President for being on America's side.  Those that are against you are really sad people!  They hate more people working, more money, people off welfare and supporting their own families.
That’s right no border no nation (Rats)
If you don't stand for ALL your citizens, (calling democrats traitors), then you cease to be a "precedent".
Build the wall and remove the magnets that draw illegal aliens here, then keep them here.
I think we should all sell our souls to bend over for Nancy Pelosi!
PROTECT OUR BORDERS  AND THATS IT. the government needs to stay out of our business. all this taxation, welfare, wealth redistribution, nation building... has got to stop. NOW!
TSA  agents aren't controlling terrorists getting on planes cuz of your shutdown donnie.  Illegals aren't the problem..you are.
Especially when our OWN Country sends millions to OTHER Countries for THEIR safety!!  HOW do Pelosi, Schumer and the rest of the House creatures justify that??
TSA  agents aren't controlling terrorists getting on planes cuz of your shutdown donnie.  Illegals aren't the problem..you are.
Chuck Owen - it's just the way I feel and I'm sorry it upsets you.  I don't think Trump wants to negotiate.  He wants a win to satisfy his base.  He will only accept what he demands.  Both houses voted unanimously before Christmas for a CR to keep the government open and continue debate on border security.  Trump did an about face.  Now McConnell won't even bring it up for a vote unless Trump gets his way.  He IS using American workers as pawns to sway public opinion.  It looks like extortion to me.  Of course the Democrats could  stop it by giving the extortionist what he wants; all or nothing.
PROTECT OUR BORDERS  AND THATS IT. the government needs to stay out of our business. all this taxation, welfare, wealth redistribution, nation building... has got to stop. NOW!
Dumb president, dumb photo op, dumb poser.
this photoshopped picture of trump is so funny - he hasn't been that thin for over 20 years - the real Pinocchio trump is fat, mostly bald and orange. Trumps is as ugly on the inside as he is on the outside - ugh!
Anyone here capable of defending ICE after arresting a former marine named Jilmar Ramos? US born, served in the Marines. Returned from Afghanistan with PTSD. He was arrested for starting a fire after having an episode and he got sent to ICE detention and was ready to be deported. A US BORN MARINE ABOUT TO BE DEPORTED. When will you idiots realize this is a race war, not an immigration war. It’s about being brown and poor, not about being illegal.
defend our borders by eradicating ISIS!
Just build the wall. You don’t technically need congress for this.
You mean “the defense of you” President Bonespurs
We risk losing a whole city when they figure out how to sneak a nuke in.
Stop issuing Visas you moron! Send lard ass Pompeo down to Mexico and DEMAND President Obrador secure THEIR side,or sanction them. You are so incompetent.
I stand with our president ...our number one priority is our nation's safety especially from the illegals invaders and muslims...
Chuck Owen - it's just the way I feel and I'm sorry it upsets you.  I don't think Trump wants to negotiate.  He wants a win to satisfy his base.  He will only accept what he demands.  Both houses voted unanimously before Christmas for a CR to keep the government open and continue debate on border security.  Trump did an about face.  Now McConnell won't even bring it up for a vote unless Trump gets his way.  He IS using American workers as pawns to sway public opinion.  It looks like extortion to me.  Of course the Democrats could  stop it by giving the extortionist what he wants; all or nothing.
Too bad Congress doesn’t care this much.
You have been robbed of your Presidential powers to do anything else to save our country.  Thank you for trying.  Go home and be with your family.  America is over.
Your Administration LIED about how many children were taken away from their parents at the border! Thousands more than reported! Lies in every area of your Cabinet! Trump destroys everything he touches! EPA is not protecting from pollution. 800,000 Federal workers are in dire straights and may lose their homes or face eviction! Trump is a monster! A compulsive liar in this WH! Resign!
Nobody will have nothing if not protected from illegal's killing innocent citizens and stealing what we have saved for us.   Our Social Security and our Families.
And when u bomb other countries..what about their security..
All fake News.... worry about taking care of Terrorist Isis, Islamic Turkey, Russia and China
The liberals hate everything you stand for.To this day they're still pissed off that Clinton didn't win.For the sake of my Children and Grandchilren,do all you can to protect them.Nancy and Chuck are teaching all the youngsters in Congress one word,RESIST.Stay strong and Build the Wall.Immigration should be a privilige given to the deserving ,not the criminals.The smart Conservatives stand behind you.Thank you for standing up for the ones that can see the whole picture President Trump.# Build the wall# Trump2020# MAGA
I stand with our president ...our number one priority is our nation's safety especially from the illegals invaders and muslims...
How many illegals are here now?? Well if is more than 1,999 there is a problem.. Build it they will stop coming.
Trump-oganda bullshit yet again!
You are a disgrace, resign #TrumpShutDown #TurdNChief
You have no clue on how to protect Americans...biggest threat is ISIS and you want to withdraw troops from Siria, in the meantime 4 Americans lost their lives and you keep taking about your stupid wall...you are losing BIg!
I guess from my perspective,  I see that immigrants illegal or not work their asses off and some are good at what they do, but. The some folks that have the privilege to be here in the US  think they dont have to work or as hard. MY OPINION!! No recourse needed.
President trump for twenty twenty he's working hard to save our country and our freedom   best president eeve had in a long time   god bless him and god bless america   land of the free and the home of the brave
Y'all know what will  finally stop caravans of illegals from coming into our country  ? Lots of ammo . Drop a few and the others will get a clue they aren't wanted.
ok...are you the president or is pelosi?...be the president....build the wall...they now have the power to get you to open the gov. and they then will discuss border security...ha ha ha ha ha ha ha.
I don't care about a wall or not.... I care about the people that are working without a paycheck and as president trying to get your way over those peoples back is just wrong.
Much more going on in this country then just wall issue .. ... That mean boarder along the other coast need be secured as well if we going to stop what Illigals coming into the country .. Butvid not right some people get away with doing same thing some people are charged with. I'm just jeni chase .. Book worm . whatever they call me Jesus freak crazy jeni from they block .. But I stress some good points .. I have been three things I know the system is broken .. And there isn't one perfect person in this country ... Fact I never get to say my side ... I have been violated in many ways .. But I still help and ill stand with our country .. Where would u like me to help .. Cuz in my eyes they treated me so bad they didn't want me in. The justice system when I tried going to school for it .. Cruel unusual punishment and I still helped in many areas ....  So... Just say stand tall for the people and what u believe in .. Liberty and justice for .. Our children are our future .. I sure wish I could sit face to face with u Donald trump and u really hear me out .. Ill help wherever I'm needed but I intend on still pursuing college this time in the nursing field ..
Lmao okay so a wall will fix that? All drugs and crime come by air or by boat. Congrats you want to build this wall because it’s the one thing you can be remembered for. A wall to hide behind all those lies you tell the American people day to day. You sir will go down as the biggest dumb dumb in office ever 😂
You are a disgrace, resign #TrumpShutDown #TurdNChief
Much more going on in this country then just wall issue .. ... That mean boarder along the other coast need be secured as well if we going to stop what Illigals coming into the country .. Butvid not right some people get away with doing same thing some people are charged with. I'm just jeni chase .. Book worm . whatever they call me Jesus freak crazy jeni from they block .. But I stress some good points .. I have been three things I know the system is broken .. And there isn't one perfect person in this country ... Fact I never get to say my side ... I have been violated in many ways .. But I still help and ill stand with our country .. Where would u like me to help .. Cuz in my eyes they treated me so bad they didn't want me in. The justice system when I tried going to school for it .. Cruel unusual punishment and I still helped in many areas ....  So... Just say stand tall for the people and what u believe in .. Liberty and justice for .. Our children are our future .. I sure wish I could sit face to face with u Donald trump and u really hear me out .. Ill help wherever I'm needed but I intend on still pursuing college this time in the nursing field ..
You are so fixated on this damn border that you could care less about anything else that is going on. That is all you are talking about non stop. The majority of the people dont give a rats ass about your damn border wall and are sick and tired of hearing about it. There is no crisis at the border. You are just making it up in hopes that you can continue to brainwash your supporters. The majority of the people regardless of their political stance want the government shutdown to end. YOUR SHUTDOWN !! The majority of the people dont believe a damn word you say. You are a mental case  A true Narcissist at work. Why dont you resign like you make others in your administration do?? You are not winning. You are losing and you know it.Play Video

I don't care about a wall or not.... I care about the people that are working without a paycheck and as president trying to get your way over those peoples back is just wrong.
Old fat man photoshopped to look less old and fat us a fraud in every way
Deflection from trump’s treason
This mofo looks like his knees don't bend. Or like he really does have a hand up his ass. LMBO #putinspuppet4real
You're strangling & suffocating America like a serial killer and apparently, American's are too dumb to object...
Trump is a compulsive liar,  the world knows Russia helped trump get elected because the Russians didn't want Hillary Clinton to win.  Trump has always cheated, lied, insults and threats.  He is the bankrupt king. He always has lived very well on other peopples money. He is a new York thug
Provide for the common defense is job #1
I  thought  that  was  the  role  of  the  C.I.C.? Mike  Pence is  President  of  the  senate  ........
Everyone get food and be safe things might get ugly out here
No if the pres doesn't stop pulling the crap he does

No if the pres doesn't stop pulling the crap he does
You should be ashamed of the way you are representing the nation! The #TRUMPSHUTDOWN is using people's lives as political fodder. Resign now, before you drag us into ruin!
Everyone get food and be safe things might get ugly out here
Actually the fact that you are in cahoots with Russia is a little more concerning than your signatory fence
Why don't you just think this through? The wall doesn't work! ICE cut through it with a hand saw. Electronics, drones, and boots on the ground, are the only way to protect this border.
Pay your taxes like everyone else does. Then maybe I will listen. LIAR.
How do your hidden meetings with Putin promote the defense of our nation?
Impeach time! You are nothing but a traitor to this country Donald.
And let’s take all the garbage and backed up toilet stuff from the national parks and throw it on the white house lawn and mitch mcconnells lawn in front of his house.  If dumpster is willing to continue the shutdown for years then ‘border security’ can’t be much of an ‘emergency’ now can it? A repulsican congress saw no ‘emergency’ for 2 years, now it’s an emergency?  No.   And we'll ignore the fact that Don the Con hasn't even spent the money he's already been given on border security. And that 90% of the drugs come in through the ports, sneaked in through official entry points at harbors and airports and the majority of undocumented immigrants arrive by plane, not hiking across the desert. And we’ll ignoring the fact that native-born Americans commit crime at higher rates. And ‘border security’ has held for over 200 years. The Wall is a scam and this SOB scum needs to be removed.  2018 12 terrorist list Southern border crossings  41 terrorist list Northern border crossings Build a Northern Border Wall and Canada will pay for it.  Your ‘terrorists’ are already here you deranged idiot.    Oklahoma City bombers – white male US citizen Colombine school massacre – white male US citizens Chardon school massacre – white male US citizen Isle Vista massacre – white male US citizen Charleston Church massacre – white male US citizen Las Vegas massacre- white male US citizen Sandy Hook massacre – white male US citizen Aurora Theatre – white male US citizen Casa Adobe shooter – white male US citizen Pulse Nightclub massacre – white male US citizen Austin bomber – white male US citizen Parkland School massacre – white male US citizen Santa Fe School massacre – white male US citizen Jacksonville Gamer shooter – white male US citizen MAGA mail bomber – white male US citizen
South Korean News rumor is that President Trump will meet with North Korean Kim Jong Eun and negotiate for ICBM and disarmament, not C V I D.  If rumors are true, American and global citizens are disappointed with President Trump. When Kim Jong - eun meets with North Korea and the disarmament negotiations with the ICBM take place, Americans do not trust Trump. Do not forget it.
You should be ashamed of the way you are representing the nation! The #TRUMPSHUTDOWN is using people's lives as political fodder. Resign now, before you drag us into ruin!
Get it done Trump, take no prisoner, just ground "em !!!!
Time to bust out the DOJ on them bitches .
Blah..blah the same bs lies ,brainwashing old nazi techniques,lies and deception  every freaking day . Wow he is a moron !!!!🤦‍♂️🤦‍♂️🤦‍♂️
Take a vote, do your job!  You work for the America People !! #Wheresmitch? 😡
We need strong borders and security stop the caravans and illegal aliens in this country.
The Democrats are heartless. Nancy Pelosi wouldn't meet with the Angel moms and dads. That goes to show she doesn't care a wit about American citizens, only illegal immigrants. That is what our country has come to, unfortunately.
We bleveave I you Mr. President! we have a solution that even the Democrats cannot say is not a great solution for the wall! A solution That will not cost AMERICAN tax payers a dim! Don’t let them make you part of the problem! We voted you in office because we believe you were not part of the political aristocracy! We know Both parties are playing us and persisting in there stupid political games! The money is there! Use the drug money confiscated from the drug cartels and Human traffickers. According to Senator   Ted Cruise it’s $14 billion$& No tax dollars need to be spent on this wall!😤🤯🇺🇸 Mr. President stop letting the party bosses/deep state manipulate the people and you!   You are the peoples president! 🤝🇺🇸  Here is your chance to prove it To the naysayers that you are indeed the People’s President!🤝🤗🇺🇸  And you can for fill a campaign promise that Mexico will pay for the wall!
Then why is the coast guard not being paid...
You are a JOKE! Open the Government!
Funny how we've been a nation prior!!
South Korean News rumor is that President Trump will meet with North Korean Kim Jong Eun and negotiate for ICBM and disarmament, not C V I D.  If rumors are true, American and global citizens are disappointed with President Trump. When Kim Jong - eun meets with North Korea and the disarmament negotiations with the ICBM take place, Americans do not trust Trump. Do not forget it.
More like defense of your off shore bank accounts asshole.
Out of all the issues in America he only focuses on this one smh moron
All for a stupid campaign promise!  10-12 terrorists!  The HSA and CBP can't be trusted after allowing over 12 million illegal aliens in!  Can't even count jailed children at the border!  You trust them with $6B for a wall. 70% of Americans won't!  #YouElectedHim
this IS what is such a Contradiction - House, Congress and Senate Not until this PRESIDENT was ANYTHING done about Opioids,,,,  And still NOTHING on Illegal Drugs - - - -I SMELL A RAT
Send her ass to Honduras and Guatemala, find out if she can gather intel as to why these people are being treated poorly and maybe kick the oppressors ass, roll that funding into the wall package , rather than just sending unaccounted billions around the world 🌎
It should be defend another
Question Thump hating people, 🤔 what does any,I say any other Country do to American Citizens when found doing the least, tiniest unlawful, thing in their Country while visiting or vacationing, with a proper ID and passport????????   Jail,torture,behead !!  I can’t imagine what what would happen if they would dare to enter   Illegally????!!!!!  Sit on that fact for just a second!!!!>
Pelosi is inviting illegals to California.
Funny how we've been a nation prior!!
Pelosi is inviting illegals to California.
John Wild there is no strategy with Congress.  They have play with peoples lives for years.  Trump is one president who they can't make  a puppet out off. Now I ask you what is your solution to border security?
Debbie Hudson Debbie, first of all, open the government to stop hurting Americans by holding them hostage.  Then, analyze the border to identify the various issues associated with various segments of the border. Take the segments or issues presenting the greatest risk. Review those segments or issues to ID the best solution approaches. Fund those solution approaches. Then iterate thru lower priorities until the pt. of diminishing returns is encountered.  There are big problems that a wall will do nothing to solve: 1) most of the illegal drugs that enter our great country across the southern border come in on vehicles driving thru existing, managed and legal ports of entry, 2) the next most prevalent entry method is via tunnels under existing wall, 3) about 40% of folk currently in our country illegally came in with valid visas but overstayed those visas (these folk come from all over the world) and 4) it is reported that currently, the visa overstay issue is contributing higher volumes of people in country illegally than the volume of people crossing across the southern border.  Trump is actually hurting the cause of enhancing border security by using the false siren call of “the wall”. This is both dumb and counterproductive. If he wanted true progress, he would lead the process towards smart and effective enhancements in a prioritized way.  Debbie, I watched Trump state he would be happy and proud to shut it down. I watched Trump state he would own the shutdown, completely.  I watched this on live TV - no “fake news” spin involved.  Trump had signaled he would sign the funding bills. McConnell had the Senate vote on the funding bills based upon that understanding.  That same night, extreme right wing media personalities criticized Trump. Trump caved to the criticism (so much for being strong).  Then the House added Trump’s money into their version of the bill and passed it.  Then the shutdown started.  Then, the new House passed the exact same funding bills that had just been passed, almost unanimously, three or so weeks before. Now, McConnell refuses to bring those same bills for a vote in the new Congress, enabling Trump.  Trump is acting IMMORALLY when he hurts over one million Americans as his sole “negotiating” chip.
Question Thump hating people, 🤔 what does any,I say any other Country do to American Citizens when found doing the least, tiniest unlawful, thing in their Country while visiting or vacationing, with a proper ID and passport????????   Jail,torture,behead !!  I can’t imagine what what would happen if they would dare to enter   Illegally????!!!!!  Sit on that fact for just a second!!!!>
All these crackers probably mad asl that the wall hasn’t been built yet pay for it yall self lmao
Stay the course. Give us a border wall; a very high border wall. Walls work. President Trump, I am so proud of you for insisting on a wall to protect the American people. COMMON SENSE tells us that we need the wall. Keep these invaders out.
If trump would go back to Hell. We might have a country
Build the wall keep the shut down
For all the dumb fucks that are okay with illegals breaking the law and flying under the radar why don't you move to Mexico and rot then maybe you'd appreciate his stance on national security and keeping everyone in line instead of cutting in line from those that file for citizenship the right way.
Now is the time to put extreme intell and all nation allies to join forces to let Isis know no one is going to put up with their actions of destruction. Other wise they will hold our servicemen and  forces at bay while the border crisis is not get the attention it needs, and the Democrats are just trying for any little bit of control they can grab. Not really thinking of their country or servicemen dying and pulled away from their homes. Let Isis know we are pulling out but can joint forces against them if their action still detour the ways if the world. Destroy Isis not just send them hiding.
Here's an idea. You have almost 200 military bases around the world. Close down 5 of them, and use that money for the wall.   You have almost 13,000 military aircraft. With much more being ordered to build. Don't build 5 of them, and use that money towards the wall.  You're worth $10 billion, so you say. Alot of which is assets for useless things like golf and country clubs. Sell 5 billion worth of it, and use the money for the damn wall. This should be enough. Plaster your name on it every 5 miles, and then shut up about it.  Once you do that, you can then finally focus on the real dangers facing Americans. Like say, drunk driving. Which literally kill hundreds of people a DAY. Immigrants, including illegals, have literally among the lowest crime rates of anybody. You got to look at that, and look for what's really wrong and then work to fix it. Scapegoating on illegals, for 'real Americans', which there's no such thing, is stupid. But what do you expect on Planet Stupid.
Build the wall !! Americans deserve to be protected by this wall. I saw on our local news that now deaths caused by drugs now passes death by car accidents, drownings, general accidents. There is a drug problem in this country and the wall will slow the drugs coming into this country. Building the wall will keep a lot of bad people from coming into this country, etc. Border agents have seen first hand all the issues of bad people, drugs, etc all trying to come into this country. They have told the President, Congressmen, News people, etc. Mr. President Trump, stand your ground, build the wall, keep America safe!
Debbie Hudson Debbie, first of all, open the government to stop hurting Americans by holding them hostage.  Then, analyze the border to identify the various issues associated with various segments of the border. Take the segments or issues presenting the greatest risk. Review those segments or issues to ID the best solution approaches. Fund those solution approaches. Then iterate thru lower priorities until the pt. of diminishing returns is encountered.  There are big problems that a wall will do nothing to solve: 1) most of the illegal drugs that enter our great country across the southern border come in on vehicles driving thru existing, managed and legal ports of entry, 2) the next most prevalent entry method is via tunnels under existing wall, 3) about 40% of folk currently in our country illegally came in with valid visas but overstayed those visas (these folk come from all over the world) and 4) it is reported that currently, the visa overstay issue is contributing higher volumes of people in country illegally than the volume of people crossing across the southern border.  Trump is actually hurting the cause of enhancing border security by using the false siren call of “the wall”. This is both dumb and counterproductive. If he wanted true progress, he would lead the process towards smart and effective enhancements in a prioritized way.  Debbie, I watched Trump state he would be happy and proud to shut it down. I watched Trump state he would own the shutdown, completely.  I watched this on live TV - no “fake news” spin involved.  Trump had signaled he would sign the funding bills. McConnell had the Senate vote on the funding bills based upon that understanding.  That same night, extreme right wing media personalities criticized Trump. Trump caved to the criticism (so much for being strong).  Then the House added Trump’s money into their version of the bill and passed it.  Then the shutdown started.  Then, the new House passed the exact same funding bills that had just been passed, almost unanimously, three or so weeks before. Now, McConnell refuses to bring those same bills for a vote in the new Congress, enabling Trump.  Trump is acting IMMORALLY when he hurts over one million Americans as his sole “negotiating” chip.
*Has control of Senate and House for 2 years without addressing it*
.........Did you lose weight?  And gain finger?  LMAO!  Fucking loser.
You are destroying our country , you orange shithole.   Not my president!!!!!
Donald j humperdick hahahhahaahhaha asshole
YOU'RE A FELON AND TRAITOR.
That's right make Mexico pay for it like you promised. Reduce the deficit, bring back the coal industry.
Ah thanks for the laugh donnie !! You are truly the best American drama queen on tv !!
How have we made it 200 years with out dick bag trump?
Thanks to trumps inexperienced and foolish arrogance, or enemies now have enthusiasm, and not a mention from the president about the 4 American hero’s that lost their life’s while defending this country! All I see is people defending their egos, while they brag about being the last ones to abandon trumps sinking ship! What pathetic display of foolishness! You guys should be ashamed
Did you get the ok from Putin before you shut down the government?
Build the wall !! Americans deserve to be protected by this wall. I saw on our local news that now deaths caused by drugs now passes death by car accidents, drownings, general accidents. There is a drug problem in this country and the wall will slow the drugs coming into this country. Building the wall will keep a lot of bad people from coming into this country, etc. Border agents have seen first hand all the issues of bad people, drugs, etc all trying to come into this country. They have told the President, Congressmen, News people, etc. Mr. President Trump, stand your ground, build the wall, keep America safe!
It takes a strong man like pres tump to help our country n th   Deal with those idiots
We were a nation before you and hope we last long enough to dump your sorry ASS !
President Trump, why cannot some of the funds from the Wall come from the money taken by, whoever it was, from the Social Security fund? Why are politicians still being paid when government workers who are doing their jobs are not? Why do politicians even get paid at all when they are not taking care of business? Politicians work for the people that elected them, not for illegals and criminals, and they were not elected to line their own pockets. This Wall is referred to as "Trumps Wall", it is not Trumps Wall it is America's and the American peoples Wall. Why are you getting all the blame when the left is fighting you every step of the way. What happened to all the funds that were allocated for the Wall before you even thought about running for President? Mr. President, what can we, the American people do to help you and ourselves? How do we go about setting term limits for Congress since they continue to pass laws that exclude them from having to buy Obama Care, etc., So many questions, so many problems and issues. What can we do?
GOD wants us to use wisdom, and wisdom silently to settle down, before you do or say something.  Emotions urge us toward haste, telling us we must do something and do it right now! https://goo.gl/pQa7jy But Godly Wisdom tells us to be patient and wait until we have a clear picture of what we are to do and when we are to do it. https://goo.gl/33Crru  It will benefit us to study and apply GOD's Word, so we can make more wise decisions. https://goo.gl/AAtj1x HIS Word promises us that if we acknowledge HIM in all of our ways HE will direct us. Prayer is just inviting GOD to get involved, let HIM help you in every matter. https://goo.gl/eHbCo5  The Book of  Job  https://goo.gl/VSJXrL  Satan attacks a righteous man named Job, and Job and his friends argue about why terrible things are happening to him (Join me on Linkedin https://goo.gl/GKUE5r )  The Bible https://goo.gl/33FZjm
You can defend the nation and borders without a stupid wall. Give it up.
You are a liar and a fraud.  Your administration is an American disgrace and a global embarrassment.  Go to jail soon. 👋🏻😎 #MAGA
I agree with you Mr. PRESIDENT!  But how do we convince the unreasonable Democrats? CNN is a bunch of Lying Scumbags!
YOU'RE SUCH A LOSER AND A MORON!!!!!!!!!!!! 🤣🤣🤣  NFL icon Michael Strahan just showed up Trump on Good Morning America over his fast food debacle  With the controversy over President Trump’s on-the-cheap fast food feast for the victorious Clemson Tigers football players briefly crowding the government shutdown, the border wall, and the latest revelations in the Mueller investigation out of the news cycle, a lot of people were obviously insulted on behalf of the players whom they thought deserved to be treated with as much dignity during a White House visit as any prior group of winning athletes.  The Trump administration used the excuse of the government shutdown as the reason for why no White House kitchen staff was available to make a proper meal for the visiting players, forcing Trump to pay for the reception out of his own pocket, but his parsimonious purchase of burgers, chicken nuggets, and fries from major fast food chains —rather than ordering takeout from a catering firm or proper restaurant — displayed a contempt for the college student-athletes and a miserly approach to forking over his own cash that did sit well with Michael Strahan, the former NY Giants defensive end who is now a co-host on ABC’s Good Morning America.  Tell Speaker Pelosi and Senator Schumer to stand firm. Don't give in to Trump's ransom demand for a stupid wall!  Strahan decided to outclass and outspend the president with a generous on-air invitation to the team to attend a sumptuous feast of lobster and caviar at GMA’s Times Square studios, a feast that he vowed to pay for personally, describing it as the proper meal that they deserve.
We have net zero immigration from Mexico. And there is already a wall.
Did you get the ok from Putin before you shut down the government?
We have net zero immigration from Mexico. And there is already a wall.
We all thought that your most important duty was being an amoral shitbag that sells out their country to Russia, or to put other lawmaker's lives in danger because they rightly embarrassed your ignorant ass. Please, PLEASE have a massive coronary attack where your heart literally EXPLODES! Alternately, you could choke to death on a double quarter pounder, and we'd all be better off, scumbag. DeNiro was right about you, BUM!
YOU'RE SUCH A LOSER AND A MORON!!!!!!!!!!!! 🤣🤣🤣  NFL icon Michael Strahan just showed up Trump on Good Morning America over his fast food debacle  With the controversy over President Trump’s on-the-cheap fast food feast for the victorious Clemson Tigers football players briefly crowding the government shutdown, the border wall, and the latest revelations in the Mueller investigation out of the news cycle, a lot of people were obviously insulted on behalf of the players whom they thought deserved to be treated with as much dignity during a White House visit as any prior group of winning athletes.  The Trump administration used the excuse of the government shutdown as the reason for why no White House kitchen staff was available to make a proper meal for the visiting players, forcing Trump to pay for the reception out of his own pocket, but his parsimonious purchase of burgers, chicken nuggets, and fries from major fast food chains —rather than ordering takeout from a catering firm or proper restaurant — displayed a contempt for the college student-athletes and a miserly approach to forking over his own cash that did sit well with Michael Strahan, the former NY Giants defensive end who is now a co-host on ABC’s Good Morning America.  Tell Speaker Pelosi and Senator Schumer to stand firm. Don't give in to Trump's ransom demand for a stupid wall!  Strahan decided to outclass and outspend the president with a generous on-air invitation to the team to attend a sumptuous feast of lobster and caviar at GMA’s Times Square studios, a feast that he vowed to pay for personally, describing it as the proper meal that they deserve.
We all thought that your most important duty was being an amoral shitbag that sells out their country to Russia, or to put other lawmaker's lives in danger because they rightly embarrassed your ignorant ass. Please, PLEASE have a massive coronary attack where your heart literally EXPLODES! Alternately, you could choke to death on a double quarter pounder, and we'd all be better off, scumbag. DeNiro was right about you, BUM!
All you who voted for him look like you all keep it in the family if you know what I'm incesting,  I mean intending 🤣🤣🤣  No wonder your brain cells seem to be deteriorating at an amazing speed.  It must be all the "great American" Trash foods you get fed  Trash food from a classless,  trash "dictator"
Sophie Tkacz Wildrick I've held the same  before this joke of a human being was ever in office.  He contradicts himself.  And oh honey my last name doesn't make me,  get that straight.  My mom is as white as you are sooooooooooooo
And you yourself had immigrant ancestors,  wildrick derives from Germany.   Which last I checked.  Is not 🇺🇸
I agree with you Mr. PRESIDENT!  But how do we convince the unreasonable Democrats? CNN is a bunch of Lying Scumbags!
If we don't defend our country AGAINST YOU, then we cease to be a nation. Traitorous LIAR!
I am an African and I supported of Donald J. Trump from Day one , I was called a fool, I asked why and I was told " Donald J. Trump Policies are nationalist and not globalist" and I asked won't our country be better if we have Trump like as a president, when has taking care of family first before pleasing the public becomes an evil?
He loves these morons. They are anairpump to his ego,
Build the wall . Everyone is worried about them tunneling under big deal easy to solve that problem Ever seen the pic with the wall and the water with the gators.  If there is any good coal or rock in the ground there just let the mines come in and strip mine just off the line 300+ ft deep hell they will even pay the government for the land no need to pay them to do the work. Then fill with water tunneling problem solved.
We should start air lifting pieces of the Great wall of China to put on the boarder. China doesnt really need/use it like we do.
I am getting concerned about some of the government programs that are necessary for life in our country. Like WIC and food stamps, especially for single mothers. Please don't let them have problems. You can solve this problem with Congress ... just think ,, what would Jesus do in this situation?
And you yourself had immigrant ancestors,  wildrick derives from Germany.   Which last I checked.  Is not 🇺🇸
And so should the people in America! And if they disagree, then they should move on the other side of the border and see how they like that!
America does not have a wall in time to chase dangerous criminals to successfully carry out illegal illegal drug dealing, there is a wall of criminals running out of business, we will commit this. finding every way into America, sabotaging America in the next time the LORD will bless America especially for President DONALD J, TRUMP will always be safe .
Moron!!!!..there are many ways to secure your border.... putting your government back to work would be one of them ...idiot!!
I think 20 people from Main Street could work out a immigration plan. PELOSI TIME TO DO YOUR JOB!!!
We need to defend against you
douchebag in chief, liar and a thief.
Climate Change is the real threat you stupid americans
Dear Americans and friends, I believe, I believe, Donald Trump is just an ignorant flunky for wealthy special interests in government and in health  care and  that they are bankrupting our future for their wealth. He is deceiving us with the republican Congress and protecting special interests in health care and special interests in general. They are paying lawmakers for their support and complicity. He is not helping in his terrible immigration with his super rude noise; he is hiding and protecting wealthy and selfish interests at the expense of everyone else. The swamp has given Donald Trump directions not to bother them in their money making activities and he is obedient to them and going after defenseless poor people, refugees that need mercy and a humane chance as a ruse to deceive we the people. 	We are being badly governed in his cruel immigration hoax while he is being patted on the back for deceiving the middle class and helping the wealthy lobbies. As proof I offer humble Canada and that they are not as corrupt and arrogant as our non humble elected officials.  	What is the answer but to vote these carpetbagger republicans out of office and never to support Captain Ahab again!
seriously more illegals come in smuggled in ships than any other way jesus youre a huge idiot.
Well prisons have walls and they get plenty of drugs in. 🤦🏼‍♀️🤦🏼‍♀️🤦🏼‍♀️ I’m not scared of anyone crossing the border to seek a better life. A white guy in a MAGA hat with a confederate flag on his truck scares me tho.
So because we have no wall we have never been a nation??? 🤔
Well prisons have walls and they get plenty of drugs in. 🤦🏼‍♀️🤦🏼‍♀️🤦🏼‍♀️ I’m not scared of anyone crossing the border to seek a better life. A white guy in a MAGA hat with a confederate flag on his truck scares me tho.
Donald J. Trump Please stay tied hard and fast on the Border Wall.  Most all intelligent Americans realize your positive stand against Pelosi, Schumer and the rest of the Democrat Socialist is a  Life and Death stand of Good Republicans  vs Evil Democrat Socialists.
From your statement it would seem that you are not one of the intelligent ones, right?
seriously more illegals come in smuggled in ships than any other way jesus youre a huge idiot.
So- build the damn wall allready. Keep your promise! I will not vote for you again if you are a liar!
He is absolutely right.  I know for a FACT that TERRORIST are entering the USA via this way. Build the wall.....it will protect all the idiots too.
He is nothing but a fucking liar..
I support trump but this wall is the dumbest waste of money I’ve ever heard of.... come on. It’s 2019.... the wall will do nothing except get ripped down in 20 years
Than do it already take the nancy Pelosi bitch out damnit!
With hold pay from Congress and Senate so they will get the job done. If others don't get paid neither should they
Build the wall get it done
Illegal immigrants are trespassers, I don't see anyone allowing strangers moving onto their property and squatting to live....why should we allow them into the country to do the same? It's ok because they're not at your house?
Wrong again.  The highest duty of the President is described in the Oath you took.  "... preserve, protect and defend the Constitution of the United States of America, against all enemies, foreign and domestic ...".    But you keep violating the Constitution and even attempt to undermine it.  The First Amendment, the Fourth Amendment, the Fifth Amendment, the emoluments clause, all have come under attack by you.    So how about you stop lying and start at least pretending to fulfill your oath.
From your statement it would seem that you are not one of the intelligent ones, right?
As president, you should step down like you said Obama’s should during the shutdown in his term. #FuckTrump
You keep rippin and roarin it Mr. President
Prison walls dont stop criminals what makes yall Republicunts think it will stop illegal immigrants from getting here. Yall are really that dumb
We started down that path when idiots elected you President... God Save America Again...get rid of this moron!
Thank you President Trump for putting our safety  at the top of your list.
I say just shoot them as they come over. Or you could build the wall like trump wants.
Who's body did you photoshop your big stupid head onto? "Fake Photo"!
Look at Canada. We have an idiot in power and no borders.
Wrong again.  The highest duty of the President is described in the Oath you took.  "... preserve, protect and defend the Constitution of the United States of America, against all enemies, foreign and domestic ...".    But you keep violating the Constitution and even attempt to undermine it.  The First Amendment, the Fourth Amendment, the Fifth Amendment, the emoluments clause, all have come under attack by you.    So how about you stop lying and start at least pretending to fulfill your oath.
You should start by not being a traitor that deserves to hang!
Trump equals betrayal, he is loyal to nothing or no one save his own ego! He is a blight on the soul of America and a scar on our honor.
Drugs comes in via military choppers and vehicles, the wall will be useless, use technology and built a working system where everyone is loyal to the government, you personally tricked and stole from the same American people you want allude to protect, maybe you will be gaining from the wall
Yep. If we dont build this wall, the Mexicans will defeat our Army, our Navy, our Air Force, our Border Patrol Officers, and everyone in between. From there, they will caravan straight to Washington and steal the Declaration of Independence and the Constitution. Next, they'll establish communications back to Mexico and thus the United States of America will surrender. All because of a wall. Great thinking guy. Here, have 5 billion dollars for that wall thatll take 10 years to built. You'll likely be dead before then because of your age and health, but thats okay, because we'll have a wall. We'll make sure to tell the next group of pinheads that this wall is crucial to the survival of the American country.   Dont you worry your toupee over this, sir.
5 more days and Trump will be aloud to RFI all the deep state, bureaucrats. This is what draining the swamp looks like.  This is the fight we have to have. Its Gonna be ugly, its gonna be loud. But its got to happen.
Just Do It! We don't need anymore immigrants on STOLEN LAND....
Amazing the amount of concern Pelosi has for the “security” of congress! So much so that she wishes to postpone the SOTU address by our POTUS...She has ZERO concern  for the security of our nation and will not fund a border wall to keep out those who are not vetted and want to sneak into our country to commit heinous crimes against our citizens! She is a sorry excuse for a human being!
Do it the right way. These illegals are leaving their kids what does that say about them. Sorry but if politicans care so much take care of our own Americans first.
Hey morons of cult 45, If this so called president. Was really about our security he would pay our TSA people at airports where  MOST terrorists enter
And some of those countries they don't even give vaccinations so we get diseases from other countries because open borders makes sense to me
You only talking n talking,  doing nothing...worst president for USA
And some of those countries they don't even give vaccinations so we get diseases from other countries because open borders makes sense to me
Trump cock suckers is all I see
When somebody offs this man. That’s when “America will be great again”
Hey morons of cult 45, If this so called president. Was really about our security he would pay our TSA people at airports where  MOST terrorists enter
Right, build the wall and throw the trashes out from USA. Then invite the good people to work or to live and make a better place. Say no to Criminals and robbers and killer communities.
Anyone ever thought maybe those countries have a wall because of us and how the us is a bully and use to start wars to steal that countries resources
It's sad how much power all u white fucks have in this world and enough just isn't enough when will you all be tired of hating the world u live in that's why you all age so badly u are very wicked people and his only option is to start war and we will only fail and the leaders of the world will tuck their tails run and hide ur not scaring me u evil mother fuckers it was u who God mentioned in the bible it will be you who will start war and fail our economy it's u and those who hide behind those big white walls with your secrets and your lies God mentioned u and the 7th seal will soon be open and all leaders of our world will meet their judgement day
We don't have a border so I guess we will cease to exist pretty soon!! The illegals continue to pour into this country and no longer lie about why they are coming. FOR A JOB
What a goof....hope he goes to jail!
Last time I checked, we did not have open borders.  There are guys in booths checking ID's, agents with guns, bomb and drug sniffing dogs, lots of stuff!  Federal govt. employees not getting a pay check, please identify yourself.  The rest of you do not have a dog in this fight.
What to do about the ones already here .We need to tax all money wired to Mexico.
When somebody offs this man. That’s when “America will be great again”
God damn that's a stupid statement. What the f*** is wrong with you.
Shut the government down for as long as you have to, as well as stop giving billions of dollars in aid to these corrupt countries.  Nancy and Chuck are evil.   Thank you President Trump for protecting us and our future.

God damn that's a stupid statement. What the f*** is wrong with you.

I'm standing with the President. Let Congress work for a change. They seem to have lost their way and can't speak their own minds They are afraid of their shadows. The American People have a right to representation and our boarders should be protected. It's ridiculous for Pelosi to send a letter regarding the State of the Union. She could careless about the people affected by the partial shutdown. She only cares about herself. Maybe more people should thinks for themselves as well.
Robbyn Brewington TRUMP DOES NOT CARE ABOUT THE PEOPLE WHO ARE AFFECTED BY SHUTDOWN.  He Is an SOB BASTARD FROM HELL You Trump supporters move to PUTINS LAND AND TAKE TRUMP WITH YOU   HE LOVES PUTIN.  THE DICTATOR
Howard Parlen It's great we have our own opinion.
Shut the government down for as long as you have to, as well as stop giving billions of dollars in aid to these corrupt countries.  Nancy and Chuck are evil.   Thank you President Trump for protecting us and our future.
FAT CATS LIKE TRUMP DON'T CARE ABOUT THE WORKING MAN. 202-224-2541 Wash.DC OFFICE Fax: (202) 224-2499 Wash DC OFFICE 502-582-6304 Louisville KY office EVERYONE CALL MITCHY MCCONNELL AND DEMAND HE BRING THE RESOLUTION TO REOPEN THE GOVT TO THE FLOOR
Even in Australia we had illegal immigrants arriving by boat and our navy sent them back. People would die at sea cause of people smugglers.  Good on Trump for protecting the border 👍
Well, except for the treason part...
Nice  Photoshop  job  to  slim  your  fat  ass  down.  Hurry  up  and  die  of  a  heart  attack,  you  worthless cunt.
Make America Great...GET RID OF THESE DEMOCRATS
Good god. Why is this fool still crying. No one want the border wall. Expect for a few thousands brainwashed trumpet. Swollow your  your huge ego. And open the government
If are putos is compromised he becomes a Russian puppet
Howard Parlen It's great we have our own opinion.
Mash on them libtards Trump.  We the people love it.
Why do you have to photoshop your picture, you stubby fingered fat ass?
Go on and build the fucking wall .You're our PRESIDENT !! Not the fucking democrates.
If Trump really cared about us, he's resign.  Anyway, Mueller is coming for you, orange maggot.
Should be. But it's only your campaign ploy. The wall and Mexico will pay. Trumpers gobbled up your lies. Still are! Congrats trump
If we don't defend our country because of you and your corrupt administration, we are dead!
STOP SUPPORTING ISRAEL LOOK WHAT THEY TEACH   5:16 / 20:01 Words to Remember! Quotes from the Jewish Bible,the Talmud ✡ HD 11,499 views  250  32  SHARE  SAVE  SaturnRising ♄ Published on Nov 26, 2015 Quotes from The Jewish Talmud: Gentile: A Non Jew Goy= "Cattle" aka Goyim Referring to Non-Jews Quotes: From the Talmud 1- If a Jew finds a Object Lost by: A Goy it does Not Have to be Returned [BABA MAZIA 24a] 2- "If a Goy hits a Jew, He Must be Killed  [Sanhedrin 58b] 3- If a Jew Kills a Goy There Will be No Death Penalty.  [Sanhedrin 57a] 4- 'What a Jew Steals from a Goy,He must Keep  [Sanhedrin 57a] 5- 'All Children of the Goyim Are Animals  [Yebamoth 98a] 5- 'If You Eat with a Goy it's the same as eating with a Dog' [Yebamoth 98a Tospoth,Jebamouth 84b] 6- 'The Gentiles are not Humans,They are Beasts' [Baba Mezia 114b] 7- 'Even The Best of the Goyim Should be Killed' [Soferim 15] 8- 'Do Not Save the Goyim in Danger of Death, Show NO Mercy to the Goyim' [Hikkoth Akum X1] 9- 'Sexual Intercourse between the Goyim is Like Intercourse between Animals'  [Sanhedrin 74b] 10- 'When the Messiah Comes every Jew will have  2800 Slaves' Simeon fol 56D 11- 'Extermination of the Christians is a Necessary Sacrifice' [Zohar, Shemothj 12- 'Jehovah Created the non-Jew in human form so that the Jews would bot have to be an animal in human form,and condemned to serve the Jew day and night [Midrash Talpioth,p.225-L] 13- 'A Jew is Forbidden to drink from a glass of wine which a Gentile has touched,Because the touch has made the wine Unclean' [Schulchan Aruch, Johre Deah, 122] 14- ''To Communicate anything to a Goy about religious relations would be equal to the Killing of ALL Jews,for if the Goyim knew what we teach about them,they would Kill us openly'' [Libbre David 37] 15- ''A Jew may do to a non-Jewess what he can do. He may treat her as he treats a piece of meat.'' [Hadarine,20,B; Schulchan Aruch, Choszen Hamiszpat 348] 16- 'A Jew may violate but not marry a non-Jewish girl' [Gad. Shas.2:2] 17- "A"prayer" or "benediction" to be said by a Jewish man every day: "Thank God for not making me a Gentile, a woman or a Slave." [Hilkkoth Akum X1] 18-  "A Jew should and must make a false oath when the Goyim asks if our books contain anything against them" [Szaaloth-Utszabot, The Book of Jore Dia 17]
The best president ever . In my lifetime I had never seen any another president who had been working so hard for Americans like president Trump  .  I definitely will vote for him again in 2020 !
Traitor in chief doing what he does best. Sucking Russian ass
just heard on cbc  we have 60 isis here don.t know  what to do with them  i say kill them  but they have to have proof to get them in court. the kurds have 1000 isis . 500 wives and 1000 children canadian .   what  do you do with them i say kill them in syria don.t bring them  home to canada but i don.t know mr trump what do you guys do with them.  we have woman in court now with butcher knife trying to kill people  mall by me  for isis . she is only going court now happened in summer. so you don.t need troops in syria isis here now
Traitor in chief doing what he does best. Sucking Russian ass
THAT WHY HE PUTTING IT IN JEOPARDY....IDIOT
Bette Ristoff.  English much?
The best president ever . In my lifetime I had never seen any another president who had been working so hard for Americans like president Trump  .  I definitely will vote for him again in 2020 !
Any word on the progress of denying all tax funded benefits to illegals and their anchor baby spawn?? That’s going to be a bigger deterrent to them than ANY wall or fence!!  🇺🇸😡🇺🇸😡🇺🇸
Then put the government back to work and do your job rather than fear mongering.
Stand STRONG Mr. President, tell Nancy to take down the fence or cement wall surrounding the palace she resides in and see how she gets a lot of people she and Hillary would call them deplorable and irredeemables and see if she’s afraid or is willing to let them stay at her house and have them over for tea and krimpets!!! Build this country’s WALL Nancy for our protection.  If you don’t like living in The United States of America then take yourself and crying chuckle Schumer and go fly a commercial plane and get the HELL out of my country.  As far as I go, I believe you are the new communism and your both TRAITORS!!.  Actually, you both should both be in JAIL!!!
Go president Trump! Thanks for standing your grounds..keep America great! Don't let this country go to hell in a hand bag. Don't let this country turn into a "shithole" like California.
Give the State of the Union from the senate, and give it on time!  Pelosi is obviously scared stiff that you will tell all of our nation just how she and the dems/aka communists would take us all down.  Nice chess move.
TRUMP IS, "INDIVIDUAL 1" and implicated in 2 felonies in court documents. BEWARE the Trump Low life cheesy lying UnAMERICAN crime family.  MORE MANAFORT INFORMATION WILL MAKE YOUR LIFE A LIVING HELL. Michael Cohan has set date to testify in congress in open session. 😂 Grab your popcorn, Walnuts 😂  Trump has been being investigated since before inauguration by the counterintelligence division of the FBI (ongoing).  Allen Weisselberg and David Pecker have given up all they know including videotapes and documents about all his filthy dirty dealings.
Then defend than without a wall
Stop with the lies and propaganda. You are the worst president in American History!
Then stop taking orders from the Russians. Trump is a draft dodging traitor
Bette Ristoff.  English much?
Pelosi does not even have the guts to face family members of those killed by illegals. To call her a leader is just pathetic. This problem has been going on for decades. We want it fixed. Permanently.
Thank you for leaving our borders at our coastlines and airports unsecured. Now we have open borders. If you thought that a wall would stop any threats, then you're a stupid Son of butch and you need to be FIRED!!! Because now with the shutdown, you have left our borders completely opened.
Last year more people died from gun violence committed by American citizens than all the murders committed by illegal aliens over the last decade.  True story.  There were nearly as many mass shootings committed by American citizens last year as there were days in the year.  True story.  If you want to clutch your pearls & cry over a genuine crisis, look no further than the next shooting.  No one thinks border security & illegal immigration are not important issues that need addressed.  True story.  Representatives from border districts from both nations, border patrol officials, military officials, citizens from both nations who live in the border region all agree that a wall is a bad idea for numerous reasons.  True story.  The wall is a 18th century idea that simply doesn’t work in a 21st century world.  More technology, personnel, & an end to “the war on drugs” policies are common sense & widely accepted solutions.  Additionally, have you wondered why this is happening now?  The GOP had control of congress & the white house for the past two years & did nothing about this “crisis.”  Why now?  Everything I’ve stated in this post is verifiably accurate & I’ll happily provide you w/ sources if you’d like.
The Mr Rogers of the USA !   WHAT A STORY TELLER KIDS !
Resign you dirty grifter.
Y’all patriots go troll Schumer and Pelosi page.  They are catching hell...
You’re ruining this nation, Trump, you stupid, fucking, ignorant twat! And the great thing is, you’re finally realizing it and you’re panicking! Bwa ha ha! 🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣
Bugger Trump you are even dumber than you look.
Then stop taking orders from the Russians. Trump is a draft dodging traitor
WAKE UP PEOPLE... Dems don't want the wall because "DRUG MONEY" is being funneled directly into the DNC's pockets. - - #America1ST💯 #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸️
Build that wall & stand strong against the democrats who support ISIS, MS13, criminal aliens, 6 more years of the best president ever. Chuckie Nancy Maxine Waters Pocahontas & that evil stupid Cortez lady you will lose & you all can go to hell
Bruce Hale show us one Democrat that supports ISIS, or MS13, or illegal immigration. You plainly show your bias and hatred for those that are working to oppose Donald Trump, but show no compassion for those that Trump's government shutdown impacts more severely each day. How would you feel if you were forced to work unpaid for a month just so Donald Trump has a hostage to bargain with for his wall. You support a dealmaker who cares little for 800,000 civil servants and thousands of others who are working longer hours to keep things running without them. No true American or Christian could act so cruelly.
WAKE UP PEOPLE... Dems don't want the wall because "DRUG MONEY" is being funneled directly into the DNC's pockets. - - #America1ST💯 #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸️
1 of 1 stories  Poll: Trump Approval Down, Slips With Base  by Domenico Montanaro  January 17, 2019 | 3 min 36 sec  ￼ Share  ￼ Listen Now  ￼ Playlist  ￼  Brendan Smialowski/AFP/Getty Images  ￼ Enlarge for caption  While the longest government shutdown in U.S. history continues, President Trump's approval rating is down, and there are cracks showing with his base. A new NPR/PBS NewsHour/Marist poll finds Trump's approval rating down and his disapproval rating up from a month ago. He currently stands at 39 percent approve, 53 disapprove — a 7-point net change from December when his rating was 42 percent approve, 49 percent disapprove. And the movement has come from within key portions of his base. He is:  Down significantly among suburban men, a net-positive approval rating of 51-to-39 percent to a net-negative of 42 percent approve, 48 percent disapprove. That's a net change of down 18 percentage points;  Down a net of 13 points among white evangelicals, from 73-to-17 percent approve to 66-to-23 percent approve;  Down a net of 10 points among Republicans, from 90-to-7 percent approve to 83-to-10 percent;  Down marginally among white men without a college degree, from 56-to-34 percent approve to 50-to-35 percent approve, a net change downward of 7 points.  Don't see the graphic above? Click here. "For the first time, we saw a fairly consistent pattern of having his base showing evidence of a cracking," said Lee Miringoff, director of the Marist Institute for Public Opinion, which conducted the poll. "Don't know if that's temporary — tied to the government shutdown — or a broader problem the president is having." The percentage of people now saying they strongly disapprove of the job the president's doing is up to 45 percent, the highest for President Trump since December 2017. Don't see the graphic above? Click here. 2020 headwinds The president also faces some significant headwinds for re-election in 2020. Just 30 percent of registered voters said they will definitely vote for Trump in 2020, while 57 percent said they will definitely vote against him. Just 76 percent of Trump supporters, 69 percent of Republicans and 58 percent of white evangelicals say they will definitely vote for him. Many, if not most, of them will likely vote for the president, but their softness in supporting him for re-election is a sign of vulnerability. For context, in 2010, when asked about then-President Barack Obama, just 36 percent said they would definitely vote for him, while 48 percent said they would not. Obama went on to win with 51 percent of the vote. But for Trump to have more than half the country already saying it definitely won't vote for him indicates he is facing a difficult re-election. "The president has had his base and not much else," Miringoff said, "and when you look ahead to the election ... he enters with a significant disadvantage. His re-election prospects would definitely be in jeopardy at this point." Trump has a lot of work to do to be able to reassemble the coalition that voted for him narrowly to win in the Electoral College in 2016. He lost the popular vote by almost 3 million votes and won just 46 percent of the vote. He won by about 70,000 votes combined between Pennsylvania, Wisconsin and Michigan, all states that have trended away from the president during his first two years in office. The Democratic field As for who Trump would face, former Vice President Joe Biden stands apart from the Democratic field, in terms of how Democratic voters feel about him compared to others. Biden is the best-known potential Democratic candidate, and is very well liked — 76 percent of Democrats and Democratic-leaning independents have a favorable impression of him. Just 12 percent have a negative view. "If he gets in, he automatically becomes the front runner with numbers like this," Miringoff said. "He becomes the candidate who you have to get into the mix with and be competitive with him." Barbara Carvalho, director of the poll, added, "It is unusual to see a candidate, who's been part of the Washington scene for so long, have such a low unfavorable rating." Don't see the graphic above? Click here. Bernie Sanders, the principal challenger to 2016 nominee Hillary Clinton, is well-known, but between 1-in-3 and 1-in-4 Democrats have a negative opinion of him. There are a lot of questions about whether Sanders will be able to keep his base of activist supporters together, four years later, now that Democrats have so many more options. Massachusetts Sen. Elizabeth Warren has an almost equally high favorability rating as Sanders, but is not viewed as negatively. Others are potentially well-positioned, too. New Jersey Sen. Cory Booker, Texas Rep. Beto O'Rourke and California Sen. Kamala Harris are in a next tier and have a capability of taking off if they make a good impression as voters get to know them. The poll isn't good news for all potential Democratic contenders, however. The Democratic primary electorate does not appear ready for a billionaire. As former New York Mayor Michael Bloomberg weighs a run, Democrats are evenly split on their views of him, while about half of them haven't yet formed an opinion. A primary challenge to Trump? There has been talk of a primary challenge to President Trump, but no candidate emerges with particular backing. Ohio Gov. John Kasich and Mitt Romney are viewed more unfavorably than favorably with Republicans and Republican-leaning independents — 24 percent view Kasich favorably, 28 percent view him unfavorably; 29 percent view Romney positively, while 48 percent view Romney negatively. Romney has been an outspoken critic of Trump, and the GOP base does not appear to appreciate that. "There is no strong support" for a primary challenge to Trump, Miringoff said. "Kasich is not well-known, and Romney is not particularly popular." In the mood for compromise As this shutdown continues, 59 percent said they mostly blame President Trump or congressional Republicans for it. And more than 6-in-10 are in the mood for compromise — 63 percent said they want their elected officials to compromise with people they disagree with rather than stick to their positions, including a majority of Republicans. Just 31 percent overall said they want their elected officials to stick to their positions no matter what. Strong Republicans (50 percent), African-Americans (51 percent), Trump supporters (53 percent), Latinos (55 percent) and Gen Xers (56 percent) are among the least likely to say they want their elected officials to compromise. "People are looking for compromise right now," Miringoff said. But neither side is seen as doing a very good job of it right now – 57 percent think the Trump administration is doing too little to work with Democrats in Congress; 55 percent think that Democrats are doing too little to work with the administration. Neither party is making a very good impression, either. Only about a third of Americans have a positive view of congressional Democrats (34 percent) while a majority (53 percent) disapprove of the job they are doing. An even lower number (29 percent) have a positive view of congressional Republicans and more view them negative (58 percent). The survey of 1,023 adults was conducted from Jan. 10 to Jan. 13 by The Marist Poll for NPR and the PBS NewsHour. Results for all Americans have a margin of error of +/- 3.8 percentage points. There were 324 Republicans or Republican-leaning independents surveyed. Where they are referenced, there is a margin of error of +/- 6.8 percentage points. There were 417 Democrats and Democratic-leaning independents surveyed. Where they are referenced, there is a margin of error of +/- 6 percentage points.
Impeach the sorry Bastard.....
You're a nation of Animals and no different to any terrorist organisation !  Sickos !!!
Too dumb for Nancy Pelosi. She owns you now.
What are you blubbering about??  We don't 'stop being American' just becuse your dum wall don't get built. but by the end of it you will not be anymore.  You're a special kind of stupid, ain't ya?
Yeah you're right if your name was not Donald jackass Trump
Bruce Hale show us one Democrat that supports ISIS, or MS13, or illegal immigration. You plainly show your bias and hatred for those that are working to oppose Donald Trump, but show no compassion for those that Trump's government shutdown impacts more severely each day. How would you feel if you were forced to work unpaid for a month just so Donald Trump has a hostage to bargain with for his wall. You support a dealmaker who cares little for 800,000 civil servants and thousands of others who are working longer hours to keep things running without them. No true American or Christian could act so cruelly.
To bad our dumb ass prime minister here in Canada doesnt listen to Trump.
WHAT HAPPEND with COLLUSION ? fucking TRAITOR !!! where are u Agents of FBI or CIA or NSA etcetera , why are u allowing 2 mess up country and everything its Based on?
someone should start checking Traitors supporters there are A lot of RUSSIAN Payed AGENTS.
To bad our dumb ass prime minister here in Canada doesnt listen to Trump.
i think michael cohen is lying aboutr trump to save his neck he lying about the project not true at all he is lying just to safe his own neck that all he doing michael cohen you are  a liar big time liar lying to muller like that about trump.
To all people who dislike and hate our president, I don’t think anyone including myself, agrees with the decisions that president Trump makes for our country. However, a president of a country and nation can’t make decisions graciously for each and every person. Also, he doesn’t have too. His job is to protect our country and keep it the greatest country in the world. The United States!!! Republican, Democrats, etc.. no matter your political views, support and help from all you Americans out there can really help our president and congress get this country back on track by supporting them and standing together as one nation, instead of putting them down and being selfish because many citizens of the U.S. aren’t getting their way. Things change. It’s life! It’s humanity. Accept and move on, and just be a good person. God bless everyone!
All y’all niggas supporting this orange pill looking ass Bitch wack asf🤷🏽‍♀️🤣
Hahahahahahahaha. You stupid moron
Trump you want to make USA great again. You need to stop this shutdown so federal employees can return to work. Families need a pay check to pay bills, meds, gas car payments, etc. None of these things do you need to worry about, so do not insult Americans saying you now what they are going thru because it is another lie coming out of your mouth.
This guy is a dickhead plain and simple.
Its so sad that a person would use their politcal power for foolery.  America is the biggest shitshow circus right now and Donald Trump the leading clown.  I blame your parents for not whipping your ass when you caught a temper tandrum over Leggos. If they did you probably would reconsider this stupidity of a wall. ALL FEDERAL EMPLOYEES SHOULD UNITE AND WALKOUT! What is a wall going to do if you dont have any federal employees guarding it?
Then stop bs'n around and call a national emergency. And while we're at it, what exactly is the vetting plan for Muslims coming to this nation. As I recall, you ran on that topic, not to mention, the detrimental affect Muslims have had in other Western nations -- not to mention the historic abomination they've been to humanity since conception. And what is being done about the visa issue and ending chain migration--and I'm not just talking South American individuals, but from the M.E. and Asia as well? Why are we still in Afghanistan protecting poppies for M.E. human scum?
You are the worst president and human being I've ever seen. F*** you honestly
someone should start checking Traitors supporters there are A lot of RUSSIAN Payed AGENTS.
You are the worst president and human being I've ever seen. F*** you honestly
Borders?  I've only heard of the ONE border   “He is shutting down the government to break his signature campaign promise. His signature campaign promise was that the taxpayers weren’t going to have to pay for it.” The House Armed Services Committee Chairman said on “This Week.” When you keep your promise, the wall can be built.
https://assets.donaldjtrump.com/Pay_for_the_Wall.pdf?fbclid=IwAR0P798Dgf28--nEvY-QUblFFdZAJraET0UR3sZ4YVRjMpuvj3sVVVTyZIc
https://l.facebook.com/l.php?u=https%3A%2F%2Fpbs.twimg.com%2Fmedia%2FDwcQbrSVYAAP_d2.jpg%3Alarge%3Ffbclid%3DIwAR07cNH9xIzWZTAFyccJK8TB7mLQxi-Y_HLyJOda2Y3YYC_XfwlTk3UXTNY&h=AT2XN6HIC7XpQ4wG0p8Nbg5PCGc9uC0LlGozQgDPXxNE2vYjLuSpoNPj-OrOIrERTCRfl4OzKVECRDmIrqeO8sHJh-xlbpsXL7_KHEJVoFqeUa1J4hVWPn-8eRghxA48NGs6QI6hTNMUVN9Cm5s
Then stop bs'n around and call a national emergency. And while we're at it, what exactly is the vetting plan for Muslims coming to this nation. As I recall, you ran on that topic, not to mention, the detrimental affect Muslims have had in other Western nations -- not to mention the historic abomination they've been to humanity since conception. And what is being done about the visa issue and ending chain migration--and I'm not just talking South American individuals, but from the M.E. and Asia as well? Why are we still in Afghanistan protecting poppies for M.E. human scum?
https://l.facebook.com/l.php?u=https%3A%2F%2Fpbs.twimg.com%2Fmedia%2FDwcQbrSVYAAP_d2.jpg%3Alarge%3Ffbclid%3DIwAR07cNH9xIzWZTAFyccJK8TB7mLQxi-Y_HLyJOda2Y3YYC_XfwlTk3UXTNY&h=AT2XN6HIC7XpQ4wG0p8Nbg5PCGc9uC0LlGozQgDPXxNE2vYjLuSpoNPj-OrOIrERTCRfl4OzKVECRDmIrqeO8sHJh-xlbpsXL7_KHEJVoFqeUa1J4hVWPn-8eRghxA48NGs6QI6hTNMUVN9Cm5s
Michelle Calderon, yes, Schumer is all that and less!
Michelle Calderon go trump
Alvin Mathews can you say collusion # he is guilty #he loves Putin
https://assets.donaldjtrump.com/Pay_for_the_Wall.pdf?fbclid=IwAR0P798Dgf28--nEvY-QUblFFdZAJraET0UR3sZ4YVRjMpuvj3sVVVTyZIc
Yep, want to make sure it's weak enough so Russia can continue to penetrate it long after you're in jail.
man what fucking creep you are asshole oh I know what the people are going through why don't we go to daddy and get more money what a fucking tool asshole your DADDY is DEAD mother fucker
Don't bother with a wall, just put a mile wide minefield with machine gun posts every 200 yards with a shoot to kill policy, that will stop the dirty rats getting through.
This is the most TRUE SPOKEN WORDS!!! PRESIDENT TRUMP is only Trying to Help Americans and YOUR CHILDREN and GRANDCHILDREN’S future ✅🇺🇸
There are far more criminals and murderers  that are white Americans ,  not to mention all the other American gangs and criminals than the 0.0132% of illegals that are criminals. Most drugs come through check points, human bodies, planes, etc. Hell, the drug cartels, can spend an extra couple of hundred dollars to go to Canada first then here. I mean damn...they have submarines and bring them all up and down the coast. You think an ignorant wall will stop them, lmbo! They are laughing at us!
Is this your ideology on all nations or just yours? Cause you kinda have your garbage (military bases) in so many nations.  America with walls would not have allowed your ancestors in from the ghettos of Europe. Trump is a fraud!
Alvin Mathews can you say collusion # he is guilty #he loves Putin
Thanks and THANKS for protecting our country from INVADERS ! ILLEGALS! CRIMINALS , drug dealers and more.GOD BLESS  YOU and YOUR WORK ! ! ! !
Liberals are now wanting to legalize pedophilia, yet some liberals have no idea and call us retarded and stupid.🧐
Trump supporters , you have no relevance. You are a Trump supporter. You obviously have no common sense, no morals, and are too gullible to have an intellectual opinion, since you are dumb enough to support Trump. You have been conned. A damn wall really? A wall to swim or boat around, because the wall can't block waterways. A wall to dig under, because they haven't been building mile long tunnels across the border already. A wall they can't climb over, blast or cut through like they have done. A wall they can't fly over....I mean, Trump supporters have no common sense, to know it's a waste of money. Especially, when we have a homeless problem and places like Flint!
What an absolute load of crap.  Americans want a solution not a symbol.  A wall may be part of the solution but it is far from THE solution.  Get with it and become a president and stop acting like you're one.
Protect Americans from the anti American, domestic terrorist Democrats and their commie Leftists, #PresidentTrump; the Constitutional Republic and Bill of Rights will be destroyed by them, not other countries.
Is this your ideology on all nations or just yours? Cause you kinda have your garbage (military bases) in so many nations.  America with walls would not have allowed your ancestors in from the ghettos of Europe. Trump is a fraud!
God sought a man among them that would build the wall, and stand in the gap before me on behalf of the land, that it should not be destroyed. Ezekiel 22:30 -- Pray for President Trump & a strong America! 🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯🇺🇸️
Serious, Real News: My Client Resigned From the White House. It's Time for Trump to Think About His Children and Do the Same  Impeachment should be far from the President's only concern By Martin London (VP Spiro T Agnew’s attorney, back in the day)  The BuzzFeed report that former Trump personal lawyer Michael Cohen has told investigators that, after the election, President Trump instructed him to lie to Congress has raised new calls for impeachment. But impeachment is far from the only concern Trump should consider now.  But what is new is the BuzzFeed revelation that Special Counsel Robert Mueller has not just Cohen’s testimony but documentary evidence (the story mentions “internal company emails, text messages, and a cache of other documents”) and witness corroboration that not only the President, but others in his family — specifically his children, Ivanka and Donald Trump, Jr. — knew the details of Cohen’s secret dealings with Russia on behalf of Trump. Therefore, the family members knew his testimony was false and had what BuzzFeed describes as “deep involvement” in the discussions with Russia — a subject they’ve denied in the past. BuzzFeed writes that Cohen had “extensive discussions” with the family members. The outlet’s two unnamed law enforcement sources said he gave them “very detailed updates.” If this is true, it is their criminal exposure that increases the pressure on Trump exponentially.  Trump faces two major problems: First is the question, Will Trump’s firm support in the Senate — which is responsible for trying impeachment charges lodged by the House — dissolve because the Senators see this as different? After all, Cohen lied directly to them. At some point, enough of them may conclude that enough is enough.  But the President’s immediate concern is Mueller. This is not like Trump firing of then–FBI Director James Comey, which lawyers can challenge because it was technically within the President’s constitutional power to do so for any reason, good or bad. This is conspiracy and aiding and abetting in the commission of a felony. There can be no argument that the President has the Constitutional authority to conspire to, say, cause somebody to rob a bank — or commit any other felony, such as giving perjurious testimony concerning the President’s conduct.  Don’t forget: While the President may be immune from prosecution while he remains in office, his children are not. Can he politically survive pardons for Donald Jr. and Ivanka? What about his son-in-law Jared? And his ex–campaign chairman Paul Manafort? And possibly even himself? (Though this last one is probably not even legal anyway.)  As the President’s power weakens because of the shutdown, and the Mueller pressure increases, there must be some level-headed people on his team that are considering the advantages of a resignation deal, as Vice President Spiro Agnew took in 1973 when I was his lawyer — and as I wrote the President should consider in August, if it means Mueller would end his investigation. Or failing that, even a non-deal resignation, a la Richard Nixon. Would President Mike Pence emulate President Gerald Ford and pardon his predecessor?  At some point, this for-now President must start to contemplate the future: It is not his back-slapping commentator-supporters or his Mar-a-Lago glad-handers or his Twitter followers who face a term of imprisonment. The longer the President waits, the more evidence piles up, and the tougher it will be to get a deal. Mueller already has a federal grand jury hearing evidence that just received a six-month extension. The President should make his deal before that body completes its work. The Mueller report may accompany a clutch of Mueller indictments.
From VP Agnew’s one-time lawyer: “At some point, this for-now President must start to contemplate the future: It is not his back-slapping commentator-supporters or his Mar-a-Lago glad-handers or his Twitter followers who face a term of imprisonment. The longer the President waits, the more evidence piles up, and the tougher it will be to get a deal. Mueller already has a federal grand jury hearing evidence that just received a six-month extension. The President should make his deal before that body completes its work. The Mueller report may accompany a clutch of Mueller indictments.”
God sought a man among them that would build the wall, and stand in the gap before me on behalf of the land, that it should not be destroyed. Ezekiel 22:30 -- Pray for President Trump & a strong America! 🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯🇺🇸️
From VP Agnew’s one-time lawyer: “At some point, this for-now President must start to contemplate the future: It is not his back-slapping commentator-supporters or his Mar-a-Lago glad-handers or his Twitter followers who face a term of imprisonment. The longer the President waits, the more evidence piles up, and the tougher it will be to get a deal. Mueller already has a federal grand jury hearing evidence that just received a six-month extension. The President should make his deal before that body completes its work. The Mueller report may accompany a clutch of Mueller indictments.”
No, making sure there are enough hamberbers in the Oval Office is YOUR most important duty. Just saying.
Ya do know he doesn't post his own social media...or are you just grasping?
Serious, Real News: My Client Resigned From the White House. It's Time for Trump to Think About His Children and Do the Same  Impeachment should be far from the President's only concern By Martin London (VP Spiro T Agnew’s attorney, back in the day)  The BuzzFeed report that former Trump personal lawyer Michael Cohen has told investigators that, after the election, President Trump instructed him to lie to Congress has raised new calls for impeachment. But impeachment is far from the only concern Trump should consider now.  But what is new is the BuzzFeed revelation that Special Counsel Robert Mueller has not just Cohen’s testimony but documentary evidence (the story mentions “internal company emails, text messages, and a cache of other documents”) and witness corroboration that not only the President, but others in his family — specifically his children, Ivanka and Donald Trump, Jr. — knew the details of Cohen’s secret dealings with Russia on behalf of Trump. Therefore, the family members knew his testimony was false and had what BuzzFeed describes as “deep involvement” in the discussions with Russia — a subject they’ve denied in the past. BuzzFeed writes that Cohen had “extensive discussions” with the family members. The outlet’s two unnamed law enforcement sources said he gave them “very detailed updates.” If this is true, it is their criminal exposure that increases the pressure on Trump exponentially.  Trump faces two major problems: First is the question, Will Trump’s firm support in the Senate — which is responsible for trying impeachment charges lodged by the House — dissolve because the Senators see this as different? After all, Cohen lied directly to them. At some point, enough of them may conclude that enough is enough.  But the President’s immediate concern is Mueller. This is not like Trump firing of then–FBI Director James Comey, which lawyers can challenge because it was technically within the President’s constitutional power to do so for any reason, good or bad. This is conspiracy and aiding and abetting in the commission of a felony. There can be no argument that the President has the Constitutional authority to conspire to, say, cause somebody to rob a bank — or commit any other felony, such as giving perjurious testimony concerning the President’s conduct.  Don’t forget: While the President may be immune from prosecution while he remains in office, his children are not. Can he politically survive pardons for Donald Jr. and Ivanka? What about his son-in-law Jared? And his ex–campaign chairman Paul Manafort? And possibly even himself? (Though this last one is probably not even legal anyway.)  As the President’s power weakens because of the shutdown, and the Mueller pressure increases, there must be some level-headed people on his team that are considering the advantages of a resignation deal, as Vice President Spiro Agnew took in 1973 when I was his lawyer — and as I wrote the President should consider in August, if it means Mueller would end his investigation. Or failing that, even a non-deal resignation, a la Richard Nixon. Would President Mike Pence emulate President Gerald Ford and pardon his predecessor?  At some point, this for-now President must start to contemplate the future: It is not his back-slapping commentator-supporters or his Mar-a-Lago glad-handers or his Twitter followers who face a term of imprisonment. The longer the President waits, the more evidence piles up, and the tougher it will be to get a deal. Mueller already has a federal grand jury hearing evidence that just received a six-month extension. The President should make his deal before that body completes its work. The Mueller report may accompany a clutch of Mueller indictments.
Ya do know he doesn't post his own social media...or are you just grasping?
Best President we have ever had
No, making sure there are enough hamberbers in the Oval Office is YOUR most important duty. Just saying.
Shutdown is going on BUT that Bitch is taking a Vacation using Government Plane / Taxpayer Money
That is exactly what the democrats want. One world wide nation under their chaotic rule. They are more than happy to throw away US sovereignty if it will accelerate their global citizen goals! Stay strong, win both the house and the senate by to build the wall. MAGA in 2020! If the Brits can escape the EU, you can escape the democrats!
I don't see any problem of having a border wall at all, it is important, it is essential and it is necessary to have it. Those illegal immigrants digging a hole under or climbing over  are criminals. If my country has problems other than war do I illegally run away  to the neighboring country ? No.
If a militia of armed American patriots traveled to the border and shot any illegals or migrants crossing into the US, what would be the penalty? Certainly it wouldn’t be murder as they would simply be protecting the country from foreign invaders and stopping a crime in progress?
‘Lawyer Bug Eyes’ makes Real News: TRump Camp Colluded with Russia  Giuliani stuns with new claim: ‘I never said there was no collusion’ 01/17/19 08:00 AM By Steve Benen  When Rudy Giuliani comments on the investigation into the Russia scandal, his observations tend to fall into two broad categories: he reflects on things that have happened in the past and things that might happen in the future.  When the former mayor focuses his attention on the latter, his comments are of little value. Giuliani often seems hopelessly lost about where Donald Trump’s legal defense is headed, the status of talks with Special Counsel Robert Mueller’s team, and what the president is likely to do next. By and large, when it comes to future developments, Giuliani routinely appears to be guessing.  But when he comments on things that have already happened, I think there’s a qualitative difference. More specifically, when Giuliani talks about the past, he’s reflecting on things he presumably knows more about: evidence he’s seen, witnesses he’s spoken to, details he’s reviewed, etc.  With this in mind, when Giuliani dramatically changes his story about central questions at the heart of the Russia scandal, it’s worth taking note. Consider this exchange from last night between the former mayor and CNN’s Chris Cuomo.  CUOMO: Mr. Mayor, false reporting is saying that nobody in the campaign had any contacts with Russia. False reporting is saying that there has been no suggestion of any kind of collusion between the campaign and any Russians. Because now you have Paul Manafort giving poll data that winds up leading to this coincidence –  GIULIANI: I – I never said – well, you just misstated my position. I never said there was no collusion between the campaign, or between people in the campaign –  CUOMO: Yes, you have.  GIULIANI: I have no idea if – I have not. I said the president of the United States.  There a few angles to this that are worth keeping in mind. The first is that Giuliani, in reality, really is on record saying that the Trump campaign – not just the president himself – did not collude with Russia during its attack on the American elections. Giuliani is now changing his story. It seems likely that he learned something new that led him to adopt this new position.  Second, Trump’s lawyer defines “collusion” in a ridiculously narrow way. To hear Giuliani tell it, the president’s campaign may have cooperated with a hostile foreign power during its attack on U.S. elections, but so long as the president didn’t personally help the Kremlin hack DNC computers, there’s no reason to take the controversy seriously. That’s absurd.  And finally, it’s worth appreciating just how many times Trump World has moved the goalposts. In 2016, the original line from the Republican and his team was that Russia didn’t interfere in the elections at all. When that proved untenable, Trump and his team categorically denied that there were any communications whatsoever between the campaign and Vladimir Putin’s government.  At a pre-inaugural press conference, Trump said no one from the Trump campaign was in contact with Russia during the campaign. Just a few days before Inauguration Day, for example, CBS’s John Dickerson asked Mike Pence, “Did any adviser or anybody in the Trump campaign have any contact with the Russians who were trying to meddle in the election?” The vice president-elect responded at the time, “Of course not.”  There’s no doubt that those claims were flamboyantly untrue.  The Trump World’s argument has evolved several times since, and it’s arrived at a new location: the president’s political operation and Russia may have colluded after all. That’s not my argument; that’s the president’s lawyer’s argument.
The border has a barrier on 60% already, 100% along CA border. The real biggest problem for immigration so folks that overstay visas. Border patrol is being corrupted because drugs and gangs come in through legal checkpoints in vans and trucks and cars. We need staff and technology to counter this. Drinking the Copland and thinking there is no border security now and Trump is the only one who has ever addressed the issue, well like so much of what his followers beleive...that is a lie and foolish.
Best President we have ever had
The border has a barrier on 60% already, 100% along CA border. The real biggest problem for immigration so folks that overstay visas. Border patrol is being corrupted because drugs and gangs come in through legal checkpoints in vans and trucks and cars. We need staff and technology to counter this. Drinking the Copland and thinking there is no border security now and Trump is the only one who has ever addressed the issue, well like so much of what his followers beleive...that is a lie and foolish.
‘Lawyer Bug Eyes’ makes Real News: TRump Camp Colluded with Russia  Giuliani stuns with new claim: ‘I never said there was no collusion’ 01/17/19 08:00 AM By Steve Benen  When Rudy Giuliani comments on the investigation into the Russia scandal, his observations tend to fall into two broad categories: he reflects on things that have happened in the past and things that might happen in the future.  When the former mayor focuses his attention on the latter, his comments are of little value. Giuliani often seems hopelessly lost about where Donald Trump’s legal defense is headed, the status of talks with Special Counsel Robert Mueller’s team, and what the president is likely to do next. By and large, when it comes to future developments, Giuliani routinely appears to be guessing.  But when he comments on things that have already happened, I think there’s a qualitative difference. More specifically, when Giuliani talks about the past, he’s reflecting on things he presumably knows more about: evidence he’s seen, witnesses he’s spoken to, details he’s reviewed, etc.  With this in mind, when Giuliani dramatically changes his story about central questions at the heart of the Russia scandal, it’s worth taking note. Consider this exchange from last night between the former mayor and CNN’s Chris Cuomo.  CUOMO: Mr. Mayor, false reporting is saying that nobody in the campaign had any contacts with Russia. False reporting is saying that there has been no suggestion of any kind of collusion between the campaign and any Russians. Because now you have Paul Manafort giving poll data that winds up leading to this coincidence –  GIULIANI: I – I never said – well, you just misstated my position. I never said there was no collusion between the campaign, or between people in the campaign –  CUOMO: Yes, you have.  GIULIANI: I have no idea if – I have not. I said the president of the United States.  There a few angles to this that are worth keeping in mind. The first is that Giuliani, in reality, really is on record saying that the Trump campaign – not just the president himself – did not collude with Russia during its attack on the American elections. Giuliani is now changing his story. It seems likely that he learned something new that led him to adopt this new position.  Second, Trump’s lawyer defines “collusion” in a ridiculously narrow way. To hear Giuliani tell it, the president’s campaign may have cooperated with a hostile foreign power during its attack on U.S. elections, but so long as the president didn’t personally help the Kremlin hack DNC computers, there’s no reason to take the controversy seriously. That’s absurd.  And finally, it’s worth appreciating just how many times Trump World has moved the goalposts. In 2016, the original line from the Republican and his team was that Russia didn’t interfere in the elections at all. When that proved untenable, Trump and his team categorically denied that there were any communications whatsoever between the campaign and Vladimir Putin’s government.  At a pre-inaugural press conference, Trump said no one from the Trump campaign was in contact with Russia during the campaign. Just a few days before Inauguration Day, for example, CBS’s John Dickerson asked Mike Pence, “Did any adviser or anybody in the Trump campaign have any contact with the Russians who were trying to meddle in the election?” The vice president-elect responded at the time, “Of course not.”  There’s no doubt that those claims were flamboyantly untrue.  The Trump World’s argument has evolved several times since, and it’s arrived at a new location: the president’s political operation and Russia may have colluded after all. That’s not my argument; that’s the president’s lawyer’s argument.
Maria Shafer secret service should visit you!!!
Sue Marie rethuglicon dog whistles. Most drugs entering the country come thru LEGAL ports of entry on fishing boats, cargo ships, personal submarines, personal vehicles, tractor trailers.  Or just look at Perdu Pharmaceutical for opiate abuse. Source El Chapo trial
Marsha Howes Illegals slither over everyday!  They need to come in with consent only!  They're like a infestation of rats!
Maria Shafer secret service should visit you!!!
Marsha Howes Illegals slither over everyday!  They need to come in with consent only!  They're like a infestation of rats!
You promised 200 times that Mexico is paying for the wall. Plus, why didn't you vote for it for the two years where you controlled the Senate and the house? Must not have been TOO important ya MORON!
Susan Casto He can't force Mexico to pay for it. Unfortunate,if he choose to stop the annual welfare this Country gives to Mexico,the liberals would melt down! They would block his attempts to stop the money given to Mexico,everyone knows this. But,if he stops even a small percent ofthe illegal  entries, the wall would pay for itself with nothing more then the costs we absorb per entry.
Dawn Phelps way to be a coward and block yourself so I can't respond to whatever drivel you wrote. Typical trumptard.
Sue Marie rethuglicon dog whistles. Most drugs entering the country come thru LEGAL ports of entry on fishing boats, cargo ships, personal submarines, personal vehicles, tractor trailers.  Or just look at Perdu Pharmaceutical for opiate abuse. Source El Chapo trial
He is such a Liar .he is a TREASONOUS CRIMINAL Traitor
Bob Kelley Let's get to it, I don't understand why as the President, You can't take 5.3 Billion of the Mexican Cartels Drug Money and build the damn Wall !! What are they going to do, demand it back, I don't think that's happening and then you can Boast that the Mexican's really did pay for the WALL !! So lets get this done, your the President GET ER DONE..... then open the Government and make Nancy and Chuckie look like the ass's they are..... then how many crossover supporter's will you have, for coming up with this idea !!!! Now we'll see if those that read these pass them on or throw them away.... X NAM Navy also a supporter !!!! 🇺🇸 🤔 🇨🇱 😁 🇺🇸
You doctored these photos you fat ass! And longer fingers.
so you blocked Pelosi GOOD FOR YOU, stay strong Mr President and don't let the,mget you down....Pelosi is determined to destroy not only you but this country also...SHE IS TERRIFIED OF YOU !!!!! and so are the other dims, they are all afraid of you exposing their devious anddishonest deeds...….HANG IN THERE !!!!
How about defending our troops you moron? Stand up for Ukraine. Be a man and leader for once.
Dawn Phelps way to be a coward and block yourself so I can't respond to whatever drivel you wrote. Typical trumptard.
How about defending our troops you moron? Stand up for Ukraine. Be a man and leader for once.
Mirror image son?
Build the wall!!!
Mirror image son?
Man you fake trolls are out there in full force but you are not the voice of the people, you are scum cowards hiding behind phony accounts! How’s the weather in Russia or is it China or in your Mom’s basement? Build the wall! BTW, your irreverent comments just unifies us even more and makes us stronger so knock yourselves out!
Bill Miller Your fake account has reported coward scum! Don’t you FAKE accounts realize you’re just helping our side unite even further? Ha, thanks!!
What a fucking moron
Bill Miller Your fake account has reported coward scum! Don’t you FAKE accounts realize you’re just helping our side unite even further? Ha, thanks!!
Kristen Schmitz put it on his Deplorable supporters and Republican in Congress.
Debbie Skinner your profile looks like Putins people created it. No facts on where you are from, work, or live. So dont be so quick to label those with opposing views as not being real. I worked for 51 years, paid my taxes and SS. Raised my kids to all work and pay taxes. I oppose the wall, support border security, am for more accessible ports of entry and better screening,  and am torally against the gov't shutdown. I blame Donald Trump for creating it, and Mitch McConnell for prolonging it by not allowing bipartisan legislation that has passed the house to even be put up for debate and a possible vote. He is now the biggest obstacle to reopening the government, not Shumer, not Pelosi.
Kristen Schmitz put it on his Deplorable supporters and Republican in Congress.
STEP #4 SAY NOTHING MORE THAN THAT IF YOU CAN CONTROL YOUR EMOTIONS AND WALK OUT! STEP #5 24HRS LATER DECLARE EMERGENCY AND FUND WALL. END SHUT DOWN TAKE CREDIT. STEP #6 CALL ROUND TABLE GET PIZZA N ROOTBEER FOR YOU AND BARRON!
Dumbest mofo alive!
The Dim Rats are so stubborn like children !!!!!! Go Trump !!!!!!
If Walls don't work, why do I have to have one around my Pool? Why are Walls around Schools and Day Cares? Why did Disney put one around their lakes? Why do Over 55 Communities have Walls and Guard Stations? Why does the Democratic Party have one around their Building? Get the point? President Donald J. Trump, if you have to shut the government down in order to get our Wall that will provide the safety and National Security that All Americans are entitled too, do whatever it takes! How many more loved ones do we have to bury before the Democrats do their job? My family buried an 18 year old American girl and her American 20 year old companion is a double leg amputee. Oh, the criminal illegal immigrant that is supposed to be deported at the end of his prison term(originally 17 years) will be out of prison in 2021 (2 yrs for a life and pair of legs), do you want him in your neighborhood? Here’s the Senate switchboard: (202) 224-3121. Call your Senator. Tell them you stand with the President. Demand the wall. #BuildOurWall
Total colossal perfidious imbecile, Nazi, Russian agent and thief. What bullsshit!!!!
he’s trying to bully congress into getting what he wants, we as the people can fight against him!!! theres millions of us and one of him!! a wall will not keep drug trafficking away, they have under ground tunnels, everyone knows that. you’re trying to keep people away that need to come to america so they have money and opportunity, you deserve to burn in hell
Really? Our nation is Trumps highest priority? Is that the nation that he sees greenbacks off of today or the nation that his ignorance threatens to destroy for everyone who will be here when he is no longer in office? https://www.businessinsider.com/donald-trump-default-print-money-2016-5?fbclid=IwAR0ZoRzM7XBZVGiWc3hpd8cZcgMkluZ2naxb5V6CzSxhVfBn6Y89cs6hQ_s ~ This is no songbird tweeting soft nothings in your ear - this is a foghorn wake up call signaling you've crashed upon the rocky sholes of Trump Isle. He is not only a member, but a platinum card holder of the #DonaldTrumpUniversalAbsoluteMoronsWhoDontKnowShitAboutShitClub  Hey, #DonaldTrump, In all your #BigBusiness dealings you may have missed the class on #Hyperinflation - so, here you go. Please, better yourself - you're only the current president of the United States tasked with working WITHIN the three branches of our Democratic Republic to better the United States and preserve and possibly enhance the tenants and ideals upon which it was founded. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hyperinflation https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hyperinflation... Will #DonaldTrumpsPresidency be the one that moves the #UnitedStates from the #HighInflation category to the #Hyperinflation category? Wow! perhaps the real legacy might be summed up in 'If not through failure then how else are a people to grow and innovate?' #PresidentialLegacy! ~ But, life calls me away from all of this fabulousness. Please, fellow F-bookers.. let the toupees and comments fly!
As it should be.  Unfortunately in Canada our twatwaffle leader thinks open boarders and funding terrorism should be his number 2 and 3 priorities right behind embezzlement
STEP #4 SAY NOTHING MORE THAN THAT IF YOU CAN CONTROL YOUR EMOTIONS AND WALK OUT! STEP #5 24HRS LATER DECLARE EMERGENCY AND FUND WALL. END SHUT DOWN TAKE CREDIT. STEP #6 CALL ROUND TABLE GET PIZZA N ROOTBEER FOR YOU AND BARRON!
As it should be.  Unfortunately in Canada our twatwaffle leader thinks open boarders and funding terrorism should be his number 2 and 3 priorities right behind embezzlement
Gloria Oceguera I mean no disrespect but for your age i am beguiled by your beauty believe me if there's beauty then there's you, please forgive my manners I'm tony
Really? Our nation is Trumps highest priority? Is that the nation that he sees greenbacks off of today or the nation that his ignorance threatens to destroy for everyone who will be here when he is no longer in office? https://www.businessinsider.com/donald-trump-default-print-money-2016-5?fbclid=IwAR0ZoRzM7XBZVGiWc3hpd8cZcgMkluZ2naxb5V6CzSxhVfBn6Y89cs6hQ_s ~ This is no songbird tweeting soft nothings in your ear - this is a foghorn wake up call signaling you've crashed upon the rocky sholes of Trump Isle. He is not only a member, but a platinum card holder of the #DonaldTrumpUniversalAbsoluteMoronsWhoDontKnowShitAboutShitClub  Hey, #DonaldTrump, In all your #BigBusiness dealings you may have missed the class on #Hyperinflation - so, here you go. Please, better yourself - you're only the current president of the United States tasked with working WITHIN the three branches of our Democratic Republic to better the United States and preserve and possibly enhance the tenants and ideals upon which it was founded. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hyperinflation https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hyperinflation... Will #DonaldTrumpsPresidency be the one that moves the #UnitedStates from the #HighInflation category to the #Hyperinflation category? Wow! perhaps the real legacy might be summed up in 'If not through failure then how else are a people to grow and innovate?' #PresidentialLegacy! ~ But, life calls me away from all of this fabulousness. Please, fellow F-bookers.. let the toupees and comments fly!
Gloria Oceguera I mean no disrespect but for your age i am beguiled by your beauty believe me if there's beauty then there's you, please forgive my manners I'm tony
Jeffrey Brown you must be referring to Pelosi and Schumer!
Frank Lapinski no sir asshole President Trump
Pitiful moron.
How about getting rid of the Federal Reserve and printing money through the treasury..all debt would be gone over night..you stupid Jackass...
One of the best presidents I have ever seen ❤️ DONALD TRAMP
Yes, drain the swamp and Build the wall, deport all illegals.
Frank Lapinski no sir asshole President Trump
Yes, drain the swamp and Build the wall, deport all illegals.
Build the wall
How can you call yourself a real American if you hate Donald Trump. He has nothing but America's best interests and has done nothing but make this country great again just like he said god bless you and your family Mr Trump you saved America from the most coward and corrupt  Clinton's and Obama's nothing American about either of the scum. But once again thank you Mr President Donald Trump
Keep lying Trump that the Dems don't want any border security.  Keep the government shutdown as well, it will ensure that you will be a one term President :-) and that will be the greatest thing you have ever done.  :-)
Why did you imbeciles care so much about Hillary's emails and you don't care about Ivanka's emails and her use of a private email server? Why did you care so much about Hillary having friends in high places and you don't care about Trump owing Russian Mob $650 Millon and his "relationships" with an evil, murderous dictator like Putin? Secret meetings. Spies in our White House? Why did you all go crazy about Benghazi but don't care about the 15 people and 4 servicemen who lost their lives on Syria yesterday? Why????
God thinks Donald Trump is a douchebag
Your an orange dumm ASS
Physicians were unable to reach a consensus: Should the U.S. build Trump's Mexican Wall? The Allergists were in favor of scratching it, but the Dermatologists advised not to make any rash moves. The Gastroenterologist's had sort of a gut feeling about it, but the Neurologists thought Trump had a lot of nerve. Meanwhile, Obstetricians felt certain everyone was laboring under a misconception, while the Ophthalmologists considered the idea shortsighted. Pathologists yelled, "Over my dead body!" while the Pediatricians said, "Oh, grow up!" The Psychiatrists thought the whole idea was madness, while the Radiologists could see right through it. Surgeons decided to wash their hands of the whole thing and the Internists claimed it would indeed be a bitter pill to swallow. The Plastic Surgeons opined that this proposal would "put a whole new face on the matter." The Podiatrists thought it was a step forward, but the Urologists were pissed off at the whole idea. Anesthesiologists thought the whole idea was a gas, and those lofty Cardiologists didn't have the heart to say no. In the end, the Proctologists won out, leaving the entire decision up to the assholes in Washington!
Build the wall
Donald Trump your doing a good job. We need the wall built if the Democrats would give in and just let go of there childish ways we wouldn’t be in this predicament of everyone not getting paid and the government being shut down and all. Then sorry son of a bitches called the Democrats need to either retire or just quit because they aren’t helping this problem any more better than it already is getting.
BUILD THE WALL
What an ASSHOLE
Ports and Airports Dumb Ass smh
Build the wall
Malignant liar.
BUILD THE WALL 🇺🇸
God thinks Donald Trump is a douchebag
BUILD THE WALL 🇺🇸
Wished I knew what 316 of you morons find so funny, he's exactly right.
The wall won't actually help. Everyone wants border security, but the money should be spent on things that will actually work, like more personnel, high tech border surveillance technology, more immigration judges and so on.
Phoebe Cassandra Smith, that's contrary to what everyone that works on the border is telling us. They are the experts, not you.
Malignant liar.
Build the wall
lying fat ass crook
build the wall.
Guys a goof straight up
Just like Putin. We want this in Norway too. Unfortunately our Government is run by NWO FAKE POLITICIANS, WORKING FOR THEIR OWN FAME AND MONEY. Disgusting to witness norwegian msm as propagandists for these unworthy politicians selling our wealth out to sArabia and the NWO EU an UN.
Impeach Trump
build the wall
DISGUSTING PIGMAN
Phoebe Cassandra Smith, that's contrary to what everyone that works on the border is telling us. They are the experts, not you.
Lets exterminate the cartel Mr President
Your're a worthless bitch..
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Your loyalty is to Russia and Putin, not the Americans who can’t pay there bills because of your tantrum!!! Whether dem or republicans you have an obligation to treat us all fair and equally. You haven’t done that, because you’re a weak, ignorant fool, not leader
Killed America when he took office
Build the wall
DISGUSTING PIGMAN
You really need a punch in the teeth, Trump! Any time, any place, chickenshit!
FAKE President
Tick tick motherfucker
BUILD THE WALL
No, dumb dumb. Just no.
And the liberals laugh.  They must detest America.
Build the wall
Ditch Mitch. Dump Trump.
BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL
Calm down. Everyone wants border security. We just want the money spent effectively on more personnel, high tech border surveillance technology and so on. Not on a wasteful monument to Trump's vanity.
Phoebe Cassandra Smith it is a matter of security not vanity. Maybe you should leave this conversation to the adults..
Ditch Mitch. Dump Trump.
BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL
Build the Wall!  NOW!
Build the wall
Is giving me my fuckin tax return...bitch
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Americans should pay a visit to the homes of Pelosi or other Democrats in the Congress. Find out whether their homes have no walls. Ask them why they have walls all over. Ask them whether they would welcome and accept every Tom, Dick and Harry. I have never seen a Party so averse to issues of National Importance. What are the Democrats up to?
Build the wall!
Phoebe Cassandra Smith it is a matter of security not vanity. Maybe you should leave this conversation to the adults..
Build the wall!
You are stupid..plz stfu
Saurabh Bakshi didn’t you promise me a million for a ten dollar wire transfer, Nigerian idiot
https://www.facebook.com/9124187907/posts/10157608403692908/
Americans should pay a visit to the homes of Pelosi or other Democrats in the Congress. Find out whether their homes have no walls. Ask them why they have walls all over. Ask them whether they would welcome and accept every Tom, Dick and Harry. I have never seen a Party so averse to issues of National Importance. What are the Democrats up to?
https://www.facebook.com/9124187907/posts/10157608403692908/
Titouan Renard Borders are useless: people can even go out of the image now...
Saurabh Bakshi didn’t you promise me a million for a ten dollar wire transfer, Nigerian idiot
#buildthat4thWall
WHO DOES KAMELA HARRIS THINK SHE IS BULLYING OUR SECRETARY OF HOMELAND SECURITY ??? MORE SWAMP CREATURES EVERYDAY THAT PASSES... WHACKY WATER,, AOC,, CHUCKY CHEESE ,, DELERIOUS PELOSI the list is LONG !! GOD BLESS YOU FOR YOUR WORK ETHICS & STRENGTH MR.PRESIDENT ..STAND STRONG AGAINST THESE CRIMINALS WHO WANT TO TAKE THIS AMERICA & ITS PEOPLE DOWN ... THANK YOU ..OH ONE MORE IMPORTANT FACTOR BECAUSE OF WHAT HARRIS IS DOING WHICH IS CALLED "DIVIDING " MLK IS MOST LIKELY TURNING IN HIS GRAVE SHE STANDS FOR & IS PUSHING THE AGENDA OF WHAT HE STOOD AGAINST ,,WHICH IS WHY HE WAS SO LOVED !!! IF JFK & MLK HAVE NOT BEEN ASSASSINATED THIS COUNTRY WOULD HAVE BEEN WONDERFUL I TRULY BELIEVE !! AMEN  R.I.P. TO BOTH OF THOSE PATRIOTS & BRAVE MEN...
🇺🇸agree! 🇺🇸 2020
#buildthat4thWall
Build the wall
Build the wall!
fat stupid cunt
A total  Madman needs to be gone
Build the Wall !!!
Stupid ass dude
Build the wall!
🇺🇸agree! 🇺🇸 2020
Kill yourself scum.
Build the WALL NOW
Kick some ass trump
Are you going to build a wall around the country to because you get terrorists from everywhere else coming into country how you going to stop.
Build the wall.
Build the wall
If we do not get rid of you and your cronies America will become a fascist state.
Liar trump liar
Defend us from you please. https://www.wsj.com/articles/poll-rigging-for-trump-and-creating-womenforcohen-one-it-firms-work-order-11547722801
Get the retard. Out is the nations. First duty
Build the wall!
Build the Wall!
BUILD THE WALL
Bunch of bullshit
Build the Wall!!
Your all immigrants
Build the WALL
Build the Wall.   MAGA.
BUILD THAT WALL
Get the retard. Out is the nations. First duty
Build the wall!
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL !!!
Build the wall.
This is what the far left have been doing for YEARS. People seem to forget these things. The wall is not only to protect us from drug smugglers, human trafficking, gangs and sicknesses that have been eradicated from our country.   It's also to protect us from the far left with things like this.  https://youtu.be/yYnVKJMAV90
GO GET EM TRUMP
Build the wall
Build the Wall!
BUILD THAT WALL
Fire the Democraps.
Build the wall!
Build The Wall!
Build the wall!!!!!
Build that wall
Build that wall
Build that wall
Photoshopped picture?!?
Build the WALL
Build the Wall!
Build the WALL
Photoshopped picture?!?
BUILD THE WALL!
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!
What an  Idiot
What an asshole!
Build the Wall!
IMPEACH THE MOTHER FUCKER
Putin in Trumps ass 2020
BUILD THAT WALL DEPORT ALL ILLEGALS AND THEIR FAMILIES AND DREAMERS.
Democrats Pelosi and Schumer, are Desperate to try and Stop President Trump, from telling the Truth about the government shut down and the Wall with Mexico. Senator, Ted Cruz: https://twitter.com/BlazeTV/status/1085907090957307909?s=20
Resign president Turd.
President of USA ... Why not PRESIDENT of the WORLD ???  All nations want to say Donald Trump Is Our President !
TRUMP TRUMP TRUMP
You haven’t been a nation since 2016... you dont get called divider in chief for nothing you complete lunatic. If America gets attacked during your  shut down, it will be on you.
MAGAts...Reason why the wall won't work:  https://m.washingtontimes.com/news/2017/aug/20/mexican-drug-cartels-using-drones-to-smuggle-heroi/
Quick, Dems are headed for the beach on Mars! Taxpayer paid Deep State won't stop their speedy flight. But they'll send a $350B bill for the fake Mars mission later. #mars #space #beach #shutdown https://m.facebook.com/groups/1554701338086961?ref=bookmarks1,432 Members
We must defend our country from Russian Interference.  They infiltrated the NRA and installed a wannabe be dictator in the oval office!  Cyber wall and sanctions are not on Trumps to do list and everyone is a liar except him. Like the FBI, CIA, NSA, CNN, MSNBC, ABC, NYT, WaPo etc...  He is a traitor and and spy.  WAKE UP! WE ARE UNDER ATTACK.
Nasty Nan doesn't want to fund the wall and now she is taking the word of 1 unknown person to tell the President to not give his SOTU address.  Both she would then use to claim he was weak and incapable to try to take the spotlight off of her for being weak and incapable.  She is a snake and her actions are why she has no business in office in Washington.  She is inept and incapable of doing anything but trying to cause trouble.  This country cannot function well on that agenda--as proven!
Resign, you fat fucking criminal.
The battle used to be good vs evil....  now it’s (politics) republic and democrat....  The battle used to be to enforce justice.... Now it’s (manslaw) can you afford it....  ITS THE SAME OLD SWAMP FOLKS.... #DrainTheSwamp   "public servants" who are really self seeking liars MUST NOT BE ALLOWED TO BECOME mini kings with money and health insurance for life!!!  When a public servant is found serving a private club/self, treason is at play and the gallows would await in a country with normal intelligence  Proverbs 25:5  New Living Translation Remove the wicked from the king's court, and his reign will be made secure by justice.  English Standard Version take away the wicked from the presence of the king, and his throne will be established in righteousness.  King James Bible Take away the wicked from before the king, and his throne shall be established in righteousness.
The battle used to be good vs evil....  now it’s (politics) republic and democrat....  The battle used to be to enforce justice.... Now it’s (manslaw) can you afford it....  ITS THE SAME OLD SWAMP FOLKS.... #DrainTheSwamp   "public servants" who are really self seeking liars MUST NOT BE ALLOWED TO BECOME mini kings with money and health insurance for life!!!  When a public servant is found serving a private club/self, treason is at play and the gallows would await in a country with normal intelligence  Proverbs 25:5  New Living Translation Remove the wicked from the king's court, and his reign will be made secure by justice.  English Standard Version take away the wicked from the presence of the king, and his throne will be established in righteousness.  King James Bible Take away the wicked from before the king, and his throne shall be established in righteousness.
EVERYBODY NEEDS TO CALL OR VISIT PELOSI AND SHUMMER, REMOVE THEM FROM THEIR POSITION, THEY WORK FOR THE ELITE CABAL ENEMIES OF THE PEOPLE OF THE UNITED STATES Nancy polosy 202 255-4965 Chuck chummer 202 224-7433
Dear Dems, Please stop living life la vida loca, quit wasting our tax dollars and get your stupid asses back to work!
We don’t have open borders. We are one of the strictest nations to get into. Have you ever even tried to get into the United states? Idiots.
LIAR LIAR PANTS ON FIRE   LIBERTY UNIV. CIO ADMITTED HE   WAS ASKED TO RIG TWO POLLS IN   FAVOR OF TRUMP  FOR $50K     THAT IS COLLUSION  AND   OBSTRUCTION OF JUSTICE     TIME FOR HERR DRUMPF TO RESIGN   OR JUST GO STRAIGHT TO PRISON   WITH HIS CORRUPT FAMILY AND   ILLEGALLY GAINED ADMINISTRATION!
Actually you are a illegal immigrant from Europe and this land was mexico for thousands of years and mexicans lived here for thousands of years and are native to this land so this land belongs to mexicans more than anyone else. All white people are illegal immigrants from Europe that came here for spiritual refuge and we are all illegal immigrants living here on mexico's land that we stole from them, all mexicans deserve to live here more than anyone else. We should let in all mexicans at the border and build them freedom towers in san diego where they all can live and eat free with buffets of maha prasadam not fast food so they eat as healthy as possible to prevent diseases. We should be focused on the welfare of the immigrants not using our borders as way to keep immigrants out that want to live here, all non violent immigrants at the border should be let in and put on welfare and the fact you want to keep them out to cut their welfare money is a crime.
THANK YOU MR. PRESIDENT !!! NEVER BACK DOWN TO THOSE COMMIE DEMOCRATS !!! WE SHOULD TAR AND FEATHER THEM AND RUN THEM OUT OF TOWN !!!
Bullshit! There is NO crisis at the border! Trump’s a disgrace! He needs to be impeached, then imprisoned!
Stop holding the American people hostage to get what you want. You could have done this in the past two years. Why didn't you, to prove how powerful you are, to take the "heat" off of you for all your criminal activities. Shame on our government all of you for putting America families at risk, that is not making America great again. Do your damn job, build your stupid wall, won't make a damn difference. Planes, boats and tunnels, please.
*I LOVE MY PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP*...*YOU ARE MORE THAN THE VERY BLESSED & ANOINTED KING DAVID*...*YOU ARE MORE THAN THE WISE & THE RICHEST KING SALOMO*...*YOU ARE MORE THAN THE MOST POWERFUL HERCULES*...*YOU ARE MORE THAN THE MOST FAMOUS SUPERMAN, BATMAN & SPIDERMAN*... AMAZING GRACE... GOD BLESS YOU... WE LOVE YOU
Stop holding the American people hostage to get what you want. You could have done this in the past two years. Why didn't you, to prove how powerful you are, to take the "heat" off of you for all your criminal activities. Shame on our government all of you for putting America families at risk, that is not making America great again. Do your damn job, build your stupid wall, won't make a damn difference. Planes, boats and tunnels, please.
Trump and his base need to dial back the name calling. The House has a Democratic majority and Trump won't get a single bill passed if he can't persuade people to come together on some common sense moderate measures. Calling people "evil" or "dim" isn't likely to work very well. 😁
Bullshit! There is NO crisis at the border! Trump’s a disgrace! He needs to be impeached, then imprisoned!
build the wall
As a Afghan i kill you and destroy your boarders . Go to the Hell loser
Build the wall!😀🇺🇸
Ignorant ass
Oh humpty dumpty built ass nigga
BUILD THE WALL!! MAGA!!
to be hung by the neck until dead for treason
Trump and his base need to dial back the name calling. The House has a Democratic majority and Trump won't get a single bill passed if he can't persuade people to come together on some common sense moderate measures. Calling people "evil" or "dim" isn't likely to work very well. 😁
You're liar and crook trump
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!
Mr. President, the protection of our beloved nation ALSO comes through an honorable, Constitutional DOJ. Your nominee HAS TESTIFIED THAT HE DOES NOT SUPPORT THE 2ND AMENDMENT!   WE CANNOT AFFORD ANOTHER BAD DOJ! Your time in office is too short and precious!   PLEASE PULL THIS NOMINATION AND GIVE US A STRONG CONSTITUTIONAL DOJ WHO WILL ASSIGN ANOTHER SPECIAL COUNSEL TO INVESTIGATE THE TRUE CORRUPTION OF THE CLINTONS, AND OBAMA, THE FBI AND THE DOJ AND STATE DEPT AND HUD!  WE NEED CRIMINAL PROSECUTION OF ALL OF THESE TREASONOUS CRIMINALS!  AND PLEASE DESTROY THE ILLEGAL DATABASE THAT OBAMA HAS ON US ALL!
Our country is divided again.  Not north and south but by political party.  The Democrats are doing everything in their power to lead us toward socialism.  This will take away our freedoms and put us right back to where we were before 1776.  If you think the Democrats are creating these social programs for your benefit your are wrong.  This is bait in the trap.  Once our freedoms are taken away and the Democrats have complete control all those give away programs will end.  Look at other countries with a socialistic government.  I think the thing that bothers me most is the millions of men and women who gave their lives in past wars to protect us from this very thing.  Such disrespect...  When you are standing in a bread line hoping they won't run out before you get yours then you will understand why these men and women gave their lives freely to protect our country.
That is what Socialist Democrats want. Open Borders and Globalization.  The elimination of Sovereign Nations. Free flow of people everywhere. Eventually the People ruled by a One World Order.   Obama’s solution would be Islam Domination. He just loves the Call To Prayer.
Bwwwaahh. THAT would be SO disappointing to Putin it would never happen. Liar! Anyone that still supports this Putin F is a traitor as well. F Trump the Russian stooge! LOCK HIM UP!
"An anguished question from a Trump supporter: "Why do liberals think Trump supporters are stupid?" The serious answer: Here’s what we really think about Trump supporters - the rich, the poor, the malignant and the innocently well-meaning, the ones who think and the ones who don't... That when you saw a man who had owned a fraudulent University, intent on scamming poor people, you thought "Fine." That when you saw a man who had made it his business practice to stiff his creditors, you said, "Okay." That when you heard him proudly brag about his own history of sexual abuse, you said, "No problem." That when he made up stories about seeing muslim-Americans in the thousands cheering the destruction of the World Trade Center, you said, "Not an issue." That when you saw him brag that he could shoot a man on Fifth Avenue and you wouldn't care, you chirped, "He sure knows me." That when you heard him illustrate his own character by telling that cute story about the elderly guest bleeding on the floor at his country club, the story about how he turned his back and how it was all an imposition on him, you said, "That's cool!" That when you saw him mock the disabled, you thought it was the funniest thing you ever saw. That when you heard him brag that he doesn't read books, you said, "Well, who has time?" That when the Central Park Five were compensated as innocent men convicted of a crime they didn't commit, and he angrily said that they should still be in prison, you said, "That makes sense." That when you heard him tell his supporters to beat up protesters and that he would hire attorneys, you thought, "Yes!" That when you heard him tell one rally to confiscate a man's coat before throwing him out into the freezing cold, you said, "What a great guy!" That you have watched the parade of neo-Nazis and white supremacists with whom he curries favor, while refusing to condemn outright Nazis, and you have said, "Thumbs up!" That you hear him unable to talk to foreign dignitaries without insulting their countries and demanding that they praise his electoral win, you said, "That's the way I want my President to be." That you have watched him remove expertise from all layers of government in favor of people who make money off of eliminating protections in the industries they're supposed to be regulating and you have said, "What a genius!" That you have heard him continue to profit from his businesses, in part by leveraging his position as President, to the point of overcharging the Secret Service for space in the properties he owns, and you have said, "That's smart!" That you have heard him say that it was difficult to help Puerto Rico because it was the middle of water and you have said, "That makes sense." That you have seen him start fights with every country from Canada to New Zealand while praising Russia and quote, "falling in love" with the dictator of North Korea, and you have said, "That's statesmanship!" That Trump separated children from their families and put them in cages, managed to lose track of 1500 kids. has opened a tent city incarceration camp in the desert in Texas - he explains that they’re just “animals” - and you say, “well, ok then.” That you have witnessed all the thousand and one other manifestations of corruption and low moral character and outright animalistic rudeness and contempt for you, the working American voter, and you still show up grinning and wearing your MAGA hats and threatening to beat up anybody who says otherwise. What you don't get, Trump supporters in 2019, is that succumbing to frustration and thinking of you as stupid may be wrong and unhelpful, but it's also...hear me...charitable. Because if you're NOT stupid, we must turn to other explanations, and most of them are less flattering." ~ A friend of a friend of a friend, perfectly expressing my thoughts on this.
WHY WE NEED TO SUPPORT THE WALL and BOARDER SECURITY:  OUR FORESTS ARE TELLING US, WE NEED TO LISTEN!  Unfortunately, for our forests we have let the bittersweet vines grow unchecked and now they are choking the trees and killing them - our forests are a tangled mess. Forest management has been ignored for many years.  The resulting forest fires are devastating as they consume our homes and lives.  The vines need sunlight/and room for their roots to grow they are green and lush and the awesome tunnels they create; so they kill the trees also killing their roots; thus they let the sun shine in - their vines flourish and their tentacle roots spread.  The roots are so thick that new trees also perish.    Our society is facing the same fate. Unfortunately FOR ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS we need to manage our population.  To do this we need to have a strong immigration policy, we need to stop pushing our children into high paying careers, and support the working class. Without farmers, mechanics, electricians, plumbers, construction workers, house keeps, childcare workers, store cashiers, and shelf stockers  etc our society will crumble.  We need decent low income housing so that hardworking low income workers will not end up homeless.  WE DO NOT NEED ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS TO FILL THESE JOBS.  Illegal immigration is like the vines - the expense on low income working US citizens is very real.    Eventually we will all be victims.
We need a Trump clone in Europe. Our leaders invite invaders in our countries !
We ceased to be a nation when you got faux elected and started running this country and it’s people into the gutter along with you. Disgusting fool.
to be hung by the neck until dead for treason
We ceased to be a nation when you got faux elected and started running this country and it’s people into the gutter along with you. Disgusting fool.
Rachel Anne. Hey lady bring me a xheesburger
Dan E St Get it yourself you sexist pig..and while your at it, go crawl back up Dogshit44's ass, maybe you can taste what he had for breakfast this morning..LOL
We need a Trump clone in Europe. Our leaders invite invaders in our countries !
Draft Dodger Trump. Your a coward.
👹👹👹 These radical progressives, these Evil Globalists, enemies of America and the American People, but especially NancyStretchPelosi and ChuckYouShummer must be sent home without pay. They are absolute NonEssentials. 👹👺👹 Cut all their privileges! Cut all funds to “sanctuary cities”. Let’s save some dollars for our MUST Wall! Build the Wall, Mr President! Let these leeches bark at the moon! 👹 #BUILDTHEWALL ! We the American People stand with you! 🇺🇸💖🇺🇸💖🇺🇸
ALL YOU NON-TRUMP SUPPORTERS ARE FUCKTARDS!
You are correct my President. You need not have porous borders , America must weed out criminals by ensuring the proper procedures are followed while entering.
Thank you!   Nancy and Chuck needs to stop playing dirty games wit America's safety!    Adult bullies against our great President!   To Chuck and the democrats build the wall and open the government and stop your Evil speeches, America's eyes wide open!
Hello from Ireland. I love Trump!  Just kidding.  You're a tangerine turnip cockwomble spunktrumpet farknugget twatwaffle.
Resign! You’re an idiot and everyone hates you!
Dan E St Get it yourself you sexist pig..and while your at it, go crawl back up Dogshit44's ass, maybe you can taste what he had for breakfast this morning..LOL
when the president is the agent of a foreign enemy, we cease to be a free and democratic nation.  trump = Putin's b*tch
You're doing a great job of killing the country over this stupid wall. Congratulations
To all you libtard Dem morons out there — THE WALL = WINNING.  Got it? 🤪
Nice photoshop, Chump. 😂 You are NOT 6' 3"! 🤣🤣🤣
Hold out MR.PRESIDENT TRUMP WE NEED OUR BORDER SECURE, THESE ASSHOLES HAVE BEEN SLOWLY DETERIORATING  OUR COUNTRY FAR TO LONG
This whole narrative that trump won’t budge so the shutdown is going to drag on for a while is idiotic. McConnell can easily fix this with a veto-proof vote but his dumb ass can’t be found anywhere. Does Putin have you under his control too Mitch? This is totally a trump and republican shutdown and the people who are affected need to know that. The House has been passing Bills to reopen the government but McConnell won’t hold a vote in the senate. So there it is people.
Then BUild to the Fucking Wall.   Democrats think your a pussy... that you won't      jusdoit
Your own lawyer is now admitting your campaign was conspiring with the Russians and you send the armed forces to the border and threaten to have them shoot women and children. The greatest current enemy of democracy and free speech is in the white house and controlled from Moscow!
once the wall goes up you dickheads cant excape FFS , ,get a fucking brain
CHARGE THE DEMO RATS FOR AIDING AND ABETTING ILLEGALS
How many kinds of stupid are you moron?
And yet we’ve been a nation for about 240 years just fine, quit fear mongering you narcissistic asshole.  Illegal immigration has been steadily decreasing for the last 10 years. OPENNTHE GOVERNMENT YOU ASSHOLE!
Mr president  Human trafficking is going on right new in Iowa and Illinois. And the police are apart of it. There churches in America are supporting them through organizations that help relocate women and children. What there doing. The cities that have large churches. that give a lot to missions. Is how the raise money. Then they ship the illegal immigrants to another city. Where the coyotes cartel are waiting for them. I saw it at the church I was going to.  And yesterday I over heard a police officer talking about. A case of a woman stabbing a man. Both here illegally. The officer said that the federal government told him to go to the Catholic Church in town to get there name. I told them that this is called human trafficking. They looked at me like I was crazy
You’re getting your ass whooped by a woman!!! Stop lying and get people back to work you fucking clown.
A real leader... unlike the anti British parasites we have now in the U.K.... wish we had him..
#masege to p.tramp A message of distress from the people of Basra province to the President of the United States of America. Trump respectable.  We are the people of Basra province. We ask you to rescue our province of Basra from the Militias  Gangs who have been stealing the oil of Basrah since 2003 and to this day, they are sending it to Iran and to the terrorist organizations that fund them with weapons. We have been carrying out large demonstrations against these gangs, but they respond to us with repression, torture, murder and assassination. We lack the simplest means of living, such as water and electricity. We demand reforms and appointments for the unemployed youth, many of them graduates and holders of higher diplomas, but the armed groups monopolize appointments for themselves and their parties and gangs. They are killing all those who speak a word and stand against them and they take the presidential palaces in the province of Basra, a place known to the Iraqis, and in the recent demonstrations have fired live bullets at the demonstrators and killed many innocent young people who claim their right, and the assassination of civilian activists In front of their homes and in the streets and markets, We are asking your presence to intervene quickly to rescue us from these dirty armed gangs. We know that the US military has entered Iraq and we welcome this very welcome because we believe that the US military has the ability to rescue Basra, Iraq and Iraqis from these gangs. We hope you will receive this message and respond. Because you are the only hope now for all Iraqis. Thank you Mr. Trump. Youth of Basrah Governorate...........
So you lied about Mexico paying for the wall.  You are a fraud.
Comrade stooge motherfucka individual 1 so I guess our nation will cease to exist because of your dumbass not declaring a national emergency, you have absolute power to do so, I guess the way you run the country is by shutting it down, by the way Robert Mueller and Michael Cohen says hi #ImpeachThatMotherfucka #GoBackToRussiaTraitor #HateHasNoHomeHere
What about all these white people doing these mass murders? In case you’re not paying attention Mr. Trump these mass murders are not coming for Mexico  and 911 wasn’t from Mexico.... lol Now you’re throwing a tantrum because the American people won’t pay for a wall that you promised Mexico would pay for even though they will just build tunnels or use ladders or sneak across the border now American people are not getting their paychecks but who cares because you’re taken care of.... I guess that’s what we can expect from a president who makes fun of handicapped people and is a womanizer and thinks our war veterans are not hero’s
once the wall goes up you dickheads cant excape FFS , ,get a fucking brain
Why can't people see how true this statement is???  We have the best country in the world and people want to come here! But, to keep it great we need to know whose coming here, their background, if they are criminals, killers etc.!!! Other countries have really strict rules who get to come and live in their countries!! We must do the same or we will be overrun and lose what has made our country great!!!
The left hates that you work so hard to keep your promises. They haven’t had a President do that and stick to it.
death to America 😆😁
Hope he  does  some  thing  about  the  4.2  billion dollars the  illegals are  stealing  from  the  IRS  per accounting  by  claiming  to  have  made  more  than  they  have  and  then  claim  there are  10  kids  inthe  hose  ,so  they  get  back more  than  they  paid  in  taxes.
You’re a fucking joke 🙄
How about keeping our federal employees employed? It would be different if the Democrats said they would not negotiate border security. That is not the case. Democrats are more than willing to negotiate but keeping Americans hostage is more important to the righties and Mitch is weak by not allowing votes in the Senate. The votes are there to open the government. This is so stupid. Trump shutdown is all on Mitch.
NO, it is not, Mr. man-child Trump!  Your highest and most important "duty" is deflecting attention to the growing evidence against your corrupt & colluding ways, and your abominable attempts at dividing our nation.  You, sir, are nothing more than a pathological lying deluded man-child.
I ask the President of the United States of America to intervene immediately in Iraq and kill the clergy and kill the Communist Party and the coup to the military or royal and liberate the people from their control and open a bar and night club everywhere and I hope to have a relationship with Israel and open them an embassy in Baghdad
What about all these white people doing these mass murders? In case you’re not paying attention Mr. Trump these mass murders are not coming for Mexico  and 911 wasn’t from Mexico.... lol Now you’re throwing a tantrum because the American people won’t pay for a wall that you promised Mexico would pay for even though they will just build tunnels or use ladders or sneak across the border now American people are not getting their paychecks but who cares because you’re taken care of.... I guess that’s what we can expect from a president who makes fun of handicapped people and is a womanizer and thinks our war veterans are not hero’s
Comrade Trump liar, corrupt, grifter, incompetent, stupid, con artist, cheater, bigot and Putin's puppet.
We need to lock up the Marxists! So you can try to destroy a nation and be a terrorist organization as long as it's under the guise of a political party?
And if your lawyers don’t defend you you’ll be executed for treason.
While Mr. Fibbs says that the furlough could be called a "strike"... this is the same person that has cheated workers/contractors out of their money all of his life.... and you expect him to care how you pay your bills and feed your family or how you get services from the government...WAKE UP!... the alarm has been sounding for two years and there are those act as though it has not been heard.... THIS RUSSIAN LACKY thinks being called a MF is a disgrace.... no, being a draft dodging, Trump U scammer, tax cheating, charity cheating, illegal immigrant hiring, P@#$y grabbing, name calling of AMERICAN football players SOB's, wife cheater(x3-that we know of),prostitute paying, daily liar, family separating, children caging and a disgrace and embarrassment to Americans is far worse than a MF... that would might even be too good for him. His PUBLIC conduct would get our children expelled from school for ever... If our great county of America has to suffer over ego and stupidity, no one in Congress or the Executive branch should get a paycheck-seems a lot of them are or could end up on jail anyway(they will be provided for-now that is funny in a sad way).........MF definition.. a despicable or very unpleasant person or thing., a person or thing of a specified kind... REPUBLICANS, Democrats and Independents AND THERE ARE MANY GOOD REPUBLICANS(MANY unfortunately MISLEAD)...STAND UP AND BE COUNTED...rant over -nough said for the "moment".FLOOD YOUR CONGRESSMAN'S OFFICE WITH CALLS=load up their email.... SPEAK OUT! Americans should not have to pay for his stupidity let alone his dumb ass wall....he is a sniveling twitt..just think about who is representing you...
Glynda Lomax  THURSDAY, JANUARY 17, 2019  Overrun  I was praying for America yesterday morning and praying for the Senators and Congressman; praying that the Lord would shake everyone concerned awake and make them realize this government shut down has to end.  I was praying out loud and asking for an end times podcast for God’s People to prepare them for…and I was about to say ‘these end times’ when I heard “War.” And “Overrun!” And I saw a flash vision of people running in America’s streets and our coastlines being overrun with enemy troops. And no one was able to run far before they were killed. Our people are no match for these soldiers, that was clear to see. They were large soldiers. Whoever they were, they were wearing brownish green uniforms and they were big men. It was obvious to me we were well outnumbered, whoever they were. Lord! What is this You are showing me??  My Child, there is much My Sheep must go through before the end of these times in your world. America is on the brink of war, though she does not know this outright. (It is not generally known to the public)  Because her back is turned to Me, I will not protect her as her enemies overrun her and many, many lives will be lost. Many, many families will be unprotected as they do not know Me.  I heard “Collapse.”  The eyes of America are on its government and while it is distracted, the enemies of America are preparing. As a predator strikes the weakest of the herd, so will they also strike America while she is in a weakened state and bring down her government. They will go for the head and as America has uncovered herself for all to see her flaunt her indecencies and her abominations, she has no protection and her enemies will succeed. I am already calling them forth.  Prepare, for war is coming to your streets in America, My People. This is only the beginning. Much is coming for My People in other nations as well. Nations that think they do not need Me will soon see their need for Me. Nations who have turned from Me, who have rejected My Ways and My Holy Word will soon see which of us is God, for I will show them My Mighty Power.  Pray for the protection of all you hold dear. Pray for the lost among you. Pray I will hide you in the shadow of My Mighty Wings.
Democrats did refuse to work with our President on the border wall before the shut down.... REMEMBER. Now the talking heads and certain congressmen are encouraging to reopen the government and be given three weeks for Republicans and Democrats to work on a solution? Notice how they all say border security and avoid the word wall, barrier ..... there is a reason why they skillfully use language to deceive and/or give false hope.  N. Pelosi  and C. Schumer will negotiate with giving 1.6B for border security but the wall is not included( or I forgot she did say 1 dollar to the wall) and there you have it folks. The Democrat Party for two years have made it clear in their talk and walk that they are the party of hate and resist President Donald J. Trump and those that voted for him. What honest person with common sense believes the controlled house of Democrats will abandon their hate and resistance for the next two years? There talk is cheap and their walk shows Americans they can not be trusted. Majority of "We The People" demand a strong, big border wall. Schumer and Pelosi don't give a flip about American lives..... all they care about is political power over national security and over the life of Americans. Sorry Senator L. Graham but you are wrong on this one...… Democrats ought to be able to work this out with the Republicans before the government reopens if you truly care for Americans as they claim they are so concerned. Stay strong Mr. President for majority of "We The People" are standing strong for the protection of our children and grandchildren.
Amen to that President Trump!! Love you!! Best President since Ronald Reagan!! Keep up the good work, & don't let the lunatic left get you down!! You love America!! They don't!! Letting in illegals & holding not letting you build the wall proves that illegals come first, & America comes last!! GOD BLESS YOU!!! 👍👍👍👍👍👍💚💛
Only stupid persons open border for illegal immigrants 😈😈, they kill American directly & indirectly method (job, tax to pay for illegal immigrants) . Illegal immigrants utilize so much American honey & make American become the most stupid people 😱😱
We need to re-brand Mr. Fibb's slogan of "Make America Great Again" into "Hugs from Thugs"... Admittedly,he will sell out the will of the majority of country for $5.7B....take hostage a whole level of or workforce and not even mention them, create crisis and then take credit for fixing the crisis, and he will sell us out abroad... All it takes is an admiration letter or say you admire him. Aren't you glad you don't live in a dictator country where they can make you disappear, execute you, or starve you to death, deny you your legal rights??? America help feed those that are unpaid, unable to go to work population and thrive.. don't let the hostages suffer..give all you can, if you can..
I ask the President of the United States of America to intervene immediately in Iraq and kill the clergy and kill the Communist Party and the coup to the military or royal and liberate the people from their control and open a bar and night club everywhere and I hope to have a relationship with Israel and open them an embassy in Baghdad
Fool we all want protected borders but a wall won't do it. Keep talking to your base that is getting smaller and smaller. Like your hands?
Amen!
You paid to have polls rigged.  You dirty crook.
You are conjuring a crisis where there is none.  We do not need a fucking wall, you moron.  How about using that money to make sure poor seniors are cared for, homeless veterans are cared for, our vulnerable children cared for.  If you wsnt tge wall that bad then maybe ypu shouldn't have given the billionaire's club such huge tax breaks.
CSCo true and a country can only be destroy from within and it is exactly what Pelosi is trying to do. Mr. President hold you state of the union at the senate forget the house
You’re a jackass
Exactly ! You are doing your job! Feckless Dems in Congress need to do their job!
"immoral Nancy"  seeks to destroy America by flooding the nation with illegal invaders--she and Paul  want low wages-cheap labor for her vineyard.  Nancy is a traitor. The solution--VOTE RED
Shut the border down now.  Mexico is reporting several caravans heading towards our border.  Declare a National Emergency for repairs/replacing the fence that congress should be allocating financing to per the Secure Fence Act 2006.
I’m gonna tell you fascists You may be surprised The people in this world Are getting organized You’re bound to lose You fascists bound to lose  Woody Guthrie
We need to re-brand Mr. Fibb's slogan of "Make America Great Again" into "Hugs from Thugs"... Admittedly,he will sell out the will of the majority of country for $5.7B....take hostage a whole level of or workforce and not even mention them, create crisis and then take credit for fixing the crisis, and he will sell us out abroad... All it takes is an admiration letter or say you admire him. Aren't you glad you don't live in a dictator country where they can make you disappear, execute you, or starve you to death, deny you your legal rights??? America help feed those that are unpaid, unable to go to work population and thrive.. don't let the hostages suffer..give all you can, if you can..
I’m gonna tell you fascists You may be surprised The people in this world Are getting organized You’re bound to lose You fascists bound to lose  Woody Guthrie
Is that why you collude with Russia? Is that why you've lifted sanctions to make sure your masters get paid? Is that why you speak to your boss Vlad in private? You're a traitor and one day soon Americans will know all the details, that's if Bill Barr doesn't hide them for you.
Shut the border down now.  Mexico is reporting several caravans heading towards our border.  Declare a National Emergency for repairs/replacing the fence that congress should be allocating financing to per the Secure Fence Act 2006.
That's the stupidest thing ever come out his mouth he is a liar
fk this puto. viva la raza. tell em the real plans behind this this happen in 2006 and 2013 we wasted 45 billion dollars. and the president hired a big company from Riverside, CA most of them if not all where ILLLEGAL iMMAGRANTS? does nto make no sense then you tell the people we need to get rid of them?
But you yourself dodged fighting and defending your country. Your a piece of 💩.  Always will Be you asshat
Let’s defend our country from this clown.   Traitor
Then resign you fucking halfwit
ASSHOLE, PROMOTER IN CHIEF,,,trump is an illiterate con man... change your dirty depends,... you stink.
F*** Trump and everybody who looks like his bitchass. ✊🇲🇽👑
What an asshole !
Is that why you collude with Russia? Is that why you've lifted sanctions to make sure your masters get paid? Is that why you speak to your boss Vlad in private? You're a traitor and one day soon Americans will know all the details, that's if Bill Barr doesn't hide them for you.
If you hyper-militarize one land border while ignoring the MAJORITY of the ways undocumented immigrants and drugs get into this country, and you destroy democracy, people's health and well-being, and the environment, then we cease to be a nation.  Asshat.
The fact that you don’t pay Giuliani is no excuse for letting him lie in your name every time the senile old bastid opens his big fat facial anus. We know you couldn’t give a crap what he says, but to take advantage of a senile old misogynist like that is really cruel!  Tonight, Rudely admitted that “the collusion in your campaign happened a long time ago.” REALLY?? Like about 3 years ago?? LMAO!  Then, senile Uncle Rudely with the big mouth said, referring to Robert Mueller, “Put up or shut up!” Bwaaaahahahaha! Oh he will Rudely! Oh he will!  You’re going down hard Fatboy Fuhrer. So are your little Nazi mutants, and 1/2 your gestapo KKKabinett! What a shitshow this is gonna be. The whole world is watching you fucKKK it all up! Happy now?
True. And cultures cease to exist. Thats is just what the NWO demons want.
Another hoax , what Trump has done just for his 2020 election , he needs your vote to prevailed Democracy competitors , that's the reason why he even shut down government and still committed to build that fucking wall.
History is ginna look down on this President. And the kind of people that encourage Trump will be the forgotten Rebels of this failed Confederacy on our modern America. You wanna act like a bunch of dickheads at the expense of our civilization, then move to a country that would openly accept such disingenuous behavior, like Iraq, or Panama, or any other failed dictatorship.
Shut your Putin's cock holster
NATO HAS DEFENDED OUR BOARDERS FOR SEVENTY YEARS MOTHERFUCKER TRUMP!
Why don't you go to the RUSSIANS to get more money asshole god you suck
What an asshole !
Why don't you go to the RUSSIANS to get more money asshole god you suck
Jenn Eccher maybe some mydol would help you cupcake. Obviously the woman is a non essential employee and should look for a job where she is actually essential instead of working in a job she isnt needed.
Kevin Lake Maybe some viagra would cure what ails your pathetic azz.
The fact that you have a shut down over a crazy stupid wall that will do nothing to stop illegal immigrants means you are extremely unqualified to be president and you being president is a crime against humanity.
He's The President of the United States of AMERICA voted in by the AMERICAN VOTERS wake up and he's kicking Asses!
Letting in illegals. Hammering the taxpayer with billions in Medicaid costs, court cost, prison costs, border policing is the Democrats Schumer and Pelosi (won't give $1 for the Wall) "solution" they been using for 40 years. The WALL is the solution. Once build it's a low cost low maintenance very efficient use of taxpayer money (but wait hold on that's the Democrats and Schumer/Pelosi main objection they can't get their hands on endless amounts of taxpayer money their non solutions have generated for decades) The Schumer's NYC there are 3 million illegals 35% of the 8.5 million population of NYC. If immigration Plan Schumer translates to the US it would mean 112 million illegals in US. White Europeans are now the minority in NYC and NY state had the largest number of it's citizens of all nationalities emigrating from it of any State in the Union meaning it has the poorest standard of living in the country. Schumer has risen to the top of the Democrat party not because of talent but because NY is a one party state since the 1920s and Calvin Coolidge. . The Democrats could run a dead rat for Senate and it would be elected in NY State-which would actually be an improvement since it would do less damage then Schumer. Things would actually improve without Crying Lying Chuck monkey wrenching the economy of the state-tax,tax,tax and let's add a Green something or other tax and more illegals to support
I don't understand why the Democrats are more concerned about illegals than the people who pay their salaries!!!
The president should hold the state of the union message and have a tv monitor directly behind him on his left or his right and during his union message ask why the democrats called it a crisis then when he used their word crisis they say there is no crisis. He should play past tapes of shumer and pelosi and Clinton and Obama all saying we need a wall to stop illegals and that way the entire nation can see what he is up against ! He can use it to his advantage - use the media towards his advantage ! And make sure the networks do not give democrats after the union message air time !   Roll those past tapes! Remind the American people what liars they are!!!
Trump’s Middle East Plan leaked in Jerusalem Post is an evil response from Satan to my open letter to Israel   In regard to the Third Temple and Christianity (see below) Satan wants to confuse the world and Unite  the nations based on Noah and not based on Christ. This is an anti-christ plan coming from the swamps of several countries. Please, read again my open letter to Israel. They didn’t want my open letter and wanted to create problems with the President Plan. The Lord is not in agreement of the division of Israel and Jerusalem (Exodus 23:31) USA could be punished by God with natural disasters because of this division. In fact, it has been chastened with Natural Disasrers  since the plan has been crafted. Please, leave this matter as it is now. Just focus on rebuilding the Third Temple and don’t do animal sacrifices inside  or outside it. The Messiah will take care of Jacob (Israel) and Esau (Palestine)  when He returns. God created the conflict with these twins and He is the only ONE With power and wisdom to solve it (Genesis 25:19-24)  Remember that our battle is not with flesh and blood but with Satan himself (Ephesians 6:10) “Because if Satan transforms  himself into an angel of light, therefore, his ministres also transform themselves into ministers of righteousness whose end will be according to their work” 2 Corinthians 1:14-15
WHY ARE THE DEMOCRATS NOT WORRIED ABOUT THE SAFETY OF THE AMERICAN PEOPLE AT THE BORDER, YET THEY ARE WORRIED ABOUT THEIR SAFETY AT THE STATE OF THE UNION SPEECH, BEHIND THE WALLS OF THE CAPITOL?
You need to tell that to fucker trudeau
We have such a good border and defense. I think Don the Con wants the wall not because of security but because he wants a Trumpski wall. Donnie the Carnie right now is letting ISIS and all Terrorists in through our airports and oceans because of the Shutdown. Starve our Federal Employees for PutieTang.
What happened to Mexico paying for the wall - You Trump are nothing more then a CRIMINAL LIAR & TRAITOR
Kevin Lake Maybe some viagra would cure what ails your pathetic azz.
What happened to Mexico paying for the wall - You Trump are nothing more then a CRIMINAL LIAR & TRAITOR
2 US soldiers have died at the hands of ISIL as well as 2 US citizens in Syria. You bragged that ISIL had been wiped out. Your VP bragged about ISIL being wipe out and the caliphate being crushed hours after their deaths. Their blood is on your hands, you have put the live of US service member in danger as well as in dangeringvthis country.
The thing about radical organizations is, even once you've crushed their holdings, supply chain, and leadership, true believers are still going to attack. It's not like fighting a more mercenary or defensive force, where the soldiers will call it quits when the battle is lost and the money runs out. ISIS will keep attacking people until the last idiot who buys into their dogma is dead. Destroying their infrastructure and holdings just removes their ability to recruit and arm said idiots.
We have such a good border and defense. I think Don the Con wants the wall not because of security but because he wants a Trumpski wall. Donnie the Carnie right now is letting ISIS and all Terrorists in through our airports and oceans because of the Shutdown. Starve our Federal Employees for PutieTang.
If we dont stop doctirs doing genocide on organs and also frauding our nations tax insurance murder morphine we dont need a wall we need bridges yo ger away from Congress bullshit laws which herd us to genocide plants   Drink only water if you trust your water. No straws and .wake sure you dont let humans poop chenicals that eat your flesh. Brain especially. All products with brain flesh eating can get you shot by a rescuer because you are uncontrollable hallucinating abd in a danger to public   Anheuser Busch liars thieves abd murdering organs  and Pepsi co been told to stop wounding stomach pancreas.
Our country's president, Mr Trump, needs to share that directly to Americans by giving his State of the Union address from the White House, NOT in front of disrespectful politicians at the capitol. You know that Pelosi will pack the place with federal workers who are furloughed or working without pay.  Congress is suppose to work for the people. State your case directly to the people and let them call and harass their congressmen until they give in to funding border security. Maybe the SOTU address could be delivered from the East Room with an audience of families who have lost loved ones due to illegals and drug overdose, along with any politician that supports your border strategy.
why are you Russia's little bitch then
Anyone know why Trump won't go to jail once Mueller's report comes out?  They're afraid his shading will blend with the orange suit and he'll slip out in the dirty laundry...  Score to date : Russia 6, US 0...
I'm tired of one party trying to dictate their agenda to the rest of us. I'm talking about you, Democrats. Contrary to what you might think, you don't run this country alone. And you never will. No matter how many illegal votes you try to import over the border. It won't be the first time America said no to tyranny. You might not care for the President's policies. But there are those of us who don't care for yours either. If you're not compromising...guess what...you're dictating. Now get your sorry asses to the negotiating table and work out a deal with your fellow Americans to end the shutdown before the situation escalates any further. Trump may have let you off the hook by taking ownership of it. But many of us haven't. You say elections have consequences. Well this is yours for losing in 2016 to a candidate who ran on building a border wall. The people want secure borders and immigration reform. This begins by physically halting illegal activity at the border and curtailing exploiters. But you already know that. And are doing everything humanly possible to prevent it. You can't seem to get over the wall I like to call the plain, honest truth.
I have a MUCH easier solution.....get rid of all the illegals AND the liberals and we don’t need a wall!
o Truer Words:  “He has so singular a combination of defects for the office of a constitutional magistrate, that he could have obtained the opportunity to misrule the nation only by a visitation of Providence. Insincere as well as stubborn, cunning as well as unreasonable, vain as well as ill-tempered, greedy of popularity as well as arbitrary in disposition, veering in his mind as well as fixed in his will, he unites in his character the seemingly opposite qualities of demagogue and autocrat.” he continued, was “egotistic to the point of mental disease” and had become “the prey of intriguers and sycophants."
We need some heightened defense from within our borders from the deranged pedocrats and their frothy-mouthed acolytes.
The thing about radical organizations is, even once you've crushed their holdings, supply chain, and leadership, true believers are still going to attack. It's not like fighting a more mercenary or defensive force, where the soldiers will call it quits when the battle is lost and the money runs out. ISIS will keep attacking people until the last idiot who buys into their dogma is dead. Destroying their infrastructure and holdings just removes their ability to recruit and arm said idiots.
We need some heightened defense from within our borders from the deranged pedocrats and their frothy-mouthed acolytes.
Larry read the part where those seeking asylum are legally allowed to enter the US. That’s how America works.
o Truer Words:  “He has so singular a combination of defects for the office of a constitutional magistrate, that he could have obtained the opportunity to misrule the nation only by a visitation of Providence. Insincere as well as stubborn, cunning as well as unreasonable, vain as well as ill-tempered, greedy of popularity as well as arbitrary in disposition, veering in his mind as well as fixed in his will, he unites in his character the seemingly opposite qualities of demagogue and autocrat.” he continued, was “egotistic to the point of mental disease” and had become “the prey of intriguers and sycophants."
Larry read the part where those seeking asylum are legally allowed to enter the US. That’s how America works.
You know what's way more important than the borders or a wall for mexico? To stop the military support for the king in saudi-arabia!!! Stop that madness, stop preventing the arabians from destroying the monarchy. You don't need that damn alliance with the king any longer, no reason to kill innocents and rebels who only try to free their nation from a mad king. If that monarchy is gone, then a lot of violence and danger will be gone soon too. Use your time and the position you got to make things right man.
Can’t wait till your found guilty of Treason. Then all this goes back to the way it was as your regime is quickly dismantled. #WallsAreForWussies
"There is no migrant crisis.  "There is, however, a refugee crisis. That crisis is the effect of at least a half-century (and, arguably, twice that) of calamitous US political intervention in Central America, and not — as President Trump would have us believe — the inevitable byproduct of 'bad hombres' who may as well be 'animals.'  "US-funded military coups, resource exploitation, and American policies of economic neoliberalism in El Salvador have destabilized the entire region, and effectively created a climate where paramilitary-aligned drug cartels can thrive."
It would sound a lot better, if you were not a spoiled crook,  liar, cheater,  corrupt , vindictive thief.
Omg - just open the gov’t already you idiot
People that hate him because he wants to protect American also hate American. I realize you are not used to a President looking out for the United States of America  since your last President sold us out to the new world order. We are not the worlds parents let them govern themselves.
Russia, if you're listening, please nuke us! We are idiots.
Tell that to all the countries you fuckwits bomb or invade in the middle east and north Africa while still fuelling the fire by giving israel huge sums of money....you helped create all this shitstorm.... but now that's fucked up you run away....I guess now it's Mexico's turn for the blame game, it'snever ever your fault though is it?.....you intolerant little  manchild!
That's their game plan. Why we must never let the foriegniers into our nation.  They do not assimilate, learn our language.  ( Build the wall cheap) Study China's wall. Lesson learned in America about foriegniers, never again. Godless of the devil. Terrorist.   Lord returns 2024,  judgement day. Will America confess the mistake of letting in foriegniers?    What to do now? Build the wall!  Hispanics call themselves, La Raza! The Race!  Huge movement, can be stopped.  Get the  Dems to stop stupidity..  Mexico just elected a socialist. Whatch Mexico go down the tubes. Like Cuba and Venezula.  Then people will flee Mexico just to look for food, like in Venezula.  Mexicans hungry will steal and more. Mexicans will steal from Mexicans, whites , everyone.  Venezuela is seeking Russia help now and looks to go Godless communist. Not very healthy!  I have been to Venezula. People wanted piece of the pie, so voted socialism, never works, has no stock exchange, none , why failed!  Please pray for the wall now! Pray for our president Trump.
You know what's way more important than the borders or a wall for mexico? To stop the military support for the king in saudi-arabia!!! Stop that madness, stop preventing the arabians from destroying the monarchy. You don't need that damn alliance with the king any longer, no reason to kill innocents and rebels who only try to free their nation from a mad king. If that monarchy is gone, then a lot of violence and danger will be gone soon too. Use your time and the position you got to make things right man.
That's their game plan. Why we must never let the foriegniers into our nation.  They do not assimilate, learn our language.  ( Build the wall cheap) Study China's wall. Lesson learned in America about foriegniers, never again. Godless of the devil. Terrorist.   Lord returns 2024,  judgement day. Will America confess the mistake of letting in foriegniers?    What to do now? Build the wall!  Hispanics call themselves, La Raza! The Race!  Huge movement, can be stopped.  Get the  Dems to stop stupidity..  Mexico just elected a socialist. Whatch Mexico go down the tubes. Like Cuba and Venezula.  Then people will flee Mexico just to look for food, like in Venezula.  Mexicans hungry will steal and more. Mexicans will steal from Mexicans, whites , everyone.  Venezuela is seeking Russia help now and looks to go Godless communist. Not very healthy!  I have been to Venezula. People wanted piece of the pie, so voted socialism, never works, has no stock exchange, none , why failed!  Please pray for the wall now! Pray for our president Trump.
https://www.theatlantic.com/magazine/archive/2019/03/impeachment-trump/580468/?fbclid=IwAR24SiDTauSA6G-_ci89bB8ZMNEdhX8MaaiCQ6tCQlk7bBme5SpFVIlASks
https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/chris-christie-donald-trump-book_us_5c40336fe4b0a8dbe16dab4d?section=politics&ncid=fcbklnkushpmg00000063&utm_campaign=hp_fb_pages&utm_medium=facebook&utm_source=main_fb&fbclid=IwAR3Ka58bP1rnH8jb-O4ElnZZsWhQn4Wvr7yGXNF6HmoAVn6cd2vPOgVTto4
Tell that to all the countries you fuckwits bomb or invade in the middle east and north Africa while still fuelling the fire by giving israel huge sums of money....you helped create all this shitstorm.... but now that's fucked up you run away....I guess now it's Mexico's turn for the blame game, it'snever ever your fault though is it?.....you intolerant little  manchild!
Trump ur a fucking  morron
This Motherfucker! You like. Being lied to and grabbing pussy
Being a agent of Russia is whats important to you WE SEE YOU IDIOT
If it’s “defense of our nation” and not deterrence from our nation, just authorize lethal force. A lot cheaper than a barrier. If someone enters illegally, neutralize them. Soon word will get around and the invaders will find somewhere else to play.
President Trump.. please close our borders and order all illegals to be deported to open up jobs for our military men and women whom you are bringing home. #AmericaFirst!
Tell the people that are about to lose there homes and cars just because you wont the wall you are nothing but trash and a lier and crock you neet to get out of the white house theres no room in there for a lier and draft dodger like you are you are a fraud
https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/chris-christie-donald-trump-book_us_5c40336fe4b0a8dbe16dab4d?section=politics&ncid=fcbklnkushpmg00000063&utm_campaign=hp_fb_pages&utm_medium=facebook&utm_source=main_fb&fbclid=IwAR3Ka58bP1rnH8jb-O4ElnZZsWhQn4Wvr7yGXNF6HmoAVn6cd2vPOgVTto4
Yes, because if the last 200 years of US history has taught us anything (and I know it has not taught most of you Trump supporters anything), it's that the US needs borders to survive.. How stupid are you Americans? You have spent the last 200 years expanding your influence all over the globe, invading border after border.. and now you have the audacity to ask for a wall to keep the very people you have invaded and schemed against, out? What a bunch of hypocritical morons.. millions of Americans are on the verge of homelessness and destitute, yet all you care about is the "dangerous" immigrants..
People cussing him and calling him the worst names they can think of and relying on him to protect them by giving him nothing to protect them with. Hate blinds their logic. All this because he beat their candidate!! 🙄 WOW...
Wrong, Comrade Bullshit! No one believes your lyin' cheatin' mouth. Go directly to jail.
Democrats are like sperm cells only 1 in 10 million has a chance to become a human being
The soil of Afghanistan is hell for the invaders
What a moron
DEMOCRATS - When you can’t raise money through individual donations - you STEAL IT FROM THE AMERICAN TAXPAYER.  PLANNED PARENTHOOD - $1.5 BILLION we give them over a 3 year period. PP disclosed $30 MILLION - closer to $65 MILLION in taxpayer subsidies to influence the outcome of the 2018 ELECTION. So we give money to these crooks and they support the Democrat Party.
MUSSOLINI # 2 HOW CAN ANY RATIONAL , SANE PERSON BACK SUCH A LYING , CORRUPT , DUMB , TREASONOUS , COWARD , FASCIST , SCUMBAG , INSANE, SYCOPHANT , BUFFOON ? ? ?STUPID IS , AS STUPID DOES ! ! ?TIME TO TAKE THE KEYS AWAY FROM THIS DANGEROUS TRAITOR ! CORPORATE LACKEY ! TRUMP COULD BE THE MOST HATED MAN ON EARTH ? ! ?
I think the Shutdown and the border wall are a *hypocritical* and *vicious distraction* from Trump!!!  Remember, Trump opens all borders for Putin (Syria, NATO, Afghanistan ...)   The border with Mexico is distraction !!!  I don't know from what?   But the Wall Money could help Trump with whom or whatever? !!!   Trump is a Madman
Tell the people that are about to lose there homes and cars just because you wont the wall you are nothing but trash and a lier and crock you neet to get out of the white house theres no room in there for a lier and draft dodger like you are you are a fraud
I think the Shutdown and the border wall are a *hypocritical* and *vicious distraction* from Trump!!!  Remember, Trump opens all borders for Putin (Syria, NATO, Afghanistan ...)   The border with Mexico is distraction !!!  I don't know from what?   But the Wall Money could help Trump with whom or whatever? !!!   Trump is a Madman
Lying scumbag, whipping your dullard followers into a froth-mouthed frenzy over a mere administrative issue. You're a damned disgrace.
Maolmhuireadh MacMaghnuis congress liars thieves murdering with manufacturers who fill their pockets but no protection for citizens including trump  Fire congress give money to unprotected rescuers  Under severe xhenical bullet attacks. Congress Warren will not simply put. No seeds to a plant to a product which ingested causes loss of soft tissues including wounds in brain.  Murdering sift tissilyes of a body should not be allowed. on detoxification of chemicals murdering millions because fraid ads
Lily Anderson Jake Dinoman Um, okay.
MUSSOLINI # 2 HOW CAN ANY RATIONAL , SANE PERSON BACK SUCH A LYING , CORRUPT , DUMB , TREASONOUS , COWARD , FASCIST , SCUMBAG , INSANE, SYCOPHANT , BUFFOON ? ? ?STUPID IS , AS STUPID DOES ! ! ?TIME TO TAKE THE KEYS AWAY FROM THIS DANGEROUS TRAITOR ! CORPORATE LACKEY ! TRUMP COULD BE THE MOST HATED MAN ON EARTH ? ! ?
Fake president conspires with Russia to steal the election.
If the Russians controlled the President of the United States— what are things they would want him to do:  - shut down the U.S. Government   - ease sanctions, particularly key Putin associates   - undermine and propose pulling out of NATO  - disrupt U.S. allied relationships  - start disruptive trade wars   - discredit U.S. intelligence, law enforcement, and judicial systems   - fill the Government leadership with people who have no relevant experience, give them a mandate of dismantle and neglect, and throw in a healthy dash of graft and corruption  - pull out of Syria  - pull out of Afghanistan   - turn our back on the Ukraine   - turn our back on the Kurds   - support extreme white supremacy groups   - support Brexit and disrupt the EU  - undermine the free press  - undermine the U.S. electoral process  - destroy all records and keep secret the content of discussions from 5 in person meetings with trump since being elected   What else??
Democrats are against the wall for one reason....... they put their hate for President Trump and their two year long temper tantrum above everything else. They will sacrifice the country and American lives to push their agenda of hate and obstruction.   Democrats are so desperate. They will do anything to hide facts that don’t fit their agenda.   Funny how the Democrats don’t want the non citizens counted on the census.   Teachers in California on strike because of low pay, lack of supplies and overcrowded classrooms. How many of the students in those over crowded classrooms are illegal immigrants? State of California can’t pay teachers a fair wage but they are a Sanctuary State and want free healthcare for all illegal immigrants.   Remember a few years ago when the Democrats wanted a “fence / wall” and voted to fund it. Funny how they are against it now because President Trump wants the wall.   Remember a few years ago when Obama declared there was a “Humanitarian Crisis” on the southern  border. Funny how Democrats now says the “Humanitarian Crisis” on the southern border is a fake / made up Crisis.   How are those Democrat policies working out?   It really takes a special kind of stupid to still support the Democrats.
donald The HIGHEST and MOST IMPORTANT DUTY you have in keeping our country safe is STOP THE DOMESTIC TERRORISM/VIOLENCE IN OUR OWN COUNTRY.  NO WALL needed for that and NO WALL needed to fix IMMIGRATION LAWS where those who are only here on temporary visas ARE STILL HERE!  For those of you who probably are NOT familiar with what that means is that the 9/11 terrorists gained LEGAL entry here through the immigration system.  FOUR of the terrorists were here on business visas and FOURTEEN of the terrorists were here on 6 month tourist visas!  They had ALL expired.  As far as the wall goes if our children and citizens of domestic terrorism here are protected by thoughts and prayers that is good enough for the southern border!  Most of you have NEVER even been to the southern border.  I lived on the southern border many years being part of a military family and I guarantee you a wall is useless.
Then why are 4 Americans dead in Syria. Could it be the weakness you showed Putin by promising to remove troops for him made us seem weak to ISIS. And also the fact you announced to the world that ISIS was defeated they had to prove they were not. Or when you empower hate group causing a 17%^ increase in hate crimes as well as an increase in school shooting. Or maybe not paying border patrol TSA inspectors and coast guard makes us safer. https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/how-trump-just-made-america-less-safe_us_5888fe22e4b0628ad613ddb2
Oh go suck UR own dick trump. U rich fucker can pay for that wall. U scared to pay for that wall ? Hum ! Yes !
IMPEACH!
MAGGOT! Abe Gone Soon!!!!!
Lily Anderson Jake Dinoman Um, okay.
You promised 200 times that Mexico is paying for the wall. Plus, why didn't you vote for it for the two years where you controlled the Senate and the house? Must not have been TOO important ya MORON!
Oh I thought your campaign for 2020 was your most important duty. Your legacy will be that you made the lives of so very many Americans MISERABLE. You HATED on Americans. You DISCRIMINATED on Americans. You LIED to Americans. You COLLUDED with Russia. But, your ultimate legacy will be far different. You will always be known as the President that DIVIDED AMERICA. Imagine all the good you could have done. You were given the ultimate American opportunity and you squandered it on selfish goals. You could have been great but you just lacked the most critical skill. You lacked the ability to understand the whole of America. Your predecessors understood the importance of being a president for ALL but you missed that. You never stopped being that New York Realtor. What a waste. What a tragic waste.
Trumps fat
Why are people so STUPID?!?  Republicans complain that Democrats voted FOR border security repeatedly, but now that it's Trump, they are voting against it. If Democrats voted for it before, where did this ridiculous LIE that they support "open borders"? Do you people even LISTEN to ANYTHING?!? And, as point of FACT, Democrats have voted FOR border security this time as well. They just won't let Trump waste BILLIONS of taxpayer dollars on his vanity project. Unlike Republicans, the Democrats are actually holding Trump accountable for being an idiot. And Trump and his sheep are constantly whining that Obama "lied", and yet you hypocrites don't have the slightest problem with the fact that Trump CAMPAIGNED on taxpayers NOT PAYING FOR THE WALL, ANY OF YOU REMEMBER THAT?!? His constant "Mexico will pay for it", and his current "Mexico IS paying for it......indirectly" bullshit was obviously NEVER going to happen.... But whatever happened to his rallying cry of NO AMERICAN TAXPAYER MONEY WILL GO TO PAY FOR THE WALL, I GUARANTEE IT?  Clearly, just MORE PROOF that his word, just like the "man" himself, isn't worth a damn thing.
Trump is the WORST president ever in the history of the United States 🇺🇸 of America. He is a disgrace that continues to ruin and embarrass its citizens!!!
Trump is a doo doo head. LOL 😆
This wall distraction isn't going to work. Neither will shutting down the government. Mueller is coming for you and soon you'll be in prison. Traitor.
Psycho 🤡🤥😱
MAGGOT! Abe Gone Soon!!!!!
Psycho 🤡🤥😱
Defend them and do what you said and have Mexico write that check and stop asking us for a useless wall with 1,000 holes.
Kevin Marshall master negotiator with Mexico? Not even 2 cents! Lol
Your a yuge FAILURE stop fear mongering ......your only trying to throw bloody meat to your base ....to create a smoke screen ....noone in their right mind believes a word you say .....why not just resign ? Thatd be your 1st step to actually making america great again
Kevin Marshall master negotiator with Mexico? Not even 2 cents! Lol
More terrorists come in from canada than mexico. Drugs come through legal ports of entry.  Stop holding the country hostage, ahab
Homo?  First off, I'm straight.  Second off - love how republicans try to claim a moral high ground while also using an entire classification of people as a euphamism for "stupid". I'm positive Jesus would approve.
Defend them and do what you said and have Mexico write that check and stop asking us for a useless wall with 1,000 holes.
You and your family are  a National security threat, you all will sell America's secrets to the highest bidder. You all are treasonous traitor conmen.
Traitor
Moron!
Your wall is not protecting our country.   This is a made up crisis by a fake president who doesn't have a brain or a soul.
Traitor
KICK BUTT TRUMP MAGA
Homo?  First off, I'm straight.  Second off - love how republicans try to claim a moral high ground while also using an entire classification of people as a euphamism for "stupid". I'm positive Jesus would approve.
Ban guns.
Horseshit.
Idiot
IMBECILE
You are such a pathetic Con-Artist!!!! Can't you see that all you have following you is a bunch of ignorant REDNECKS?
Infidels
Dumbass 🤡
Traitor.
Fucing loser
Dirty asf
KICK BUTT TRUMP MAGA
Dirty asf
MIRROR IMAGE?  FAKE PROFILE.  REPORTED.
Fucing loser
Traitor
turd
Traitor!
Asshat
YOU GODDAM FOOLS! GUESS WHAT ASS!!! PAY ATTENTION: Trump TOLD Cohen to LIE to Congress! And it was backed up by ELECTRONIC surveillance! #MICDROP #Treason #Collusion
Gobshite
Moron
Reading of the letter to the Hebrews (3, 7-14)  The Holy Spirit says: Oh, that today you would hear his voice,  "Harden not your hearts as at the rebellion in the day of testing in the desert, where your ancestors tested and tried me and saw my works for forty years. Because of this I was provoked with that generation and I said, 'They have always been of erring heart, and they do not know my ways.' As I swore in my wrath, " They shall not enter into my rest. "' Take care, brothers and sisters, that none of you may have an evil and unfaithful heart, so as to forsake the living God. Encourage yourselves daily while it is still "today,"  so that none of you may grow hardened by the deceit of sin. We have become partners of Christ if only we hold the beginning of the reality firm until the end.  Word of God. Praise you, Lord.
Menka  just doing acting chatnooga u wrote  tat means u are dirty no sing your telling me,but her mind  geese gee gay telling  me,tat due to your support,tat menka is dominating me,so I kept her enemies, she want to dragged me,how much I care she want to dragged me,her everything  lier, she fear tat I get dream,so she is nonsense ly pleasing me,it's fact,spiritual ly m telling  u truth,this deepika  being insecure  but I gave her one chance,if she again dragged me,I will snatch everything  her chance mind it
MIRROR IMAGE?  FAKE PROFILE.  REPORTED.
THEN SHUT DOWN THE BORDERS OR NATIONAL EMERGENCY it is not smart to wait on deal with dems ,they want open borders, they have the security at there houses
BUILD THE WALL. Truth is a bedrock foundation. Continue to call out the Socialist, Marxist as they are. Define who they are, and the abject failure their ideas are. And their messengers for who that they are. This is cultural war we are engaged in. They are afraid of you because you got elected from outside their system. You will be in charge for another 6 years. It is time to put them in the dust pile of history as an abject failure. Run our country as the business model that made you successful. Thank you for your service to our country Sir! Semper Fi Mr. President. Saepius Exertus, Semper Fidelis, Frater Infinitas. Often tested, always faithful, brothers forever.
Orange fool
Moron
You idiot
Lying ass !
Good lord, your hyperbole is absurd. Let me say this so even you can understand: WE ARE A NATION OF IMMIGRANTS. That includes your grandfather who was kicked  out of Germany for avoiding the draft, your mother who overstayed her visa, and your wife who faked her "exceptional talent" standing.
Menka  just doing acting chatnooga u wrote  tat means u are dirty no sing your telling me,but her mind  geese gee gay telling  me,tat due to your support,tat menka is dominating me,so I kept her enemies, she want to dragged me,how much I care she want to dragged me,her everything  lier, she fear tat I get dream,so she is nonsense ly pleasing me,it's fact,spiritual ly m telling  u truth,this deepika  being insecure  but I gave her one chance,if she again dragged me,I will snatch everything  her chance mind it
ALL THE LEFTISTS TROLLS ON HERE SHOULD #WALKAWAY YOU WOULD FEEL SO MUCH BETTER ALL THAT HATE WILL DIE AND YOU CAN BE PART OF A GREAT MOVEMENT. YOUR LIVES WILL BE MORE MANAGABLE YOU WON'T HAVE TO WAKE EVERY MORNING FEELING SO MUCH HATE IN YOUR EVIL HEARTS. #WALKAWAY.
Bullshit… You’re not getting your wall and you look like a loser
U RICH MOTHER FUCKER ! PAY FOR THAT WALL U WANT SO GOD DAM BAD. U SCARED TO PAY FOR IT OUT OF UR POCKET ? WE WANT TO KNOW RIGHT NOW !
Susan A. Holmberg, most drugs come through check points, human bodies, planes, etc. Hell, the drug cartels, can spend an extra couple of hundred dollars to go to Canada first then here. I mean damn...they have submarines and bring them all up and down the coast. You think an ignorant wall will stop them, lmbo! They are laughing at us!
One thing I got to say is mankind is one messed-up species I'm surprised we survived this long we are idiots go President Trump best president ever there's a reason why we are different religions we are different colors we speak different languages and we're Dems and Republicans so that we can kill each other and we will Idiots but that is the master plan and you can't get away from it 5 Seconds to genius
Trump 2020! Stop the socialists anti-American demorats! You can't secure the border without the wall,  700,000 homeless children's in America, but demorats care for illegal children and criminal  parents that croos the border illegal.  America first! Legal immigration over illegal immigrant.  IMPEACH PELOSI AND SCHUMER . DEMOCRATS ARE ANTI-AMERICAN.....THEY SUCK BIGTIME.
The orange cancer is a disgrace to the office Putin put him in , he's a failed estate agent putting America back 60 years
What wall will defend us from Russian comrade in the White House?  “The 362-53 vote registers formal House disapproval of plans to relax sanctions against companies controlled by Russian President Vladimir Putin ally, Oleg Deripaska, and comes despite last-minute appeals by Treasury Secretary Steven Mnuchin. A similar measure narrowly failed in the Senate this week, despite 11 Republicans breaking ranks to vote with Democrats.”
Good lord, your hyperbole is absurd. Let me say this so even you can understand: WE ARE A NATION OF IMMIGRANTS. That includes your grandfather who was kicked  out of Germany for avoiding the draft, your mother who overstayed her visa, and your wife who faked her "exceptional talent" standing.
It should be Pelosi's too....but she wants to go off on a nice trip to Egypt....must be nice...ON YOUR TAX DOLLAR...while Americans aren't getting paid because she doesn't care about their safety or future.
POTUS;   If i do not defend immigrants then you would be running your mouth at will.     "I AM, BEFORE YOU WERE; ALWAYS AND FOREVER SIR."  PURO MEXICO SIR! See you soon pervert.   Respectfully;  Omar Martinez
OMAR.  BLESS YOUR HEART SON.  TRUMP IS MAKING AMERICA GREAT AGAIN. IT IS OUR COUNTRY.  WE DECIDE WHO COMES AND WHO STAYS. FACT!  THERE ARE 194 OTHER COUNTRIES ON THE PLANET.. HAVE A NICE TRIP
It should be Pelosi's too....but she wants to go off on a nice trip to Egypt....must be nice...ON YOUR TAX DOLLAR...while Americans aren't getting paid because she doesn't care about their safety or future.
Article IV Section 4 of the Constitution requires them to secure our border. I care not what CNN told you. Schumer & Pelosi are guilty of treason for aiding hostile foreign invaders  (Section 3). I stand with you Mr. President
TRANSLATION: "As President, I really enjoy scaring the hell out of my dimwitted supporters because it makes me feel greater and more powerful than even my own over-inflated view of myself. It's good to be a tyrant as long there are voters who are stupid enough to let me treat them like peasants."
The only ones who don’t want it are criminal gangs, cartels, organized syndicates and democrats who profit from CASH donations in Brown bag 💰 to be elected and keep things as they are
Such an ugly man. Inside and out.
Well, actually.....  TRUMP IS FRAYING NERVES INSIDE THE PENTAGON  Washington (CNN) — Two years into his presidency, Donald Trump is fueling unprecedented uncertainty and anxiety inside the Pentagon. In private conversations over the past month, many of them unsolicited, more than a dozen key military officers, enlisted personnel and senior civilians have expressed worry and concern to CNN. None of the officials have spoken publicly about this, as military law prohibits active-duty personnel from criticizing a sitting president. It's not just Trump's unpredictable decision making that has officials on edge, it's also his penchant for politicizing the military— something that's come into focus in recent months as he's struggled to fulfill his campaign promise to crack down on immigration and build a border wall. His decision to draw down troops in Syria and his claims that ISIS is defeated have also rankled military commanders who felt it wasn't well thought out. Some of the highest-ranking officers say there is a new atmosphere of unease inside the Pentagon, particularly among some of the most senior ranks, over the President's inclination to use the military to achieve certain partisan policy objectives. Behind the scenes officials are trying to keep it all at bay. "The amount of time we have to spend making sure our statements and what we say is apolitical is astronomically higher than ever before," one senior military officer told CNN. If commanders order the troops to perform a mission for reasons that are political — rather than based on national security grounds — the fundamental nature of the US military is changed, several officials worry. That line has already been crossed in the minds of some over the issue of sending troops to the border. It could become even more of a problem should the President decide to declare a national emergency to gain access to Defense Department funds to build the wall. R E A D  O N....  https://cnn.it/2FFdNbG .
If the defense of our nation is so important to you then why did you shut down the government and now disgruntled TSA workers aren’t doing their job correctly therefore endangering the lives of hundreds of Americans. Democrats are just as much to blame as well. And trump supporters are so dumb they only blame them and don’t see that trump has as much blame. You people are dumbasses 🤣
If our borders are not protected then we have more of the criminals, drugs, gangs, killings! I live in Texas as many relatives do!  It is unsafe and we need the protection from the walls!  You democrats who have never been to a border state or know of the dangers are Spewing vitriol just like your fake news and leaders.  Friends in NewMexico and Arizona are going through the same thing! Calif. has become “tent city” and border towns are Wanting the protection also!
Oh shut it down dumb ass, we’ve a nation all this time with out your wall!  Quit saying defending borders because we do have border patrol
OMAR.  BLESS YOUR HEART SON.  TRUMP IS MAKING AMERICA GREAT AGAIN. IT IS OUR COUNTRY.  WE DECIDE WHO COMES AND WHO STAYS. FACT!  THERE ARE 194 OTHER COUNTRIES ON THE PLANET.. HAVE A NICE TRIP
Oh shut it down dumb ass, we’ve a nation all this time with out your wall!  Quit saying defending borders because we do have border patrol
I AM AMAZED AT PRESIDENT TRUMP. I DON'T SEE HOW HE KEEPS UP WITH ALL OF THIS. HE HAS TO HAVE THINGS HITTING HIM AT 90 MPH FROM THE DEMONIC, DEMENTED DEMS CONSTANTLY AND HE SEEMS TO MANAGE SO WELL!! HE IS TRULY, TRULY AN AMAZING MAN!! HE SURELY HAS MY VOTE IN THE NEXT ELECTION. HOWEVER, THE MAN IS A BILLIONAIRE. I DON'T KNOW WHAT BEHEST HIM TO TAKE ON THE HUGE PROBLEM OF BEING PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES....ESPECIALLY FOR NO PAY!! IF I WERE HIM, I WOULD BE SPENDING MY TIME ON THE BEACHES OF THE WORLD AND FORGET ABOUT FIGHTING THE DEMENTED DEMS. HE DOESN'T NEED THE MONEY AND HE DOESN'T NEED THE AGGRAVATION AND PROBLEMS BEING PRESIDENT BRINGS. I LOVE THIS MAN FOR GIVING HIS ALL TO AMERICA!!!
HE HAS TO DO IT BECAUSE HE TRULY CARES ABOUT THE FUTURE OF THE UNITED STATES AND HER CITIZENS!!   I JUST WORRY WHAT WILL HAPPEN WHEN ALL U.S. OLDER PEOPLE ARE GONE.  WHO WILL FIGHT THE COMMUNIST AND NEW WORLD ORDER TAKE OVER AT THAT TIME??
If our borders are not protected then we have more of the criminals, drugs, gangs, killings! I live in Texas as many relatives do!  It is unsafe and we need the protection from the walls!  You democrats who have never been to a border state or know of the dangers are Spewing vitriol just like your fake news and leaders.  Friends in NewMexico and Arizona are going through the same thing! Calif. has become “tent city” and border towns are Wanting the protection also!
if we dont get you and your cohorts out of our WH we cease to be a nation.  please die and take mikie with you.
My husband is retired government, our daughter and a son in law, work for the government. Daughter is on leave, son in law is still working and being paid. Yes it is hurting some now, but everyone must pull together help those waiting for a pay check.  Stand firm we must protect our borders. We are behind the president 100%  Keep the borders closed until the money is allocated.  A guestion, what happened to the 50 billon that was supposed to be set aside in 2006 under the Bush administration, that Obama was supposed to use to build the wall?   Palosi, Hillary and Shumer signed it. They are hypocrites. I honestly wish that the Democrats could get a wake up from God. Even God in the Bible sanction walls.
Then why are you leaving our airports, borders, and seaports undermanned and vulnerable by holding our country hostage.  Terrorists come here mostly by plane. Drug trafficking organizations have also taken to the air. Border Patrol and other law enforcement agents have encountered smugglers using ultralight aircraft to conduct drug drops. Customs and Border Protection data showed that ultralight aircraft may have been used to transport drugs on 534 occasions from 2011 to 2016. Drones have also been used.In recent years, the Coast Guard and Customs and Border Protection have started to see small speedboats from Mexico used to smuggle drugs into the United States, particularly in California, in an effort to get around border walls and Border Patrol agents. From 2011 to 2016, border officials said there were 309 known attempts to smuggle drugs across the border using boats; officials said there was no way of knowing how many boats actually reach shore.
but but were supposed to be the only  country to not have them because shitbag Pelosi and Schumer say so
But not the lives of the actual people you have been elected to represent? Got it. You're a cancer and I cant wait until you are removed.
this is a stupid badly educated giant baby, you hardly bear his tweet. These are just cheap and stupid, he takes over 800,000 civil servants in hostage, this monster.Amerika awake and finally throw him out.🤮
#DonaldTrump when are you going to grow some balls as George H.W.Bush had in his days like POTUS when he orderd a military  intervention with Marines to overthrow from power and arrest Manuel Antonio Noriega on Dic. of 1989 and do so or copy that in Venezuela? It could not be that dificult....Can you act as a Comander in Chief for once to liberate a Criminal Comunist and Tyranical regime there with a SOB BASTARD Nicolas Maduro as President.
HE HAS TO DO IT BECAUSE HE TRULY CARES ABOUT THE FUTURE OF THE UNITED STATES AND HER CITIZENS!!   I JUST WORRY WHAT WILL HAPPEN WHEN ALL U.S. OLDER PEOPLE ARE GONE.  WHO WILL FIGHT THE COMMUNIST AND NEW WORLD ORDER TAKE OVER AT THAT TIME??
Laughable. Then you should have made it a priority when you had control of congress for 2 years. More LIES from the pathological liar!!! 👎
I HAVE REACHED THE EXALTED POSITION OF A HATE MONGER [According to Facebook].  Basically, Facebook Deems That Any of My Posts [In the Parlance of Terms and Conditions Are in ANY WAY UNFLATTERING with Regard to Illegal Aliens / Other Citizens] Are to Be Considered as HATE SPEECH AND WILL NOT BE POSTED.  The Offending Posts Are Shaded in Grey and Will Be Destroyed When I Leave the Web Page on Which the Post Was Entered.  This Flies in the Name of Logic as Many of My Posts ARE COMPRISED OF LINKS to Documentation Available in the Public Records [e.g. []- DOJ ... There Are over 56,000 ILLEGAL ALIENS in the Federal Prison System So Why Should We Let More in ??; []- DOJ ... It Is a Crime to Emote That the President and Members of Congress Should Be SUBJECT TO PHYSICAL HARM].  Animal Farm Rears It’s Ugly Head ... ONLY LIBERALS KNOW THE TRUTH OF POLITICAL MATTERS !! =+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+= MY FILE || csfe2015\ facebook\ f_share\ family\ cour10ay\ 2016\ CE0803_A.wpd
I pray over you Mr. President  It's a shame you have these crazy Democrats..all they are are kids who wasnt ever punished in their youth.. May God lead you with His hand and deliver you from evil,  and the Democrats who think they are all powerful.. I pray you smite them all and show them who the Real Boss is..In Jesus name.. To God be the Glory forever and ever.. Democrats...you are not In control of anything... but The all mighty God.. Blessed be the name of the Lord
If you dont pay your workers...you're an ASSHOLE.
Liar,  you think of yourself period.  All your criminal friends and family are on th pike and your turn is coming. all your lies are being surfaced plus your traitor action with Russia.
You let 4 soldiers die in Syria. How can protect the country? Send your sons to war? You can say anything and stupid Americans believe it.
Real News from a republican no less.                                                                                                                                                                                   Former New Jersey Gov. Chris Christie reportedly delivers a savage critique of President Donald Trump’s inner circle in his upcoming book, Let Me Finish.                                                                                                       Christie wrote that Trump has a “revolving door of deeply flawed individuals” working for him in the White House.                                                                                                       They are “amateurs, grifters, weaklings, convicted and unconvicted felons” who “were hustled into jobs they were never suited for, sometimes seemingly without so much as a background check via Google or Wikipedia
The only reason Trump promised a wall was to get the votes of the uneducated,  which he said he loves.  Then hecame up with the idea to say Mexico would pay for it,  to get not only the uneducated votes,  but votes of people who did not want our government to pay for it.  Trump knew he could not accomplish this wall all along. Didn't really do anything about it while the republicans had the house and Senate.  Now that the democrats have the house,  he is making a big deal out of it. This way,  he will blame the democrats when it doesn't get built. But he did say he was proud to shut down the government.
Anyone that disagrees with securing our borders should be shot for treason.
#DonaldTrump when are you going to grow some balls as George H.W.Bush had in his days like POTUS when he orderd a military  intervention with Marines to overthrow from power and arrest Manuel Antonio Noriega on Dic. of 1989 and do so or copy that in Venezuela? It could not be that dificult....Can you act as a Comander in Chief for once to liberate a Criminal Comunist and Tyranical regime there with a SOB BASTARD Nicolas Maduro as President.
You knew damn well when you were campaigning on the fact that Mexico would pay you we're talking to the dumbest among us and you knew how you were going to try to get that wall paid for you miserable jackass
Then stop the men caravans. You know it’s the government purge around the world letting men in all these countries. Women are extremely few and a distraction. World terrorism is being planned Globally
Mr President we know you are  fighting demons just know God the Father is the One with Power. Let them bring it on!  🤘
A wall doesn't fix the problem.  We don't have open borders. in fact our borders are more closed than most, with some of the highest costs and hardest requurements to immigrate legally. Those that would try to cross the border illegally are typically stopped and turned back. Most illegal immigrants had work visa's and overstay, and usually arrive in airports. A wall doesn't fix the problem. Its just grand-standing.
Maybe you should just invade central and South America then, you pathological lying fraud.
Get all the illegals put them in buses  to Air Port stocked them up in Military Cargo Plains  RETURN TO SENDER.  NO wast money or people time.  JUST DO IT.
MR PRESIDENT,  PLEASE BUILD THE WALL.   I TELL PEOPLE WHO THINK THAT IT IS USELESS,  TO POST THEIR ADDRESS AND OPEN THEIR DOORS  24/7 SO THAT MS-13 AND OTHERS CAN ENJOY  ALL THAT THEY OWN.
Will you please stop telling lies. Democrats don't want open borders. They want border security just like you. Why don't you sit down like a real man president and work with the other branches of Government? You would be surprised at what you can accomplish without bullying, threatening, or being vengeful.  We need a leader not, a toddler. Get over your tantrum and get these people back to work. They are suffering. Tell your Senate majority leader to put those bills to the floor fbor a vote. Please start working for the people. They need to get back to work!
Anyone that disagrees with securing our borders should be shot for treason.
Will you please stop telling lies. Democrats don't want open borders. They want border security just like you. Why don't you sit down like a real man president and work with the other branches of Government? You would be surprised at what you can accomplish without bullying, threatening, or being vengeful.  We need a leader not, a toddler. Get over your tantrum and get these people back to work. They are suffering. Tell your Senate majority leader to put those bills to the floor fbor a vote. Please start working for the people. They need to get back to work!
Nancy Have you by the b@lls!  RESIGN!  You are a FRAUD,Nancy Pelosi Has the President Outmatchedgq.com
Fernando B Nava that’s exactly what he wants you to think
You're incompetent AF!  Your presidency is a fraud  #fakepresident
You are absolutely right and that is EXACTLY what the DEMOCCULT Party and the rest of the bought-and-paid-for party puppets want to happen!  AMERICA FIRST!  AMERICA STRONG! AMERICA FOREVER! <3 <3 🇺🇸🎚🙏 BUILD THE WALL!!
We are the most heavily defended country on earth. Illegal immigration is at its lowest point in 50 years after falling for the 10th straight year.  The majority of illegal immigrants flew in and overstayed visas. 90% of all illegal drugs are smuggled in through border crossings. You are a liar who wants a PR stunt.
ASSHOLE
Trump is nothing more then a baby he cries over what a dam wall he's shut down the dam government who does that I'd tell him to his face he's nothing more then a rich man who wants his way making america great again bs trump pack up your bags let a real man run this world not some spoiled rich man i got a great idea build a wall around him what's next for this dumb ass
You cant 'defend' your own nation while undermining the very intelligence agencies sworn to protect it. You've lied all your life and gotten away with it. Now you work for us and its all caught up to you. Time to pay the piper...and his name is Mueller. A very capable republican who is putting country first over party, over his own interests and his own pockets. Bye bye lil' Donnie.                                      https://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-6605677/Sources-claim-Trump-directed-Cohen-lie-Congress-Trump-Tower-Moscow.html
George Washington's State of the Union Address was a letter FOR THE PEOPLE OF AMERICA....and it was the FOUNDATION of The State of the Union Address...until Democrat President Woodrow Wilson made it a PR STUNT for politicians to gather and pat each other on the back!  Is Nancy Pelosi's "dissing" really a GIFT IN DISGUISE?  President Donald Trump has three choices.  1. He can start a twitter campaign calling out Nancy Pelosi for this, and we get another expensive boring "Dog and Pony show" none of us look forward to.  2. He could take the "Dog and Pony Show" out of Washington, D.C. and go back to what President George Washington did. Actually report to the legal and law abiding American's, call out the division, call out for term limits, call out for real reform in immigration via a demanding for the Visa Programs, Refugee status, having a wall/fence/barrier put in place and sharing that before he was elected, Democrats were willing to invest over 30 BILLION for a wall/fence/barrier for the protection, much like on their own private properties to protect themselves and their family, the legal and law abiding "American Family."  3. He goes ahead with the State of the Union...BUT, he walks in to the room this is held empty, for a "one on one" talk with the legal and law abiding American citizens that last 5-10 minutes at the most.  He walks in and doesn't even go to the podium. He sits down in a chair where the Democrats are not present, and tells the cameraman to pan around that room, showing the emptiness. He then addresses us.  He address the fact can be shown we need TERM LIMITS (What more American's want even more than a wall/fence/barrier) on Congress to get back to those actually doing their job, nothing more and nothing less, and it has become crystal clear, through mostly Lobbyism/Lobbists Congress cannot do their real job any more. Then talk about Senator Ted Cruz's attempt to pass a Bill to Law for TERM LIMITS on both The House and The Senate to get back to their assigned, through the Constitution of the United States, jobs!  He reminds us it is WE THE PEOPLE are their bosses. We foot the bills/pay the bills that they make, and way too many bills are being given to us that they have no right, per their Constitutional Oath, and we have to let our voices be heard.  (Traveling to DC has proven to not be a motivator for Congress...but we hold the real purse-strings, and the BIGGEST MOVE we could make is show we don't need the IRS, the real LIFEBLOOD of theft for politicians on us. Just look at the Socialist and Communist leaders in many states stealing tax dollars by finding ways to tax everything. EVEN WATER!!!!) DOWNSIZE THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT (This shut down is showing we don't need HALF of what we are paying for Federally!) PASS TERM LIMITS ON CONGRESS AND JUDGES! GET RID OF TENURE! FORCE OUR TRUE REPRESENTATIVES IN CONGRESS TO LIVE IN THEIR HOME STATE NOT WASHINGTON! BUILD THE WALL/FENCE/BARRIER! ENFORCE VISA'S, REFUGEE AND OTHER TIME LIMITED NON-CITIZENSHIP AGREEMENTS! BRING BACK THE DEATH PENALTY TO DAY OF CONVICTION EXECUTIONS FOR CONVICTED MURDERERS, RAPISTS, MOLESTERS, PEDOPHILES, KIDNAPPERS, TERRORISTS, THOSE THAT AID THESE AND THOSE THAT FALSELY ACCUSE THESE WHETHER THEY ARE LEGAL CITIZENS OR ILLEGAL ALIENS!
with you as LIAR n THIEF, and as RUSSIAN ASSET YOU ALREADY SUCCEEDED THAT !
Keep telling that lie Trump, while TSA workers call in sick and our airports are left unprotected, you know airports, where the 9/11 attackers came and overstayed their visas.
Fernando B Nava that’s exactly what he wants you to think
We have ZERO Moral Authority in the world as long as you are leading us.  You’ve sold our nation to enrich yourself.  NOTHING “Great” about America with you in the WH.  MANY Are Getting Arrested #MAGA
KREMLIN NAMES TRUMP EMPLOYEE OF THE MONTH  https://www.newyorker.com/humor/borowitz-report/kremlin-names-trump-employee-of-the-month?utm_medium=social&utm_brand=tny&mbid=social_facebook&utm_social-type=owned&utm_source=facebook .
YOUR A DISCUSTING UNCLE TOM
The Republican party as a whole and it saddens me that some African Americans support this.  "What you really need to do is go back in the ’30s, when they outlawed all types of drugs in Kansas (and) across the United States. What was the reason why they did that? One of the reasons why, I hate to say it, was that the African Americans, they were basically users and they basically responded the worst off to those drugs just because of their character makeup, their genetics, and that.  Alford’s comments referenced a belief promoted by marijuana prohibitionist Harry Anslinger, the founding commissioner of the Federal Bureau of Narcotics.  “Under Anslinger’s leadership, the FBN came to be considered responsible for the Marijuana Tax Act of 1937,” the report noted, “regulating cannabis and further taxing it to the ultimate detriment of the hemp industry that was booming at the time.”  “Reefer makes darkies think they’re as good as white men,” Anslinger said once when explaining why marijuana supposedly caused crime and violence. The commissioner also fought for the prohibition of cannabis due to “its effect on the degenerate races.” "  https://www.patheos.com/blogs/progressivesecularhumanist/2018/01/gop-lawmaker-blacks-cant-handle-marijuana-genetics/?utm_medium=social&utm_source=share_bar&fbclid=IwAR1a0r6zt3lIAcIO4el5QMMrUbkxjQcIiXmhb0VqxyrhcukaAC1GqunkSjM#ZL0Xf6bLCtu2GRhH.01
News conference  hey asshole you do America a favor and QUIT you fat fucking loser
If he would come to El Paso and speak about how "Hold the Line" implemented by former USBP Director EP Sector, former US Congressman, Reyes, it would be a great positive proof about how the "Wall" has lowered crime exponentially.  He has statistics and Facts to prove it.  Ya know what? Perhaps this is why buses of caravan invaders were dropped off in our city. Perhaps to undermine and chang those statics in favor of the Democratic false narrative.   Oh, those sneaky snakes. 🐍
While you starve the citizens, much like Putin and Kim Jong-un are doing.  When do you start murdering your political enemies and the LGTB community?  You are already complacent in the murder of journalists.
Has anybody figured out why Americans Against Nancy Pelosi IS AFRAID of the #SOTU? She doesn’t want to face all the #AngelFamilies that President Donald J. Trump is sure to invite and sit up in the gallery. That will be thee most #EpicFail to date... I say open the press room “sans” The #LameStreamMedia with all these families that have been affected in this 30+ year #crisis in attendance.... Let’s be honest here, the reason there are so many people wanting to come here, is all the jobs being created. Some of those jobs can’t be taken by Americans because they can’t pass #drugtests all because some of those illegals, and those temporarily employed by the Obama armed #cartels are bringing the drugs from down souf.... it’s the half circle that needs to end, or at the least deterred by any means necessary.... If we were to give job performance “evals” to the dimocRATs at this time, they’d all receive #pinkslips.... They were hired for one job, and as of this moment, their work ethics are lacking, egregiously. It’s seriously time to move forward with the recall of both House Speaker Nancy Pelosi and Senator Chuck Schumer. They both lack fortitude. They must’ve gotten into the ineptitude line by mitsake....
You are a big fat slob
Keep telling that lie Trump, while TSA workers call in sick and our airports are left unprotected, you know airports, where the 9/11 attackers came and overstayed their visas.
You are a big fat slob
Build The Wall National Security Order!!!! KEEP UP THE AWESOME WORK!! YOU ARE PROTECTED BY GOD ALMIGHTY FOR STANDING FOR RIGHTEOUSNESS! AWESOME PRESIDENT Donald J. Trump Vice President Mike Pence Mike Pence KEEP DESTROYING THE WORKS OF THESE EVIL LIBERAL BABY KILLING DEVILS!! EVERYONE WITH A BRAIN IS BEHIND YOU AND IN SUPPORT OF YOU! GOD BLESS YOU AND YOURS!!  Check out Awesome President Donald J. Trump accomplishments! Visit! www.magapill.comPresident Donald J. Trump's Accomplishment's Listmagapill.com
Joe Saladino amazing commrnt
Most of you hate trump because your freinds would hate you if you liked him.
Joe Saladino amazing commrnt
Glenn Culpepper, yes, Obama was a fraud and a joke as president. But I’d go with incompetent rather then crooked.
Build The Wall National Security Order!!!! KEEP UP THE AWESOME WORK!! YOU ARE PROTECTED BY GOD ALMIGHTY FOR STANDING FOR RIGHTEOUSNESS! AWESOME PRESIDENT Donald J. Trump Vice President Mike Pence Mike Pence KEEP DESTROYING THE WORKS OF THESE EVIL LIBERAL BABY KILLING DEVILS!! EVERYONE WITH A BRAIN IS BEHIND YOU AND IN SUPPORT OF YOU! GOD BLESS YOU AND YOURS!!  Check out Awesome President Donald J. Trump accomplishments! Visit! www.magapill.comPresident Donald J. Trump's Accomplishment's Listmagapill.com
WE HAVE ALL KINDS OF PRISONS ACROSS THE U.S.A THAT HAVE BEEN CLOSED AND YET HAVE PERFECTLY GOOD FENCES AROUND THEM.. WE HAVE SEVERAL PEOPLE IN THE PRISONS SITTING ON THEIR BUTTS... HAVE THEM TAKE THE FENCES DOWN AROUND OUR UN-USED PRISONS AND MOVE THEM TO THE BOARDER!!! IT'S CALLED A REFURBISHED FENCE ALREADY PAID FOR BY THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!!
Shithole President Donald J. Trump.
There was a conspiracy to fix a election  did you hear that there was collusion  with a foreign hostile government ! Lock him up! Lock him up! Take all these treasonous  coconspirators  down with treasonous  donnie
Idiot!!The U.S has always defended its border.Stop making a crisis out of nothing.
Donald Trump is a BABY!  A Big Fat Stupid BABY who desperately needs adult supervision.  No wonder New York Society rejected him.  He doesn’t have a scintilla of class or intelligence in his morbidly obese body.  What kind of cheap infantile idiot invites a group to the White House and gives them fast food burgers and fries to eat.  Pathetic!
Your all like lambs to the slaughter blindly following this fool. Next you'll be saying you believe in Jesus,  hahaha!
If we keep you in office, the country goes into the shitter. You should be the one going into the shitter, face-first!!
News Flash, what the media and politicians haven't told us. The Syrian war is all but over, for the 1st time since 2011 the first President of a Middle East nation met with Bashir Assad, the President of Sudan, Omar al Bashir. All the middle Eastern Countries closed their embassies back in 2011. It's concluded Assad is the leader of the nation and has won the war. They will be letting Syria back in the 22 member Arab League . President Trump knows this, if we stay we will end up paying to rebuild Syria when their neighbors have agreed to absorb the cost. Politicians and the wealthy that all own stock in Boeing, Northrop, Lockheed, would love for us to keep spending billions on bombs. 2 Americans dying yesterday I Syria as we all know could of happened just as well in France or any other EU country or right here at home... Tell your representatives we're finished in Syria, I followed this conflict closely since 2011, I knew then and now Assad is the lessor of evil in that nation... The sad part of this war, he oldest know cities places like Aleppo going back to 3bc have been blown to pieces. These wars have erased much of structures and cities that have survived since man kind. Gone forever..
Glenn Culpepper, yes, Obama was a fraud and a joke as president. But I’d go with incompetent rather then crooked.
News Flash, what the media and politicians haven't told us. The Syrian war is all but over, for the 1st time since 2011 the first President of a Middle East nation met with Bashir Assad, the President of Sudan, Omar al Bashir. All the middle Eastern Countries closed their embassies back in 2011. It's concluded Assad is the leader of the nation and has won the war. They will be letting Syria back in the 22 member Arab League . President Trump knows this, if we stay we will end up paying to rebuild Syria when their neighbors have agreed to absorb the cost. Politicians and the wealthy that all own stock in Boeing, Northrop, Lockheed, would love for us to keep spending billions on bombs. 2 Americans dying yesterday I Syria as we all know could of happened just as well in France or any other EU country or right here at home... Tell your representatives we're finished in Syria, I followed this conflict closely since 2011, I knew then and now Assad is the lessor of evil in that nation... The sad part of this war, he oldest know cities places like Aleppo going back to 3bc have been blown to pieces. These wars have erased much of structures and cities that have survived since man kind. Gone forever..
*You're.....an idiot.
If we keep you in office, the country goes into the shitter. You should be the one going into the shitter, face-first!!
*You're.....an idiot.
Linda Silver Trumps IQ is quite high . What's yours!?
Linda Silver hahaha are u mad lol
Wow, you believe all that Crap don't you ! Trump is NOT smart ,you Get that !
Your a liar. Plain, simple and to the point.
End the shutdown, you embarrassing fool. You will now be remembered as the most inept and disgraceful president ever.
You can't defend borders with a wall idiot.  Try the solutions offered by the Democrats and quit being such a stubborn little boy who can't get his way.
We will not build Donald Trump's fucking white supremacist wall. We will force our Congressional leaders and Representatives to impeach,  indict and imprison him.
Is freaking Sad and embarrassing that we have someone who act like a little two-year-old little snot-nosed  Brat
The solution is simple.  It should be handled the same way the Obama administration handled Obamacare.  If you refuse to pay for the barrier / wall, you will be fined.  This only seems fair.  'Social justice warriors' claiming to 'defend the high moral ground' can't possibly oppose this equitable solution for all Americans.  Afterall, that would be grossely hypocritical.
You are a SMELLY FUCKING TURD. I hope you rot in jail and never see the light of day. POS
Which part of "Donald Trump is a shifty piece of garbage" were you folks too stupid to comprehend?  https://aol.it/2syE6Zk
Wow, you believe all that Crap don't you ! Trump is NOT smart ,you Get that !
What a stubborn idiot
You  don’t care  about  the  borders or  the  health  of  our  Nation;  you  only  care  about  yourself.    Narcissistic  dimwit.
WAITING FOR YOUR EXECUTIVE ORDER ALONG WITH AN AUTOMATIC FILING TO THE SUPREME COURT  BECAUSE  THE ASSHOLE CIRCUIT JUDGES WHO ARE PARTISAN WILL ATTEMP TO TEMPORARILY BLOCK IT.
get off yourself trump you are a fucking monster
Border Security is a must.  Keeping Illegal immigrants out of the United States is important.     How would you  feel if your neighbors took the liberty & jumped over the wooden fence in your backyard & invaded your privacy ,& home???
What a rotten son of a bitch you people elected ! He could not get Mexico to pay for his ego wall now thousands of families are suffering. There is NO EXCUSE for a spoiled trust fund baby making working American suffer. IMPEACHMENT NOW!
trump  if thats  true  why  are  you  putins  liddle  bitch
We are being invaded and Dems are counting them as votes instead of invaders.
Which part of "Donald Trump is a shifty piece of garbage" were you folks too stupid to comprehend?  https://aol.it/2syE6Zk
We are being invaded and Dems are counting them as votes instead of invaders.
As a citizen of the United States I demand that you resign the presidency and take your Serwer Rat Cabinet, the Republithug eunuchs, and your criminal family with you MORON!
Larry Vincent as a non elitist working class Republican...if any harm comes to President Trump...Yellow Jackets of France will be like chunky cheese to your world
Lee Grant...congratulations! You have just gone to the head of the Trumpkin Bumpkin Class of Stupidity and Delusion! When Humpty Drumpty is thrown out of office...of that there is NO DOUBT....there will be rejoicing in streets across the nation and you illiterate, brain dead Trumptards will be wailing into your China made MAGGAT hats!
trump  if thats  true  why  are  you  putins  liddle  bitch
Let us be crystal clear about 1 thing. Trump's reasons for wanting a wall have nothing to do with border security. Trump only wants the wall for the same reason why he still believes The Central Park Five are still guilty years after being exonerated (look it up), he believes our first black POTUS is not an American citizen, & why he & his father refused to rent apartments to POC during their real estate days. He believes America is only great if it is the Whites-only, English-speaking only, Christian-only, etc. country that it supposedly was before a man of color had the audacity to run for & win the Presidency twice!!!!!!! He only wants the wall because he is a childish, immature, infantile, narcissistic, petty, spoiled, whiny, vindictive, man-baby, mob boss of a POTUS who believes that the entire world revolves around HIM & HIM ALONE because his rich daddy/parents always made everything work out in his favor with their connections, lawyers, & money rather than properly disciplining him & laying down the law that he will NOT look down on people who are different, he will NOT shut down anyone & everyone who says things which hurt his feelings, he will NOT threaten people & call them childish names & hurl childish insults at them until he gets your way, etc who only got Russia involved in the first place because, since he already had business interests in Russia, & since Putin is a dictator & Russia is a dictatorship, he knew that Putin was the only person & Russia was the only country that he looked at/sat in/test drove when he was shopping around for countries to assist him in getting his own way yet again by stealing the 2016 election who wouldn't automatically tell him to go f*** himself & stick his malignant narcissism where the sun don't shine (up his ass)!!! He is going to have to learn one way or another, & he WILL learn one way or another that the world does not revolve around him & him alone, & that he doesn't get to hold American workers & their paychecks hostage until people give into his little babyish/childish/immature/infantile temper tantrum & give him his wall like a spoiled child whose mommy won't buy him his favorite cereal at the grocery store!!!!!!
Benedict Donald, you are a liar, coward and TRAITOR. Prepare for prison in 2019.
HOW MANY AMERICAN SONS WERE KILLED BY TIMOTHY McVEIGH? THE LAS VEGAS SHOOTER? THE SHERMAN OAKS SHOOTER?? SANDY HOOK?? LITTLE CHILDREN?? BY WHITE AMERICAN MALES!!??? TRUMP DOESN’T CARE ABOUT AMERICAN PEOPLE - HE ONLY CARES CARES ABOUT AMERICAN DOLLARS!!
I don't want Trump impeached. I want him to resign in disgrace or have his flabby ass kicked out in 2020. Either way, we're gonna see another Blue Wave in 2020. :) He's such a slimy loser.  Headline: President Trump Directed His Attorney Michael Cohen To Lie To Congress About The Moscow Tower Project  https://www.buzzfeednews.com/article/jasonleopold/trump-russia-cohen-moscow-tower-mueller-investigation
Now we know where their priorities REALLY lie.  Republicans voted to lift sanctions on a Russian oligarch while refusing to vote to reopen the government. They are #RepublicanScum, doing scummy stuff.
Thank you Mr. President. It's about time someone puts the American people BEFORE their own [cash cow] agenda! Keep it up - please...
You're such a liar. And you're so pathetically weak. You let Ann Coulter tell you what to do...how disgraceful.
Lee Grant...congratulations! You have just gone to the head of the Trumpkin Bumpkin Class of Stupidity and Delusion! When Humpty Drumpty is thrown out of office...of that there is NO DOUBT....there will be rejoicing in streets across the nation and you illiterate, brain dead Trumptards will be wailing into your China made MAGGAT hats!
You're such a liar. And you're so pathetically weak. You let Ann Coulter tell you what to do...how disgraceful.
Keep everything shut down till you get us that wall ...Screw the democraps
Trump and his base need to dial back the name calling. Now that the House is under Democratic control he won't get a single bill passed if he can't get enough Democrats to support him.
Phoebe Cassandra Smith lol yeah you'll see troll
Thank you Mr. President. It's about time someone puts the American people BEFORE their own [cash cow] agenda! Keep it up - please...
Phoebe Cassandra Smith lol yeah you'll see troll
Trump and his base need to dial back the name calling. Now that the House is under Democratic control he won't get a single bill passed if he can't get enough Democrats to support him.
Here's the real 411 on the Shutdown. The Democrat led Congress is Flexing their Muscles over Trump. They Own the Purse Strings and Donald Trump is just like You who are wanting a paycheck. Trump has his hand out asking the Democrats Pelosi & Schumer for his money. SURE you are hearing some Democrat Trolls vilify & blame Trump, but In Reality Trump is only another citizen waiting for Congress to give out the money. He needs money to do the job just like you. SO IF YOU ARE HARBORING SOME DEEP HATE BECAUSE YOU DIDN'T GET YOUR PAYCHECK THEN BLAME THE DEMOCRATS. They are playing Cat and Mouse and the President is now the mouse. REMEMBER the President is just One Branch of the Government. President -Congress-Senate, Supreme Court, they all have "Their Powers."  Just read the Ocasio-Cortez story- Jeez! She's still doesn't know what is going on yet.
You are a fool and you think your supporters are fools, too.
This moron is doing a campaign rally. He’s so worried about brown people invading his space that he’s allowing the his own people to be cold and starve. Time to impeach. Sick of listening to his whining. Talks like the adderall has kicked in.
Lock him up
The actual photo before photoshopping his tiny hands and fat ass  https://www.flickr.com/photos/whitehouse/46745079141/in/dateposted/
I agree Build The WALL send gun choppers down to patrol our Border and warning shots to stay away from our Borders. Call up their President and Mexican President and start charging fines. Change the Tampered Language Obama , Clinton’s, Pelosi, Schumer changed to make it open Border to allow Mexican, Middle-Easterners and Central Americans Ect. All to enter the U.S.A. Stop allowing so many in , or to come here at all Crime is rampant ! Rape then murder, it’s appalling! We are only one Country get them out of our Government they are tearing our Country to pieces. Be more like Poland . No  strangers are allowed to mass invade and come in on their families and citizens to do them harm by diseases, rape, murder, illegally/ or other wise unvetted. Traitors speaking against us the American people we will not give up our guns to protect ourselves with, we will not submit to or obey an ideology that goes against our Christian Beliefs they should be deported out our Country . No to Sharia Law it is incompatible with the Constitution of the U.S.A. Mc Carran-Walters Act 1952. Thomas Jefferson V. Muslim Pirates.1800s.
KREMLIN NAMES TRUMP EMPLOYEE OF THE MONTH  https://www.newyorker.com/humor/borowitz-report/kremlin-names-trump-employee-of-the-month?utm_medium=social&utm_brand=tny&mbid=social_facebook&utm_social-type=owned&utm_source=facebook .
Trump's "Brown Shirts"  - Make no mistake, if I had the means, YOU would be on your knees apologizing on their behalf - but it will be enough to see you go to prison.  https://boingboing.net/2019/01/19/mob-of-young-maga-hat-wearers.html?fbclid=IwAR19DOI6bj-W6ZSDDY4vLHCJD9p7bCLG50dQ9tswnYn-oP_LiQtAO-FbwBA
Quite a few kool aid chugging idiots here...want a wall? Then open your wallets, get down to the border, and start building!
Trump is a pussy
Yeah I noticed how Canada built a wall. And I travelled all over Europe and you couldn't go anywhere without running into a wall. Even Russia has a wall. Wait a minute. Nope, they all have borders with no walls. How can that be. Do they know something we don't? Ask your Russian buddy how they keep people out.  Not with a wall.
Hay ASS Hole when you Freaking Bloody use American working federal workers as a Ransom to get what you want your a Freaking dictator and a Freaking spoiled little brat because you can't get your Freaking Wall why freaking Keep people from getting paid not acting like a spoiled little boy that is throwing temper tantrum open up the Freaking Government and you still can negotiate on Boader security you No good want to be president what a Freaking Jackass
You’re a god damn incompetent coward whose highest priority is to grift your moron supporters, degrade the integrity of this nation, and dodge the blame when it’s on your shoulders. You and your stooges are a plague. Keep talking about your stupid wall when Isis has just killed four servicemen and an American citizen was killed by terrorists in Africa. But that’s too unpleasant for you to mention because you’re a coward and your supporters are idiots with zero critical thinking skills.
Build the damn wall run over Nancy and Chuck and the rest of the Dems like a steam roller . Go around them  take care of American tax payers. Go Trump
WHEN YOU TRUMP ARE WORKING WITH RUSSIA  THAN YOU ARE MAKING AMERICA TO CEASE TO BE A NATION...................AND TURNING AMERICA COMMUNIST.......................IF YOU WERE FOR THE SAFTY OF THIS COUNTRY YOU WOULDNT HAVE LIFTED SANCTIONS ON RUSSIA LAST NIGHT,YOU DID WHAT PUTIN ASK OF YOU...NOW YOU HAVE PUT AMERICAN LIVES AT RISK AND YOU DONT GIVE A DAM.................AND YOU LIES TO YOUR SUPPORTERS SAYING YOUR TOUGH ON RUSSIA.......................IMPEACH TRUMPS ASS............
I agree Build The WALL send gun choppers down to patrol our Border and warning shots to stay away from our Borders. Call up their President and Mexican President and start charging fines. Change the Tampered Language Obama , Clinton’s, Pelosi, Schumer changed to make it open Border to allow Mexican, Middle-Easterners and Central Americans Ect. All to enter the U.S.A. Stop allowing so many in , or to come here at all Crime is rampant ! Rape then murder, it’s appalling! We are only one Country get them out of our Government they are tearing our Country to pieces. Be more like Poland . No  strangers are allowed to mass invade and come in on their families and citizens to do them harm by diseases, rape, murder, illegally/ or other wise unvetted. Traitors speaking against us the American people we will not give up our guns to protect ourselves with, we will not submit to or obey an ideology that goes against our Christian Beliefs they should be deported out our Country . No to Sharia Law it is incompatible with the Constitution of the U.S.A. Mc Carran-Walters Act 1952. Thomas Jefferson V. Muslim Pirates.1800s.
"Let our lord now command your servants, who is skillful in playing the lyre, and when the evil spirit from God is upon you, he will play it, and you will be well(1Samuel 16:16)".  This comes in two ; the first is, God can use unfavorable situation someone is in, for you to showcase your God-given talent and thus be blessed. The second is, God brings down one and lifts up another. Nothing just happens! Whatever happens in life whether favorable or unfavorable is for God to take glory for Himself.   Don't get this wrong though, there are times one suffers for rejecting God and not serving Him but that's not what we are treating today. The case of Saul and David is different. God just appointed a new king and He wants to bring him to the palace to learn till he is fully in charge, and He is punishing Saul for what he did and at the same time using his predicament to show David to the entire nation. Bringing him to the limelight to be noticed.   There is a God in the heavens who works wonders. What should be prioritized in your life is to be faithful and committed to serving God. You must keep hope alive as you serve Him faithfully till God takes glory for Himself out of the situation you are in. You must position yourself for greatness and not waver in faith.  When God made Saul a king, he thought, he could do what pleased him alone and not what pleased God. He has forgotten that, He who made you king could also remove you. Not only was he removed, he was severely dealt with, the first and once a great king ran mad. A great lesson to all who occupy great positions but are pleasing themselves, those who are forgetting so soon how God made them what they are, and lift them up.   You can run away from the judgment of man but cannot run from the judgment of God. Twenty, thirty years may be long to you but nemesis will catch up with you. Repentance is what can save you. Repent! JESUS IS COMING SOON!
"Let our lord now command your servants, who is skillful in playing the lyre, and when the evil spirit from God is upon you, he will play it, and you will be well(1Samuel 16:16)".  This comes in two ; the first is, God can use unfavorable situation someone is in, for you to showcase your God-given talent and thus be blessed. The second is, God brings down one and lifts up another. Nothing just happens! Whatever happens in life whether favorable or unfavorable is for God to take glory for Himself.   Don't get this wrong though, there are times one suffers for rejecting God and not serving Him but that's not what we are treating today. The case of Saul and David is different. God just appointed a new king and He wants to bring him to the palace to learn till he is fully in charge, and He is punishing Saul for what he did and at the same time using his predicament to show David to the entire nation. Bringing him to the limelight to be noticed.   There is a God in the heavens who works wonders. What should be prioritized in your life is to be faithful and committed to serving God. You must keep hope alive as you serve Him faithfully till God takes glory for Himself out of the situation you are in. You must position yourself for greatness and not waver in faith.  When God made Saul a king, he thought, he could do what pleased him alone and not what pleased God. He has forgotten that, He who made you king could also remove you. Not only was he removed, he was severely dealt with, the first and once a great king ran mad. A great lesson to all who occupy great positions but are pleasing themselves, those who are forgetting so soon how God made them what they are, and lift them up.   You can run away from the judgment of man but cannot run from the judgment of God. Twenty, thirty years may be long to you but nemesis will catch up with you. Repentance is what can save you. Repent! JESUS IS COMING SOON!
Trump is the stupidest president in the history of this country. What a fucking idiot.
David DeMarinis you are the traitor. No respect, just hate.
TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR
Trump is the stupidest president in the history of this country. What a fucking idiot.
Shut your Putin sucker Donnie!
“Normally President Trump comes down and joins visitors for dinner after he’s spied on Ivanka having her early evening shower, and then retreats to his own bedroom to tuck into a mountain of grease and carbohydrates while watching his favourite Stormy Daniels porno."
thats what the bilderbergs and their type of globalist ilk wants. buy america and destroy the white males first. screw you bastards. america forever bitches. many guns waiting for your flake asses.
All Vile Lib Dem socialist Communists Who Hate Capitalism Freedom and America Feel The Defense of 12 Million Gang Members Millions of Child Molesters PEDOPHILES ROBBERS ILLEGALS RAPISTS KILLERS and Shariah Islam Tists who Kill Gays Transgenders Lesbians their own daughters wives and all women who disobey Maxine Waters BELOVED Shariah Law IS THIER HIGHEST AND MOST IMPORTANT DUTY. FACT !
rears it's ugly head
BABY DONNY, GROW UP ASSHOLE!    https://www.facebook.com/Upworthy/videos/333822050797836/
SHAME ON You TRUMP! This SHUTDOWN that you created is a CRISIS and you are not dealing with it! There is no Crisis except for trump's SHUTDOWN! This is a Trump Tempest in a Teapot! The Democrats and the MAJORITY  of Americans want to hire more Border Patrol Agents and use MODERN METHODS  like drones, not useless walls. There was NEVER going to be a wall from Coast to Coast anyway! Why doesn't MCCONNELL allow a Senate vote!!!!!! Shame on the REPUBLICANS for not forcing MCCONNELL!!!! If trump really wanted a wall why didn't he push for it when Republicans held the House and Senate? If the Border States really wanted Walls they would have built them already!  Shame on trump and McConnell! http://fortune.com/2019/01/10/mcconnell-blocked-spending-bill-vote/  https://www.forbes.com/sites/stuartanderson/2018/06/25/there-is-no-crisis-at-the-border-and-dhs-stats-prove-it/  https://www.npr.org/2019/01/08/683205814/fact-check-trumps-oval-office-pitch-for-a-border-wall?utm_source=facebook.com&utm_medium=social&utm_campaign=npr&utm_term=nprnews&utm_content=20190108  https://cnn.it/2FqLu0J  https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=2515590041805804&id=908009612563863  So, I see you voted PRO RUSSIA! https://www.nytimes.com/2019/01/16/us/politics/senate-trump-russia-sanctions.html?smid=fb-nytimes&smtyp=cur  During the 2015-2016 election season, Ukrainian-born joint US/UK citizen billionaire Leonard "Len" Blavatnik contributed $6.35 million to leading Republican candidates and incumbent senators. Mitch McConnell was the top recipient of Blavatnik's donations, collecting $2.5 million for his GOP Senate Leadership Fund under the names of two of Blavatnik's holding companies, Access Industries and AI Altep Holdings, according to Federal Election Commission documents and OpenSecrets.org.   Lindsey Graham received $800,000.00 in addition to the benefits of the fund.   Under federal law, foreign nationals are barred from contributing directly or indirectly to political campaigns in local, state and federal elections.   $2.5 million and $800k in a year he wasn’t even running for re-election...why?  https://www.dallasnews.com/opinion/commentary/2017/08/03/tangled-web-connects-russian-oligarch-money-gop-campaigns
CLOSE THE BORDER. BUILD THE WALL. Remove ILLEGALS from ever receiving our Taxpayers Welfare!!!!!! 😡😡😡😡 BUILD THE WALL!
TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR
The worse Terrorist in the History of this country came across the northern border from Canada. Mostly Saudis. They killed more Americans on American soil and destroyed more property than any other foreigners on our soil.
I’m sure you Christians are just fine with this, eh? Pro lifer? Hardly  “"Vance County Schools has announced that beginning Jan. 21, the school district will begin to provide students with “minimum level” school lunches to conserve funds in the wake of the federal government shutdown.  State nutrition officials say the directive to cut back on school lunches didn’t come from Raleigh."
TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR
CLOSE THE BORDER. BUILD THE WALL. Remove ILLEGALS from ever receiving our Taxpayers Welfare!!!!!! 😡😡😡😡 BUILD THE WALL!
TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR
I’m sure you Christians are just fine with this, eh? Pro lifer? Hardly  “"Vance County Schools has announced that beginning Jan. 21, the school district will begin to provide students with “minimum level” school lunches to conserve funds in the wake of the federal government shutdown.  State nutrition officials say the directive to cut back on school lunches didn’t come from Raleigh."
45's supporters are one of the following... 1. To arrogant to admit their mistake. 2. Too embarrassed to admit their mistake. 3. Too stupid to know they made a mistake! MAGA... Moscow's Asset Governs America
45's supporters are one of the following... 1. To arrogant to admit their mistake. 2. Too embarrassed to admit their mistake. 3. Too stupid to know they made a mistake! MAGA... Moscow's Asset Governs America
The worse Terrorist in the History of this country came across the northern border from Canada. Mostly Saudis. They killed more Americans on American soil and destroyed more property than any other foreigners on our soil.
SHAME ON You TRUMP! This SHUTDOWN that you created is a CRISIS and you are not dealing with it! There is no Crisis except for trump's SHUTDOWN! This is a Trump Tempest in a Teapot! The Democrats and the MAJORITY  of Americans want to hire more Border Patrol Agents and use MODERN METHODS  like drones, not useless walls. There was NEVER going to be a wall from Coast to Coast anyway! Why doesn't MCCONNELL allow a Senate vote!!!!!! Shame on the REPUBLICANS for not forcing MCCONNELL!!!! If trump really wanted a wall why didn't he push for it when Republicans held the House and Senate? If the Border States really wanted Walls they would have built them already!  Shame on trump and McConnell! http://fortune.com/2019/01/10/mcconnell-blocked-spending-bill-vote/  https://www.forbes.com/sites/stuartanderson/2018/06/25/there-is-no-crisis-at-the-border-and-dhs-stats-prove-it/  https://www.npr.org/2019/01/08/683205814/fact-check-trumps-oval-office-pitch-for-a-border-wall?utm_source=facebook.com&utm_medium=social&utm_campaign=npr&utm_term=nprnews&utm_content=20190108  https://cnn.it/2FqLu0J  https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=2515590041805804&id=908009612563863  So, I see you voted PRO RUSSIA! https://www.nytimes.com/2019/01/16/us/politics/senate-trump-russia-sanctions.html?smid=fb-nytimes&smtyp=cur  During the 2015-2016 election season, Ukrainian-born joint US/UK citizen billionaire Leonard "Len" Blavatnik contributed $6.35 million to leading Republican candidates and incumbent senators. Mitch McConnell was the top recipient of Blavatnik's donations, collecting $2.5 million for his GOP Senate Leadership Fund under the names of two of Blavatnik's holding companies, Access Industries and AI Altep Holdings, according to Federal Election Commission documents and OpenSecrets.org.   Lindsey Graham received $800,000.00 in addition to the benefits of the fund.   Under federal law, foreign nationals are barred from contributing directly or indirectly to political campaigns in local, state and federal elections.   $2.5 million and $800k in a year he wasn’t even running for re-election...why?  https://www.dallasnews.com/opinion/commentary/2017/08/03/tangled-web-connects-russian-oligarch-money-gop-campaigns
BABY DONNY, GROW UP ASSHOLE!    https://www.facebook.com/Upworthy/videos/333822050797836/
rears it's ugly head
All Vile Lib Dem socialist Communists Who Hate Capitalism Freedom and America Feel The Defense of 12 Million Gang Members Millions of Child Molesters PEDOPHILES ROBBERS ILLEGALS RAPISTS KILLERS and Shariah Islam Tists who Kill Gays Transgenders Lesbians their own daughters wives and all women who disobey Maxine Waters BELOVED Shariah Law IS THIER HIGHEST AND MOST IMPORTANT DUTY. FACT !
thats what the bilderbergs and their type of globalist ilk wants. buy america and destroy the white males first. screw you bastards. america forever bitches. many guns waiting for your flake asses.
“Normally President Trump comes down and joins visitors for dinner after he’s spied on Ivanka having her early evening shower, and then retreats to his own bedroom to tuck into a mountain of grease and carbohydrates while watching his favourite Stormy Daniels porno."
Shut your Putin sucker Donnie!
David DeMarinis you are the traitor. No respect, just hate.
TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR
TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR  TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR TRAITOR
WHEN YOU TRUMP ARE WORKING WITH RUSSIA  THAN YOU ARE MAKING AMERICA TO CEASE TO BE A NATION...................AND TURNING AMERICA COMMUNIST.......................IF YOU WERE FOR THE SAFTY OF THIS COUNTRY YOU WOULDNT HAVE LIFTED SANCTIONS ON RUSSIA LAST NIGHT,YOU DID WHAT PUTIN ASK OF YOU...NOW YOU HAVE PUT AMERICAN LIVES AT RISK AND YOU DONT GIVE A DAM.................AND YOU LIES TO YOUR SUPPORTERS SAYING YOUR TOUGH ON RUSSIA.......................IMPEACH TRUMPS ASS............
Build the damn wall run over Nancy and Chuck and the rest of the Dems like a steam roller . Go around them  take care of American tax payers. Go Trump
THANK YOU VERY MUCH PRESIDENT TRUMP THE NATIONS IN THE WORLD WHO WANT PEACE AND TRANGUILITY ADMIRE YOU AND TRUE AMERICANS LOVE YOU AND PRAYING FOR YOU AND YOUR FAMILY EVERYDAY.OUR GOD IS A LOVING GOD THE OTHER SIDE PARTY CALLED DEMONS ARE ONLY WORSHIPING DEVIL.THESE DEMON RATS PARTY IS NOT NOT NOT FOR AMERICA THEY ARE THE DISTROYER.
THANK YOU VERY MUCH PRESIDENT TRUMP THE NATIONS IN THE WORLD WHO WANT PEACE AND TRANGUILITY ADMIRE YOU AND TRUE AMERICANS LOVE YOU AND PRAYING FOR YOU AND YOUR FAMILY EVERYDAY.OUR GOD IS A LOVING GOD THE OTHER SIDE PARTY CALLED DEMONS ARE ONLY WORSHIPING DEVIL.THESE DEMON RATS PARTY IS NOT NOT NOT FOR AMERICA THEY ARE THE DISTROYER.
You’re a god damn incompetent coward whose highest priority is to grift your moron supporters, degrade the integrity of this nation, and dodge the blame when it’s on your shoulders. You and your stooges are a plague. Keep talking about your stupid wall when Isis has just killed four servicemen and an American citizen was killed by terrorists in Africa. But that’s too unpleasant for you to mention because you’re a coward and your supporters are idiots with zero critical thinking skills.
Hay ASS Hole when you Freaking Bloody use American working federal workers as a Ransom to get what you want your a Freaking dictator and a Freaking spoiled little brat because you can't get your Freaking Wall why freaking Keep people from getting paid not acting like a spoiled little boy that is throwing temper tantrum open up the Freaking Government and you still can negotiate on Boader security you No good want to be president what a Freaking Jackass
Yeah I noticed how Canada built a wall. And I travelled all over Europe and you couldn't go anywhere without running into a wall. Even Russia has a wall. Wait a minute. Nope, they all have borders with no walls. How can that be. Do they know something we don't? Ask your Russian buddy how they keep people out.  Not with a wall.
Trump is a pussy
Quite a few kool aid chugging idiots here...want a wall? Then open your wallets, get down to the border, and start building!
Trump's "Brown Shirts"  - Make no mistake, if I had the means, YOU would be on your knees apologizing on their behalf - but it will be enough to see you go to prison.  https://boingboing.net/2019/01/19/mob-of-young-maga-hat-wearers.html?fbclid=IwAR19DOI6bj-W6ZSDDY4vLHCJD9p7bCLG50dQ9tswnYn-oP_LiQtAO-FbwBA
The actual photo before photoshopping his tiny hands and fat ass  https://www.flickr.com/photos/whitehouse/46745079141/in/dateposted/
Lock him up
This moron is doing a campaign rally. He’s so worried about brown people invading his space that he’s allowing the his own people to be cold and starve. Time to impeach. Sick of listening to his whining. Talks like the adderall has kicked in.
You are a fool and you think your supporters are fools, too.
Oh this is gonna be good !!!!!!!!  Former Trump lawyer Michael Cohen asserts that that he paid a small tech firm to rig online polls before the 2016 presidential campaign "at the direction of and the sole benefit of" Donald Trump.
Oh this is gonna be good !!!!!!!!  Former Trump lawyer Michael Cohen asserts that that he paid a small tech firm to rig online polls before the 2016 presidential campaign "at the direction of and the sole benefit of" Donald Trump.
Here's the real 411 on the Shutdown. The Democrat led Congress is Flexing their Muscles over Trump. They Own the Purse Strings and Donald Trump is just like You who are wanting a paycheck. Trump has his hand out asking the Democrats Pelosi & Schumer for his money. SURE you are hearing some Democrat Trolls vilify & blame Trump, but In Reality Trump is only another citizen waiting for Congress to give out the money. He needs money to do the job just like you. SO IF YOU ARE HARBORING SOME DEEP HATE BECAUSE YOU DIDN'T GET YOUR PAYCHECK THEN BLAME THE DEMOCRATS. They are playing Cat and Mouse and the President is now the mouse. REMEMBER the President is just One Branch of the Government. President -Congress-Senate, Supreme Court, they all have "Their Powers."  Just read the Ocasio-Cortez story- Jeez! She's still doesn't know what is going on yet.
You People Do Understand That This Wall Isn't Being Built To Keep Immigrants In, Its to Keep U.S Citizens In & Contained ... Let Martial Law Began Oh Ya Mr.Trump Nice Way To Fake You're Own Death What An Assassination 🙄💁
You People Do Understand That This Wall Isn't Being Built To Keep Immigrants In, Its to Keep U.S Citizens In & Contained ... Let Martial Law Began Oh Ya Mr.Trump Nice Way To Fake You're Own Death What An Assassination 🙄💁
KREMLIN NAMES TRUMP EMPLOYEE OF THE MONTH  https://www.newyorker.com/humor/borowitz-report/kremlin-names-trump-employee-of-the-month?utm_medium=social&utm_brand=tny&mbid=social_facebook&utm_social-type=owned&utm_source=facebook .
He said this while waving the Russian flag folks don;t let him fool you. All that asshole cares about is his own personal wealth.
He said this while waving the Russian flag folks don;t let him fool you. All that asshole cares about is his own personal wealth.
Keep everything shut down till you get us that wall ...Screw the democraps
Now we know where their priorities REALLY lie.  Republicans voted to lift sanctions on a Russian oligarch while refusing to vote to reopen the government. They are #RepublicanScum, doing scummy stuff.
END CONGRESS’S PAY AND BENEFITS NOW AND RETRACT THEIR PAY SINCE THE SHUTDOWN BEGAN! WE ARE SICK AND TIRED OF THEM HOLDING THIS NATION HOSTAGE. THEY ARE GETTING AWAY WITH TERRORISM OF OUR REPUBLIC!
END CONGRESS’S PAY AND BENEFITS NOW AND RETRACT THEIR PAY SINCE THE SHUTDOWN BEGAN! WE ARE SICK AND TIRED OF THEM HOLDING THIS NATION HOSTAGE. THEY ARE GETTING AWAY WITH TERRORISM OF OUR REPUBLIC!
I don't want Trump impeached. I want him to resign in disgrace or have his flabby ass kicked out in 2020. Either way, we're gonna see another Blue Wave in 2020. :) He's such a slimy loser.  Headline: President Trump Directed His Attorney Michael Cohen To Lie To Congress About The Moscow Tower Project  https://www.buzzfeednews.com/article/jasonleopold/trump-russia-cohen-moscow-tower-mueller-investigation
HOW MANY AMERICAN SONS WERE KILLED BY TIMOTHY McVEIGH? THE LAS VEGAS SHOOTER? THE SHERMAN OAKS SHOOTER?? SANDY HOOK?? LITTLE CHILDREN?? BY WHITE AMERICAN MALES!!??? TRUMP DOESN’T CARE ABOUT AMERICAN PEOPLE - HE ONLY CARES CARES ABOUT AMERICAN DOLLARS!!
Benedict Donald, you are a liar, coward and TRAITOR. Prepare for prison in 2019.
Let us be crystal clear about 1 thing. Trump's reasons for wanting a wall have nothing to do with border security. Trump only wants the wall for the same reason why he still believes The Central Park Five are still guilty years after being exonerated (look it up), he believes our first black POTUS is not an American citizen, & why he & his father refused to rent apartments to POC during their real estate days. He believes America is only great if it is the Whites-only, English-speaking only, Christian-only, etc. country that it supposedly was before a man of color had the audacity to run for & win the Presidency twice!!!!!!! He only wants the wall because he is a childish, immature, infantile, narcissistic, petty, spoiled, whiny, vindictive, man-baby, mob boss of a POTUS who believes that the entire world revolves around HIM & HIM ALONE because his rich daddy/parents always made everything work out in his favor with their connections, lawyers, & money rather than properly disciplining him & laying down the law that he will NOT look down on people who are different, he will NOT shut down anyone & everyone who says things which hurt his feelings, he will NOT threaten people & call them childish names & hurl childish insults at them until he gets your way, etc who only got Russia involved in the first place because, since he already had business interests in Russia, & since Putin is a dictator & Russia is a dictatorship, he knew that Putin was the only person & Russia was the only country that he looked at/sat in/test drove when he was shopping around for countries to assist him in getting his own way yet again by stealing the 2016 election who wouldn't automatically tell him to go f*** himself & stick his malignant narcissism where the sun don't shine (up his ass)!!! He is going to have to learn one way or another, & he WILL learn one way or another that the world does not revolve around him & him alone, & that he doesn't get to hold American workers & their paychecks hostage until people give into his little babyish/childish/immature/infantile temper tantrum & give him his wall like a spoiled child whose mommy won't buy him his favorite cereal at the grocery store!!!!!!
Wag the dog moment while holding over a million American citizens hostage.
Wag the dog moment while holding over a million American citizens hostage.
Larry Vincent as a non elitist working class Republican...if any harm comes to President Trump...Yellow Jackets of France will be like chunky cheese to your world
As a citizen of the United States I demand that you resign the presidency and take your Serwer Rat Cabinet, the Republithug eunuchs, and your criminal family with you MORON!
Oh gawd. So not paying our federal employees is good how? Your an idiot and need to jump off a wall. A very tall wall.
Oh gawd. So not paying our federal employees is good how? Your an idiot and need to jump off a wall. A very tall wall.
just what is the matter with these stupid democrats, esp. Pelosi and that guy??  they are a bunch of sick jerks.
just what is the matter with these stupid democrats, esp. Pelosi and that guy??  they are a bunch of sick jerks.
What a rotten son of a bitch you people elected ! He could not get Mexico to pay for his ego wall now thousands of families are suffering. There is NO EXCUSE for a spoiled trust fund baby making working American suffer. IMPEACHMENT NOW!
Border Security is a must.  Keeping Illegal immigrants out of the United States is important.     How would you  feel if your neighbors took the liberty & jumped over the wooden fence in your backyard & invaded your privacy ,& home???
get off yourself trump you are a fucking monster
WAITING FOR YOUR EXECUTIVE ORDER ALONG WITH AN AUTOMATIC FILING TO THE SUPREME COURT  BECAUSE  THE ASSHOLE CIRCUIT JUDGES WHO ARE PARTISAN WILL ATTEMP TO TEMPORARILY BLOCK IT.
You  don’t care  about  the  borders or  the  health  of  our  Nation;  you  only  care  about  yourself.    Narcissistic  dimwit.
What a stubborn idiot
As a Brit you don't know how lucky you are to have Trump who puts America first not like the pathetic left wing snowflake Democrats who put illegals rapists murderers and all scum of the earth first You should thank the Lord for Trump.
As a Brit you don't know how lucky you are to have Trump who puts America first not like the pathetic left wing snowflake Democrats who put illegals rapists murderers and all scum of the earth first You should thank the Lord for Trump.
You are a SMELLY FUCKING TURD. I hope you rot in jail and never see the light of day. POS
The solution is simple.  It should be handled the same way the Obama administration handled Obamacare.  If you refuse to pay for the barrier / wall, you will be fined.  This only seems fair.  'Social justice warriors' claiming to 'defend the high moral ground' can't possibly oppose this equitable solution for all Americans.  Afterall, that would be grossely hypocritical.
Is freaking Sad and embarrassing that we have someone who act like a little two-year-old little snot-nosed  Brat
We will not build Donald Trump's fucking white supremacist wall. We will force our Congressional leaders and Representatives to impeach,  indict and imprison him.
You can't defend borders with a wall idiot.  Try the solutions offered by the Democrats and quit being such a stubborn little boy who can't get his way.
End the shutdown, you embarrassing fool. You will now be remembered as the most inept and disgraceful president ever.
Linda Silver hahaha are u mad lol
Linda Silver Trumps IQ is quite high . What's yours!?
Trump this is total Bullshit! What a Propaganda post ! We will be a Nation and "STUPID Trump" isn't gonna fly in with his tights and cape to save the day ! Trump you are so PATHETIC! Trump,your first and only priority is to open up the Government NOW, so these people can get paid ! Trump, you think that by NOT paying the Border Patrol that there won't be the cartels to swoop in with butt loads of money to tempt these people! Wow, that sounds a might bit CRAZY! There had already been CORRUPTION on the Southern Border !Trump, you are complete imbecile,pay the Coast Guard ASAP, they keep our borders "SAFE" ! If this is Not some kinda of "SiCK " game and a Political ploy to "USE" your CRAZY base,then prove it ! OPEN UP THE GOVERNMENT! I still am interested in where all the 1.6 Billion Dollars that you got in March went ? Why are you asking for an additional 5.7 Billion dollars ? Why hold these Feberal workers "Hostages" just so you can say "I won " ? It should demonstrate to the American people that you don't "Care" about the citizens of this Nation and that you are a "Greedy ,INCOMPETENT,EGOTISTICAL,,LIAR "! Trump your tweet about Schumer is very PATHETIC,you Fired Comey because of the "Russia Thing"! What Trump are you grasping at straws? Trump ,you could go today and TESTIFY to Mueller Face to Face and put it all behind you ,since all of this is just more Distraction from the Meuller investigation! Dude,you still have the option to RESIGN before you are in PRISON! Why don't you just to that,save the country money and time in your IMPEACHMENT hearings !
Trump this is total Bullshit! What a Propaganda post ! We will be a Nation and "STUPID Trump" isn't gonna fly in with his tights and cape to save the day ! Trump you are so PATHETIC! Trump,your first and only priority is to open up the Government NOW, so these people can get paid ! Trump, you think that by NOT paying the Border Patrol that there won't be the cartels to swoop in with butt loads of money to tempt these people! Wow, that sounds a might bit CRAZY! There had already been CORRUPTION on the Southern Border !Trump, you are complete imbecile,pay the Coast Guard ASAP, they keep our borders "SAFE" ! If this is Not some kinda of "SiCK " game and a Political ploy to "USE" your CRAZY base,then prove it ! OPEN UP THE GOVERNMENT! I still am interested in where all the 1.6 Billion Dollars that you got in March went ? Why are you asking for an additional 5.7 Billion dollars ? Why hold these Feberal workers "Hostages" just so you can say "I won " ? It should demonstrate to the American people that you don't "Care" about the citizens of this Nation and that you are a "Greedy ,INCOMPETENT,EGOTISTICAL,,LIAR "! Trump your tweet about Schumer is very PATHETIC,you Fired Comey because of the "Russia Thing"! What Trump are you grasping at straws? Trump ,you could go today and TESTIFY to Mueller Face to Face and put it all behind you ,since all of this is just more Distraction from the Meuller investigation! Dude,you still have the option to RESIGN before you are in PRISON! Why don't you just to that,save the country money and time in your IMPEACHMENT hearings !
Your a liar. Plain, simple and to the point.
Your all like lambs to the slaughter blindly following this fool. Next you'll be saying you believe in Jesus,  hahaha!
Donald Trump is a BABY!  A Big Fat Stupid BABY who desperately needs adult supervision.  No wonder New York Society rejected him.  He doesn’t have a scintilla of class or intelligence in his morbidly obese body.  What kind of cheap infantile idiot invites a group to the White House and gives them fast food burgers and fries to eat.  Pathetic!
Idiot!!The U.S has always defended its border.Stop making a crisis out of nothing.
There was a conspiracy to fix a election  did you hear that there was collusion  with a foreign hostile government ! Lock him up! Lock him up! Take all these treasonous  coconspirators  down with treasonous  donnie
Shithole President Donald J. Trump.
WE HAVE ALL KINDS OF PRISONS ACROSS THE U.S.A THAT HAVE BEEN CLOSED AND YET HAVE PERFECTLY GOOD FENCES AROUND THEM.. WE HAVE SEVERAL PEOPLE IN THE PRISONS SITTING ON THEIR BUTTS... HAVE THEM TAKE THE FENCES DOWN AROUND OUR UN-USED PRISONS AND MOVE THEM TO THE BOARDER!!! IT'S CALLED A REFURBISHED FENCE ALREADY PAID FOR BY THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!!
You’re a crook you’re a fraud and you’re a fucking joke Mr. President
You’re a crook you’re a fraud and you’re a fucking joke Mr. President
Most of you hate trump because your freinds would hate you if you liked him.
Has anybody figured out why Americans Against Nancy Pelosi IS AFRAID of the #SOTU? She doesn’t want to face all the #AngelFamilies that President Donald J. Trump is sure to invite and sit up in the gallery. That will be thee most #EpicFail to date... I say open the press room “sans” The #LameStreamMedia with all these families that have been affected in this 30+ year #crisis in attendance.... Let’s be honest here, the reason there are so many people wanting to come here, is all the jobs being created. Some of those jobs can’t be taken by Americans because they can’t pass #drugtests all because some of those illegals, and those temporarily employed by the Obama armed #cartels are bringing the drugs from down souf.... it’s the half circle that needs to end, or at the least deterred by any means necessary.... If we were to give job performance “evals” to the dimocRATs at this time, they’d all receive #pinkslips.... They were hired for one job, and as of this moment, their work ethics are lacking, egregiously. It’s seriously time to move forward with the recall of both House Speaker Nancy Pelosi and Senator Chuck Schumer. They both lack fortitude. They must’ve gotten into the ineptitude line by mitsake....
While you starve the citizens, much like Putin and Kim Jong-un are doing.  When do you start murdering your political enemies and the LGTB community?  You are already complacent in the murder of journalists.
If he would come to El Paso and speak about how "Hold the Line" implemented by former USBP Director EP Sector, former US Congressman, Reyes, it would be a great positive proof about how the "Wall" has lowered crime exponentially.  He has statistics and Facts to prove it.  Ya know what? Perhaps this is why buses of caravan invaders were dropped off in our city. Perhaps to undermine and chang those statics in favor of the Democratic false narrative.   Oh, those sneaky snakes. 🐍
News conference  hey asshole you do America a favor and QUIT you fat fucking loser
The Republican party as a whole and it saddens me that some African Americans support this.  "What you really need to do is go back in the ’30s, when they outlawed all types of drugs in Kansas (and) across the United States. What was the reason why they did that? One of the reasons why, I hate to say it, was that the African Americans, they were basically users and they basically responded the worst off to those drugs just because of their character makeup, their genetics, and that.  Alford’s comments referenced a belief promoted by marijuana prohibitionist Harry Anslinger, the founding commissioner of the Federal Bureau of Narcotics.  “Under Anslinger’s leadership, the FBN came to be considered responsible for the Marijuana Tax Act of 1937,” the report noted, “regulating cannabis and further taxing it to the ultimate detriment of the hemp industry that was booming at the time.”  “Reefer makes darkies think they’re as good as white men,” Anslinger said once when explaining why marijuana supposedly caused crime and violence. The commissioner also fought for the prohibition of cannabis due to “its effect on the degenerate races.” "  https://www.patheos.com/blogs/progressivesecularhumanist/2018/01/gop-lawmaker-blacks-cant-handle-marijuana-genetics/?utm_medium=social&utm_source=share_bar&fbclid=IwAR1a0r6zt3lIAcIO4el5QMMrUbkxjQcIiXmhb0VqxyrhcukaAC1GqunkSjM#ZL0Xf6bLCtu2GRhH.01
YOUR A DISCUSTING UNCLE TOM
KREMLIN NAMES TRUMP EMPLOYEE OF THE MONTH  https://www.newyorker.com/humor/borowitz-report/kremlin-names-trump-employee-of-the-month?utm_medium=social&utm_brand=tny&mbid=social_facebook&utm_social-type=owned&utm_source=facebook .
We have ZERO Moral Authority in the world as long as you are leading us.  You’ve sold our nation to enrich yourself.  NOTHING “Great” about America with you in the WH.  MANY Are Getting Arrested #MAGA
with you as LIAR n THIEF, and as RUSSIAN ASSET YOU ALREADY SUCCEEDED THAT !
George Washington's State of the Union Address was a letter FOR THE PEOPLE OF AMERICA....and it was the FOUNDATION of The State of the Union Address...until Democrat President Woodrow Wilson made it a PR STUNT for politicians to gather and pat each other on the back!  Is Nancy Pelosi's "dissing" really a GIFT IN DISGUISE?  President Donald Trump has three choices.  1. He can start a twitter campaign calling out Nancy Pelosi for this, and we get another expensive boring "Dog and Pony show" none of us look forward to.  2. He could take the "Dog and Pony Show" out of Washington, D.C. and go back to what President George Washington did. Actually report to the legal and law abiding American's, call out the division, call out for term limits, call out for real reform in immigration via a demanding for the Visa Programs, Refugee status, having a wall/fence/barrier put in place and sharing that before he was elected, Democrats were willing to invest over 30 BILLION for a wall/fence/barrier for the protection, much like on their own private properties to protect themselves and their family, the legal and law abiding "American Family."  3. He goes ahead with the State of the Union...BUT, he walks in to the room this is held empty, for a "one on one" talk with the legal and law abiding American citizens that last 5-10 minutes at the most.  He walks in and doesn't even go to the podium. He sits down in a chair where the Democrats are not present, and tells the cameraman to pan around that room, showing the emptiness. He then addresses us.  He address the fact can be shown we need TERM LIMITS (What more American's want even more than a wall/fence/barrier) on Congress to get back to those actually doing their job, nothing more and nothing less, and it has become crystal clear, through mostly Lobbyism/Lobbists Congress cannot do their real job any more. Then talk about Senator Ted Cruz's attempt to pass a Bill to Law for TERM LIMITS on both The House and The Senate to get back to their assigned, through the Constitution of the United States, jobs!  He reminds us it is WE THE PEOPLE are their bosses. We foot the bills/pay the bills that they make, and way too many bills are being given to us that they have no right, per their Constitutional Oath, and we have to let our voices be heard.  (Traveling to DC has proven to not be a motivator for Congress...but we hold the real purse-strings, and the BIGGEST MOVE we could make is show we don't need the IRS, the real LIFEBLOOD of theft for politicians on us. Just look at the Socialist and Communist leaders in many states stealing tax dollars by finding ways to tax everything. EVEN WATER!!!!) DOWNSIZE THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT (This shut down is showing we don't need HALF of what we are paying for Federally!) PASS TERM LIMITS ON CONGRESS AND JUDGES! GET RID OF TENURE! FORCE OUR TRUE REPRESENTATIVES IN CONGRESS TO LIVE IN THEIR HOME STATE NOT WASHINGTON! BUILD THE WALL/FENCE/BARRIER! ENFORCE VISA'S, REFUGEE AND OTHER TIME LIMITED NON-CITIZENSHIP AGREEMENTS! BRING BACK THE DEATH PENALTY TO DAY OF CONVICTION EXECUTIONS FOR CONVICTED MURDERERS, RAPISTS, MOLESTERS, PEDOPHILES, KIDNAPPERS, TERRORISTS, THOSE THAT AID THESE AND THOSE THAT FALSELY ACCUSE THESE WHETHER THEY ARE LEGAL CITIZENS OR ILLEGAL ALIENS!
You cant 'defend' your own nation while undermining the very intelligence agencies sworn to protect it. You've lied all your life and gotten away with it. Now you work for us and its all caught up to you. Time to pay the piper...and his name is Mueller. A very capable republican who is putting country first over party, over his own interests and his own pockets. Bye bye lil' Donnie.                                      https://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-6605677/Sources-claim-Trump-directed-Cohen-lie-Congress-Trump-Tower-Moscow.html
Trump is nothing more then a baby he cries over what a dam wall he's shut down the dam government who does that I'd tell him to his face he's nothing more then a rich man who wants his way making america great again bs trump pack up your bags let a real man run this world not some spoiled rich man i got a great idea build a wall around him what's next for this dumb ass
The time has come to make being a Democrat illegal. In order to be a political party in America, you should resemble something American. The Democrat party has not resembled anything close to American in 50+ years.
The time has come to make being a Democrat illegal. In order to be a political party in America, you should resemble something American. The Democrat party has not resembled anything close to American in 50+ years.
ASSHOLE
We are the most heavily defended country on earth. Illegal immigration is at its lowest point in 50 years after falling for the 10th straight year.  The majority of illegal immigrants flew in and overstayed visas. 90% of all illegal drugs are smuggled in through border crossings. You are a liar who wants a PR stunt.
You are absolutely right and that is EXACTLY what the DEMOCCULT Party and the rest of the bought-and-paid-for party puppets want to happen!  AMERICA FIRST!  AMERICA STRONG! AMERICA FOREVER! <3 <3 🇺🇸🎚🙏 BUILD THE WALL!!
Nancy Have you by the b@lls!  RESIGN!  You are a FRAUD,Nancy Pelosi Has the President Outmatchedgq.com
You're incompetent AF!  Your presidency is a fraud  #fakepresident
MR PRESIDENT,  PLEASE BUILD THE WALL.   I TELL PEOPLE WHO THINK THAT IT IS USELESS,  TO POST THEIR ADDRESS AND OPEN THEIR DOORS  24/7 SO THAT MS-13 AND OTHERS CAN ENJOY  ALL THAT THEY OWN.
Get all the illegals put them in buses  to Air Port stocked them up in Military Cargo Plains  RETURN TO SENDER.  NO wast money or people time.  JUST DO IT.
Maybe you should just invade central and South America then, you pathological lying fraud.
A wall doesn't fix the problem.  We don't have open borders. in fact our borders are more closed than most, with some of the highest costs and hardest requurements to immigrate legally. Those that would try to cross the border illegally are typically stopped and turned back. Most illegal immigrants had work visa's and overstay, and usually arrive in airports. A wall doesn't fix the problem. Its just grand-standing.
Mr President we know you are  fighting demons just know God the Father is the One with Power. Let them bring it on!  🤘
You’re a fucking idiot!!!! You are the crisis!!!! Resign you pos! We the people want you in prison you fucking traitor!!!!! You and your family are deplorable, disgusting and a complete disgrace!!!!
You’re a fucking idiot!!!! You are the crisis!!!! Resign you pos! We the people want you in prison you fucking traitor!!!!! You and your family are deplorable, disgusting and a complete disgrace!!!!
Then stop the men caravans. You know it’s the government purge around the world letting men in all these countries. Women are extremely few and a distraction. World terrorism is being planned Globally
You knew damn well when you were campaigning on the fact that Mexico would pay you we're talking to the dumbest among us and you knew how you were going to try to get that wall paid for you miserable jackass
The only reason Trump promised a wall was to get the votes of the uneducated,  which he said he loves.  Then hecame up with the idea to say Mexico would pay for it,  to get not only the uneducated votes,  but votes of people who did not want our government to pay for it.  Trump knew he could not accomplish this wall all along. Didn't really do anything about it while the republicans had the house and Senate.  Now that the democrats have the house,  he is making a big deal out of it. This way,  he will blame the democrats when it doesn't get built. But he did say he was proud to shut down the government.
Real News from a republican no less.                                                                                                                                                                                   Former New Jersey Gov. Chris Christie reportedly delivers a savage critique of President Donald Trump’s inner circle in his upcoming book, Let Me Finish.                                                                                                       Christie wrote that Trump has a “revolving door of deeply flawed individuals” working for him in the White House.                                                                                                       They are “amateurs, grifters, weaklings, convicted and unconvicted felons” who “were hustled into jobs they were never suited for, sometimes seemingly without so much as a background check via Google or Wikipedia
You let 4 soldiers die in Syria. How can protect the country? Send your sons to war? You can say anything and stupid Americans believe it.
Liar,  you think of yourself period.  All your criminal friends and family are on th pike and your turn is coming. all your lies are being surfaced plus your traitor action with Russia.
If you dont pay your workers...you're an ASSHOLE.
I pray over you Mr. President  It's a shame you have these crazy Democrats..all they are are kids who wasnt ever punished in their youth.. May God lead you with His hand and deliver you from evil,  and the Democrats who think they are all powerful.. I pray you smite them all and show them who the Real Boss is..In Jesus name.. To God be the Glory forever and ever.. Democrats...you are not In control of anything... but The all mighty God.. Blessed be the name of the Lord
I HAVE REACHED THE EXALTED POSITION OF A HATE MONGER [According to Facebook].  Basically, Facebook Deems That Any of My Posts [In the Parlance of Terms and Conditions Are in ANY WAY UNFLATTERING with Regard to Illegal Aliens / Other Citizens] Are to Be Considered as HATE SPEECH AND WILL NOT BE POSTED.  The Offending Posts Are Shaded in Grey and Will Be Destroyed When I Leave the Web Page on Which the Post Was Entered.  This Flies in the Name of Logic as Many of My Posts ARE COMPRISED OF LINKS to Documentation Available in the Public Records [e.g. []- DOJ ... There Are over 56,000 ILLEGAL ALIENS in the Federal Prison System So Why Should We Let More in ??; []- DOJ ... It Is a Crime to Emote That the President and Members of Congress Should Be SUBJECT TO PHYSICAL HARM].  Animal Farm Rears It’s Ugly Head ... ONLY LIBERALS KNOW THE TRUTH OF POLITICAL MATTERS !! =+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+= MY FILE || csfe2015\ facebook\ f_share\ family\ cour10ay\ 2016\ CE0803_A.wpd
Laughable. Then you should have made it a priority when you had control of congress for 2 years. More LIES from the pathological liar!!! 👎
How does that fit with your surrender to Russia 🇷🇺. Puppet.
How does that fit with your surrender to Russia 🇷🇺. Puppet.
this is a stupid badly educated giant baby, you hardly bear his tweet. These are just cheap and stupid, he takes over 800,000 civil servants in hostage, this monster.Amerika awake and finally throw him out.🤮
But not the lives of the actual people you have been elected to represent? Got it. You're a cancer and I cant wait until you are removed.
but but were supposed to be the only  country to not have them because shitbag Pelosi and Schumer say so
Then why are you leaving our airports, borders, and seaports undermanned and vulnerable by holding our country hostage.  Terrorists come here mostly by plane. Drug trafficking organizations have also taken to the air. Border Patrol and other law enforcement agents have encountered smugglers using ultralight aircraft to conduct drug drops. Customs and Border Protection data showed that ultralight aircraft may have been used to transport drugs on 534 occasions from 2011 to 2016. Drones have also been used.In recent years, the Coast Guard and Customs and Border Protection have started to see small speedboats from Mexico used to smuggle drugs into the United States, particularly in California, in an effort to get around border walls and Border Patrol agents. From 2011 to 2016, border officials said there were 309 known attempts to smuggle drugs across the border using boats; officials said there was no way of knowing how many boats actually reach shore.
Then do something about the illegals who overstay their visas.
Then do something about the illegals who overstay their visas.
My husband is retired government, our daughter and a son in law, work for the government. Daughter is on leave, son in law is still working and being paid. Yes it is hurting some now, but everyone must pull together help those waiting for a pay check.  Stand firm we must protect our borders. We are behind the president 100%  Keep the borders closed until the money is allocated.  A guestion, what happened to the 50 billon that was supposed to be set aside in 2006 under the Bush administration, that Obama was supposed to use to build the wall?   Palosi, Hillary and Shumer signed it. They are hypocrites. I honestly wish that the Democrats could get a wake up from God. Even God in the Bible sanction walls.
if we dont get you and your cohorts out of our WH we cease to be a nation.  please die and take mikie with you.
Rod Novoa and you POS Socialist commie's playing the victim card all the time is a fraud, I hope I get to see you POS Socialist commie's get a taste of your own death and oppression medicine!
Rod Novoa and you POS Socialist commie's playing the victim card all the time is a fraud, I hope I get to see you POS Socialist commie's get a taste of your own death and oppression medicine!
I AM AMAZED AT PRESIDENT TRUMP. I DON'T SEE HOW HE KEEPS UP WITH ALL OF THIS. HE HAS TO HAVE THINGS HITTING HIM AT 90 MPH FROM THE DEMONIC, DEMENTED DEMS CONSTANTLY AND HE SEEMS TO MANAGE SO WELL!! HE IS TRULY, TRULY AN AMAZING MAN!! HE SURELY HAS MY VOTE IN THE NEXT ELECTION. HOWEVER, THE MAN IS A BILLIONAIRE. I DON'T KNOW WHAT BEHEST HIM TO TAKE ON THE HUGE PROBLEM OF BEING PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES....ESPECIALLY FOR NO PAY!! IF I WERE HIM, I WOULD BE SPENDING MY TIME ON THE BEACHES OF THE WORLD AND FORGET ABOUT FIGHTING THE DEMENTED DEMS. HE DOESN'T NEED THE MONEY AND HE DOESN'T NEED THE AGGRAVATION AND PROBLEMS BEING PRESIDENT BRINGS. I LOVE THIS MAN FOR GIVING HIS ALL TO AMERICA!!!
If the defense of our nation is so important to you then why did you shut down the government and now disgruntled TSA workers aren’t doing their job correctly therefore endangering the lives of hundreds of Americans. Democrats are just as much to blame as well. And trump supporters are so dumb they only blame them and don’t see that trump has as much blame. You people are dumbasses 🤣
Well, actually.....  TRUMP IS FRAYING NERVES INSIDE THE PENTAGON  Washington (CNN) — Two years into his presidency, Donald Trump is fueling unprecedented uncertainty and anxiety inside the Pentagon. In private conversations over the past month, many of them unsolicited, more than a dozen key military officers, enlisted personnel and senior civilians have expressed worry and concern to CNN. None of the officials have spoken publicly about this, as military law prohibits active-duty personnel from criticizing a sitting president. It's not just Trump's unpredictable decision making that has officials on edge, it's also his penchant for politicizing the military— something that's come into focus in recent months as he's struggled to fulfill his campaign promise to crack down on immigration and build a border wall. His decision to draw down troops in Syria and his claims that ISIS is defeated have also rankled military commanders who felt it wasn't well thought out. Some of the highest-ranking officers say there is a new atmosphere of unease inside the Pentagon, particularly among some of the most senior ranks, over the President's inclination to use the military to achieve certain partisan policy objectives. Behind the scenes officials are trying to keep it all at bay. "The amount of time we have to spend making sure our statements and what we say is apolitical is astronomically higher than ever before," one senior military officer told CNN. If commanders order the troops to perform a mission for reasons that are political — rather than based on national security grounds — the fundamental nature of the US military is changed, several officials worry. That line has already been crossed in the minds of some over the issue of sending troops to the border. It could become even more of a problem should the President decide to declare a national emergency to gain access to Defense Department funds to build the wall. R E A D  O N....  https://cnn.it/2FFdNbG .
Such an ugly man. Inside and out.
Keep on the same path Mr. President.. don't let anyone kick you off your doorstep.
Keep on the same path Mr. President.. don't let anyone kick you off your doorstep.
The only ones who don’t want it are criminal gangs, cartels, organized syndicates and democrats who profit from CASH donations in Brown bag 💰 to be elected and keep things as they are
TRANSLATION: "As President, I really enjoy scaring the hell out of my dimwitted supporters because it makes me feel greater and more powerful than even my own over-inflated view of myself. It's good to be a tyrant as long there are voters who are stupid enough to let me treat them like peasants."
Article IV Section 4 of the Constitution requires them to secure our border. I care not what CNN told you. Schumer & Pelosi are guilty of treason for aiding hostile foreign invaders  (Section 3). I stand with you Mr. President
POTUS;   If i do not defend immigrants then you would be running your mouth at will.     "I AM, BEFORE YOU WERE; ALWAYS AND FOREVER SIR."  PURO MEXICO SIR! See you soon pervert.   Respectfully;  Omar Martinez
What wall will defend us from Russian comrade in the White House?  “The 362-53 vote registers formal House disapproval of plans to relax sanctions against companies controlled by Russian President Vladimir Putin ally, Oleg Deripaska, and comes despite last-minute appeals by Treasury Secretary Steven Mnuchin. A similar measure narrowly failed in the Senate this week, despite 11 Republicans breaking ranks to vote with Democrats.”
The orange cancer is a disgrace to the office Putin put him in , he's a failed estate agent putting America back 60 years
Trump 2020! Stop the socialists anti-American demorats! You can't secure the border without the wall,  700,000 homeless children's in America, but demorats care for illegal children and criminal  parents that croos the border illegal.  America first! Legal immigration over illegal immigrant.  IMPEACH PELOSI AND SCHUMER . DEMOCRATS ARE ANTI-AMERICAN.....THEY SUCK BIGTIME.
One thing I got to say is mankind is one messed-up species I'm surprised we survived this long we are idiots go President Trump best president ever there's a reason why we are different religions we are different colors we speak different languages and we're Dems and Republicans so that we can kill each other and we will Idiots but that is the master plan and you can't get away from it 5 Seconds to genius
Susan A. Holmberg, most drugs come through check points, human bodies, planes, etc. Hell, the drug cartels, can spend an extra couple of hundred dollars to go to Canada first then here. I mean damn...they have submarines and bring them all up and down the coast. You think an ignorant wall will stop them, lmbo! They are laughing at us!
U RICH MOTHER FUCKER ! PAY FOR THAT WALL U WANT SO GOD DAM BAD. U SCARED TO PAY FOR IT OUT OF UR POCKET ? WE WANT TO KNOW RIGHT NOW !
Bullshit… You’re not getting your wall and you look like a loser
It's a common sense statement, don't know why everyone is so upset about it. Any normal idiot locks their car when they park and you all lock up your houses at night. Why wouldn't you do it to your own COUNTRY? Dumb asses everywhere, it seems.
It's a common sense statement, don't know why everyone is so upset about it. Any normal idiot locks their car when they park and you all lock up your houses at night. Why wouldn't you do it to your own COUNTRY? Dumb asses everywhere, it seems.
ALL THE LEFTISTS TROLLS ON HERE SHOULD #WALKAWAY YOU WOULD FEEL SO MUCH BETTER ALL THAT HATE WILL DIE AND YOU CAN BE PART OF A GREAT MOVEMENT. YOUR LIVES WILL BE MORE MANAGABLE YOU WON'T HAVE TO WAKE EVERY MORNING FEELING SO MUCH HATE IN YOUR EVIL HEARTS. #WALKAWAY.
Lying ass !
You idiot
You are a fucking joke to America! Thanks for shuttig down everything and fucking over hard working American's. You are a douch!
You are a fucking joke to America! Thanks for shuttig down everything and fucking over hard working American's. You are a douch!
Moron
Orange fool
The borders has been the same for as long as I've been alive and we have never ceased to be a nation.  Trump, you're getting more and more stupid every day.  I can't wait till your ass is out of office.
The borders has been the same for as long as I've been alive and we have never ceased to be a nation.  Trump, you're getting more and more stupid every day.  I can't wait till your ass is out of office.
BUILD THE WALL. Truth is a bedrock foundation. Continue to call out the Socialist, Marxist as they are. Define who they are, and the abject failure their ideas are. And their messengers for who that they are. This is cultural war we are engaged in. They are afraid of you because you got elected from outside their system. You will be in charge for another 6 years. It is time to put them in the dust pile of history as an abject failure. Run our country as the business model that made you successful. Thank you for your service to our country Sir! Semper Fi Mr. President. Saepius Exertus, Semper Fidelis, Frater Infinitas. Often tested, always faithful, brothers forever.
THEN SHUT DOWN THE BORDERS OR NATIONAL EMERGENCY it is not smart to wait on deal with dems ,they want open borders, they have the security at there houses
You trash
You trash
Reading of the letter to the Hebrews (3, 7-14)  The Holy Spirit says: Oh, that today you would hear his voice,  "Harden not your hearts as at the rebellion in the day of testing in the desert, where your ancestors tested and tried me and saw my works for forty years. Because of this I was provoked with that generation and I said, 'They have always been of erring heart, and they do not know my ways.' As I swore in my wrath, " They shall not enter into my rest. "' Take care, brothers and sisters, that none of you may have an evil and unfaithful heart, so as to forsake the living God. Encourage yourselves daily while it is still "today,"  so that none of you may grow hardened by the deceit of sin. We have become partners of Christ if only we hold the beginning of the reality firm until the end.  Word of God. Praise you, Lord.
Moron
Gobshite
YOU GODDAM FOOLS! GUESS WHAT ASS!!! PAY ATTENTION: Trump TOLD Cohen to LIE to Congress! And it was backed up by ELECTRONIC surveillance! #MICDROP #Treason #Collusion
Asshat
Traitor!
turd
Traitor
Wanker
Wanker
Traitor.
Dumbass 🤡
Infidels
You are such a pathetic Con-Artist!!!! Can't you see that all you have following you is a bunch of ignorant REDNECKS?
IMBECILE
Idiot
Horseshit.
Ban guns.
Traitor
Your wall is not protecting our country.   This is a made up crisis by a fake president who doesn't have a brain or a soul.
Moron!
Traitor
Ok, I do agree with him but I'm tired of hearing politics just declare a national emergency get the wall built and reopen the government and move on to other things that need attention. Like law, enforcement reform get more cops better trained and crack down on crime and violence. Make guns more readily available to able-bodied citizens and if you wanna go big dissolve the democratic party they serve no purpose to us and only damage our nation with hate and bigotry.
Ok, I do agree with him but I'm tired of hearing politics just declare a national emergency get the wall built and reopen the government and move on to other things that need attention. Like law, enforcement reform get more cops better trained and crack down on crime and violence. Make guns more readily available to able-bodied citizens and if you wanna go big dissolve the democratic party they serve no purpose to us and only damage our nation with hate and bigotry.
You and your family are  a National security threat, you all will sell America's secrets to the highest bidder. You all are treasonous traitor conmen.
clown
clown
More terrorists come in from canada than mexico. Drugs come through legal ports of entry.  Stop holding the country hostage, ahab
Your a yuge FAILURE stop fear mongering ......your only trying to throw bloody meat to your base ....to create a smoke screen ....noone in their right mind believes a word you say .....why not just resign ? Thatd be your 1st step to actually making america great again
And the left knows this and just look at them, Homo's and foreigners?
And the left knows this and just look at them, Homo's and foreigners?
This wall distraction isn't going to work. Neither will shutting down the government. Mueller is coming for you and soon you'll be in prison. Traitor.
Trump is a doo doo head. LOL 😆
Trump is the WORST president ever in the history of the United States 🇺🇸 of America. He is a disgrace that continues to ruin and embarrass its citizens!!!
Why are people so STUPID?!?  Republicans complain that Democrats voted FOR border security repeatedly, but now that it's Trump, they are voting against it. If Democrats voted for it before, where did this ridiculous LIE that they support "open borders"? Do you people even LISTEN to ANYTHING?!? And, as point of FACT, Democrats have voted FOR border security this time as well. They just won't let Trump waste BILLIONS of taxpayer dollars on his vanity project. Unlike Republicans, the Democrats are actually holding Trump accountable for being an idiot. And Trump and his sheep are constantly whining that Obama "lied", and yet you hypocrites don't have the slightest problem with the fact that Trump CAMPAIGNED on taxpayers NOT PAYING FOR THE WALL, ANY OF YOU REMEMBER THAT?!? His constant "Mexico will pay for it", and his current "Mexico IS paying for it......indirectly" bullshit was obviously NEVER going to happen.... But whatever happened to his rallying cry of NO AMERICAN TAXPAYER MONEY WILL GO TO PAY FOR THE WALL, I GUARANTEE IT?  Clearly, just MORE PROOF that his word, just like the "man" himself, isn't worth a damn thing.
Trumps fat
Oh I thought your campaign for 2020 was your most important duty. Your legacy will be that you made the lives of so very many Americans MISERABLE. You HATED on Americans. You DISCRIMINATED on Americans. You LIED to Americans. You COLLUDED with Russia. But, your ultimate legacy will be far different. You will always be known as the President that DIVIDED AMERICA. Imagine all the good you could have done. You were given the ultimate American opportunity and you squandered it on selfish goals. You could have been great but you just lacked the most critical skill. You lacked the ability to understand the whole of America. Your predecessors understood the importance of being a president for ALL but you missed that. You never stopped being that New York Realtor. What a waste. What a tragic waste.
You promised 200 times that Mexico is paying for the wall. Plus, why didn't you vote for it for the two years where you controlled the Senate and the house? Must not have been TOO important ya MORON!
IMPEACH!
Oh go suck UR own dick trump. U rich fucker can pay for that wall. U scared to pay for that wall ? Hum ! Yes !
Then why are 4 Americans dead in Syria. Could it be the weakness you showed Putin by promising to remove troops for him made us seem weak to ISIS. And also the fact you announced to the world that ISIS was defeated they had to prove they were not. Or when you empower hate group causing a 17%^ increase in hate crimes as well as an increase in school shooting. Or maybe not paying border patrol TSA inspectors and coast guard makes us safer. https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/how-trump-just-made-america-less-safe_us_5888fe22e4b0628ad613ddb2
If we sell out to russia and ignore trumps collusion we will cease to be a nation.
If we sell out to russia and ignore trumps collusion we will cease to be a nation.
donald The HIGHEST and MOST IMPORTANT DUTY you have in keeping our country safe is STOP THE DOMESTIC TERRORISM/VIOLENCE IN OUR OWN COUNTRY.  NO WALL needed for that and NO WALL needed to fix IMMIGRATION LAWS where those who are only here on temporary visas ARE STILL HERE!  For those of you who probably are NOT familiar with what that means is that the 9/11 terrorists gained LEGAL entry here through the immigration system.  FOUR of the terrorists were here on business visas and FOURTEEN of the terrorists were here on 6 month tourist visas!  They had ALL expired.  As far as the wall goes if our children and citizens of domestic terrorism here are protected by thoughts and prayers that is good enough for the southern border!  Most of you have NEVER even been to the southern border.  I lived on the southern border many years being part of a military family and I guarantee you a wall is useless.
Democrats are against the wall for one reason....... they put their hate for President Trump and their two year long temper tantrum above everything else. They will sacrifice the country and American lives to push their agenda of hate and obstruction.   Democrats are so desperate. They will do anything to hide facts that don’t fit their agenda.   Funny how the Democrats don’t want the non citizens counted on the census.   Teachers in California on strike because of low pay, lack of supplies and overcrowded classrooms. How many of the students in those over crowded classrooms are illegal immigrants? State of California can’t pay teachers a fair wage but they are a Sanctuary State and want free healthcare for all illegal immigrants.   Remember a few years ago when the Democrats wanted a “fence / wall” and voted to fund it. Funny how they are against it now because President Trump wants the wall.   Remember a few years ago when Obama declared there was a “Humanitarian Crisis” on the southern  border. Funny how Democrats now says the “Humanitarian Crisis” on the southern border is a fake / made up Crisis.   How are those Democrat policies working out?   It really takes a special kind of stupid to still support the Democrats.
If the Russians controlled the President of the United States— what are things they would want him to do:  - shut down the U.S. Government   - ease sanctions, particularly key Putin associates   - undermine and propose pulling out of NATO  - disrupt U.S. allied relationships  - start disruptive trade wars   - discredit U.S. intelligence, law enforcement, and judicial systems   - fill the Government leadership with people who have no relevant experience, give them a mandate of dismantle and neglect, and throw in a healthy dash of graft and corruption  - pull out of Syria  - pull out of Afghanistan   - turn our back on the Ukraine   - turn our back on the Kurds   - support extreme white supremacy groups   - support Brexit and disrupt the EU  - undermine the free press  - undermine the U.S. electoral process  - destroy all records and keep secret the content of discussions from 5 in person meetings with trump since being elected   What else??
Fake president conspires with Russia to steal the election.
Maolmhuireadh MacMaghnuis congress liars thieves murdering with manufacturers who fill their pockets but no protection for citizens including trump  Fire congress give money to unprotected rescuers  Under severe xhenical bullet attacks. Congress Warren will not simply put. No seeds to a plant to a product which ingested causes loss of soft tissues including wounds in brain.  Murdering sift tissilyes of a body should not be allowed. on detoxification of chemicals murdering millions because fraid ads
Lying scumbag, whipping your dullard followers into a froth-mouthed frenzy over a mere administrative issue. You're a damned disgrace.
You’re full of crap, you spoiled, petulant traitor.
You’re full of crap, you spoiled, petulant traitor.
DEMOCRATS - When you can’t raise money through individual donations - you STEAL IT FROM THE AMERICAN TAXPAYER.  PLANNED PARENTHOOD - $1.5 BILLION we give them over a 3 year period. PP disclosed $30 MILLION - closer to $65 MILLION in taxpayer subsidies to influence the outcome of the 2018 ELECTION. So we give money to these crooks and they support the Democrat Party.
What a moron
The soil of Afghanistan is hell for the invaders
Democrats are like sperm cells only 1 in 10 million has a chance to become a human being
Wrong, Comrade Bullshit! No one believes your lyin' cheatin' mouth. Go directly to jail.
People cussing him and calling him the worst names they can think of and relying on him to protect them by giving him nothing to protect them with. Hate blinds their logic. All this because he beat their candidate!! 🙄 WOW...
Yes, because if the last 200 years of US history has taught us anything (and I know it has not taught most of you Trump supporters anything), it's that the US needs borders to survive.. How stupid are you Americans? You have spent the last 200 years expanding your influence all over the globe, invading border after border.. and now you have the audacity to ask for a wall to keep the very people you have invaded and schemed against, out? What a bunch of hypocritical morons.. millions of Americans are on the verge of homelessness and destitute, yet all you care about is the "dangerous" immigrants..
If we don't protect our children, our seniors, our citizens from polluted drinking water, toxic air, harmful food and provide them medical care then we cease to be serving, defending and representing the people...you are a traitor to America.
If we don't protect our children, our seniors, our citizens from polluted drinking water, toxic air, harmful food and provide them medical care then we cease to be serving, defending and representing the people...you are a traitor to America.
President Trump.. please close our borders and order all illegals to be deported to open up jobs for our military men and women whom you are bringing home. #AmericaFirst!
If it’s “defense of our nation” and not deterrence from our nation, just authorize lethal force. A lot cheaper than a barrier. If someone enters illegally, neutralize them. Soon word will get around and the invaders will find somewhere else to play.
Being a agent of Russia is whats important to you WE SEE YOU IDIOT
Four Americans killed by ISIS in Syria. Now, either you do not know what you are talking about claiming ISIS is defeated or you are a liar. Has your claim of defeating ISIS in Syria caused this killing to prove you are wrong? The security of your armed forces abroard should be as serious as your border security with Mexico.
Four Americans killed by ISIS in Syria. Now, either you do not know what you are talking about claiming ISIS is defeated or you are a liar. Has your claim of defeating ISIS in Syria caused this killing to prove you are wrong? The security of your armed forces abroard should be as serious as your border security with Mexico.
This Motherfucker! You like. Being lied to and grabbing pussy
I think you need to take a closer look at what you’re important duties are for this country. First of all it is to unite the people of this country! Something you failed to do since day one. Second of all it is to work across the aisle to ensure the safety of this country and by shutting down the government is certainly no way of doing that.  you have endangered our country even more by your actions. Second of all as a veteran I have serious concerns about our troops. When I was in the military we did not discuss the president. I served under Ronald Reagan. We did not discuss the president we did not discuss politics we did not discuss political parties. We had a job to do and that was defend this country. We did not need division between troops. We had to be there to protect each other the only person that had my back it was the man standing next to me. I had to be able to trust him with my life and he trusted me with his. We never discussed political parties we never wanted any kind of division in our battalions. So politics it was never discussed.  I’m afraid things have changed in the military today. And I see our troops been divided. That is the biggest danger to our country right now our biggest threat! Our president needs to unite our country and our people and our troops and stop dividing everybody! It is not us versus them it is America as one! Do your fucking job Mr. President you like the people of this country and make this country truly great again! Get off your ass and stop being an egotistical fucking freak only concerned about himself and care about the people of this country for once
I think you need to take a closer look at what you’re important duties are for this country. First of all it is to unite the people of this country! Something you failed to do since day one. Second of all it is to work across the aisle to ensure the safety of this country and by shutting down the government is certainly no way of doing that.  you have endangered our country even more by your actions. Second of all as a veteran I have serious concerns about our troops. When I was in the military we did not discuss the president. I served under Ronald Reagan. We did not discuss the president we did not discuss politics we did not discuss political parties. We had a job to do and that was defend this country. We did not need division between troops. We had to be there to protect each other the only person that had my back it was the man standing next to me. I had to be able to trust him with my life and he trusted me with his. We never discussed political parties we never wanted any kind of division in our battalions. So politics it was never discussed.  I’m afraid things have changed in the military today. And I see our troops been divided. That is the biggest danger to our country right now our biggest threat! Our president needs to unite our country and our people and our troops and stop dividing everybody! It is not us versus them it is America as one! Do your fucking job Mr. President you like the people of this country and make this country truly great again! Get off your ass and stop being an egotistical fucking freak only concerned about himself and care about the people of this country for once
Trump ur a fucking  morron
https://www.theatlantic.com/magazine/archive/2019/03/impeachment-trump/580468/?fbclid=IwAR24SiDTauSA6G-_ci89bB8ZMNEdhX8MaaiCQ6tCQlk7bBme5SpFVIlASks
“The Founders worried about electing a president who lacked character or a sense of honor, but Americans have long since lost the moral vocabulary to articulate such concerns explicitly, preferring to look instead for demonstrable violations of rules that illuminate underlying character flaws. It is Trump’s unfitness for office that necessitates impeachment; his attacks on American democracy are plainly evident, and should be sufficient.” The Atlantic’s Yoni Appelbaum makes the case for impeachment.
“The Founders worried about electing a president who lacked character or a sense of honor, but Americans have long since lost the moral vocabulary to articulate such concerns explicitly, preferring to look instead for demonstrable violations of rules that illuminate underlying character flaws. It is Trump’s unfitness for office that necessitates impeachment; his attacks on American democracy are plainly evident, and should be sufficient.” The Atlantic’s Yoni Appelbaum makes the case for impeachment.
As our president......you are a criminal and a moron.......
As our president......you are a criminal and a moron.......
Russia, if you're listening, please nuke us! We are idiots.
People that hate him because he wants to protect American also hate American. I realize you are not used to a President looking out for the United States of America  since your last President sold us out to the new world order. We are not the worlds parents let them govern themselves.
Omg - just open the gov’t already you idiot
It would sound a lot better, if you were not a spoiled crook,  liar, cheater,  corrupt , vindictive thief.
"There is no migrant crisis.  "There is, however, a refugee crisis. That crisis is the effect of at least a half-century (and, arguably, twice that) of calamitous US political intervention in Central America, and not — as President Trump would have us believe — the inevitable byproduct of 'bad hombres' who may as well be 'animals.'  "US-funded military coups, resource exploitation, and American policies of economic neoliberalism in El Salvador have destabilized the entire region, and effectively created a climate where paramilitary-aligned drug cartels can thrive."
Can’t wait till your found guilty of Treason. Then all this goes back to the way it was as your regime is quickly dismantled. #WallsAreForWussies
I have a MUCH easier solution.....get rid of all the illegals AND the liberals and we don’t need a wall!
I'm tired of one party trying to dictate their agenda to the rest of us. I'm talking about you, Democrats. Contrary to what you might think, you don't run this country alone. And you never will. No matter how many illegal votes you try to import over the border. It won't be the first time America said no to tyranny. You might not care for the President's policies. But there are those of us who don't care for yours either. If you're not compromising...guess what...you're dictating. Now get your sorry asses to the negotiating table and work out a deal with your fellow Americans to end the shutdown before the situation escalates any further. Trump may have let you off the hook by taking ownership of it. But many of us haven't. You say elections have consequences. Well this is yours for losing in 2016 to a candidate who ran on building a border wall. The people want secure borders and immigration reform. This begins by physically halting illegal activity at the border and curtailing exploiters. But you already know that. And are doing everything humanly possible to prevent it. You can't seem to get over the wall I like to call the plain, honest truth.
We ceased as a nation when you got elected ya moron
We ceased as a nation when you got elected ya moron
Anyone know why Trump won't go to jail once Mueller's report comes out?  They're afraid his shading will blend with the orange suit and he'll slip out in the dirty laundry...  Score to date : Russia 6, US 0...
why are you Russia's little bitch then
Our country's president, Mr Trump, needs to share that directly to Americans by giving his State of the Union address from the White House, NOT in front of disrespectful politicians at the capitol. You know that Pelosi will pack the place with federal workers who are furloughed or working without pay.  Congress is suppose to work for the people. State your case directly to the people and let them call and harass their congressmen until they give in to funding border security. Maybe the SOTU address could be delivered from the East Room with an audience of families who have lost loved ones due to illegals and drug overdose, along with any politician that supports your border strategy.
If we dont stop doctirs doing genocide on organs and also frauding our nations tax insurance murder morphine we dont need a wall we need bridges yo ger away from Congress bullshit laws which herd us to genocide plants   Drink only water if you trust your water. No straws and .wake sure you dont let humans poop chenicals that eat your flesh. Brain especially. All products with brain flesh eating can get you shot by a rescuer because you are uncontrollable hallucinating abd in a danger to public   Anheuser Busch liars thieves abd murdering organs  and Pepsi co been told to stop wounding stomach pancreas.
2 US soldiers have died at the hands of ISIL as well as 2 US citizens in Syria. You bragged that ISIL had been wiped out. Your VP bragged about ISIL being wipe out and the caliphate being crushed hours after their deaths. Their blood is on your hands, you have put the live of US service member in danger as well as in dangeringvthis country.
You need to tell that to fucker trudeau
WHY ARE THE DEMOCRATS NOT WORRIED ABOUT THE SAFETY OF THE AMERICAN PEOPLE AT THE BORDER, YET THEY ARE WORRIED ABOUT THEIR SAFETY AT THE STATE OF THE UNION SPEECH, BEHIND THE WALLS OF THE CAPITOL?
Trump’s Middle East Plan leaked in Jerusalem Post is an evil response from Satan to my open letter to Israel   In regard to the Third Temple and Christianity (see below) Satan wants to confuse the world and Unite  the nations based on Noah and not based on Christ. This is an anti-christ plan coming from the swamps of several countries. Please, read again my open letter to Israel. They didn’t want my open letter and wanted to create problems with the President Plan. The Lord is not in agreement of the division of Israel and Jerusalem (Exodus 23:31) USA could be punished by God with natural disasters because of this division. In fact, it has been chastened with Natural Disasrers  since the plan has been crafted. Please, leave this matter as it is now. Just focus on rebuilding the Third Temple and don’t do animal sacrifices inside  or outside it. The Messiah will take care of Jacob (Israel) and Esau (Palestine)  when He returns. God created the conflict with these twins and He is the only ONE With power and wisdom to solve it (Genesis 25:19-24)  Remember that our battle is not with flesh and blood but with Satan himself (Ephesians 6:10) “Because if Satan transforms  himself into an angel of light, therefore, his ministres also transform themselves into ministers of righteousness whose end will be according to their work” 2 Corinthians 1:14-15
The president should hold the state of the union message and have a tv monitor directly behind him on his left or his right and during his union message ask why the democrats called it a crisis then when he used their word crisis they say there is no crisis. He should play past tapes of shumer and pelosi and Clinton and Obama all saying we need a wall to stop illegals and that way the entire nation can see what he is up against ! He can use it to his advantage - use the media towards his advantage ! And make sure the networks do not give democrats after the union message air time !   Roll those past tapes! Remind the American people what liars they are!!!
I don't understand why the Democrats are more concerned about illegals than the people who pay their salaries!!!
Letting in illegals. Hammering the taxpayer with billions in Medicaid costs, court cost, prison costs, border policing is the Democrats Schumer and Pelosi (won't give $1 for the Wall) "solution" they been using for 40 years. The WALL is the solution. Once build it's a low cost low maintenance very efficient use of taxpayer money (but wait hold on that's the Democrats and Schumer/Pelosi main objection they can't get their hands on endless amounts of taxpayer money their non solutions have generated for decades) The Schumer's NYC there are 3 million illegals 35% of the 8.5 million population of NYC. If immigration Plan Schumer translates to the US it would mean 112 million illegals in US. White Europeans are now the minority in NYC and NY state had the largest number of it's citizens of all nationalities emigrating from it of any State in the Union meaning it has the poorest standard of living in the country. Schumer has risen to the top of the Democrat party not because of talent but because NY is a one party state since the 1920s and Calvin Coolidge. . The Democrats could run a dead rat for Senate and it would be elected in NY State-which would actually be an improvement since it would do less damage then Schumer. Things would actually improve without Crying Lying Chuck monkey wrenching the economy of the state-tax,tax,tax and let's add a Green something or other tax and more illegals to support
He's The President of the United States of AMERICA voted in by the AMERICAN VOTERS wake up and he's kicking Asses!
Jenn Eccher maybe some mydol would help you cupcake. Obviously the woman is a non essential employee and should look for a job where she is actually essential instead of working in a job she isnt needed.
You disgusting waste of oxygen.  Furloughed mom faces choice of buying insulin or making mortgage payment  https://www.cbsnews.com/news/government-shutdown-furloughed-mom-faces-choice-of-buying-insulin-or-making-mortgage-payment/?ftag=COS-05-10aaa0h&utm_campaign=trueAnthem%3A+Trending+Content&utm_content=5c3d5fe904d301574302ae68&utm_medium=trueAnthem&utm_source=facebook&fbclid=IwAR2LGiY1hT3xs-31W1IuKJyyvbWXmgC9s7qy5HUzB-O12_yX-ODvisLNxyQFurloughed mom faces choice of buying insulin or making mortgage paymentcbsnews.com
You disgusting waste of oxygen.  Furloughed mom faces choice of buying insulin or making mortgage payment  https://www.cbsnews.com/news/government-shutdown-furloughed-mom-faces-choice-of-buying-insulin-or-making-mortgage-payment/?ftag=COS-05-10aaa0h&utm_campaign=trueAnthem%3A+Trending+Content&utm_content=5c3d5fe904d301574302ae68&utm_medium=trueAnthem&utm_source=facebook&fbclid=IwAR2LGiY1hT3xs-31W1IuKJyyvbWXmgC9s7qy5HUzB-O12_yX-ODvisLNxyQFurloughed mom faces choice of buying insulin or making mortgage paymentcbsnews.com
The fact that you have a shut down over a crazy stupid wall that will do nothing to stop illegal immigrants means you are extremely unqualified to be president and you being president is a crime against humanity.
NATO HAS DEFENDED OUR BOARDERS FOR SEVENTY YEARS MOTHERFUCKER TRUMP!
So very true and Demon-crats. Take and oath too protect the sovereignty of America.  They are the ones that  ought too be lmpeached...
So very true and Demon-crats. Take and oath too protect the sovereignty of America.  They are the ones that  ought too be lmpeached...
Shut your Putin's cock holster
History is ginna look down on this President. And the kind of people that encourage Trump will be the forgotten Rebels of this failed Confederacy on our modern America. You wanna act like a bunch of dickheads at the expense of our civilization, then move to a country that would openly accept such disingenuous behavior, like Iraq, or Panama, or any other failed dictatorship.
Another hoax , what Trump has done just for his 2020 election , he needs your vote to prevailed Democracy competitors , that's the reason why he even shut down government and still committed to build that fucking wall.
True. And cultures cease to exist. Thats is just what the NWO demons want.
The fact that you don’t pay Giuliani is no excuse for letting him lie in your name every time the senile old bastid opens his big fat facial anus. We know you couldn’t give a crap what he says, but to take advantage of a senile old misogynist like that is really cruel!  Tonight, Rudely admitted that “the collusion in your campaign happened a long time ago.” REALLY?? Like about 3 years ago?? LMAO!  Then, senile Uncle Rudely with the big mouth said, referring to Robert Mueller, “Put up or shut up!” Bwaaaahahahaha! Oh he will Rudely! Oh he will!  You’re going down hard Fatboy Fuhrer. So are your little Nazi mutants, and 1/2 your gestapo KKKabinett! What a shitshow this is gonna be. The whole world is watching you fucKKK it all up! Happy now?
If you hyper-militarize one land border while ignoring the MAJORITY of the ways undocumented immigrants and drugs get into this country, and you destroy democracy, people's health and well-being, and the environment, then we cease to be a nation.  Asshat.
F*** Trump and everybody who looks like his bitchass. ✊🇲🇽👑
ASSHOLE, PROMOTER IN CHIEF,,,trump is an illiterate con man... change your dirty depends,... you stink.
Then resign you fucking halfwit
Let’s defend our country from this clown.   Traitor
But you yourself dodged fighting and defending your country. Your a piece of 💩.  Always will Be you asshat
fk this puto. viva la raza. tell em the real plans behind this this happen in 2006 and 2013 we wasted 45 billion dollars. and the president hired a big company from Riverside, CA most of them if not all where ILLLEGAL iMMAGRANTS? does nto make no sense then you tell the people we need to get rid of them?
President Trump 20172025 If Americans  do not replace the Despicable democrats  with Conservatives  , then we risk  being a nation,  remember  the Despicable democrats  led by benedict asshole obama, want to  fundamentally change America,   No border wall/security  ,no balanced budget clause and  no eliminating the discretionary spending clause,    No end to the  shutdown,    Let the Despicable democrats  go on camera saying, "   we want to get 3 million dues paying union workers  back on the job ,:  and screw 300 million Americans  safety "  Thank You God's speed and God bless America and your family
President Trump 20172025 If Americans  do not replace the Despicable democrats  with Conservatives  , then we risk  being a nation,  remember  the Despicable democrats  led by benedict asshole obama, want to  fundamentally change America,   No border wall/security  ,no balanced budget clause and  no eliminating the discretionary spending clause,    No end to the  shutdown,    Let the Despicable democrats  go on camera saying, "   we want to get 3 million dues paying union workers  back on the job ,:  and screw 300 million Americans  safety "  Thank You God's speed and God bless America and your family
That's the stupidest thing ever come out his mouth he is a liar
"immoral Nancy"  seeks to destroy America by flooding the nation with illegal invaders--she and Paul  want low wages-cheap labor for her vineyard.  Nancy is a traitor. The solution--VOTE RED
Exactly ! You are doing your job! Feckless Dems in Congress need to do their job!
You’re a jackass
CSCo true and a country can only be destroy from within and it is exactly what Pelosi is trying to do. Mr. President hold you state of the union at the senate forget the house
You are conjuring a crisis where there is none.  We do not need a fucking wall, you moron.  How about using that money to make sure poor seniors are cared for, homeless veterans are cared for, our vulnerable children cared for.  If you wsnt tge wall that bad then maybe ypu shouldn't have given the billionaire's club such huge tax breaks.
You paid to have polls rigged.  You dirty crook.
Amen!
Fool we all want protected borders but a wall won't do it. Keep talking to your base that is getting smaller and smaller. Like your hands?
Only stupid persons open border for illegal immigrants 😈😈, they kill American directly & indirectly method (job, tax to pay for illegal immigrants) . Illegal immigrants utilize so much American honey & make American become the most stupid people 😱😱
Amen to that President Trump!! Love you!! Best President since Ronald Reagan!! Keep up the good work, & don't let the lunatic left get you down!! You love America!! They don't!! Letting in illegals & holding not letting you build the wall proves that illegals come first, & America comes last!! GOD BLESS YOU!!! 👍👍👍👍👍👍💚💛
Democrats did refuse to work with our President on the border wall before the shut down.... REMEMBER. Now the talking heads and certain congressmen are encouraging to reopen the government and be given three weeks for Republicans and Democrats to work on a solution? Notice how they all say border security and avoid the word wall, barrier ..... there is a reason why they skillfully use language to deceive and/or give false hope.  N. Pelosi  and C. Schumer will negotiate with giving 1.6B for border security but the wall is not included( or I forgot she did say 1 dollar to the wall) and there you have it folks. The Democrat Party for two years have made it clear in their talk and walk that they are the party of hate and resist President Donald J. Trump and those that voted for him. What honest person with common sense believes the controlled house of Democrats will abandon their hate and resistance for the next two years? There talk is cheap and their walk shows Americans they can not be trusted. Majority of "We The People" demand a strong, big border wall. Schumer and Pelosi don't give a flip about American lives..... all they care about is political power over national security and over the life of Americans. Sorry Senator L. Graham but you are wrong on this one...… Democrats ought to be able to work this out with the Republicans before the government reopens if you truly care for Americans as they claim they are so concerned. Stay strong Mr. President for majority of "We The People" are standing strong for the protection of our children and grandchildren.
Glynda Lomax  THURSDAY, JANUARY 17, 2019  Overrun  I was praying for America yesterday morning and praying for the Senators and Congressman; praying that the Lord would shake everyone concerned awake and make them realize this government shut down has to end.  I was praying out loud and asking for an end times podcast for God’s People to prepare them for…and I was about to say ‘these end times’ when I heard “War.” And “Overrun!” And I saw a flash vision of people running in America’s streets and our coastlines being overrun with enemy troops. And no one was able to run far before they were killed. Our people are no match for these soldiers, that was clear to see. They were large soldiers. Whoever they were, they were wearing brownish green uniforms and they were big men. It was obvious to me we were well outnumbered, whoever they were. Lord! What is this You are showing me??  My Child, there is much My Sheep must go through before the end of these times in your world. America is on the brink of war, though she does not know this outright. (It is not generally known to the public)  Because her back is turned to Me, I will not protect her as her enemies overrun her and many, many lives will be lost. Many, many families will be unprotected as they do not know Me.  I heard “Collapse.”  The eyes of America are on its government and while it is distracted, the enemies of America are preparing. As a predator strikes the weakest of the herd, so will they also strike America while she is in a weakened state and bring down her government. They will go for the head and as America has uncovered herself for all to see her flaunt her indecencies and her abominations, she has no protection and her enemies will succeed. I am already calling them forth.  Prepare, for war is coming to your streets in America, My People. This is only the beginning. Much is coming for My People in other nations as well. Nations that think they do not need Me will soon see their need for Me. Nations who have turned from Me, who have rejected My Ways and My Holy Word will soon see which of us is God, for I will show them My Mighty Power.  Pray for the protection of all you hold dear. Pray for the lost among you. Pray I will hide you in the shadow of My Mighty Wings.
While Mr. Fibbs says that the furlough could be called a "strike"... this is the same person that has cheated workers/contractors out of their money all of his life.... and you expect him to care how you pay your bills and feed your family or how you get services from the government...WAKE UP!... the alarm has been sounding for two years and there are those act as though it has not been heard.... THIS RUSSIAN LACKY thinks being called a MF is a disgrace.... no, being a draft dodging, Trump U scammer, tax cheating, charity cheating, illegal immigrant hiring, P@#$y grabbing, name calling of AMERICAN football players SOB's, wife cheater(x3-that we know of),prostitute paying, daily liar, family separating, children caging and a disgrace and embarrassment to Americans is far worse than a MF... that would might even be too good for him. His PUBLIC conduct would get our children expelled from school for ever... If our great county of America has to suffer over ego and stupidity, no one in Congress or the Executive branch should get a paycheck-seems a lot of them are or could end up on jail anyway(they will be provided for-now that is funny in a sad way).........MF definition.. a despicable or very unpleasant person or thing., a person or thing of a specified kind... REPUBLICANS, Democrats and Independents AND THERE ARE MANY GOOD REPUBLICANS(MANY unfortunately MISLEAD)...STAND UP AND BE COUNTED...rant over -nough said for the "moment".FLOOD YOUR CONGRESSMAN'S OFFICE WITH CALLS=load up their email.... SPEAK OUT! Americans should not have to pay for his stupidity let alone his dumb ass wall....he is a sniveling twitt..just think about who is representing you...
And if your lawyers don’t defend you you’ll be executed for treason.
We need to lock up the Marxists! So you can try to destroy a nation and be a terrorist organization as long as it's under the guise of a political party?
Give the State of the Union Address, the People need to hear  it...The DemocRATS are the ones holding up the Country...Build the WALL!  Pelosi is afraid to go to the building she should be in doing her Job for the American Citizens, because she is afraid it isn't secure, yet wants us to have Open Borders...what a moron !  Give it and Build the WALL PROTECT america and HER Citizens FIRST, put her and others on the other side of the wall with the people they seem to think they work for!  God Bless President Trump, ICE , Border Patrol, our Military and ALL who work For and To PROTECT American Citizens!💕🇺🇸🇺🇸🙏🇺🇸🇺🇸🙏🇺🇸🇺🇸💕
Give the State of the Union Address, the People need to hear  it...The DemocRATS are the ones holding up the Country...Build the WALL!  Pelosi is afraid to go to the building she should be in doing her Job for the American Citizens, because she is afraid it isn't secure, yet wants us to have Open Borders...what a moron !  Give it and Build the WALL PROTECT america and HER Citizens FIRST, put her and others on the other side of the wall with the people they seem to think they work for!  God Bless President Trump, ICE , Border Patrol, our Military and ALL who work For and To PROTECT American Citizens!💕🇺🇸🇺🇸🙏🇺🇸🇺🇸🙏🇺🇸🇺🇸💕
Comrade Trump liar, corrupt, grifter, incompetent, stupid, con artist, cheater, bigot and Putin's puppet.
NO, it is not, Mr. man-child Trump!  Your highest and most important "duty" is deflecting attention to the growing evidence against your corrupt & colluding ways, and your abominable attempts at dividing our nation.  You, sir, are nothing more than a pathological lying deluded man-child.
How about keeping our federal employees employed? It would be different if the Democrats said they would not negotiate border security. That is not the case. Democrats are more than willing to negotiate but keeping Americans hostage is more important to the righties and Mitch is weak by not allowing votes in the Senate. The votes are there to open the government. This is so stupid. Trump shutdown is all on Mitch.
You’re a fucking joke 🙄
Hope he  does  some  thing  about  the  4.2  billion dollars the  illegals are  stealing  from  the  IRS  per accounting  by  claiming  to  have  made  more  than  they  have  and  then  claim  there are  10  kids  inthe  hose  ,so  they  get  back more  than  they  paid  in  taxes.
Mr trump just stop being childish and build that fuckin wall with your money😂😂😂
Mr trump just stop being childish and build that fuckin wall with your money😂😂😂
CHARGE THE DEMO RATS FOR AIDING AND ABETTING ILLEGALS
CHARGE THE DEMO RATS FOR AIDING AND ABETTING ILLEGALS
death to America 😆😁
The left hates that you work so hard to keep your promises. They haven’t had a President do that and stick to it.
Why can't people see how true this statement is???  We have the best country in the world and people want to come here! But, to keep it great we need to know whose coming here, their background, if they are criminals, killers etc.!!! Other countries have really strict rules who get to come and live in their countries!! We must do the same or we will be overrun and lose what has made our country great!!!
Bull, you don't know Jack about anything but ripping people off. Where is your secretary of defense. Oh, that's right, he's quit or gotten fired like the rest of your cabinet. You're such a Bozo.
Bull, you don't know Jack about anything but ripping people off. Where is your secretary of defense. Oh, that's right, he's quit or gotten fired like the rest of your cabinet. You're such a Bozo.
Comrade stooge motherfucka individual 1 so I guess our nation will cease to exist because of your dumbass not declaring a national emergency, you have absolute power to do so, I guess the way you run the country is by shutting it down, by the way Robert Mueller and Michael Cohen says hi #ImpeachThatMotherfucka #GoBackToRussiaTraitor #HateHasNoHomeHere
So you lied about Mexico paying for the wall.  You are a fraud.
#masege to p.tramp A message of distress from the people of Basra province to the President of the United States of America. Trump respectable.  We are the people of Basra province. We ask you to rescue our province of Basra from the Militias  Gangs who have been stealing the oil of Basrah since 2003 and to this day, they are sending it to Iran and to the terrorist organizations that fund them with weapons. We have been carrying out large demonstrations against these gangs, but they respond to us with repression, torture, murder and assassination. We lack the simplest means of living, such as water and electricity. We demand reforms and appointments for the unemployed youth, many of them graduates and holders of higher diplomas, but the armed groups monopolize appointments for themselves and their parties and gangs. They are killing all those who speak a word and stand against them and they take the presidential palaces in the province of Basra, a place known to the Iraqis, and in the recent demonstrations have fired live bullets at the demonstrators and killed many innocent young people who claim their right, and the assassination of civilian activists In front of their homes and in the streets and markets, We are asking your presence to intervene quickly to rescue us from these dirty armed gangs. We know that the US military has entered Iraq and we welcome this very welcome because we believe that the US military has the ability to rescue Basra, Iraq and Iraqis from these gangs. We hope you will receive this message and respond. Because you are the only hope now for all Iraqis. Thank you Mr. Trump. Youth of Basrah Governorate...........
A real leader... unlike the anti British parasites we have now in the U.K.... wish we had him..
You’re getting your ass whooped by a woman!!! Stop lying and get people back to work you fucking clown.
Mr president  Human trafficking is going on right new in Iowa and Illinois. And the police are apart of it. There churches in America are supporting them through organizations that help relocate women and children. What there doing. The cities that have large churches. that give a lot to missions. Is how the raise money. Then they ship the illegal immigrants to another city. Where the coyotes cartel are waiting for them. I saw it at the church I was going to.  And yesterday I over heard a police officer talking about. A case of a woman stabbing a man. Both here illegally. The officer said that the federal government told him to go to the Catholic Church in town to get there name. I told them that this is called human trafficking. They looked at me like I was crazy
And yet we’ve been a nation for about 240 years just fine, quit fear mongering you narcissistic asshole.  Illegal immigration has been steadily decreasing for the last 10 years. OPENNTHE GOVERNMENT YOU ASSHOLE!
How many kinds of stupid are you moron?
Your own lawyer is now admitting your campaign was conspiring with the Russians and you send the armed forces to the border and threaten to have them shoot women and children. The greatest current enemy of democracy and free speech is in the white house and controlled from Moscow!
Then BUild to the Fucking Wall.   Democrats think your a pussy... that you won't      jusdoit
He’s definitely a moron
He’s definitely a moron
This whole narrative that trump won’t budge so the shutdown is going to drag on for a while is idiotic. McConnell can easily fix this with a veto-proof vote but his dumb ass can’t be found anywhere. Does Putin have you under his control too Mitch? This is totally a trump and republican shutdown and the people who are affected need to know that. The House has been passing Bills to reopen the government but McConnell won’t hold a vote in the senate. So there it is people.
Hold out MR.PRESIDENT TRUMP WE NEED OUR BORDER SECURE, THESE ASSHOLES HAVE BEEN SLOWLY DETERIORATING  OUR COUNTRY FAR TO LONG
Nice photoshop, Chump. 😂 You are NOT 6' 3"! 🤣🤣🤣
To all you libtard Dem morons out there — THE WALL = WINNING.  Got it? 🤪
You're doing a great job of killing the country over this stupid wall. Congratulations
when the president is the agent of a foreign enemy, we cease to be a free and democratic nation.  trump = Putin's b*tch
CHARGE THE DEMO RATS FOR AIDING AND ABETTING ILLEGALS
Resign! You’re an idiot and everyone hates you!
Hello from Ireland. I love Trump!  Just kidding.  You're a tangerine turnip cockwomble spunktrumpet farknugget twatwaffle.
Thank you!   Nancy and Chuck needs to stop playing dirty games wit America's safety!    Adult bullies against our great President!   To Chuck and the democrats build the wall and open the government and stop your Evil speeches, America's eyes wide open!
You are correct my President. You need not have porous borders , America must weed out criminals by ensuring the proper procedures are followed while entering.
ALL YOU NON-TRUMP SUPPORTERS ARE FUCKTARDS!
👹👹👹 These radical progressives, these Evil Globalists, enemies of America and the American People, but especially NancyStretchPelosi and ChuckYouShummer must be sent home without pay. They are absolute NonEssentials. 👹👺👹 Cut all their privileges! Cut all funds to “sanctuary cities”. Let’s save some dollars for our MUST Wall! Build the Wall, Mr President! Let these leeches bark at the moon! 👹 #BUILDTHEWALL ! We the American People stand with you! 🇺🇸💖🇺🇸💖🇺🇸
Draft Dodger Trump. Your a coward.
Trump, you're a buffoon.
Trump, you're a buffoon.
Rachel Anne. Hey lady bring me a xheesburger
At this point, I dont give a rats ass who pays for it! Trump needs to tell the Democrats that he needs pallets of cash to send to Iran  Then use it for the wall 😂   #BuildThatWall
At this point, I dont give a rats ass who pays for it! Trump needs to tell the Democrats that he needs pallets of cash to send to Iran  Then use it for the wall 😂   #BuildThatWall
WHY WE NEED TO SUPPORT THE WALL and BOARDER SECURITY:  OUR FORESTS ARE TELLING US, WE NEED TO LISTEN!  Unfortunately, for our forests we have let the bittersweet vines grow unchecked and now they are choking the trees and killing them - our forests are a tangled mess. Forest management has been ignored for many years.  The resulting forest fires are devastating as they consume our homes and lives.  The vines need sunlight/and room for their roots to grow they are green and lush and the awesome tunnels they create; so they kill the trees also killing their roots; thus they let the sun shine in - their vines flourish and their tentacle roots spread.  The roots are so thick that new trees also perish.    Our society is facing the same fate. Unfortunately FOR ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS we need to manage our population.  To do this we need to have a strong immigration policy, we need to stop pushing our children into high paying careers, and support the working class. Without farmers, mechanics, electricians, plumbers, construction workers, house keeps, childcare workers, store cashiers, and shelf stockers  etc our society will crumble.  We need decent low income housing so that hardworking low income workers will not end up homeless.  WE DO NOT NEED ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS TO FILL THESE JOBS.  Illegal immigration is like the vines - the expense on low income working US citizens is very real.    Eventually we will all be victims.
"An anguished question from a Trump supporter: "Why do liberals think Trump supporters are stupid?" The serious answer: Here’s what we really think about Trump supporters - the rich, the poor, the malignant and the innocently well-meaning, the ones who think and the ones who don't... That when you saw a man who had owned a fraudulent University, intent on scamming poor people, you thought "Fine." That when you saw a man who had made it his business practice to stiff his creditors, you said, "Okay." That when you heard him proudly brag about his own history of sexual abuse, you said, "No problem." That when he made up stories about seeing muslim-Americans in the thousands cheering the destruction of the World Trade Center, you said, "Not an issue." That when you saw him brag that he could shoot a man on Fifth Avenue and you wouldn't care, you chirped, "He sure knows me." That when you heard him illustrate his own character by telling that cute story about the elderly guest bleeding on the floor at his country club, the story about how he turned his back and how it was all an imposition on him, you said, "That's cool!" That when you saw him mock the disabled, you thought it was the funniest thing you ever saw. That when you heard him brag that he doesn't read books, you said, "Well, who has time?" That when the Central Park Five were compensated as innocent men convicted of a crime they didn't commit, and he angrily said that they should still be in prison, you said, "That makes sense." That when you heard him tell his supporters to beat up protesters and that he would hire attorneys, you thought, "Yes!" That when you heard him tell one rally to confiscate a man's coat before throwing him out into the freezing cold, you said, "What a great guy!" That you have watched the parade of neo-Nazis and white supremacists with whom he curries favor, while refusing to condemn outright Nazis, and you have said, "Thumbs up!" That you hear him unable to talk to foreign dignitaries without insulting their countries and demanding that they praise his electoral win, you said, "That's the way I want my President to be." That you have watched him remove expertise from all layers of government in favor of people who make money off of eliminating protections in the industries they're supposed to be regulating and you have said, "What a genius!" That you have heard him continue to profit from his businesses, in part by leveraging his position as President, to the point of overcharging the Secret Service for space in the properties he owns, and you have said, "That's smart!" That you have heard him say that it was difficult to help Puerto Rico because it was the middle of water and you have said, "That makes sense." That you have seen him start fights with every country from Canada to New Zealand while praising Russia and quote, "falling in love" with the dictator of North Korea, and you have said, "That's statesmanship!" That Trump separated children from their families and put them in cages, managed to lose track of 1500 kids. has opened a tent city incarceration camp in the desert in Texas - he explains that they’re just “animals” - and you say, “well, ok then.” That you have witnessed all the thousand and one other manifestations of corruption and low moral character and outright animalistic rudeness and contempt for you, the working American voter, and you still show up grinning and wearing your MAGA hats and threatening to beat up anybody who says otherwise. What you don't get, Trump supporters in 2019, is that succumbing to frustration and thinking of you as stupid may be wrong and unhelpful, but it's also...hear me...charitable. Because if you're NOT stupid, we must turn to other explanations, and most of them are less flattering." ~ A friend of a friend of a friend, perfectly expressing my thoughts on this.
Bwwwaahh. THAT would be SO disappointing to Putin it would never happen. Liar! Anyone that still supports this Putin F is a traitor as well. F Trump the Russian stooge! LOCK HIM UP!
That is what Socialist Democrats want. Open Borders and Globalization.  The elimination of Sovereign Nations. Free flow of people everywhere. Eventually the People ruled by a One World Order.   Obama’s solution would be Islam Domination. He just loves the Call To Prayer.
Our country is divided again.  Not north and south but by political party.  The Democrats are doing everything in their power to lead us toward socialism.  This will take away our freedoms and put us right back to where we were before 1776.  If you think the Democrats are creating these social programs for your benefit your are wrong.  This is bait in the trap.  Once our freedoms are taken away and the Democrats have complete control all those give away programs will end.  Look at other countries with a socialistic government.  I think the thing that bothers me most is the millions of men and women who gave their lives in past wars to protect us from this very thing.  Such disrespect...  When you are standing in a bread line hoping they won't run out before you get yours then you will understand why these men and women gave their lives freely to protect our country.
Mr. President, the protection of our beloved nation ALSO comes through an honorable, Constitutional DOJ. Your nominee HAS TESTIFIED THAT HE DOES NOT SUPPORT THE 2ND AMENDMENT!   WE CANNOT AFFORD ANOTHER BAD DOJ! Your time in office is too short and precious!   PLEASE PULL THIS NOMINATION AND GIVE US A STRONG CONSTITUTIONAL DOJ WHO WILL ASSIGN ANOTHER SPECIAL COUNSEL TO INVESTIGATE THE TRUE CORRUPTION OF THE CLINTONS, AND OBAMA, THE FBI AND THE DOJ AND STATE DEPT AND HUD!  WE NEED CRIMINAL PROSECUTION OF ALL OF THESE TREASONOUS CRIMINALS!  AND PLEASE DESTROY THE ILLEGAL DATABASE THAT OBAMA HAS ON US ALL!
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!
You're liar and crook trump
BUILD THE WALL!! MAGA!!
Oh humpty dumpty built ass nigga
Ignorant ass
Build the wall!😀🇺🇸
Look at liberal democrats control California,already became illegal immigrants sanctuary heaven ,free education,free health care plus state drive license for all the illegal immigrants , democrats doesn’t care about the America’s future,all they care about is to continue the open border policy to win the Hispanic’s votes.
Look at liberal democrats control California,already became illegal immigrants sanctuary heaven ,free education,free health care plus state drive license for all the illegal immigrants , democrats doesn’t care about the America’s future,all they care about is to continue the open border policy to win the Hispanic’s votes.
As a Afghan i kill you and destroy your boarders . Go to the Hell loser
build the wall
Dear President, can you please please defend my 4 yo daughter from charged Russian fugitive pedophile who is charged in his country of citizenship Russia for sexual assault of a toddler. Yet in Richmond County New York family court he is fighting me for custody of my daughter the child he abused!!! I need you assistance please! And investigation of the judge as well. The judge has been ignoring all evidence of sexual assault and is now ignoring the fact that the father is charged fugitive with warrant for his arrest worldwide.
Dear President, can you please please defend my 4 yo daughter from charged Russian fugitive pedophile who is charged in his country of citizenship Russia for sexual assault of a toddler. Yet in Richmond County New York family court he is fighting me for custody of my daughter the child he abused!!! I need you assistance please! And investigation of the judge as well. The judge has been ignoring all evidence of sexual assault and is now ignoring the fact that the father is charged fugitive with warrant for his arrest worldwide.
and that is just what the evil demonRats want....the USA destroyed.
and that is just what the evil demonRats want....the USA destroyed.
THANK YOU MR. PRESIDENT !!! NEVER BACK DOWN TO THOSE COMMIE DEMOCRATS !!! WE SHOULD TAR AND FEATHER THEM AND RUN THEM OUT OF TOWN !!!
Actually you are a illegal immigrant from Europe and this land was mexico for thousands of years and mexicans lived here for thousands of years and are native to this land so this land belongs to mexicans more than anyone else. All white people are illegal immigrants from Europe that came here for spiritual refuge and we are all illegal immigrants living here on mexico's land that we stole from them, all mexicans deserve to live here more than anyone else. We should let in all mexicans at the border and build them freedom towers in san diego where they all can live and eat free with buffets of maha prasadam not fast food so they eat as healthy as possible to prevent diseases. We should be focused on the welfare of the immigrants not using our borders as way to keep immigrants out that want to live here, all non violent immigrants at the border should be let in and put on welfare and the fact you want to keep them out to cut their welfare money is a crime.
YALL ALL GONE DIE FUCKING WITH TRUMP 😂
YALL ALL GONE DIE FUCKING WITH TRUMP 😂
LIAR LIAR PANTS ON FIRE   LIBERTY UNIV. CIO ADMITTED HE   WAS ASKED TO RIG TWO POLLS IN   FAVOR OF TRUMP  FOR $50K     THAT IS COLLUSION  AND   OBSTRUCTION OF JUSTICE     TIME FOR HERR DRUMPF TO RESIGN   OR JUST GO STRAIGHT TO PRISON   WITH HIS CORRUPT FAMILY AND   ILLEGALLY GAINED ADMINISTRATION!
We don’t have open borders. We are one of the strictest nations to get into. Have you ever even tried to get into the United states? Idiots.
Dear Dems, Please stop living life la vida loca, quit wasting our tax dollars and get your stupid asses back to work!
EVERYBODY NEEDS TO CALL OR VISIT PELOSI AND SHUMMER, REMOVE THEM FROM THEIR POSITION, THEY WORK FOR THE ELITE CABAL ENEMIES OF THE PEOPLE OF THE UNITED STATES Nancy polosy 202 255-4965 Chuck chummer 202 224-7433
*I LOVE MY PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP*...*YOU ARE MORE THAN THE VERY BLESSED & ANOINTED KING DAVID*...*YOU ARE MORE THAN THE WISE & THE RICHEST KING SALOMO*...*YOU ARE MORE THAN THE MOST POWERFUL HERCULES*...*YOU ARE MORE THAN THE MOST FAMOUS SUPERMAN, BATMAN & SPIDERMAN*... AMAZING GRACE... GOD BLESS YOU... WE LOVE YOU
# I LOVE YOU...*I DO*... AMERICA LOVES MR. PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP *THE GREAT FATHER FOR THE GREAT NATION* IN THE GREAT TIME OF HISTORY *THE PEOPLE'S PRESIDENT SO DEAREST TO MY HEART*... AMAZING GRACE... GOD BLESS YOU... WE LOVE YOU
# I LOVE YOU...*I DO*... AMERICA LOVES MR. PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP *THE GREAT FATHER FOR THE GREAT NATION* IN THE GREAT TIME OF HISTORY *THE PEOPLE'S PRESIDENT SO DEAREST TO MY HEART*... AMAZING GRACE... GOD BLESS YOU... WE LOVE YOU
WOW... YES!... AMAZING... I BELIEVE YOU & I'M VERY PROUD OF YOU VERY HANDSOME & VERY GENIUS PRESIDENT OF USA MR. PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP THE ONLY ONE GREATEST PRESIDENT OF UNITED STATES OF AMERICA WHO KEEPS STANDING VERY STRONG & TRUE VERY POWERFUL TO KEEP HIS PROMISES WITH ALL HIS VERY BEST TO MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGAIN IN THE GREAT TIME OF HISTORY WITH HIS GREAT TEAM & GREAT ADMINISTRATION UNDER THE GREAT LEADERSHIP OF MR. PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP HAS PROVEN & SHOWING THE TRUE GREATNESS OF A REAL AMERICAN MAN DURING & IN 500 DAYS OF HIS GOLDEN PRESIDENCY GREATLY INCREDIBLE & AMAZING THE VERY REAL GENUINE & GENIUS 70+ AMERICAN HANDSOME MAN FOR THE GREAT COUNTRY USA & AMERICAN PEOPLE... AMAZING GRACE... GOD BLESS YOU... WE LOVE YOU
WOW... YES!... AMAZING... I BELIEVE YOU & I'M VERY PROUD OF YOU VERY HANDSOME & VERY GENIUS PRESIDENT OF USA MR. PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP THE ONLY ONE GREATEST PRESIDENT OF UNITED STATES OF AMERICA WHO KEEPS STANDING VERY STRONG & TRUE VERY POWERFUL TO KEEP HIS PROMISES WITH ALL HIS VERY BEST TO MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGAIN IN THE GREAT TIME OF HISTORY WITH HIS GREAT TEAM & GREAT ADMINISTRATION UNDER THE GREAT LEADERSHIP OF MR. PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP HAS PROVEN & SHOWING THE TRUE GREATNESS OF A REAL AMERICAN MAN DURING & IN 500 DAYS OF HIS GOLDEN PRESIDENCY GREATLY INCREDIBLE & AMAZING THE VERY REAL GENUINE & GENIUS 70+ AMERICAN HANDSOME MAN FOR THE GREAT COUNTRY USA & AMERICAN PEOPLE... AMAZING GRACE... GOD BLESS YOU... WE LOVE YOU
Nasty Nan doesn't want to fund the wall and now she is taking the word of 1 unknown person to tell the President to not give his SOTU address.  Both she would then use to claim he was weak and incapable to try to take the spotlight off of her for being weak and incapable.  She is a snake and her actions are why she has no business in office in Washington.  She is inept and incapable of doing anything but trying to cause trouble.  This country cannot function well on that agenda--as proven!
We must defend our country from Russian Interference.  They infiltrated the NRA and installed a wannabe be dictator in the oval office!  Cyber wall and sanctions are not on Trumps to do list and everyone is a liar except him. Like the FBI, CIA, NSA, CNN, MSNBC, ABC, NYT, WaPo etc...  He is a traitor and and spy.  WAKE UP! WE ARE UNDER ATTACK.
Quick, Dems are headed for the beach on Mars! Taxpayer paid Deep State won't stop their speedy flight. But they'll send a $350B bill for the fake Mars mission later. #mars #space #beach #shutdown https://m.facebook.com/groups/1554701338086961?ref=bookmarks1,432 Members
MAGAts...Reason why the wall won't work:  https://m.washingtontimes.com/news/2017/aug/20/mexican-drug-cartels-using-drones-to-smuggle-heroi/
You haven’t been a nation since 2016... you dont get called divider in chief for nothing you complete lunatic. If America gets attacked during your  shut down, it will be on you.
TRUMP TRUMP TRUMP
President of USA ... Why not PRESIDENT of the WORLD ???  All nations want to say Donald Trump Is Our President !
Resign president Turd.
Democrats Pelosi and Schumer, are Desperate to try and Stop President Trump, from telling the Truth about the government shut down and the Wall with Mexico. Senator, Ted Cruz: https://twitter.com/BlazeTV/status/1085907090957307909?s=20
Resign, you fat fucking criminal.
Putin in Trumps ass 2020
IMPEACH THE MOTHER FUCKER
Build the Wall!
What an asshole!
Build the wall!!
Build the wall!!
What an  Idiot
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!
BUILD THE WALL!
BUILD THAT WALL DEPORT ALL ILLEGALS AND THEIR FAMILIES AND DREAMERS.
Build that wall
Build that wall
Build that wall
Build the wall!!!!!
Build The Wall!
Build the wall!
I am so tired of people bitching about the shut down. If its a problem for you all, call you congress, Senate and tell them to get off that high horse and protect America. Maybe if enough people complain they will do what is right for America and quit acting like a bunch of idiots. Mr. President do what you have to do. Protect America.
I am so tired of people bitching about the shut down. If its a problem for you all, call you congress, Senate and tell them to get off that high horse and protect America. Maybe if enough people complain they will do what is right for America and quit acting like a bunch of idiots. Mr. President do what you have to do. Protect America.
Fire the Democraps.
Build the wall
GO GET EM TRUMP
This is what the far left have been doing for YEARS. People seem to forget these things. The wall is not only to protect us from drug smugglers, human trafficking, gangs and sicknesses that have been eradicated from our country.   It's also to protect us from the far left with things like this.  https://youtu.be/yYnVKJMAV90
Build the wall.
BUILD THE WALL !!!
Thank you, President Trump, for trying to pound some sense into Democrats heads. We all know how impossible that is. Thank you also for exposing their anti-American people agenda in favor of illegals. With yet another dangerous caravan of criminals on the way, declaring a  state of emergency is necessary and completely justified to #BUILDTHEWALL
Thank you, President Trump, for trying to pound some sense into Democrats heads. We all know how impossible that is. Thank you also for exposing their anti-American people agenda in favor of illegals. With yet another dangerous caravan of criminals on the way, declaring a  state of emergency is necessary and completely justified to #BUILDTHEWALL
Build the wall
Build that wall
Build that wall
Build the wall!
Build the Wall.   MAGA.
Build the wall saving the country
Build the wall saving the country
Build the wall 🇺🇸
Build the wall 🇺🇸
Build the WALL
Your all immigrants
Build the Wall!!
Bunch of bullshit
BUILD THE WALL
Build the Wall!
Defend us from you please. https://www.wsj.com/articles/poll-rigging-for-trump-and-creating-womenforcohen-one-it-firms-work-order-11547722801
Liar trump liar
If we do not get rid of you and your cronies America will become a fascist state.
Build the wall
Build the wall.
Are you going to build a wall around the country to because you get terrorists from everywhere else coming into country how you going to stop.
Kick some ass trump
Build the WALL NOW
Kill yourself scum.
Stupid ass dude
Build the Wall !!!
A total  Madman needs to be gone
fat stupid cunt
Build the wall!
Build the wall
WHO DOES KAMELA HARRIS THINK SHE IS BULLYING OUR SECRETARY OF HOMELAND SECURITY ??? MORE SWAMP CREATURES EVERYDAY THAT PASSES... WHACKY WATER,, AOC,, CHUCKY CHEESE ,, DELERIOUS PELOSI the list is LONG !! GOD BLESS YOU FOR YOUR WORK ETHICS & STRENGTH MR.PRESIDENT ..STAND STRONG AGAINST THESE CRIMINALS WHO WANT TO TAKE THIS AMERICA & ITS PEOPLE DOWN ... THANK YOU ..OH ONE MORE IMPORTANT FACTOR BECAUSE OF WHAT HARRIS IS DOING WHICH IS CALLED "DIVIDING " MLK IS MOST LIKELY TURNING IN HIS GRAVE SHE STANDS FOR & IS PUSHING THE AGENDA OF WHAT HE STOOD AGAINST ,,WHICH IS WHY HE WAS SO LOVED !!! IF JFK & MLK HAVE NOT BEEN ASSASSINATED THIS COUNTRY WOULD HAVE BEEN WONDERFUL I TRULY BELIEVE !! AMEN  R.I.P. TO BOTH OF THOSE PATRIOTS & BRAVE MEN...
Titouan Renard Borders are useless: people can even go out of the image now...
You are stupid..plz stfu
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Is giving me my fuckin tax return...bitch
Build the wall
Build the Wall!  NOW!
DEMOCRATS WORRIED ABOUT THEIR SAFETY BEHIND THE WALLS OF THE CAPITOL DURING STATE OF THE UNION SPEECH, BUT, DEMOCRATS NOT WORRIED ABOUT SAFETY OF THE AMERICAN PEOPLE
DEMOCRATS WORRIED ABOUT THEIR SAFETY BEHIND THE WALLS OF THE CAPITOL DURING STATE OF THE UNION SPEECH, BUT, DEMOCRATS NOT WORRIED ABOUT SAFETY OF THE AMERICAN PEOPLE
BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL
Calm down. Everyone wants border security. We just want the money spent effectively on more personnel, high tech border surveillance technology and so on. Not on a wasteful monument to Trump's vanity.
Anyone that disagrees with securing our borders should be shot for treason.
Anyone that disagrees with securing our borders should be shot for treason.
Build the wall
And the liberals laugh.  They must detest America.
It is only a wicked father who refuses to protect his family, and it is only a wicked mother who prays that her God given family be scattered, the  husband and children be killed or their blood be sucked . Is there anyone not supporting the border wall be built, if there is anyone like that,  such  a person wants America, Its Citizens and humanity terrorised. I can see Chuck and Nancy don't care to know how America is doing. Democrats  are the cause of Government shutdown, President Trump wants them to support the building of the border wall to keep America and Its Citizens safe.
It is only a wicked father who refuses to protect his family, and it is only a wicked mother who prays that her God given family be scattered, the  husband and children be killed or their blood be sucked . Is there anyone not supporting the border wall be built, if there is anyone like that,  such  a person wants America, Its Citizens and humanity terrorised. I can see Chuck and Nancy don't care to know how America is doing. Democrats  are the cause of Government shutdown, President Trump wants them to support the building of the border wall to keep America and Its Citizens safe.
No, dumb dumb. Just no.
BUILD THE WALL
Tick tick motherfucker
FAKE President
You really need a punch in the teeth, Trump! Any time, any place, chickenshit!
GOD BLESS YOU MR.PRESIDENT. STAND FAST, TAKE ALL PASSPORTS FROM ANY AMERICAN HELPING THE CARAVANS. STOP THAT INVASION.
GOD BLESS YOU MR.PRESIDENT. STAND FAST, TAKE ALL PASSPORTS FROM ANY AMERICAN HELPING THE CARAVANS. STOP THAT INVASION.
Build the wall
Build the wall
Killed America when he took office
Shut up Fool !!
Shut up Fool !!
Your loyalty is to Russia and Putin, not the Americans who can’t pay there bills because of your tantrum!!! Whether dem or republicans you have an obligation to treat us all fair and equally. You haven’t done that, because you’re a weak, ignorant fool, not leader
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Your're a worthless bitch..
Lets exterminate the cartel Mr President
Resign asshole
Resign asshole
build the wall
Impeach Trump
Just like Putin. We want this in Norway too. Unfortunately our Government is run by NWO FAKE POLITICIANS, WORKING FOR THEIR OWN FAME AND MONEY. Disgusting to witness norwegian msm as propagandists for these unworthy politicians selling our wealth out to sArabia and the NWO EU an UN.
Guys a goof straight up
build the wall.
lying fat ass crook
Build the wall
The wall won't actually help. Everyone wants border security, but the money should be spent on things that will actually work, like more personnel, high tech border surveillance technology, more immigration judges and so on.
Wished I knew what 316 of you morons find so funny, he's exactly right.
Build the wall
Ports and Airports Dumb Ass smh
What an ASSHOLE
BUILD THAT WALL
BUILD THAT WALL
BUILD THE WALL
Donald Trump your doing a good job. We need the wall built if the Democrats would give in and just let go of there childish ways we wouldn’t be in this predicament of everyone not getting paid and the government being shut down and all. Then sorry son of a bitches called the Democrats need to either retire or just quit because they aren’t helping this problem any more better than it already is getting.
Build the wall
Physicians were unable to reach a consensus: Should the U.S. build Trump's Mexican Wall? The Allergists were in favor of scratching it, but the Dermatologists advised not to make any rash moves. The Gastroenterologist's had sort of a gut feeling about it, but the Neurologists thought Trump had a lot of nerve. Meanwhile, Obstetricians felt certain everyone was laboring under a misconception, while the Ophthalmologists considered the idea shortsighted. Pathologists yelled, "Over my dead body!" while the Pediatricians said, "Oh, grow up!" The Psychiatrists thought the whole idea was madness, while the Radiologists could see right through it. Surgeons decided to wash their hands of the whole thing and the Internists claimed it would indeed be a bitter pill to swallow. The Plastic Surgeons opined that this proposal would "put a whole new face on the matter." The Podiatrists thought it was a step forward, but the Urologists were pissed off at the whole idea. Anesthesiologists thought the whole idea was a gas, and those lofty Cardiologists didn't have the heart to say no. In the end, the Proctologists won out, leaving the entire decision up to the assholes in Washington!
Build the Wall!!!
Build the Wall!!!
Build the damn wall!
Build the damn wall!
Why did you imbeciles care so much about Hillary's emails and you don't care about Ivanka's emails and her use of a private email server? Why did you care so much about Hillary having friends in high places and you don't care about Trump owing Russian Mob $650 Millon and his "relationships" with an evil, murderous dictator like Putin? Secret meetings. Spies in our White House? Why did you all go crazy about Benghazi but don't care about the 15 people and 4 servicemen who lost their lives on Syria yesterday? Why????
Build the wall
Build the wall
Keep lying Trump that the Dems don't want any border security.  Keep the government shutdown as well, it will ensure that you will be a one term President :-) and that will be the greatest thing you have ever done.  :-)
You’re a crook you’re a fraud and you’re a fucking joke Mr. President
You’re a crook you’re a fraud and you’re a fucking joke Mr. President
Build wall president
Build wall president
How can you call yourself a real American if you hate Donald Trump. He has nothing but America's best interests and has done nothing but make this country great again just like he said god bless you and your family Mr Trump you saved America from the most coward and corrupt  Clinton's and Obama's nothing American about either of the scum. But once again thank you Mr President Donald Trump
Your an orange dumm ASS
Build the wall
Build the damn wall
Build the damn wall
Start defending our borders in Syria! You just killed 4 of our great soldiers! YOU DID IT!
Start defending our borders in Syria! You just killed 4 of our great soldiers! YOU DID IT!
Block all the perverted Leftist trolls that have infested this site! When blocked their heads explode.
Block all the perverted Leftist trolls that have infested this site! When blocked their heads explode.
One of the best presidents I have ever seen ❤️ DONALD TRAMP
How about getting rid of the Federal Reserve and printing money through the treasury..all debt would be gone over night..you stupid Jackass...
You are an idiot. 🖕🏻🤡
You are an idiot. 🖕🏻🤡
Jeffrey Brown you must be referring to Pelosi and Schumer!
Ass Clown 🤡
Ass Clown 🤡
Pitiful moron.
he’s trying to bully congress into getting what he wants, we as the people can fight against him!!! theres millions of us and one of him!! a wall will not keep drug trafficking away, they have under ground tunnels, everyone knows that. you’re trying to keep people away that need to come to america so they have money and opportunity, you deserve to burn in hell
Total colossal perfidious imbecile, Nazi, Russian agent and thief. What bullsshit!!!!
If Walls don't work, why do I have to have one around my Pool? Why are Walls around Schools and Day Cares? Why did Disney put one around their lakes? Why do Over 55 Communities have Walls and Guard Stations? Why does the Democratic Party have one around their Building? Get the point? President Donald J. Trump, if you have to shut the government down in order to get our Wall that will provide the safety and National Security that All Americans are entitled too, do whatever it takes! How many more loved ones do we have to bury before the Democrats do their job? My family buried an 18 year old American girl and her American 20 year old companion is a double leg amputee. Oh, the criminal illegal immigrant that is supposed to be deported at the end of his prison term(originally 17 years) will be out of prison in 2021 (2 yrs for a life and pair of legs), do you want him in your neighborhood? Here’s the Senate switchboard: (202) 224-3121. Call your Senator. Tell them you stand with the President. Demand the wall. #BuildOurWall
The Dim Rats are so stubborn like children !!!!!! Go Trump !!!!!!
STEP #1) CALL NEWS "BRIEF" STEP #2) HOLD PEN AND PAPER UP STEP #3) TELL NANCY PELOSI DEMS CAN STOP THE SHUT DOWN RIGHT NOW, BY FUNDING THE WALL. DEMS ARE WORKING TO PROTECT THE USA OR THEY ARENT. YOU HAVE 24 HRS TO PROTECT OUR NATION BEFORE I DO!
STEP #1) CALL NEWS "BRIEF" STEP #2) HOLD PEN AND PAPER UP STEP #3) TELL NANCY PELOSI DEMS CAN STOP THE SHUT DOWN RIGHT NOW, BY FUNDING THE WALL. DEMS ARE WORKING TO PROTECT THE USA OR THEY ARENT. YOU HAVE 24 HRS TO PROTECT OUR NATION BEFORE I DO!
Dumbest mofo alive!
Debbie Skinner your profile looks like Putins people created it. No facts on where you are from, work, or live. So dont be so quick to label those with opposing views as not being real. I worked for 51 years, paid my taxes and SS. Raised my kids to all work and pay taxes. I oppose the wall, support border security, am for more accessible ports of entry and better screening,  and am torally against the gov't shutdown. I blame Donald Trump for creating it, and Mitch McConnell for prolonging it by not allowing bipartisan legislation that has passed the house to even be put up for debate and a possible vote. He is now the biggest obstacle to reopening the government, not Shumer, not Pelosi.
Man you fake trolls are out there in full force but you are not the voice of the people, you are scum cowards hiding behind phony accounts! How’s the weather in Russia or is it China or in your Mom’s basement? Build the wall! BTW, your irreverent comments just unifies us even more and makes us stronger so knock yourselves out!
What a fucking moron
Build the wall!!!
so you blocked Pelosi GOOD FOR YOU, stay strong Mr President and don't let the,mget you down....Pelosi is determined to destroy not only you but this country also...SHE IS TERRIFIED OF YOU !!!!! and so are the other dims, they are all afraid of you exposing their devious anddishonest deeds...….HANG IN THERE !!!!
You doctored these photos you fat ass! And longer fingers.
Bob Kelley Let's get to it, I don't understand why as the President, You can't take 5.3 Billion of the Mexican Cartels Drug Money and build the damn Wall !! What are they going to do, demand it back, I don't think that's happening and then you can Boast that the Mexican's really did pay for the WALL !! So lets get this done, your the President GET ER DONE..... then open the Government and make Nancy and Chuckie look like the ass's they are..... then how many crossover supporter's will you have, for coming up with this idea !!!! Now we'll see if those that read these pass them on or throw them away.... X NAM Navy also a supporter !!!! 🇺🇸 🤔 🇨🇱 😁 🇺🇸
As we Kenyans continue to suffer for the Americans we also need a wall build by United States of America,Kenya Dusit Hotel attack was a revenge on Donald Trump policy on Jerusalem,Kenyans continue to die in the hands of United States of America from 1998, 2013 and now 2019 ...it's high time for the American government to recognize Kenyan passport to enter USA without a visa
As we Kenyans continue to suffer for the Americans we also need a wall build by United States of America,Kenya Dusit Hotel attack was a revenge on Donald Trump policy on Jerusalem,Kenyans continue to die in the hands of United States of America from 1998, 2013 and now 2019 ...it's high time for the American government to recognize Kenyan passport to enter USA without a visa
He is such a Liar .he is a TREASONOUS CRIMINAL Traitor
Susan Casto He can't force Mexico to pay for it. Unfortunate,if he choose to stop the annual welfare this Country gives to Mexico,the liberals would melt down! They would block his attempts to stop the money given to Mexico,everyone knows this. But,if he stops even a small percent ofthe illegal  entries, the wall would pay for itself with nothing more then the costs we absorb per entry.
You promised 200 times that Mexico is paying for the wall. Plus, why didn't you vote for it for the two years where you controlled the Senate and the house? Must not have been TOO important ya MORON!
Enough of illegals sneeking in bringing drugs, diseases and crime!  BUILD THE WALL!
Enough of illegals sneeking in bringing drugs, diseases and crime!  BUILD THE WALL!
Bloated lying POS. We've been here a long time without a wall and will continue to be, you egomaniac. Whether you die, are impeached or resign doesn't matter as long as you and your mafia goons are out of the WH. That will MAGA! FU and your wall.
Bloated lying POS. We've been here a long time without a wall and will continue to be, you egomaniac. Whether you die, are impeached or resign doesn't matter as long as you and your mafia goons are out of the WH. That will MAGA! FU and your wall.
IMPEACH TRUMP!
IMPEACH TRUMP!
If a militia of armed American patriots traveled to the border and shot any illegals or migrants crossing into the US, what would be the penalty? Certainly it wouldn’t be murder as they would simply be protecting the country from foreign invaders and stopping a crime in progress?
I don't see any problem of having a border wall at all, it is important, it is essential and it is necessary to have it. Those illegal immigrants digging a hole under or climbing over  are criminals. If my country has problems other than war do I illegally run away  to the neighboring country ? No.
That is exactly what the democrats want. One world wide nation under their chaotic rule. They are more than happy to throw away US sovereignty if it will accelerate their global citizen goals! Stay strong, win both the house and the senate by to build the wall. MAGA in 2020! If the Brits can escape the EU, you can escape the democrats!
Shutdown is going on BUT that Bitch is taking a Vacation using Government Plane / Taxpayer Money
Build the wall
Build the wall
Protect Americans from the anti American, domestic terrorist Democrats and their commie Leftists, #PresidentTrump; the Constitutional Republic and Bill of Rights will be destroyed by them, not other countries.
Thank you Trump for protecting us when the democrats refuse to care about anyone but the illegal immigrants coming into our country and raping and killing our people. Nancy even hid behind a wall when the Angel mom's came to visit her to talk about the illegal immigrants killing their children. She wants to hide and not let the media see how awful she's being while you are trying to make this country safe again.
Thank you Trump for protecting us when the democrats refuse to care about anyone but the illegal immigrants coming into our country and raping and killing our people. Nancy even hid behind a wall when the Angel mom's came to visit her to talk about the illegal immigrants killing their children. She wants to hide and not let the media see how awful she's being while you are trying to make this country safe again.
What an absolute load of crap.  Americans want a solution not a symbol.  A wall may be part of the solution but it is far from THE solution.  Get with it and become a president and stop acting like you're one.
Trump supporters , you have no relevance. You are a Trump supporter. You obviously have no common sense, no morals, and are too gullible to have an intellectual opinion, since you are dumb enough to support Trump. You have been conned. A damn wall really? A wall to swim or boat around, because the wall can't block waterways. A wall to dig under, because they haven't been building mile long tunnels across the border already. A wall they can't climb over, blast or cut through like they have done. A wall they can't fly over....I mean, Trump supporters have no common sense, to know it's a waste of money. Especially, when we have a homeless problem and places like Flint!
Liberals are now wanting to legalize pedophilia, yet some liberals have no idea and call us retarded and stupid.🧐
Our nation went downhill from the moment you took office.   Hawaii was an educated bilingual and literate kingdom before it was annexed and it probably would have joined the Commonwealth of the 🇬🇧.  California, Arizona, New Mexico, Utah, Texas, Oklahoma, Nevada, and Colorado were part of the Spanish empire and Mexico before our nation started a BS war just to take over land under manifest destiny.  This land was first settled by indigenous peoples, and your ancestors illegally came to this land, pillaged from the Native Americans if not killed them off through bloodshed and disease, only for you to prevent the INEVITABLE. The world is becoming smaller and technology is only making travel and multilingualism more common. You represent an obsolete America. You represent outdated practices. How can you lead the most innovative country in the world when you lack a single innovative bone in your body? You only got by in life because of your bombastic entitled attitude. You are unfit to lead this country and BELONG IN JAIL.   #AnyDemocrat2020
Our nation went downhill from the moment you took office.   Hawaii was an educated bilingual and literate kingdom before it was annexed and it probably would have joined the Commonwealth of the 🇬🇧.  California, Arizona, New Mexico, Utah, Texas, Oklahoma, Nevada, and Colorado were part of the Spanish empire and Mexico before our nation started a BS war just to take over land under manifest destiny.  This land was first settled by indigenous peoples, and your ancestors illegally came to this land, pillaged from the Native Americans if not killed them off through bloodshed and disease, only for you to prevent the INEVITABLE. The world is becoming smaller and technology is only making travel and multilingualism more common. You represent an obsolete America. You represent outdated practices. How can you lead the most innovative country in the world when you lack a single innovative bone in your body? You only got by in life because of your bombastic entitled attitude. You are unfit to lead this country and BELONG IN JAIL.   #AnyDemocrat2020
Stay strong, Mr. PRESIDENT!!. DO NOT CAVE, OR GIVE 1 INCH, TO THEM FILTHY, NO GOOD LOW LIFE, DEMONRATS!. This is why we voted for you!, bc you are thee GREATEST PRESIDENT EVER!!
Stay strong, Mr. PRESIDENT!!. DO NOT CAVE, OR GIVE 1 INCH, TO THEM FILTHY, NO GOOD LOW LIFE, DEMONRATS!. This is why we voted for you!, bc you are thee GREATEST PRESIDENT EVER!!
God sought a man among them that would build the wall, and stand in the gap before me on behalf of the land, that it should not be destroyed. Ezekiel 22:30 -- Pray for President Trump & a strong America! 🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯🇺🇸️
God sought a man among them that would build the wall, and stand in the gap before me on behalf of the land, that it should not be destroyed. Ezekiel 22:30 -- Pray for President Trump & a strong America! 🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯🇺🇸️
Thanks and THANKS for protecting our country from INVADERS ! ILLEGALS! CRIMINALS , drug dealers and more.GOD BLESS  YOU and YOUR WORK ! ! ! !
There are far more criminals and murderers  that are white Americans ,  not to mention all the other American gangs and criminals than the 0.0132% of illegals that are criminals. Most drugs come through check points, human bodies, planes, etc. Hell, the drug cartels, can spend an extra couple of hundred dollars to go to Canada first then here. I mean damn...they have submarines and bring them all up and down the coast. You think an ignorant wall will stop them, lmbo! They are laughing at us!
This is the most TRUE SPOKEN WORDS!!! PRESIDENT TRUMP is only Trying to Help Americans and YOUR CHILDREN and GRANDCHILDREN’S future ✅🇺🇸
Don't bother with a wall, just put a mile wide minefield with machine gun posts every 200 yards with a shoot to kill policy, that will stop the dirty rats getting through.
man what fucking creep you are asshole oh I know what the people are going through why don't we go to daddy and get more money what a fucking tool asshole your DADDY is DEAD mother fucker
Yep, want to make sure it's weak enough so Russia can continue to penetrate it long after you're in jail.
Conservatives don't want illegal immigrants to come in because they fear they'll take jobs, receive taxpayer assistance, and challenge the dominance of white Protestant culture. (Correct me if I'm wrong.)  Progressives don't want families to die in the desert, be separated and put into cages, or live in fear in the only country they've ever known. (Again, correct me if I'm wrong.)  This "debate" is really becoming a cold civil war, and it's at a stalemate. Neither side is listening because we both believe the other side is using incorrect facts. I will admit that I truly believe I'm right, but I've run out of tools to make my point, so let's ignore for a moment which side is right or wrong and try instead a new discussion in a very new direction.  Mexicans are leaving their country to escape violence and corruption, and I don't have a solution for that. There are Mexican nationals already living in this country, and because a wall can never stop them, let's leave them out of this discussion, too.  The new immigrants are coming here for economic opportunity, and I think that's an easier point to address. They wouldn't HAVE economic opportunity if there weren't willing employers.  Catching those employers is very challenging, and that gigantic challenge requires a bold solution. Let's reward whistle-blowers with citizenship. Seriously. With such a rule in place, nobody in this country could ever again hire more than one undocumented immigrant without getting caught. No worker could ever again be exploited for less-than-minimum wage and suffer OSHA-violating standards because of their citizenship status. No American job could ever again be replaced with a position that cheats the rules.
Conservatives don't want illegal immigrants to come in because they fear they'll take jobs, receive taxpayer assistance, and challenge the dominance of white Protestant culture. (Correct me if I'm wrong.)  Progressives don't want families to die in the desert, be separated and put into cages, or live in fear in the only country they've ever known. (Again, correct me if I'm wrong.)  This "debate" is really becoming a cold civil war, and it's at a stalemate. Neither side is listening because we both believe the other side is using incorrect facts. I will admit that I truly believe I'm right, but I've run out of tools to make my point, so let's ignore for a moment which side is right or wrong and try instead a new discussion in a very new direction.  Mexicans are leaving their country to escape violence and corruption, and I don't have a solution for that. There are Mexican nationals already living in this country, and because a wall can never stop them, let's leave them out of this discussion, too.  The new immigrants are coming here for economic opportunity, and I think that's an easier point to address. They wouldn't HAVE economic opportunity if there weren't willing employers.  Catching those employers is very challenging, and that gigantic challenge requires a bold solution. Let's reward whistle-blowers with citizenship. Seriously. With such a rule in place, nobody in this country could ever again hire more than one undocumented immigrant without getting caught. No worker could ever again be exploited for less-than-minimum wage and suffer OSHA-violating standards because of their citizenship status. No American job could ever again be replaced with a position that cheats the rules.
true!!!!!  the caravans(invaders) are now coming in 'waves'...and they will continue!!!!!!!! can Mexico stop them?  I surely hope so!!!!  Guatemala can't, for that really is the country they should be seeking asylum at, not the US...!
true!!!!!  the caravans(invaders) are now coming in 'waves'...and they will continue!!!!!!!! can Mexico stop them?  I surely hope so!!!!  Guatemala can't, for that really is the country they should be seeking asylum at, not the US...!
Michelle Calderon go trump
Michelle Calderon, yes, Schumer is all that and less!
He is a trader ,liar and a moron
He is a trader ,liar and a moron
Borders?  I've only heard of the ONE border   “He is shutting down the government to break his signature campaign promise. His signature campaign promise was that the taxpayers weren’t going to have to pay for it.” The House Armed Services Committee Chairman said on “This Week.” When you keep your promise, the wall can be built.
Its so sad that a person would use their politcal power for foolery.  America is the biggest shitshow circus right now and Donald Trump the leading clown.  I blame your parents for not whipping your ass when you caught a temper tandrum over Leggos. If they did you probably would reconsider this stupidity of a wall. ALL FEDERAL EMPLOYEES SHOULD UNITE AND WALKOUT! What is a wall going to do if you dont have any federal employees guarding it?
This guy is a dickhead plain and simple.
Trump you want to make USA great again. You need to stop this shutdown so federal employees can return to work. Families need a pay check to pay bills, meds, gas car payments, etc. None of these things do you need to worry about, so do not insult Americans saying you now what they are going thru because it is another lie coming out of your mouth.
Hahahahahahahaha. You stupid moron
All y’all niggas supporting this orange pill looking ass Bitch wack asf🤷🏽‍♀️🤣
To all people who dislike and hate our president, I don’t think anyone including myself, agrees with the decisions that president Trump makes for our country. However, a president of a country and nation can’t make decisions graciously for each and every person. Also, he doesn’t have too. His job is to protect our country and keep it the greatest country in the world. The United States!!! Republican, Democrats, etc.. no matter your political views, support and help from all you Americans out there can really help our president and congress get this country back on track by supporting them and standing together as one nation, instead of putting them down and being selfish because many citizens of the U.S. aren’t getting their way. Things change. It’s life! It’s humanity. Accept and move on, and just be a good person. God bless everyone!
i think michael cohen is lying aboutr trump to save his neck he lying about the project not true at all he is lying just to safe his own neck that all he doing michael cohen you are  a liar big time liar lying to muller like that about trump.
WHAT HAPPEND with COLLUSION ? fucking TRAITOR !!! where are u Agents of FBI or CIA or NSA etcetera , why are u allowing 2 mess up country and everything its Based on?
Yeah you're right if your name was not Donald jackass Trump
What are you blubbering about??  We don't 'stop being American' just becuse your dum wall don't get built. but by the end of it you will not be anymore.  You're a special kind of stupid, ain't ya?
Trump gets the job done, even if others don't agree. We now have another caravan coming again. I feel sorry for people who have traveled so far, but we need to get our own homeless people off the streets, and put those who have been waiting for years to become a citizen first. I am sick and tired of those who condemn us that voted for Trump. Its our freedom folks. You forget, that Presidents before Trump were all dealing with the same issues as he is. The only difference is that he is tackling the problems and getting them done. None of the caravans have ever been inoculated against viruses, so they will be bringing in the diseases and then some. All those complaining, should try and do the job or help out.
Trump gets the job done, even if others don't agree. We now have another caravan coming again. I feel sorry for people who have traveled so far, but we need to get our own homeless people off the streets, and put those who have been waiting for years to become a citizen first. I am sick and tired of those who condemn us that voted for Trump. Its our freedom folks. You forget, that Presidents before Trump were all dealing with the same issues as he is. The only difference is that he is tackling the problems and getting them done. None of the caravans have ever been inoculated against viruses, so they will be bringing in the diseases and then some. All those complaining, should try and do the job or help out.
How about the highest and most important stop holding 800K family incomes hostage for your invisible enemy!! Trump you are a joke and a loser.
How about the highest and most important stop holding 800K family incomes hostage for your invisible enemy!! Trump you are a joke and a loser.
Too dumb for Nancy Pelosi. She owns you now.
You're a nation of Animals and no different to any terrorist organisation !  Sickos !!!
Impeach the sorry Bastard.....
1 of 1 stories  Poll: Trump Approval Down, Slips With Base  by Domenico Montanaro  January 17, 2019 | 3 min 36 sec  ￼ Share  ￼ Listen Now  ￼ Playlist  ￼  Brendan Smialowski/AFP/Getty Images  ￼ Enlarge for caption  While the longest government shutdown in U.S. history continues, President Trump's approval rating is down, and there are cracks showing with his base. A new NPR/PBS NewsHour/Marist poll finds Trump's approval rating down and his disapproval rating up from a month ago. He currently stands at 39 percent approve, 53 disapprove — a 7-point net change from December when his rating was 42 percent approve, 49 percent disapprove. And the movement has come from within key portions of his base. He is:  Down significantly among suburban men, a net-positive approval rating of 51-to-39 percent to a net-negative of 42 percent approve, 48 percent disapprove. That's a net change of down 18 percentage points;  Down a net of 13 points among white evangelicals, from 73-to-17 percent approve to 66-to-23 percent approve;  Down a net of 10 points among Republicans, from 90-to-7 percent approve to 83-to-10 percent;  Down marginally among white men without a college degree, from 56-to-34 percent approve to 50-to-35 percent approve, a net change downward of 7 points.  Don't see the graphic above? Click here. "For the first time, we saw a fairly consistent pattern of having his base showing evidence of a cracking," said Lee Miringoff, director of the Marist Institute for Public Opinion, which conducted the poll. "Don't know if that's temporary — tied to the government shutdown — or a broader problem the president is having." The percentage of people now saying they strongly disapprove of the job the president's doing is up to 45 percent, the highest for President Trump since December 2017. Don't see the graphic above? Click here. 2020 headwinds The president also faces some significant headwinds for re-election in 2020. Just 30 percent of registered voters said they will definitely vote for Trump in 2020, while 57 percent said they will definitely vote against him. Just 76 percent of Trump supporters, 69 percent of Republicans and 58 percent of white evangelicals say they will definitely vote for him. Many, if not most, of them will likely vote for the president, but their softness in supporting him for re-election is a sign of vulnerability. For context, in 2010, when asked about then-President Barack Obama, just 36 percent said they would definitely vote for him, while 48 percent said they would not. Obama went on to win with 51 percent of the vote. But for Trump to have more than half the country already saying it definitely won't vote for him indicates he is facing a difficult re-election. "The president has had his base and not much else," Miringoff said, "and when you look ahead to the election ... he enters with a significant disadvantage. His re-election prospects would definitely be in jeopardy at this point." Trump has a lot of work to do to be able to reassemble the coalition that voted for him narrowly to win in the Electoral College in 2016. He lost the popular vote by almost 3 million votes and won just 46 percent of the vote. He won by about 70,000 votes combined between Pennsylvania, Wisconsin and Michigan, all states that have trended away from the president during his first two years in office. The Democratic field As for who Trump would face, former Vice President Joe Biden stands apart from the Democratic field, in terms of how Democratic voters feel about him compared to others. Biden is the best-known potential Democratic candidate, and is very well liked — 76 percent of Democrats and Democratic-leaning independents have a favorable impression of him. Just 12 percent have a negative view. "If he gets in, he automatically becomes the front runner with numbers like this," Miringoff said. "He becomes the candidate who you have to get into the mix with and be competitive with him." Barbara Carvalho, director of the poll, added, "It is unusual to see a candidate, who's been part of the Washington scene for so long, have such a low unfavorable rating." Don't see the graphic above? Click here. Bernie Sanders, the principal challenger to 2016 nominee Hillary Clinton, is well-known, but between 1-in-3 and 1-in-4 Democrats have a negative opinion of him. There are a lot of questions about whether Sanders will be able to keep his base of activist supporters together, four years later, now that Democrats have so many more options. Massachusetts Sen. Elizabeth Warren has an almost equally high favorability rating as Sanders, but is not viewed as negatively. Others are potentially well-positioned, too. New Jersey Sen. Cory Booker, Texas Rep. Beto O'Rourke and California Sen. Kamala Harris are in a next tier and have a capability of taking off if they make a good impression as voters get to know them. The poll isn't good news for all potential Democratic contenders, however. The Democratic primary electorate does not appear ready for a billionaire. As former New York Mayor Michael Bloomberg weighs a run, Democrats are evenly split on their views of him, while about half of them haven't yet formed an opinion. A primary challenge to Trump? There has been talk of a primary challenge to President Trump, but no candidate emerges with particular backing. Ohio Gov. John Kasich and Mitt Romney are viewed more unfavorably than favorably with Republicans and Republican-leaning independents — 24 percent view Kasich favorably, 28 percent view him unfavorably; 29 percent view Romney positively, while 48 percent view Romney negatively. Romney has been an outspoken critic of Trump, and the GOP base does not appear to appreciate that. "There is no strong support" for a primary challenge to Trump, Miringoff said. "Kasich is not well-known, and Romney is not particularly popular." In the mood for compromise As this shutdown continues, 59 percent said they mostly blame President Trump or congressional Republicans for it. And more than 6-in-10 are in the mood for compromise — 63 percent said they want their elected officials to compromise with people they disagree with rather than stick to their positions, including a majority of Republicans. Just 31 percent overall said they want their elected officials to stick to their positions no matter what. Strong Republicans (50 percent), African-Americans (51 percent), Trump supporters (53 percent), Latinos (55 percent) and Gen Xers (56 percent) are among the least likely to say they want their elected officials to compromise. "People are looking for compromise right now," Miringoff said. But neither side is seen as doing a very good job of it right now – 57 percent think the Trump administration is doing too little to work with Democrats in Congress; 55 percent think that Democrats are doing too little to work with the administration. Neither party is making a very good impression, either. Only about a third of Americans have a positive view of congressional Democrats (34 percent) while a majority (53 percent) disapprove of the job they are doing. An even lower number (29 percent) have a positive view of congressional Republicans and more view them negative (58 percent). The survey of 1,023 adults was conducted from Jan. 10 to Jan. 13 by The Marist Poll for NPR and the PBS NewsHour. Results for all Americans have a margin of error of +/- 3.8 percentage points. There were 324 Republicans or Republican-leaning independents surveyed. Where they are referenced, there is a margin of error of +/- 6.8 percentage points. There were 417 Democrats and Democratic-leaning independents surveyed. Where they are referenced, there is a margin of error of +/- 6 percentage points.
Build that wall & stand strong against the democrats who support ISIS, MS13, criminal aliens, 6 more years of the best president ever. Chuckie Nancy Maxine Waters Pocahontas & that evil stupid Cortez lady you will lose & you all can go to hell
Bugger Trump you are even dumber than you look.
You’re ruining this nation, Trump, you stupid, fucking, ignorant twat! And the great thing is, you’re finally realizing it and you’re panicking! Bwa ha ha! 🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣
Y’all patriots go troll Schumer and Pelosi page.  They are catching hell...
Resign you dirty grifter.
The Mr Rogers of the USA !   WHAT A STORY TELLER KIDS !
Last year more people died from gun violence committed by American citizens than all the murders committed by illegal aliens over the last decade.  True story.  There were nearly as many mass shootings committed by American citizens last year as there were days in the year.  True story.  If you want to clutch your pearls & cry over a genuine crisis, look no further than the next shooting.  No one thinks border security & illegal immigration are not important issues that need addressed.  True story.  Representatives from border districts from both nations, border patrol officials, military officials, citizens from both nations who live in the border region all agree that a wall is a bad idea for numerous reasons.  True story.  The wall is a 18th century idea that simply doesn’t work in a 21st century world.  More technology, personnel, & an end to “the war on drugs” policies are common sense & widely accepted solutions.  Additionally, have you wondered why this is happening now?  The GOP had control of congress & the white house for the past two years & did nothing about this “crisis.”  Why now?  Everything I’ve stated in this post is verifiably accurate & I’ll happily provide you w/ sources if you’d like.
Thank you for leaving our borders at our coastlines and airports unsecured. Now we have open borders. If you thought that a wall would stop any threats, then you're a stupid Son of butch and you need to be FIRED!!! Because now with the shutdown, you have left our borders completely opened.
The real shame is that Trump AND the Dems are grown ass people and they should be able to sit down as such and work it out without holding thousands of hard working Americans hostage. Stop pointing fingers and do something besides tearing our country in half!!!!
The real shame is that Trump AND the Dems are grown ass people and they should be able to sit down as such and work it out without holding thousands of hard working Americans hostage. Stop pointing fingers and do something besides tearing our country in half!!!!
Pelosi does not even have the guts to face family members of those killed by illegals. To call her a leader is just pathetic. This problem has been going on for decades. We want it fixed. Permanently.
Stop with the lies and propaganda. You are the worst president in American History!
Then defend than without a wall
TRUMP IS, "INDIVIDUAL 1" and implicated in 2 felonies in court documents. BEWARE the Trump Low life cheesy lying UnAMERICAN crime family.  MORE MANAFORT INFORMATION WILL MAKE YOUR LIFE A LIVING HELL. Michael Cohan has set date to testify in congress in open session. 😂 Grab your popcorn, Walnuts 😂  Trump has been being investigated since before inauguration by the counterintelligence division of the FBI (ongoing).  Allen Weisselberg and David Pecker have given up all they know including videotapes and documents about all his filthy dirty dealings.
Give the State of the Union from the senate, and give it on time!  Pelosi is obviously scared stiff that you will tell all of our nation just how she and the dems/aka communists would take us all down.  Nice chess move.
Go president Trump! Thanks for standing your grounds..keep America great! Don't let this country go to hell in a hand bag. Don't let this country turn into a "shithole" like California.
Stand STRONG Mr. President, tell Nancy to take down the fence or cement wall surrounding the palace she resides in and see how she gets a lot of people she and Hillary would call them deplorable and irredeemables and see if she’s afraid or is willing to let them stay at her house and have them over for tea and krimpets!!! Build this country’s WALL Nancy for our protection.  If you don’t like living in The United States of America then take yourself and crying chuckle Schumer and go fly a commercial plane and get the HELL out of my country.  As far as I go, I believe you are the new communism and your both TRAITORS!!.  Actually, you both should both be in JAIL!!!
Then put the government back to work and do your job rather than fear mongering.
Any word on the progress of denying all tax funded benefits to illegals and their anchor baby spawn?? That’s going to be a bigger deterrent to them than ANY wall or fence!!  🇺🇸😡🇺🇸😡🇺🇸
THAT WHY HE PUTTING IT IN JEOPARDY....IDIOT
STOP SUPPORTING ISRAEL LOOK WHAT THEY TEACH   5:16 / 20:01 Words to Remember! Quotes from the Jewish Bible,the Talmud ✡ HD 11,499 views  250  32  SHARE  SAVE  SaturnRising ♄ Published on Nov 26, 2015 Quotes from The Jewish Talmud: Gentile: A Non Jew Goy= "Cattle" aka Goyim Referring to Non-Jews Quotes: From the Talmud 1- If a Jew finds a Object Lost by: A Goy it does Not Have to be Returned [BABA MAZIA 24a] 2- "If a Goy hits a Jew, He Must be Killed  [Sanhedrin 58b] 3- If a Jew Kills a Goy There Will be No Death Penalty.  [Sanhedrin 57a] 4- 'What a Jew Steals from a Goy,He must Keep  [Sanhedrin 57a] 5- 'All Children of the Goyim Are Animals  [Yebamoth 98a] 5- 'If You Eat with a Goy it's the same as eating with a Dog' [Yebamoth 98a Tospoth,Jebamouth 84b] 6- 'The Gentiles are not Humans,They are Beasts' [Baba Mezia 114b] 7- 'Even The Best of the Goyim Should be Killed' [Soferim 15] 8- 'Do Not Save the Goyim in Danger of Death, Show NO Mercy to the Goyim' [Hikkoth Akum X1] 9- 'Sexual Intercourse between the Goyim is Like Intercourse between Animals'  [Sanhedrin 74b] 10- 'When the Messiah Comes every Jew will have  2800 Slaves' Simeon fol 56D 11- 'Extermination of the Christians is a Necessary Sacrifice' [Zohar, Shemothj 12- 'Jehovah Created the non-Jew in human form so that the Jews would bot have to be an animal in human form,and condemned to serve the Jew day and night [Midrash Talpioth,p.225-L] 13- 'A Jew is Forbidden to drink from a glass of wine which a Gentile has touched,Because the touch has made the wine Unclean' [Schulchan Aruch, Johre Deah, 122] 14- ''To Communicate anything to a Goy about religious relations would be equal to the Killing of ALL Jews,for if the Goyim knew what we teach about them,they would Kill us openly'' [Libbre David 37] 15- ''A Jew may do to a non-Jewess what he can do. He may treat her as he treats a piece of meat.'' [Hadarine,20,B; Schulchan Aruch, Choszen Hamiszpat 348] 16- 'A Jew may violate but not marry a non-Jewish girl' [Gad. Shas.2:2] 17- "A"prayer" or "benediction" to be said by a Jewish man every day: "Thank God for not making me a Gentile, a woman or a Slave." [Hilkkoth Akum X1] 18-  "A Jew should and must make a false oath when the Goyim asks if our books contain anything against them" [Szaaloth-Utszabot, The Book of Jore Dia 17]
If we don't defend our country because of you and your corrupt administration, we are dead!
Should be. But it's only your campaign ploy. The wall and Mexico will pay. Trumpers gobbled up your lies. Still are! Congrats trump
If Trump really cared about us, he's resign.  Anyway, Mueller is coming for you, orange maggot.
Go on and build the fucking wall .You're our PRESIDENT !! Not the fucking democrates.
Why do you have to photoshop your picture, you stubby fingered fat ass?
Mash on them libtards Trump.  We the people love it.
Let me get this straight... Nancy wants the president to delay the State of the Union speech “because of security concerns” BUT she’s totally okay with NO security at the border! What a narcissistic bitch!
Let me get this straight... Nancy wants the president to delay the State of the Union speech “because of security concerns” BUT she’s totally okay with NO security at the border! What a narcissistic bitch!
just heard on cbc  we have 60 isis here don.t know  what to do with them  i say kill them  but they have to have proof to get them in court. the kurds have 1000 isis . 500 wives and 1000 children canadian .   what  do you do with them i say kill them in syria don.t bring them  home to canada but i don.t know mr trump what do you guys do with them.  we have woman in court now with butcher knife trying to kill people  mall by me  for isis . she is only going court now happened in summer. so you don.t need troops in syria isis here now
If are putos is compromised he becomes a Russian puppet
Good god. Why is this fool still crying. No one want the border wall. Expect for a few thousands brainwashed trumpet. Swollow your  your huge ego. And open the government
Make America Great...GET RID OF THESE DEMOCRATS
Nice  Photoshop  job  to  slim  your  fat  ass  down.  Hurry  up  and  die  of  a  heart  attack,  you  worthless cunt.
Well, except for the treason part...
Even in Australia we had illegal immigrants arriving by boat and our navy sent them back. People would die at sea cause of people smugglers.  Good on Trump for protecting the border 👍
FAT CATS LIKE TRUMP DON'T CARE ABOUT THE WORKING MAN. 202-224-2541 Wash.DC OFFICE Fax: (202) 224-2499 Wash DC OFFICE 502-582-6304 Louisville KY office EVERYONE CALL MITCHY MCCONNELL AND DEMAND HE BRING THE RESOLUTION TO REOPEN THE GOVT TO THE FLOOR
Robbyn Brewington TRUMP DOES NOT CARE ABOUT THE PEOPLE WHO ARE AFFECTED BY SHUTDOWN.  He Is an SOB BASTARD FROM HELL You Trump supporters move to PUTINS LAND AND TAKE TRUMP WITH YOU   HE LOVES PUTIN.  THE DICTATOR
I'm standing with the President. Let Congress work for a change. They seem to have lost their way and can't speak their own minds They are afraid of their shadows. The American People have a right to representation and our boarders should be protected. It's ridiculous for Pelosi to send a letter regarding the State of the Union. She could careless about the people affected by the partial shutdown. She only cares about herself. Maybe more people should thinks for themselves as well.
What to do about the ones already here .We need to tax all money wired to Mexico.
Last time I checked, we did not have open borders.  There are guys in booths checking ID's, agents with guns, bomb and drug sniffing dogs, lots of stuff!  Federal govt. employees not getting a pay check, please identify yourself.  The rest of you do not have a dog in this fight.
What a goof....hope he goes to jail!
We don't have a border so I guess we will cease to exist pretty soon!! The illegals continue to pour into this country and no longer lie about why they are coming. FOR A JOB
It's sad how much power all u white fucks have in this world and enough just isn't enough when will you all be tired of hating the world u live in that's why you all age so badly u are very wicked people and his only option is to start war and we will only fail and the leaders of the world will tuck their tails run and hide ur not scaring me u evil mother fuckers it was u who God mentioned in the bible it will be you who will start war and fail our economy it's u and those who hide behind those big white walls with your secrets and your lies God mentioned u and the 7th seal will soon be open and all leaders of our world will meet their judgement day
Anyone ever thought maybe those countries have a wall because of us and how the us is a bully and use to start wars to steal that countries resources
You like to make mountains out of molehills.
You like to make mountains out of molehills.
Right, build the wall and throw the trashes out from USA. Then invite the good people to work or to live and make a better place. Say no to Criminals and robbers and killer communities.
Trump cock suckers is all I see
Do it the right way. These illegals are leaving their kids what does that say about them. Sorry but if politicans care so much take care of our own Americans first.
Amazing the amount of concern Pelosi has for the “security” of congress! So much so that she wishes to postpone the SOTU address by our POTUS...She has ZERO concern  for the security of our nation and will not fund a border wall to keep out those who are not vetted and want to sneak into our country to commit heinous crimes against our citizens! She is a sorry excuse for a human being!
Just Do It! We don't need anymore immigrants on STOLEN LAND....
5 more days and Trump will be aloud to RFI all the deep state, bureaucrats. This is what draining the swamp looks like.  This is the fight we have to have. Its Gonna be ugly, its gonna be loud. But its got to happen.
Yep. If we dont build this wall, the Mexicans will defeat our Army, our Navy, our Air Force, our Border Patrol Officers, and everyone in between. From there, they will caravan straight to Washington and steal the Declaration of Independence and the Constitution. Next, they'll establish communications back to Mexico and thus the United States of America will surrender. All because of a wall. Great thinking guy. Here, have 5 billion dollars for that wall thatll take 10 years to built. You'll likely be dead before then because of your age and health, but thats okay, because we'll have a wall. We'll make sure to tell the next group of pinheads that this wall is crucial to the survival of the American country.   Dont you worry your toupee over this, sir.
Drugs comes in via military choppers and vehicles, the wall will be useless, use technology and built a working system where everyone is loyal to the government, you personally tricked and stole from the same American people you want allude to protect, maybe you will be gaining from the wall
Trump equals betrayal, he is loyal to nothing or no one save his own ego! He is a blight on the soul of America and a scar on our honor.
You should start by not being a traitor that deserves to hang!
You only talking n talking,  doing nothing...worst president for USA
Look at Canada. We have an idiot in power and no borders.
please Nancy ... Explain.. Try real Hard.. Can you tell us why all your windows are Barred? Why at your mansion entrance... there stands an armed Guard? If we try to get past Him.. We would  be feathered and Tarred.... Yes Nancy ..Please.. Tell us again.. How MS-13 thugs are really our Friends..  You say who gets a Wall.. Just Depends.. Just Depends.. You tell us a Wall.. is a thing that offends.. To the rest of the world .. the bad message it Sends.. But Nancy... Explain.. If that were really True.. Why in the world ..is there a wall built around You?
please Nancy ... Explain.. Try real Hard.. Can you tell us why all your windows are Barred? Why at your mansion entrance... there stands an armed Guard? If we try to get past Him.. We would  be feathered and Tarred.... Yes Nancy ..Please.. Tell us again.. How MS-13 thugs are really our Friends..  You say who gets a Wall.. Just Depends.. Just Depends.. You tell us a Wall.. is a thing that offends.. To the rest of the world .. the bad message it Sends.. But Nancy... Explain.. If that were really True.. Why in the world ..is there a wall built around You?
Who's body did you photoshop your big stupid head onto? "Fake Photo"!
I say just shoot them as they come over. Or you could build the wall like trump wants.
Thank you President Trump for putting our safety  at the top of your list.
We started down that path when idiots elected you President... God Save America Again...get rid of this moron!
Prison walls dont stop criminals what makes yall Republicunts think it will stop illegal immigrants from getting here. Yall are really that dumb
You keep rippin and roarin it Mr. President
As president, you should step down like you said Obama’s should during the shutdown in his term. #FuckTrump
Illegal immigrants are trespassers, I don't see anyone allowing strangers moving onto their property and squatting to live....why should we allow them into the country to do the same? It's ok because they're not at your house?
Build the wall get it done
With hold pay from Congress and Senate so they will get the job done. If others don't get paid neither should they
Than do it already take the nancy Pelosi bitch out damnit!
I support trump but this wall is the dumbest waste of money I’ve ever heard of.... come on. It’s 2019.... the wall will do nothing except get ripped down in 20 years
He is nothing but a fucking liar..
He is absolutely right.  I know for a FACT that TERRORIST are entering the USA via this way. Build the wall.....it will protect all the idiots too.
So- build the damn wall allready. Keep your promise! I will not vote for you again if you are a liar!
Donald J. Trump Please stay tied hard and fast on the Border Wall.  Most all intelligent Americans realize your positive stand against Pelosi, Schumer and the rest of the Democrat Socialist is a  Life and Death stand of Good Republicans  vs Evil Democrat Socialists.
Dear Americans and friends, I believe, I believe, Donald Trump is just an ignorant flunky for wealthy special interests in government and in health  care and  that they are bankrupting our future for their wealth. He is deceiving us with the republican Congress and protecting special interests in health care and special interests in general. They are paying lawmakers for their support and complicity. He is not helping in his terrible immigration with his super rude noise; he is hiding and protecting wealthy and selfish interests at the expense of everyone else. The swamp has given Donald Trump directions not to bother them in their money making activities and he is obedient to them and going after defenseless poor people, refugees that need mercy and a humane chance as a ruse to deceive we the people. 	We are being badly governed in his cruel immigration hoax while he is being patted on the back for deceiving the middle class and helping the wealthy lobbies. As proof I offer humble Canada and that they are not as corrupt and arrogant as our non humble elected officials.  	What is the answer but to vote these carpetbagger republicans out of office and never to support Captain Ahab again!
Climate Change is the real threat you stupid americans
douchebag in chief, liar and a thief.
We need to defend against you
I think 20 people from Main Street could work out a immigration plan. PELOSI TIME TO DO YOUR JOB!!!
Moron!!!!..there are many ways to secure your border.... putting your government back to work would be one of them ...idiot!!
America does not have a wall in time to chase dangerous criminals to successfully carry out illegal illegal drug dealing, there is a wall of criminals running out of business, we will commit this. finding every way into America, sabotaging America in the next time the LORD will bless America especially for President DONALD J, TRUMP will always be safe .
And so should the people in America! And if they disagree, then they should move on the other side of the border and see how they like that!
So because we have no wall we have never been a nation??? 🤔
I am getting concerned about some of the government programs that are necessary for life in our country. Like WIC and food stamps, especially for single mothers. Please don't let them have problems. You can solve this problem with Congress ... just think ,, what would Jesus do in this situation?
We should start air lifting pieces of the Great wall of China to put on the boarder. China doesnt really need/use it like we do.
Build the wall . Everyone is worried about them tunneling under big deal easy to solve that problem Ever seen the pic with the wall and the water with the gators.  If there is any good coal or rock in the ground there just let the mines come in and strip mine just off the line 300+ ft deep hell they will even pay the government for the land no need to pay them to do the work. Then fill with water tunneling problem solved.
He loves these morons. They are anairpump to his ego,
I am an African and I supported of Donald J. Trump from Day one , I was called a fool, I asked why and I was told " Donald J. Trump Policies are nationalist and not globalist" and I asked won't our country be better if we have Trump like as a president, when has taking care of family first before pleasing the public becomes an evil?
Sir the BIG 30 draws near dump the swamp zombies now. Shrink Gov. You are so smart! You suckered the swamp zombies.
Sir the BIG 30 draws near dump the swamp zombies now. Shrink Gov. You are so smart! You suckered the swamp zombies.
If we don't defend our country AGAINST YOU, then we cease to be a nation. Traitorous LIAR!
Sophie Tkacz Wildrick I've held the same  before this joke of a human being was ever in office.  He contradicts himself.  And oh honey my last name doesn't make me,  get that straight.  My mom is as white as you are sooooooooooooo
Kristina Olivarez seems like their are a lot of spanish names here. Aren't you all happy that you have the highest job ratings now. Thanks to President Trump!
Kristina Olivarez seems like their are a lot of spanish names here. Aren't you all happy that you have the highest job ratings now. Thanks to President Trump!
All you who voted for him look like you all keep it in the family if you know what I'm incesting,  I mean intending 🤣🤣🤣  No wonder your brain cells seem to be deteriorating at an amazing speed.  It must be all the "great American" Trash foods you get fed  Trash food from a classless,  trash "dictator"
You are a liar and a fraud.  Your administration is an American disgrace and a global embarrassment.  Go to jail soon. 👋🏻😎 #MAGA
You can defend the nation and borders without a stupid wall. Give it up.
GOD wants us to use wisdom, and wisdom silently to settle down, before you do or say something.  Emotions urge us toward haste, telling us we must do something and do it right now! https://goo.gl/pQa7jy But Godly Wisdom tells us to be patient and wait until we have a clear picture of what we are to do and when we are to do it. https://goo.gl/33Crru  It will benefit us to study and apply GOD's Word, so we can make more wise decisions. https://goo.gl/AAtj1x HIS Word promises us that if we acknowledge HIM in all of our ways HE will direct us. Prayer is just inviting GOD to get involved, let HIM help you in every matter. https://goo.gl/eHbCo5  The Book of  Job  https://goo.gl/VSJXrL  Satan attacks a righteous man named Job, and Job and his friends argue about why terrible things are happening to him (Join me on Linkedin https://goo.gl/GKUE5r )  The Bible https://goo.gl/33FZjm
President Trump, why cannot some of the funds from the Wall come from the money taken by, whoever it was, from the Social Security fund? Why are politicians still being paid when government workers who are doing their jobs are not? Why do politicians even get paid at all when they are not taking care of business? Politicians work for the people that elected them, not for illegals and criminals, and they were not elected to line their own pockets. This Wall is referred to as "Trumps Wall", it is not Trumps Wall it is America's and the American peoples Wall. Why are you getting all the blame when the left is fighting you every step of the way. What happened to all the funds that were allocated for the Wall before you even thought about running for President? Mr. President, what can we, the American people do to help you and ourselves? How do we go about setting term limits for Congress since they continue to pass laws that exclude them from having to buy Obama Care, etc., So many questions, so many problems and issues. What can we do?
We were a nation before you and hope we last long enough to dump your sorry ASS !
Send all the illegal aliens to Nancy's house to tear down her wall, doors and windows and let them all move in with her.
Send all the illegal aliens to Nancy's house to tear down her wall, doors and windows and let them all move in with her.
It takes a strong man like pres tump to help our country n th   Deal with those idiots
Thanks to trumps inexperienced and foolish arrogance, or enemies now have enthusiasm, and not a mention from the president about the 4 American hero’s that lost their life’s while defending this country! All I see is people defending their egos, while they brag about being the last ones to abandon trumps sinking ship! What pathetic display of foolishness! You guys should be ashamed
How have we made it 200 years with out dick bag trump?
Ah thanks for the laugh donnie !! You are truly the best American drama queen on tv !!
That's right make Mexico pay for it like you promised. Reduce the deficit, bring back the coal industry.
YOU'RE A FELON AND TRAITOR.
Donald j humperdick hahahhahaahhaha asshole
You are destroying our country , you orange shithole.   Not my president!!!!!
.........Did you lose weight?  And gain finger?  LMAO!  Fucking loser.
*Has control of Senate and House for 2 years without addressing it*
Here's an idea. You have almost 200 military bases around the world. Close down 5 of them, and use that money for the wall.   You have almost 13,000 military aircraft. With much more being ordered to build. Don't build 5 of them, and use that money towards the wall.  You're worth $10 billion, so you say. Alot of which is assets for useless things like golf and country clubs. Sell 5 billion worth of it, and use the money for the damn wall. This should be enough. Plaster your name on it every 5 miles, and then shut up about it.  Once you do that, you can then finally focus on the real dangers facing Americans. Like say, drunk driving. Which literally kill hundreds of people a DAY. Immigrants, including illegals, have literally among the lowest crime rates of anybody. You got to look at that, and look for what's really wrong and then work to fix it. Scapegoating on illegals, for 'real Americans', which there's no such thing, is stupid. But what do you expect on Planet Stupid.
Now is the time to put extreme intell and all nation allies to join forces to let Isis know no one is going to put up with their actions of destruction. Other wise they will hold our servicemen and  forces at bay while the border crisis is not get the attention it needs, and the Democrats are just trying for any little bit of control they can grab. Not really thinking of their country or servicemen dying and pulled away from their homes. Let Isis know we are pulling out but can joint forces against them if their action still detour the ways if the world. Destroy Isis not just send them hiding.
Dear President Donald J. Trump, You do realize that all of these Muslims in America will eventually try to murder us .. because their Quran instructs them to do exactly that?
Dear President Donald J. Trump, You do realize that all of these Muslims in America will eventually try to murder us .. because their Quran instructs them to do exactly that?
For all the dumb fucks that are okay with illegals breaking the law and flying under the radar why don't you move to Mexico and rot then maybe you'd appreciate his stance on national security and keeping everyone in line instead of cutting in line from those that file for citizenship the right way.
Build the wall keep the shut down
If trump would go back to Hell. We might have a country
Stay the course. Give us a border wall; a very high border wall. Walls work. President Trump, I am so proud of you for insisting on a wall to protect the American people. COMMON SENSE tells us that we need the wall. Keep these invaders out.
All these crackers probably mad asl that the wall hasn’t been built yet pay for it yall self lmao
John Wild there is no strategy with Congress.  They have play with peoples lives for years.  Trump is one president who they can't make  a puppet out off. Now I ask you what is your solution to border security?
A great negotiator would not need to hold over one million Americans hostage, causing them financial anxiety and pain in order to “negotiate.”  If that is the best approach to “negotiating” you have, you are certainly NOT even a good negotiator, let alone a great negotiator.  You told us your “strategy” in your book The Art of the Deal: “I play to people’s fantasies.”  Grow up. Stop hurting our fellow citizens to get your way.  Open the government - NOW....  Then start genuine open give and take negotiations in Congress to ID smart and effective enhancements to our border security, coupled with permanent residency and a pathway to citizenship for the DACA folk......  It is terrible for you to be hurting over one million Americans as part of your “negotiating” strategy.  No wait, it is worse that terrible. It is IMMORAL
A great negotiator would not need to hold over one million Americans hostage, causing them financial anxiety and pain in order to “negotiate.”  If that is the best approach to “negotiating” you have, you are certainly NOT even a good negotiator, let alone a great negotiator.  You told us your “strategy” in your book The Art of the Deal: “I play to people’s fantasies.”  Grow up. Stop hurting our fellow citizens to get your way.  Open the government - NOW....  Then start genuine open give and take negotiations in Congress to ID smart and effective enhancements to our border security, coupled with permanent residency and a pathway to citizenship for the DACA folk......  It is terrible for you to be hurting over one million Americans as part of your “negotiating” strategy.  No wait, it is worse that terrible. It is IMMORAL
It should be defend another
Send her ass to Honduras and Guatemala, find out if she can gather intel as to why these people are being treated poorly and maybe kick the oppressors ass, roll that funding into the wall package , rather than just sending unaccounted billions around the world 🌎
this IS what is such a Contradiction - House, Congress and Senate Not until this PRESIDENT was ANYTHING done about Opioids,,,,  And still NOTHING on Illegal Drugs - - - -I SMELL A RAT
Sadly, some actually don’t care. America has not seen this heightened level of dirt and corruption..This isn’t a presidency: It’s a poorly staffed and dilapidated crime syndicate. Entitled sociopathic thugs whose depravity is only matched by their overwhelming incompetence. An endless stream of human sewage somehow passing itself off as an “administration”
Sadly, some actually don’t care. America has not seen this heightened level of dirt and corruption..This isn’t a presidency: It’s a poorly staffed and dilapidated crime syndicate. Entitled sociopathic thugs whose depravity is only matched by their overwhelming incompetence. An endless stream of human sewage somehow passing itself off as an “administration”
All for a stupid campaign promise!  10-12 terrorists!  The HSA and CBP can't be trusted after allowing over 12 million illegal aliens in!  Can't even count jailed children at the border!  You trust them with $6B for a wall. 70% of Americans won't!  #YouElectedHim
We, the true Americans, are with you ever step Mr. President!
We, the true Americans, are with you ever step Mr. President!
Out of all the issues in America he only focuses on this one smh moron
More like defense of your off shore bank accounts asshole.
You are a JOKE! Open the Government!
Then why is the coast guard not being paid...
We bleveave I you Mr. President! we have a solution that even the Democrats cannot say is not a great solution for the wall! A solution That will not cost AMERICAN tax payers a dim! Don’t let them make you part of the problem! We voted you in office because we believe you were not part of the political aristocracy! We know Both parties are playing us and persisting in there stupid political games! The money is there! Use the drug money confiscated from the drug cartels and Human traffickers. According to Senator   Ted Cruise it’s $14 billion$& No tax dollars need to be spent on this wall!😤🤯🇺🇸 Mr. President stop letting the party bosses/deep state manipulate the people and you!   You are the peoples president! 🤝🇺🇸  Here is your chance to prove it To the naysayers that you are indeed the People’s President!🤝🤗🇺🇸  And you can for fill a campaign promise that Mexico will pay for the wall!
The Democrats are heartless. Nancy Pelosi wouldn't meet with the Angel moms and dads. That goes to show she doesn't care a wit about American citizens, only illegal immigrants. That is what our country has come to, unfortunately.
We need strong borders and security stop the caravans and illegal aliens in this country.
Take a vote, do your job!  You work for the America People !! #Wheresmitch? 😡
Blah..blah the same bs lies ,brainwashing old nazi techniques,lies and deception  every freaking day . Wow he is a moron !!!!🤦‍♂️🤦‍♂️🤦‍♂️
Time to bust out the DOJ on them bitches .
Get it done Trump, take no prisoner, just ground "em !!!!
And let’s take all the garbage and backed up toilet stuff from the national parks and throw it on the white house lawn and mitch mcconnells lawn in front of his house.  If dumpster is willing to continue the shutdown for years then ‘border security’ can’t be much of an ‘emergency’ now can it? A repulsican congress saw no ‘emergency’ for 2 years, now it’s an emergency?  No.   And we'll ignore the fact that Don the Con hasn't even spent the money he's already been given on border security. And that 90% of the drugs come in through the ports, sneaked in through official entry points at harbors and airports and the majority of undocumented immigrants arrive by plane, not hiking across the desert. And we’ll ignoring the fact that native-born Americans commit crime at higher rates. And ‘border security’ has held for over 200 years. The Wall is a scam and this SOB scum needs to be removed.  2018 12 terrorist list Southern border crossings  41 terrorist list Northern border crossings Build a Northern Border Wall and Canada will pay for it.  Your ‘terrorists’ are already here you deranged idiot.    Oklahoma City bombers – white male US citizen Colombine school massacre – white male US citizens Chardon school massacre – white male US citizen Isle Vista massacre – white male US citizen Charleston Church massacre – white male US citizen Las Vegas massacre- white male US citizen Sandy Hook massacre – white male US citizen Aurora Theatre – white male US citizen Casa Adobe shooter – white male US citizen Pulse Nightclub massacre – white male US citizen Austin bomber – white male US citizen Parkland School massacre – white male US citizen Santa Fe School massacre – white male US citizen Jacksonville Gamer shooter – white male US citizen MAGA mail bomber – white male US citizen
Illegals are getting BILLIONS of OUR tax dollars from the IRS. If this doesnt infuriate you, I dont know what will.   🇺🇸 BUILD THE WALL!!!   https://www.wthr.com/article/tax-loophole-investigation
Illegals are getting BILLIONS of OUR tax dollars from the IRS. If this doesnt infuriate you, I dont know what will.   🇺🇸 BUILD THE WALL!!!   https://www.wthr.com/article/tax-loophole-investigation
Impeach time! You are nothing but a traitor to this country Donald.
How do your hidden meetings with Putin promote the defense of our nation?
Pay your taxes like everyone else does. Then maybe I will listen. LIAR.
Why don't you just think this through? The wall doesn't work! ICE cut through it with a hand saw. Electronics, drones, and boots on the ground, are the only way to protect this border.
Actually the fact that you are in cahoots with Russia is a little more concerning than your signatory fence
Our Main problem was the Obumoor 8 years of Open borders enemies streaming and Sneaking In From all corrupt Countries are now commenting Hate for America and our President .     Too many Hateful morons..... We need to Hold on to Guns and Bible 🇺🇸👍🏻❤️
Our Main problem was the Obumoor 8 years of Open borders enemies streaming and Sneaking In From all corrupt Countries are now commenting Hate for America and our President .     Too many Hateful morons..... We need to Hold on to Guns and Bible 🇺🇸👍🏻❤️
I  thought  that  was  the  role  of  the  C.I.C.? Mike  Pence is  President  of  the  senate  ........
Provide for the common defense is job #1
Trump is a compulsive liar,  the world knows Russia helped trump get elected because the Russians didn't want Hillary Clinton to win.  Trump has always cheated, lied, insults and threats.  He is the bankrupt king. He always has lived very well on other peopples money. He is a new York thug
You're strangling & suffocating America like a serial killer and apparently, American's are too dumb to object...
This mofo looks like his knees don't bend. Or like he really does have a hand up his ass. LMBO #putinspuppet4real
Deflection from trump’s treason
Old fat man photoshopped to look less old and fat us a fraud in every way
You are so fixated on this damn border that you could care less about anything else that is going on. That is all you are talking about non stop. The majority of the people dont give a rats ass about your damn border wall and are sick and tired of hearing about it. There is no crisis at the border. You are just making it up in hopes that you can continue to brainwash your supporters. The majority of the people regardless of their political stance want the government shutdown to end. YOUR SHUTDOWN !! The majority of the people dont believe a damn word you say. You are a mental case  A true Narcissist at work. Why dont you resign like you make others in your administration do?? You are not winning. You are losing and you know it.Play Video
ok...are you the president or is pelosi?...be the president....build the wall...they now have the power to get you to open the gov. and they then will discuss border security...ha ha ha ha ha ha ha.
Y'all know what will  finally stop caravans of illegals from coming into our country  ? Lots of ammo . Drop a few and the others will get a clue they aren't wanted.
President trump for twenty twenty he's working hard to save our country and our freedom   best president eeve had in a long time   god bless him and god bless america   land of the free and the home of the brave
I guess from my perspective,  I see that immigrants illegal or not work their asses off and some are good at what they do, but. The some folks that have the privilege to be here in the US  think they dont have to work or as hard. MY OPINION!! No recourse needed.
You have no clue on how to protect Americans...biggest threat is ISIS and you want to withdraw troops from Siria, in the meantime 4 Americans lost their lives and you keep taking about your stupid wall...you are losing BIg!
Trump-oganda bullshit yet again!
How many illegals are here now?? Well if is more than 1,999 there is a problem.. Build it they will stop coming.
Lmao okay so a wall will fix that? All drugs and crime come by air or by boat. Congrats you want to build this wall because it’s the one thing you can be remembered for. A wall to hide behind all those lies you tell the American people day to day. You sir will go down as the biggest dumb dumb in office ever 😂
Stand firm...we need the wall.....call up our troops, send help  for border staff   to block these new invaders  headed here.  What is this UN open migration paper I keep hearing about??
Stand firm...we need the wall.....call up our troops, send help  for border staff   to block these new invaders  headed here.  What is this UN open migration paper I keep hearing about??
The liberals hate everything you stand for.To this day they're still pissed off that Clinton didn't win.For the sake of my Children and Grandchilren,do all you can to protect them.Nancy and Chuck are teaching all the youngsters in Congress one word,RESIST.Stay strong and Build the Wall.Immigration should be a privilige given to the deserving ,not the criminals.The smart Conservatives stand behind you.Thank you for standing up for the ones that can see the whole picture President Trump.# Build the wall# Trump2020# MAGA
All fake News.... worry about taking care of Terrorist Isis, Islamic Turkey, Russia and China
And when u bomb other countries..what about their security..
Nobody will have nothing if not protected from illegal's killing innocent citizens and stealing what we have saved for us.   Our Social Security and our Families.
Show us your taxes you fraud.
Show us your taxes you fraud.
Your Administration LIED about how many children were taken away from their parents at the border! Thousands more than reported! Lies in every area of your Cabinet! Trump destroys everything he touches! EPA is not protecting from pollution. 800,000 Federal workers are in dire straights and may lose their homes or face eviction! Trump is a monster! A compulsive liar in this WH! Resign!
You have been robbed of your Presidential powers to do anything else to save our country.  Thank you for trying.  Go home and be with your family.  America is over.
Too bad Congress doesn’t care this much.
Stop issuing Visas you moron! Send lard ass Pompeo down to Mexico and DEMAND President Obrador secure THEIR side,or sanction them. You are so incompetent.
We risk losing a whole city when they figure out how to sneak a nuke in.
You mean “the defense of you” President Bonespurs
Just build the wall. You don’t technically need congress for this.
defend our borders by eradicating ISIS!
Anyone here capable of defending ICE after arresting a former marine named Jilmar Ramos? US born, served in the Marines. Returned from Afghanistan with PTSD. He was arrested for starting a fire after having an episode and he got sent to ICE detention and was ready to be deported. A US BORN MARINE ABOUT TO BE DEPORTED. When will you idiots realize this is a race war, not an immigration war. It’s about being brown and poor, not about being illegal.
this photoshopped picture of trump is so funny - he hasn't been that thin for over 20 years - the real Pinocchio trump is fat, mostly bald and orange. Trumps is as ugly on the inside as he is on the outside - ugh!
Dumb president, dumb photo op, dumb poser.
Troy you are way out of touch ! Pelosi needs to get off her left wing ass and negotiate with the President! Don’t be saying that the President is holding America hostage! Your comment really pisses me off!!!!
Troy you are way out of touch ! Pelosi needs to get off her left wing ass and negotiate with the President! Don’t be saying that the President is holding America hostage! Your comment really pisses me off!!!!
I think we should all sell our souls to bend over for Nancy Pelosi!
Build the wall and remove the magnets that draw illegal aliens here, then keep them here.
If you don't stand for ALL your citizens, (calling democrats traitors), then you cease to be a "precedent".
That’s right no border no nation (Rats)
Thank you Mr. President for being on America's side.  Those that are against you are really sad people!  They hate more people working, more money, people off welfare and supporting their own families.
This man will preserve your country  Unlike our useless Muppets in Westminster  Vote FOR TRUMP
For those of you who think a border wall will protect you, y'all are about as dumb as trump thinking it will. Drugs immigrants come in other ways besides Mexico. Most drugs and guns are imported in on boats or planes. Illegal immigrants come the same way lmao so pathetic to think that a wall will prevent it from occurring.
Especially when our OWN Country sends millions to OTHER Countries for THEIR safety!!  HOW do Pelosi, Schumer and the rest of the House creatures justify that??
Oh please Donnie boy! Such a fraud!
Defend our borders. We stand with you. MAGA! 🇺🇸
Exactly, no Borders, the Way the Left destroys our Country. Will we have about 1/2 our Country be so BLINDED they choose to go along with our DESTRUCTION❓❓❓❓
Exactly, no Borders, the Way the Left destroys our Country. Will we have about 1/2 our Country be so BLINDED they choose to go along with our DESTRUCTION❓❓❓❓
trump is lying idiot Period!
The caravan came across many borders they were all open any more drugs and terrorist come in from Canada than southern and on plains and by sea
What about defending America from Russians? Your relationship with Putin is affecting your presidency and should try taking time apart... Putin is playing you
What about defending America from Russians? Your relationship with Putin is affecting your presidency and should try taking time apart... Putin is playing you
Russian graphic designers.
Mark van Beek Just Trump imitating one of his Russian heroes.
Mark van Beek Just Trump imitating one of his Russian heroes.
Someone is trolling Trump. This picture is a copy of Lenin era Soviet propaganda, the walking pose with stretched arm in particulair.
The Election of Trump has pulled the curtain back on The Administrative State (deep state) ...Greatly points to the fact that we don't have a "Justice" system. We have a "Just Us" system (designed to protect criminals like the clintons). I no longer trust any of the alphabet Law Enforcement Agencies including the IRS or the Courts. The whole thing is rigged and corrupt beyond repair. Everybody knows this.  .Democrats are now an adversary of the U.S. and like any enemy of the U.S. they care nothing about National Security and Public Safety..
Such BULLSHIT.  If We the People do not defend OUR CONSTITUTION and OUR BILL OF RIGHTS from a treasonous Nazi-loving whore of Vladimir Putin -- in other words, from Donald J Trump, Mike Pence, and Mitch McConnell and their co-conspirators -- THEN WE CEASE TO BE A NATION.  TIME TO END TRUMP-PENCE and bring these treasonous Nazi-loving whores of Vladimir Putin to trial for their crimes against We the People of the United States of America!
Yet your a fucking draft dodger!!!!!!
Trump is using a historically accurate axiom. "A country without borders is not a country."  We annexed Florida because their inhabitants raided our border towns until we said stop.  Illegal immigrants raid our jobs and don't give me "the Americans won't work the jobs they take" crap. It is an urban legend recently proven false. Americans DO work those jobs and still hold a majority in most of them.  We have been sold lies by political hacks and it has to stop. If people come here LEGALLY, then have at it it is fair game but just say 'no' to illegal immigration
I have a dream of being a President of the World who will be a Good Leader of all the Presidents of the Countries to all over the World @South Africa
Build the Wall then give DHS workers a bonus and raise for putting up with Pelosi's shutdown and working with no paycheck.
Amen, Mr. President and Commander In Chief!  This True American Christian Conservative woman stands proudly with you as you defend and protect our USA Constitution and Rule of Law; as you protect our USA Flag, 'Old Glory', our Pledge of Allegiance and our right to defend and protect our USA sovereign soil.  Without Borders; Without Boundaries; Without Laws a Nation cannot and will not stand.  BUILD THAT WALL!  Enforce our Rule of Law and defend our USA Constitution and sovereign soil from all invaders and from all enemies.
Build the wall! Blood is on Democrats hands.
Marley Dee, sexist much???
Marley Dee pelosi has no say in his giving state of the union , washed up old bitch
Marley Dee pelosi has no say in his giving state of the union , washed up old bitch
Trump hates Powerful women.  In fact he despises them.  - Pelosi Has denied him his State of the Union Address  - Pelosi arguably has more power than he does right now  -  Pelosi will ultimately lead the Impeachment of this alleged Russian Asset  This Powerful woman Wins!
Trump hates Powerful women.  In fact he despises them.  - Pelosi Has denied him his State of the Union Address  - Pelosi arguably has more power than he does right now  -  Pelosi will ultimately lead the Impeachment of this alleged Russian Asset  This Powerful woman Wins!
We could lose that option.  Our country is being inundated without regard to screening for criminals.
We could lose that option.  Our country is being inundated without regard to screening for criminals.
President Donald Trump's former "fixer" Michael Cohen said Thursday that he paid the head of a small technology company thousands in 2015 to rig online polls at "the direction of and for the sole benefit of" Trump.
President Trump kept his campaign promises, gave up his salaries to charities; loves America and its people; taking crap and worse from f**ked up liberal MSM, Dems, Socialists and those damned snowflakes; creating jobs; growing the economy; stock market rising like the sun; rolling back business stifling regulations; re-negotiating better trade deals for America; bringing back manufacturing jobs; raised the GDP; re-building our military; shamed the nations into paying their share of the UN budget; fighting damn hard to defend our southern border, etc., etc., y'all know the rest. WHAT OTHER PRESIDENT DID AS MUCH??? CAN ANYONE TELL ME WHO DID BETTER THAN PRESIDENT TRUMP???  #TRUMPISTRUMPING #MAGA #TRUMP2020
President Trump kept his campaign promises, gave up his salaries to charities; loves America and its people; taking crap and worse from f**ked up liberal MSM, Dems, Socialists and those damned snowflakes; creating jobs; growing the economy; stock market rising like the sun; rolling back business stifling regulations; re-negotiating better trade deals for America; bringing back manufacturing jobs; raised the GDP; re-building our military; shamed the nations into paying their share of the UN budget; fighting damn hard to defend our southern border, etc., etc., y'all know the rest. WHAT OTHER PRESIDENT DID AS MUCH??? CAN ANYONE TELL ME WHO DID BETTER THAN PRESIDENT TRUMP???  #TRUMPISTRUMPING #MAGA #TRUMP2020
Build the wall and quite playing around with Nancy she is a plain nut case.  We need protection now.
Build the wall and quite playing around with Nancy she is a plain nut case.  We need protection now.
To build the wall just take all confiscated money from drug bust in a year and there should be enough money to build that wall. Most of that $$$ would come from Mexico. So they would build the Wall.
To build the wall just take all confiscated money from drug bust in a year and there should be enough money to build that wall. Most of that $$$ would come from Mexico. So they would build the Wall.
Let’s have an isis birthday party at Chuck E. Cheese with Chuck Schumer and Nancy Pelosi the Muslim lover
Let’s have an isis birthday party at Chuck E. Cheese with Chuck Schumer and Nancy Pelosi the Muslim lover
Build the wall and you should push house out of the way we the people are behind you
Build the wall and you should push house out of the way we the people are behind you
Randy Cameron The Democrats are already here.
Hey Mr President you’re a Ass Hole 🕳. And the biggest Lier in America History you’re working for President Putin you’re Giving the USA 🇺🇸 Too President Putin. Hey Mr President Donald Duck 🦆 Trump When is Russia 🇷🇺 Move in our Talking Over The Great America 👈
Hey Mr President you’re a Ass Hole 🕳. And the biggest Lier in America History you’re working for President Putin you’re Giving the USA 🇺🇸 Too President Putin. Hey Mr President Donald Duck 🦆 Trump When is Russia 🇷🇺 Move in our Talking Over The Great America 👈
Bob Segal murdering bitch.
Bob Segal murdering bitch.
Bob Segal there is no overdosing today unless you're doing illegal drugs which majority of people in this country are on prescription drugs because it works I'm on prescription drugs and I'm not overdosing shows how stupid you are and you should be expected too.
Jordan Ozzy DeLage, overdosing on fool pills again?
The only crime in this country is Donald Trump and the idiots who voted for him murder 101 and accessory to murder and you should be held accountable for the murders of the people in this country  Impeachment time.  jail time. and execution time...
The only crime in this country is Donald Trump and the idiots who voted for him murder 101 and accessory to murder and you should be held accountable for the murders of the people in this country  Impeachment time.  jail time. and execution time...
AND THE DEMOCRATS ARE TRYING TO DESTROY THE COUNTRY
AND THE DEMOCRATS ARE TRYING TO DESTROY THE COUNTRY
Moron.  Hurting American families and dividing the country
Moron.  Hurting American families and dividing the country
Dumb ineffective wall to climb or fly over, swim or boat around, tunnel under, blast or cut through. Pure ignorance, from ignorant play president. He wants a government shutdown to golf more. Lazy crybaby babbling incoherent corrupt conman prick.
Dumb ineffective wall to climb or fly over, swim or boat around, tunnel under, blast or cut through. Pure ignorance, from ignorant play president. He wants a government shutdown to golf more. Lazy crybaby babbling incoherent corrupt conman prick.
Will you prosecute the radical islamic terrorist who tried to blow you up to the fullest extent, or do you think he has a spare get out of jail free card from Obummer's fake presidency..
Will you prosecute the radical islamic terrorist who tried to blow you up to the fullest extent, or do you think he has a spare get out of jail free card from Obummer's fake presidency..
Reopen the government you Orange asshole
Reopen the government you Orange asshole
We have already ceased to be a nation...... thanks moron
We have already ceased to be a nation...... thanks moron
Give the citizens of the US a tax deduction for contributing to the wall. You will allow us to make the wall decision, and go around Congress. It IS OUR country, and it is OUR money. Stop the madness.
Give the citizens of the US a tax deduction for contributing to the wall. You will allow us to make the wall decision, and go around Congress. It IS OUR country, and it is OUR money. Stop the madness.
Stella Barrett #fakenews
All he’s doing is tanking the economy and you idiots are cheering him on.  #ImpeachTrump #TraitorTrump #RussianStooge #MostCorruptPresidentEver #PutinsPuppet
All he’s doing is tanking the economy and you idiots are cheering him on.  #ImpeachTrump #TraitorTrump #RussianStooge #MostCorruptPresidentEver #PutinsPuppet
Liar coward traitor wannabe dictator sellout impotent weakling morally bankrupt fool Putin's puppet
Liar coward traitor wannabe dictator sellout impotent weakling morally bankrupt fool Putin's puppet
I have a question: If, as Trump claims, the border wall is a "national emergency", why is it that the Governors of Arizona, California, New Mexico, and Texas have failed to declare their own emergencies, and called up the National Guard in their states? I have not seen or heard of any action taken by the states, so it seems absurd to me that the border issue constitutes an emergency.
Fred Trump, Sr. Congratulations. You raised a fine son in Donald Trump. You instilled in him hard work pays off. He is a very smart man. A kind and caring heart comes easy to him. He says what he thinks and doesn’t water it down. Just don’t cross him. He is brilliant in negotiating techniques and World leaders are learning he means business. The USA has never had a business man for our President before. It’s wonderful and we know he loves us and is working for us when we are sleeping. Our economy has grown and people who had been laid off are back to work. Businesses are caring for their employees and even giving bonuses. There’s some people who don’t like him because he is a “different” kind of President and he is definitely “in charge.”  He brings with him his beautiful and gracious wife First Lady Melania Trump. She is such an asset to him and the whole world loves her. Children are drawn to her and she is thriving. We have the best chance we have ever had to have a prosperous nation because he brings family that are loyal and talented is so many ways.  He is not liked by everyone because he does things his way, not the way it has been being done. You started him young and he accepted your training. We are a grateful nation and know you would be as proud of him as we are. Prayers daily for President Donald Trump, First Lady Melania Trump, Vice President Mike Pence, and Second Lady Karen Pence. The Administration is successful even with all the resistance and obstruction from the opposing party. I applaud you for your success and we are blessed to reap the benefits. Credit: Lois Chears 🇺🇸🙏🏼🇺🇸
Fred Trump, Sr. Congratulations. You raised a fine son in Donald Trump. You instilled in him hard work pays off. He is a very smart man. A kind and caring heart comes easy to him. He says what he thinks and doesn’t water it down. Just don’t cross him. He is brilliant in negotiating techniques and World leaders are learning he means business. The USA has never had a business man for our President before. It’s wonderful and we know he loves us and is working for us when we are sleeping. Our economy has grown and people who had been laid off are back to work. Businesses are caring for their employees and even giving bonuses. There’s some people who don’t like him because he is a “different” kind of President and he is definitely “in charge.”  He brings with him his beautiful and gracious wife First Lady Melania Trump. She is such an asset to him and the whole world loves her. Children are drawn to her and she is thriving. We have the best chance we have ever had to have a prosperous nation because he brings family that are loyal and talented is so many ways.  He is not liked by everyone because he does things his way, not the way it has been being done. You started him young and he accepted your training. We are a grateful nation and know you would be as proud of him as we are. Prayers daily for President Donald Trump, First Lady Melania Trump, Vice President Mike Pence, and Second Lady Karen Pence. The Administration is successful even with all the resistance and obstruction from the opposing party. I applaud you for your success and we are blessed to reap the benefits. Credit: Lois Chears 🇺🇸🙏🏼🇺🇸
It's now the highest priority of this president to  fund the border wall...a country with an open border is not a nation.. It has to have a border wall to protect the citizenry.from harm and to preserve its sovereignty.against tyrants.
Best PRESIDENT ever Donald J TRUMP  GOD BLESS you and your FAMILY PRESIDENT TRUMP  AMERICA FIRST ALWAYS and FOREVER
Build the wall and throw everyone against it on the other side for they are against what this country stands for
Build the wall and throw everyone against it on the other side for they are against what this country stands for
Well, actually Trump, you just want a monument to feed your ego. Not happening
Well, actually Trump, you just want a monument to feed your ego. Not happening
I hope you see the walls of your prison cell soon.  Who will piss in your hair then??
Chuck Schumer & Nancy Pelosi should both be impeached, the President is making a very reasonable and fully justifiable request for the security of our border and OUR country, we have established laws and there’s no reason why we have to negotiate with our representatives to get them to enforce established laws on immigration, if they feel they can’t enforce our immigration laws or help the president to do the same then they both should leave the government of the AMERICAN PEOPLE and move to Mexico to further represent their compadres, their obstruction borders treason and at a minimum it’s childish to the point of mental instability
Chuck Schumer & Nancy Pelosi should both be impeached, the President is making a very reasonable and fully justifiable request for the security of our border and OUR country, we have established laws and there’s no reason why we have to negotiate with our representatives to get them to enforce established laws on immigration, if they feel they can’t enforce our immigration laws or help the president to do the same then they both should leave the government of the AMERICAN PEOPLE and move to Mexico to further represent their compadres, their obstruction borders treason and at a minimum it’s childish to the point of mental instability
"Borders" a.k.a the Mexican border.  Because there are so many Mexicans committing atrocious acts like mass shootings every other week *cough* that's all you white folks *cough*, illegal Mexicans don't even contribute to 1% of the total crime in the US, that 99% is done by Americans. Soooo why the need for a border wall??
"Borders" a.k.a the Mexican border.  Because there are so many Mexicans committing atrocious acts like mass shootings every other week *cough* that's all you white folks *cough*, illegal Mexicans don't even contribute to 1% of the total crime in the US, that 99% is done by Americans. Soooo why the need for a border wall??
I want to talk in English on messenger or any others. It is very important for speaking as a conversation. If any one interested, please add me and we carry on regularly conversation. Thanks.
Do your state of union address from the Oval Office hell with democraps
Do your state of union address from the Oval Office hell with democraps
Trump,  Nancy Pelosi is the boss!  Do as your told and know your place.  Open the Government! !!
The numbers on these posts say it all for themselves.... At the time I posted this there are 54,000 likes or loves  while all the rest barely made  a thousand.  960 laughs, 120 mad, 63 Wow's, and only 27 pouty Liberal faces.... The majority rules... Build the fucking wall already. Sometimes children just need a firm hand.
For TWO YEARS the Democrats have done NOTHING - BUT DISRUPT, SUBVERT, and GROW HATE!!! Fact! For TWO YEARS Democrats FOUGHT border Security-at America's PERIL! Fact! For TWO YEARS attacked RACE, Whites, Jews, Men, Family VALUES! Fact! For EIGHT YEARS Previous - the Democrats Stripped the GOV of as many Non-Liberal Leaders in EVERY Branch of Gov! Fact! For TWO YEARS - the Democrats FOUGHT EVERY SINGLE Accomplishment of Pres Trump, while simultaneously SPENDING TENS of $$ Millions investigating Russian Collusion KNOWING Hillary and O'Dippy were BOTH neck deep in corruption, collusion, and SELLING OUT America to PROFIT THEMSELVES! Fact!!! HOW on earth can ANYONE still be so blind as to think for even a moment the Liberals/Democrats have ANY INTENT WHATSOEVER to help ANYONE but THEMSELVES!!??? Fact??? The SWAMP is FIGHTING for their very survival, and have used every tool in despicable efficiency to UNDERMINE "WHAT IS GOOD for OUR COUNTRY! GO Trump!!!
For TWO YEARS the Democrats have done NOTHING - BUT DISRUPT, SUBVERT, and GROW HATE!!! Fact! For TWO YEARS Democrats FOUGHT border Security-at America's PERIL! Fact! For TWO YEARS attacked RACE, Whites, Jews, Men, Family VALUES! Fact! For EIGHT YEARS Previous - the Democrats Stripped the GOV of as many Non-Liberal Leaders in EVERY Branch of Gov! Fact! For TWO YEARS - the Democrats FOUGHT EVERY SINGLE Accomplishment of Pres Trump, while simultaneously SPENDING TENS of $$ Millions investigating Russian Collusion KNOWING Hillary and O'Dippy were BOTH neck deep in corruption, collusion, and SELLING OUT America to PROFIT THEMSELVES! Fact!!! HOW on earth can ANYONE still be so blind as to think for even a moment the Liberals/Democrats have ANY INTENT WHATSOEVER to help ANYONE but THEMSELVES!!??? Fact??? The SWAMP is FIGHTING for their very survival, and have used every tool in despicable efficiency to UNDERMINE "WHAT IS GOOD for OUR COUNTRY! GO Trump!!!
REMEMBER YOUR OATH OF OFFICE; DO NOT HOLD AMERICANS HOSTAGE TO GET YOUR WAY....BE THE GREAT NEGOTIATOR THAT YOU SAID YOU WERE...OPEN THE GOV'T PAY THE GOV'T EMPLOYEES AND NEGOTIATE TO GET YOUR WALL BUILT
REMEMBER YOUR OATH OF OFFICE; DO NOT HOLD AMERICANS HOSTAGE TO GET YOUR WAY....BE THE GREAT NEGOTIATOR THAT YOU SAID YOU WERE...OPEN THE GOV'T PAY THE GOV'T EMPLOYEES AND NEGOTIATE TO GET YOUR WALL BUILT
Picture of Trump clearly photoshopped to make him look thinner. Is there anything genuine with this guy??
Picture of Trump clearly photoshopped to make him look thinner. Is there anything genuine with this guy??
Grow up.
Grow up.
Defending our border doesn’t require a wall.   Defending our country from YOU will require a wall. A prison wall.
Defending our border doesn’t require a wall.   Defending our country from YOU will require a wall. A prison wall.
YOU ARE A FAILURE SINCE BEFORE YOU TOOK YOUR OATH !
Ignore the haters, Stand strong! This is why we hired you. For the last 60 years,. we have watched. One Republican after another cave. As our country slides into socialism. You are our last hope!!
Unless your ancestors were living, breathing, working, loving and dying in this land prior to 1942- you are a descendant of immigrants, and have no right to tell others to stay out.
Not one service men and women would NOT clap for him today😂 that has never happened before! Do you think its because he started pulling our troops out of Syria or maybe he has not mentioned the 4 service men that got killed with a suicide bomber or not paying for the coast guard with HIS shutdown? He defiantly won't get re-elected in 2020. Your little group won't have enough votes. THANK GOD! Nancy is a very strong lady and i wonder where he's going to give his state of the union address maybe the white house or his plane or maybe his bathroom.😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
A black man in Oakland sued one of the biggest corporate in America. They are called Monsanto. Monsanto is a chemical facility plant industrial that synthesized chemicals to spray our crops. Its poisonous and it causes cancer. Early 2017. A man was diagnose with cancer. Doctors gave him 3 months to live. He was a school ground keeper. One of his job requirements was to kill the weeds off by using weed killer. Which Monsanto produces. With science knowledge and prove. Points out it was the weed killer it self that gave that man cancer. He won. One of the biggest law sue in history. Now we are finding out that Monsanto ingredients is in our cereal, oatmeal and another foods we buy in the grocery stores.   In 2009, Obama first term of Presidency. He selected the vice President of Monsanto to be head of the F.D.A.   Obama was also a huge supporter of none labeling Monsanto ingredients on our food. That also passed. Now you ever wonder why we have an cancer epidemic ever in history? Or why they so invested on to passing universal healthcare?   Never have government have full control of our healthcare system.  It's called a death panel.
As president all you care about is your money that you're making off of this presidency and getting attention 24/7. 😜
You hid from military combat, so how are you an expert on protecting the country?
And out come the sad, crying leftists. Entertainment value.....PRICELESS!  TRUMP 2020
And out come the sad, crying leftists. Entertainment value.....PRICELESS!  TRUMP 2020
WRONG  your most important duty is to DEFEND THE CONSTITUTION AGAINST ALL ENEMIES FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC ...YOU HAVE DONE A HORRIBLE JOB
If “defense of our nation” is your highest priority, then YOU ARE FAILING!!    You stopped paying the TSA, the Dept of Defense, the Dept of Homeland Security, and a HOST of other agencies!! Stop the temper tantrum.  Reopen govt, MAGA=RESIGN
If “defense of our nation” is your highest priority, then YOU ARE FAILING!!    You stopped paying the TSA, the Dept of Defense, the Dept of Homeland Security, and a HOST of other agencies!! Stop the temper tantrum.  Reopen govt, MAGA=RESIGN
President Trump you have won the election in 2020
President Trump you have won the election in 2020
Just Declare a National Emergency and be done with it! We have your back Mr. President! Just do it!😊👍🇺🇸
Just Declare a National Emergency and be done with it! We have your back Mr. President! Just do it!😊👍🇺🇸
You are doing a great job President Trump. Keep up the great work thank you for putting Americans first . And BUILD THAT WALL 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
TRUMP: Coaching a witness to lie is an obstructing justice
Oh.....and having your personal lawyer pay a scum bag techie to mess with the polls
Oh.....and having your personal lawyer pay a scum bag techie to mess with the polls
The wall goes against the American Union. Mexico, Canada and America as one state. That's why the left wing are trying to drop the border.
The same people telling you no to $5.5 billion, are the same people who cant account for $21 TRILLION from 1998-2015. So therefore we, the American people are forced to pay a current debt of $21.9 TRILLION, thanks to their carelessness.  But they claim $5.5 billion for more border security is a waste of tax payers dollars? Someone please explain how these people are not in jail...
lipstick on a pig graphics intern needs to be furloughed
you dont care about americans, you just want a structure that you can make money off of. You make everyone sick
WANTED FOR PRESIDENT: A NON-LIAR. SOMEONE THAT SERVES THE COUNTRY AND NOT HIMSELF. A MAN WITH MORALS & DIGNITY. WE WANT A MAN THAT FOLLOWS THE CONSTITUTION AND BELIEVES AND FIGHTS FOR DEMOCRACY AND FOR THE GOOD OF OUR GREAT NATION.
your a one man special forces of the u.s. military mr pres. , your orders are to destroy your enemy and build the wall !...PRONTO !
your a one man special forces of the u.s. military mr pres. , your orders are to destroy your enemy and build the wall !...PRONTO !
Absolute nonsense. Why all of a sudden is there a major crisis at the Mexican border? LIES!  All lies. You are not getting your wall. You best figure out a way to keep the border patrol from being investigated for corruption.
If you believe trump, you deserve whatever comes from him.
If we the people dont get your treasonous  clan out of the peoples house . There will be a russian flag flown on the capital lawn!
Every single person in this country should be for strict borders , if your not your not a American ! A country without borders is not a country !
Yes, so stop devoting all your attention to border control which is much improved in recent years. Your only interest there, as anyone with a brain knows, is to fulfill a dumb campaign promise to build an ineffective wall. Pay attention to what matters, you mango Mussolini.
What if Trump fined all the people who don't want the wall like Obama did eith Obamacare?  He'd get his funding with or without Democratic support. 😂
James Kenney thanks James.
Colleen Kandra that’s all you got Colleen?
James Kenney the faceless facebooker. Someone who makes a billion from a few million is a dummy. Ok. What does that make you.
Dianne Fitzgerald did you see all the stuff he had to reverse from the previous president if you can call him that. Dummy up Dianne. You should move to mexico if you like it so much. Dianne you can seek professional help for this problem. Good luck and I always tell libertards these symptoms might be from the cat piss in the air.

Ann de Roo-Daly TROLL!! Not from this country...we spell check not cheque!!
Nancy Pelosis phone # is 202-225-4965 call her and voice your concerns. I just did. I asked her if she would take a drug test....the phone went silent and then started beeping all weird. It's sad the way they treat you President Trump. Schumer could never do a deal like you and he knows it. Looked like a trouble teenager in the principals office the other day with you. Democrats cant get rich on their own like you did. They need to steal and lie to get anywhere. Schumer's a rat that needs to go to the nursing home or find a trap. His number is 202-224-7433 but he's too much of a coward to answer.
Nancy Pelosis phone # is 202-225-4965 call her and voice your concerns. I just did. I asked her if she would take a drug test....the phone went silent and then started beeping all weird. It's sad the way they treat you President Trump. Schumer could never do a deal like you and he knows it. Looked like a trouble teenager in the principals office the other day with you. Democrats cant get rich on their own like you did. They need to steal and lie to get anywhere. Schumer's a rat that needs to go to the nursing home or find a trap. His number is 202-224-7433 but he's too much of a coward to answer.
Says the man who is robbing hard-working government employees of their pay and holding them hostage like a petulant child.
Mr. President as soon as that next caravan hits the US Mexican border declare a national emergency!
Tweeting and lying seem to be your highest priority Donnie.
Tweeting and lying seem to be your highest priority Donnie.
Which border are you defending when a once America banned corrupt man from Nigeria just visits your country? A man who in his case your country jailed two high top Americans.
I disagree with both of you. I believe the Democrats did shut down the government. I don't believe they did it over 5 billion dollars. I believe they did it out of defense for our American values and ideals. America is beginning to look a little to much like a prison. Guns in churches and schools, metal detectors in hospitals, court houses, and government buildings, and now a wall and security wire around the border? What's the difference between our nation and a maximum security penitentiary? We are becoming a little to harden. President Roosevelt feared declaring war for this very reason. He reasoned that the people would become to hardened and that the mentality would replace mercy and forgiveness. Fundamental emotions of all human beings. Defending our country's most sensitive beliefs is worth every loss we will incur during a lengthy government shutdown (showdown). Our virtues are worth defending. It is more important now, in the state our country is in, than it ever has been in America's brief history! Do you really want our values to go extinct? It's about more than border security. It's about more than 5 billion dollars. It's about who gets to determine the nation's system of beliefs. Do we believe in welcoming our neighbors, protecting the weak, sacrificing for the poor, or do we believe in a nation of walls, hardened schools, guns in temples, a nation that is so afraid of its own citizens that it needs metal detectors at the courthouse and even worse at the hospital! I'm for border security but I have to stand against a wall and what it stands for. There is just so much more at stake than a mere barrier between our nations.
That.  Right.  Protect.  Kids. Bad. Men. Like. Emmas. Dad. And. John. Stevenson. Sick. Fathers. Molest. Daughters
If we don’t defend our borders, then we cease to be a nation. THAT IS THE LEFT'S GOAL!
"Mr. President you can have your wall. You can get it the same way that President Obama got Obamacare; the way Lyndon Johnson got Medicare; the way Franklin Roosevelt got Social Security. In each case the president had a project he wanted enacted; so his administration crafted a bill. That bill went to Congress where committee hearings were held; amendments were proposed; studies were conducted that tested the cost, effectiveness etc. of the proposal; testimony was held in Congress; debate ensued and if the measure had enough support, a vote was taken and the measure was passed. That's how you legislate. It takes hard work, planning and the ability to actually negotiate. Your pet project doesn't get to leap frog over the pathway laid out by the Constitution and 250 years of precedent. You have chosen to skip over this entire process (even when you had majorities in both Houses) and have resorted instead to taking the American public hostage in exchange for your wall. You want a wall? Put down the gun you are holding to the head of the American people and get to work."
Christ be with you Mr President.  Keep you safe
Then why are you in cahoots with Putin?  Why did you get sanctions lifted from Deripaska?
Everyone Republicans Democrats independence non-affiliates want to security at our borders which we do have… We need to enhance manpower and technology… Some portions of the already there wall may be repaired and extended… But the big question of the day is you have been presented proposals that you said you would sign and when you receive them you did not… Liar… The $1.7 billion you were given last year for the wall was not utilize… This is just an ego hoax… Can’t wait till they LOCK U UP
Everyone Republicans Democrats independence non-affiliates want to security at our borders which we do have… We need to enhance manpower and technology… Some portions of the already there wall may be repaired and extended… But the big question of the day is you have been presented proposals that you said you would sign and when you receive them you did not… Liar… The $1.7 billion you were given last year for the wall was not utilize… This is just an ego hoax… Can’t wait till they LOCK U UP
Dear Donald J. Trump I am sorry to inform you that due to the shutdown, we the people cannot afford the extra security for you to go to your golf resort in Florida.......see you when you open the country!
Bush 41: "We have a border crisis  Clinton: We have a border crisis  Bush 43: We have a border crisis  HRC: We have a border crisis  Trump: Lets build a wall and end the border crisis  Media: OMG...Trump manufactured the crisis.
Citizens are responding to the mess that your government shutdown is causing.  At our local international airport donations are being received to aid Federal workers who are not being paid.  Your shutdown is shameful.
God sought a man among them that would build the wall, and stand in the gap before me on behalf of the land, that it should not be destroyed. Ezekiel 22:30 -- Pray for President Trump & a strong America! 🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯🇺🇸️
God sought a man among them that would build the wall, and stand in the gap before me on behalf of the land, that it should not be destroyed. Ezekiel 22:30 -- Pray for President Trump & a strong America! 🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯🇺🇸️
we the People voted Trump in to make this country safe again, and those of you who don't want this should leave and to go another country, we want our country to be the way it was before the last 5 Presidents were in and made this country the way it is now
Takes a big man to copy and paste
Takes a big man to copy and paste
No true leader would create suffering amongst a million of their own citizens and their families in order to look like a winner or look strong.  OPEN THE GOVERNMENT.  Then work with Congress to identify which border security enhancements are of highest priority, then ID what are the best approaches for those highest priority needs, then fund those approaches.  Repeat for the next highest set of priorities.  Repeat cycles until pt. of diminishing returns is encountered.  Use truth and fact - not lies and simple-minded propaganda spin messaging.   STOP hurting our own citizens - it is IMMORAL.
hahaha...you destroy the whole world..ur father would laughing about u...u are just a slave from putin und and the zions...
Trump if you remain president we will cease to be a nation.
aHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHHAAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHHA YOU DONT CARE ABOUT ANYONE BUT YOURSELF!!!! PLEASE RESIGN LYING DONNIE!!!!
aHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHHAAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHHA YOU DONT CARE ABOUT ANYONE BUT YOURSELF!!!! PLEASE RESIGN LYING DONNIE!!!!
WHEN SOMEONE ROBS A BANK THEY BOARDER HOP TO MEXICO OR CANADA WE NEED A CANADA BOARER WALL AND MEXICO BOARDER WALL
To defend your nation you dodged the draft . Must have saved a lot of lives that way
Stop the bull Trump Stop the lies.  Your corrupt crap is overflowing
LYING CROOK . . . nice try distracting us from your crimes!!! BuzzFeed: Sources say Trump directed Michael Cohen to lie to Congress about proposed Moscow project   https://www.cnn.com/2019/01/17/politics/buzzfeed-trump-cohen-lie-congress-moscow/index.htmlBuzzFeed: Sources say Trump directed Michael Cohen to lie to Congress about proposed Moscow projectcnn.com
This should read: If we don't stop the Russians then we cease to be a nation.
No delay on the SOTU address! Americans want to hear from our president & not Pelosi whose agenda is political & anti/American!   The Pelosi/Schumer shut down has taken a toll on govt workers. Americans will not forget this come the 2020 election, as the Dems will be voted out of office! ALL Americans know they voted for the wall under Obama. Don’t punish Americans for wanting safety & security, just because they lost & Trump won!
The ball is in your court Mr. President.   The shutdown is a good thing. It shrinks government & it gets rid of wasteful spending  The first thing we need out of this is better security, particularly at the southern border. Our founders envisioned a free market night watchman state, not the bungled bloated bureaucracy our government has become. But we have to keep the uniformed officers paid, which is an emergency. Ideally, continue a resolution to pay the essential employees only, if they are truly working on national security. Furloughed employees should find other work, never return and not be paid.  Secondly, we need savings for taxpayers. If this fight is merely rhetorical bickering with Nancy Pelosi, we all lose, especially the president. But if it proves that government is better when smaller, focusing only on essential functions that serve Americans, then President Trump will achieve something great that Reagan was only bold enough to dream.  The president’s instincts are right. Most Americans will not miss non-essential government functions. A referendum to end government plunder must happen. Wasteful government agencies are fighting for relevance but they will lose. Now is the time to deliver historic change by cutting them down forever.
The ball is in your court Mr. President.   The shutdown is a good thing. It shrinks government & it gets rid of wasteful spending  The first thing we need out of this is better security, particularly at the southern border. Our founders envisioned a free market night watchman state, not the bungled bloated bureaucracy our government has become. But we have to keep the uniformed officers paid, which is an emergency. Ideally, continue a resolution to pay the essential employees only, if they are truly working on national security. Furloughed employees should find other work, never return and not be paid.  Secondly, we need savings for taxpayers. If this fight is merely rhetorical bickering with Nancy Pelosi, we all lose, especially the president. But if it proves that government is better when smaller, focusing only on essential functions that serve Americans, then President Trump will achieve something great that Reagan was only bold enough to dream.  The president’s instincts are right. Most Americans will not miss non-essential government functions. A referendum to end government plunder must happen. Wasteful government agencies are fighting for relevance but they will lose. Now is the time to deliver historic change by cutting them down forever.
Then you should google and read 10 USC 311. Militia Compositions and Classes...and stop appointing people who swear to uphold the constitution while planning to violate it. Those people are liars and are unfit for office. They deserve no respect.
Every month of shut down means a decrease in the economy growth of 0.15%, which means alround 1-2% decrease over a year, which is more or less the growth rate of the industrialized countries in this world, not to speak about almost a million state employees taken as hostages ;-(. They do not know, how to pay their bills and how to buy their food and sorry to say, I know what that feels like. The trade war with China also already impacts severly the economic growth of leading US companies like Apple, Tesla and many others as they are loosing market share in one of the most important arrising markets, China. Please let's stop trade wars, populistic nationalistic politics and let's work together with your strong partners in Europe, Asia and worldwide on the real problems ahead, not for walls, weapons and dirty old-fashioned, enviromental doutable technologies like coal.
you as presdent have the right to build the wall .
Satchel...if you voted for the Bigly Orange Con Man the only name you need to be called by is STUPID!
Put a sock in it, Donnie. Your days are numbered.
With you President Trump
Anyone who thinks Trump respects Veterans and the sacrifices they make for this country is sadly mistaken.  https://www.cnn.com/2019/01/17/us/michigan-ice-detains-us-citizen-veteran/index.html
STAY STRONG MR PRESIDENT.  While the democrats put ILLEGAL ALIENS FIRST  President Trump says AMERICA FIRST.
Donald J. Trump and Vice President Mike Pence: “We have eliminated ISIS and we are pulling out of Syria” Breaking News: “ 4 US service members have been killed in Syria. ISIS has claimed responsibility”  Trump, Pence and their supporters: 🤐🤐🤐... uhhh.. “it’s Obama and HRC’s fault”
Obama's top priority was transforming the country into a welfare state with increased gubment control.  Thank you President Trump!
Obama's top priority was transforming the country into a welfare state with increased gubment control.  Thank you President Trump!
Drones are now used to fly in drugs by the cartels.
Drones are now used to fly in drugs by the cartels.
If you shut down the whole government, we will be Russians and China will own the Whitehouse. Wile E. West
Trump, day 27 of YOUR shutdown!  Innocent people NOT getting paid .. because of you!  YOU should be “IMPEACHED”.. just for this alone!   America is defenseless alright, defenseless from you!  Holding people hostage, withholding pay, (stealing) just to get a Monument to your name, “The Trump Wall”!  Sick .. and totally unfit for office!
WELL SAID !!!  ✅
Republicans are splitting from trump.  They know the end is near for crooked trump and republicans
To my black brothers and sisters--go to the library and read the history of America.  You will find that A. Lincoln and the Red party set you free from the democratic slave owners of the south.  Read about the underground railroad and the white people who helped save you from slavery--they we republicans.  Vote Red.
To my black brothers and sisters--go to the library and read the history of America.  You will find that A. Lincoln and the Red party set you free from the democratic slave owners of the south.  Read about the underground railroad and the white people who helped save you from slavery--they we republicans.  Vote Red.
Trump stop the hoax.  Open the government you Russia agent!
A con man who is staging a fight for a wall he does not believe in himself, if so it would have been done 2 years ago......He will go down in history as the con man who put on a false fight to keep the government shut down to protect himself .  If he did not lie to his base and feel embarrassed by getting caught in his own lies this would not happen.  Democrats took the house with no wall or a caravan
Drugs are such a problem in America- I think that everyone has at least 1 person in their family who is or was a drug addict. If you are lucky enough not to have someone you love hooked on drugs then I feel sure you know someone who has a family member that is. That alone is a great enough reason for the border being secure. Not to mention all the murders-child kidnappings and child trafficking. Everyone in this great country of ours should be for the border wall. I don't want to see another young person hooked on drugs much less an adult. It hurts the entire family not just the user. And 90% of the drugs come Thur the border from Mexico.
Everyday you say the border is critical to our security. The border this and the border that. Are we moving forward with the border wall or not? I support the protection of the US. Im not necessarily against the wall or for it. Let's just get something done. Rep are blaming the Dems and the Dems are blaming the Rep. Its like everyone is in kindergarten. Figure this out President Trump.
Donald J Trump= the Jim and Tammy Faye Baker of the new millennium . Robbing and lying to the good hearted faithful. Good Christian believers taken in by a CON ARTIST SUPREME. Remember folks . MATTHEW 7 : 15
Tell em what it is Mr President.  You the man.
You are the biggest threat to our national security!!!
Mr.Trump u r ancisters are from Europe...u r ancisters  distroyed Red Indians  cammunity..U.S is country of Imigrates...
Thank you President Trump! A complete steel barrier is necessary to defend our borders and great people. Trade restrictions, sanctions and a strong military are necessary to keep peace in the ME and elsewhere. The Senate is a great place for State of the Union addresses. America first! God bless the USA!
Trump's chief economic adviser to federal workers: Get a loan  https://www.cbsnews.com/news/trumps-chief-economic-adviser-to-federal-workers-get-a-loan/
You can’t believe a habitual liar!!
Syria: Leave our sand and take our death
Syria: Leave our sand and take our death
Syria: Leave our sand and take our death
gimp
NO WALL NO JOBS BUILD THE WALL KEEP THE JOBS ..DEMOCRATES JUS WANNA GET HIGH AND SELL DRUGS...VULTURES
Listen up. It is written The wall is necessary to secure our borders and protect the Nation of United States of America and its population.  Sir, excellent decision. Lets finish the wall necessary to secure our borders and protect the Nation of United States of America and its population.  Israel re-built there wall in 52 days during the Bible OLD Testament time with no modern tools as we have today in the 21st Century.  Nehemiah 6:15-16 New Living Translation  The Builders Complete the Wall  15 So on October 2d the wall was finished—just fifty-two days after we had begun. 16 When our enemies and the surrounding nations heard about it, they were frightened and humiliated. They realized this work had been done with the help of our God.  Definition of enemy plural enemies 1 : one that is antagonistic to another; especially : one seeking to injure, overthrow, or confound an opponent 2 : something harmful or deadly alcohol was his greatest enemy 3 a : a military adversary b : a hostile unit or force  http://biblehub.com/nlt/nehemiah/6.htmbiblehub.com
Drama Queen! Ever hear of  shovel dig a tunnel? Highest priority? ISIS defeated? This is you shutdown. The people on this thread are working and  not impacted.This shutdown is slowly putting our country into a real crisis. Not a drama filled one.Take your own money and pay for the wall. You are all talk. Keep giving away your hand and stimulate the enemy.
Letting the liberal socialists gain a foothold is also a threat to our nation.
Peace, we want President Trump's intervention in the presidential elections in Algeria There is a great violation of the freedom of the people and happy invitees Brother Bouteflika violates the post of his brother Abdelaziz Bouteflika because he is sick We want Trump intervention in return The brother of President Bouteflika, whose happy name dominated Algeria under the starvation of the people
WAKE UP PEOPLE... Dems don't want the wall because "DRUG MONEY" is being funneled directly into the DNC's pockets. - - #America1ST💯 #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸️
WAKE UP PEOPLE... Dems don't want the wall because "DRUG MONEY" is being funneled directly into the DNC's pockets. - - #America1ST💯 #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸️
Mr.Donald Trump A Representative Of Democracy & Missing Pieces 2020 You Have My Support
"The time has come to acknowledge spiritual realities: The devil is using the Democratic Party to try to destroy America. If we don’t awaken, our children will soon awaken in a nation unrecognizable to us today."
Comrad Trump is changing his story on a daily base...
You're either a Democrat or a Patriot you just cant be both
Give 'em h*ll President Donald J. Trump.
Defense and a useless wall are not the same thing
Pigliosi will NEVER compromise. She does NOT care about Americans! BUILDTHEWALLNOW.  Leave the immoral dems in the dust!!!!  #KAG
5000 comments in less then an hour....Boy the Russian trolls are putting in some serious overtime. Sad that Russians are the only ones Trump doesn't mind paying.
build the wall .PRESIDENT TRUMP your the best President ever
The only people that shouldn't receive a check during a Government shutdown is; members of Congress, President, Vice President, and the pensions of these retirees. They are responsible and can rectify the situation. No other Government agencies are involved.
We cease to be a nation when the president values the word of Putin over the word of all his own intelligence agencies.
We cease to be a nation when the president values the word of Putin over the word of all his own intelligence agencies.
Distraction!!!! LMAO. Mitch is too busy lifting sanctions on Russians to have a vote to reopen the government! The Senate can probably override your veto now. Your border wall is a waste of money. Let us undertake an honest and serious discussion of immigration and border issues...You Are Very SAD
President Trump,  A suggestion...how about you hold the State of the Union in Senate chambers and invite Patriots like Angel Families and Veterans...they could sit in the empty seats?
President Trump,  A suggestion...how about you hold the State of the Union in Senate chambers and invite Patriots like Angel Families and Veterans...they could sit in the empty seats?
Stop killing the middle class by giving what little we have to the rich.  Don't you have enough already.  You're rich, YOU pay for the wall.  Put your money where your mouth is.
Call a national emergency already
Trump should sign an executive order that all Senators and their staff shouldn't be paid until they resolve this shutdown.
Trump should sign an executive order that all Senators and their staff shouldn't be paid until they resolve this shutdown.
Imagine if Trump fined everyone who didn't want the wall. You know, exactly like Obama did with Obamacare.
Imagine if Trump fined everyone who didn't want the wall. You know, exactly like Obama did with Obamacare.
YOU DANG RIGHT SIR ....AND THE TSA DONT NEED TO BE TOUCHING PEOPLES NO NO SPOTS ....................
You are the president of a wrestling mother
Not a POTUS, just a POS
You voted down the bill that would defend our borders because it didn't support your wall.
Only humans with an IQ of a sawdust will dislike Mr Make America Great Again.
Number one duty of the President!  The Americans are behind you!  Stay with it!
Hope you cease to exist in the White House when Muller’s report comes out.
Hope you cease to exist in the White House when Muller’s report comes out.
Exactly, middle and Eastern European country are in the same danger. EU is our enemy.
If you can't defend your own borders, stop defending other countries. Charity begins at home.
Trump we need more FREEDOM, give us the bumb stocks back.
We don't need a 25 billion dollar wall for border  security.  There are more modern ways to do the same thing.  Trumpy and Mitch own the shutdown over this.  Quit grandstanding and put people back to work.
We don't need a 25 billion dollar wall for border  security.  There are more modern ways to do the same thing.  Trumpy and Mitch own the shutdown over this.  Quit grandstanding and put people back to work.
Precisely Mr. President! That is the #1 priority, to protect "We The People"., you are doing a hell of a job.🇺🇸👊
Lov u prez T,, thankful hitlery didnt win her rigged election,, stay strong,, dont give in to the snowflakes,, Americans voted you in for a reason
"If we don’t defend our borders, then we cease to be a nation."  That's wonderful, then we won't need a President. Bye Bye.
Daniel Johnson , take a civics class, fat ass has to ask permission to speak to Congress.
Is Nancy Pelosi Afraid to let president Donald J.Trump address the nation from the Peoples House? Her safety has been guaranteed by the Homeland Security Director.
Cohen: Paid Up To $50,000 To Rig Polls Prior To Election To Benefit Trump At Trumps Direction
Trump is a super star right now!
Mr. President, please consider the Senate Chamber to deliver the awesome SOTU address to the nation. It's high-time to bring Pelosi and Schumer to their collective soulless knees and force them to submit to wall funding.  You Are the Maga-Man!
Mr. President, please consider the Senate Chamber to deliver the awesome SOTU address to the nation. It's high-time to bring Pelosi and Schumer to their collective soulless knees and force them to submit to wall funding.  You Are the Maga-Man!
President Trump personally directed his longtime former attorney Michael Cohen to lie to Congress about the Moscow Trump Tower project, two federal law enforcement officials involved in an investigation of the matter told BuzzFeed cnn.it/2QUjuEF
❤⚘🌷🙏🌷⚘❤  THANK YOU, LORD, FOR GIVING US PRES. TRUMP!  PROTECT PRES. TRUMP  & THE ENTIRE AMERICAN NATION FROM DEMOCRAT MOBS (DARK FORCES) THAT ARE IN FULL FORCE TO DESTROY AMERICAN LIVES, O LORD, WE PRAY.  AMEN!  IN YOU, DEAR LORD, WE FULLY TRUST!  ❤⚘🌷🙏🌷⚘❤
WHY ARE WE PAYING N PALOSI -* SHE DOESNT WANT TO WORK THINGS OUT ON BORDER SECURITY - HER ANSWER IS NO NO NO NO  *She doesn't want to come out of her hiding place to meet THE ANGEL MOMS & DADS THAT WAS IN HER OFFICE.  By the way WE SHOULD CALL THE WALL/BORDER THE "ANGEL WALL OR ANGEL BORDER" *She doesnt want to have your night when you talk to the AMERICAN PEOPLE. SO WHY ARE WE PAYING HER ?
President Trump, keep up the great work!!
James Boose right...... lol and the dems didn't have any resources to do the same thing! In fact that is why Hillary was so shocked! 🤣
NOW THIS:  BREAKING: Trump's former attorney, Michael Cohen, says he paid a tech firm to rig online polls before the 2016 presidential campaign got underway "at the direction of and the sole benefit of" Donald Trump.  FRAUD PRESIDENT ALERT!!!!
NOW THIS:  BREAKING: Trump's former attorney, Michael Cohen, says he paid a tech firm to rig online polls before the 2016 presidential campaign got underway "at the direction of and the sole benefit of" Donald Trump.  FRAUD PRESIDENT ALERT!!!!
2% (Embarrassing) postitive reaction to your disastrous state of the union gimmick, and now the shutdown is baptized as Donal  McConnell shutdown!
All the drug lords in Mexico support Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer. El Chapo, El Nacho El Teo, El General, and El Mayo are against border security.😛
All the drug lords in Mexico support Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer. El Chapo, El Nacho El Teo, El General, and El Mayo are against border security.😛
NO, Sir!  Your highest priority is to hoodwink the American people, and pretend to be a human being . BUT, we are not as deceived as you think!  Look up, your judgment is coming and it will be very dire!
NO, Sir!  Your highest priority is to hoodwink the American people, and pretend to be a human being . BUT, we are not as deceived as you think!  Look up, your judgment is coming and it will be very dire!
Hang in there" We are with you" Go Trump"
If we don't hold Hillary Clinton accountable she will fly around the world on her private jet calling Chuck Schumer and Nancy Pelosi and tell them everything she wants them to do to obstruct Donald Trump until she can run against him again in 2020. Oops
Mark Butler aw are you trying to spam me with all the :) and >:( come on.
Aaron Green, idiot. You don't think that trumps lawyers have not already explored all of this? LOL 😆
Bulld the wall using this Mr Trump Public Law No. 85-804, codified at 50 U.S.C. § 1431-35 (Supp. IV 1998), grants to the President the authority to authorize any agency which exercises functions in connection with the national defense to enter into contracts or into amendments or modifications of contracts, and to make advance payments, without regard to other applicable legal provisions whenever such action would facilitate the national defense. 50 U.S.C. § 1431. The legislative history of the statute indicates that it may also be used as the basis for making indemnity payments under certain government contracts.
Bulld the wall using this Mr Trump Public Law No. 85-804, codified at 50 U.S.C. § 1431-35 (Supp. IV 1998), grants to the President the authority to authorize any agency which exercises functions in connection with the national defense to enter into contracts or into amendments or modifications of contracts, and to make advance payments, without regard to other applicable legal provisions whenever such action would facilitate the national defense. 50 U.S.C. § 1431. The legislative history of the statute indicates that it may also be used as the basis for making indemnity payments under certain government contracts.
LIAR. Collusion with Russia is your biggest commitment.
LIAR. Collusion with Russia is your biggest commitment.
South Korean News rumor is that President Trump will meet with North Korean Kim Jong Eun and negotiate for ICBM and disarmament, not C V I D.  If rumors are true, American and global citizens are disappointed with President Trump.
South Korean News rumor is that President Trump will meet with North Korean Kim Jong Eun and negotiate for ICBM and disarmament, not C V I D.  If rumors are true, American and global citizens are disappointed with President Trump.
MAKE AMERICA SAFE AGAIN, TRUMP 2020. Heaven help us the nuts are running the finance committee. Waters, Cortez and Tlaib. The three stooges look intelligent next to those three.
Not a penny for a wall! Do not reward chump dump for lying to America! Teach him a lesson!
Christopher Dewayne Jones damn skippy!
Today is the anniversary of a nuclear deal, a deal that did not last long and its main actor pulled out of the deal, the agreement now has no value for the Iranian regime, and they have been severely defeated. We made Twitter work to cancel this agreement and we are proud to have done this great work. Our first move was to prevent the agreement from changing in Congress, and we did not intervene with the influence of this agreement, the lobbyists of Israel were trying hard to change this agreement, but we did not let it work, we worked hard and made it harder. This agreement did not change and we succeeded in that. The next step was the expulsion of two officials from the White House, Tillerson and McMaster, those on Twitter, are seeing how we provided the terms for Tillerson and Mackman to be fired from the White House, and Bolton and Pompeo would take them. And we rushed to the last minute and made the conditions for a catastrophic agreement abandoned. I struggled hard and fought every day, if not for us, this agreement would never be canceled. Those on Twitter are testifying who made the catastrophic agreement canceled, and we are proud that with the help of the people we were able to do this great work and provide the conditions to cancel President Trump without interrupting the nuclear deal, and All sanctions will be restored. If the catastrophic agreement was not abandoned, the Iranian regime would be much more likely to be happy and appreciative than President Tramp at a much earlier date than anyone imagined that he would have a nuclear weapon, and that they would intervene in more countries, and that the Middle East would be very destabilizing. This agreement was withdrawn. Thanks to Pompeo, who supports our people and has announced in the Middle East that until April, Iran's oil exports will be completely cut off. Exceptions to the eight countries were a big mistake, and if oil was cut off completely until November 4th, the oil price would have fallen again, the exemption to eight countries made the Democrats take over Congress, accept President Trump that the mistake And I hope you do not repeat this mistake because people do not forget. We have forgotten the exemption for eight countries and, as you and the US Secretary of State promise, you would say that the breaks will not be renewed, if you do not repeat your promise this time, they will all mock you and the Iranian regime will definitely be a nuclear weapon. And this time, the lives of the Americans and Israel will be at risk, I hope you are wise and until April to complete Iran's oil industry, so far, there is a lot of time spent that does not benefit the national security of the United States. The Polish conference is the end of the Islamic Republic, and it provides conditions for countries to support the free people of Iran in order to protect the suffering people who are demanding change, to create another honor and to celebrate the victory in the Freedom Square.
...or another terrorist attack WILL happen!  Foolish people.  Smh.
So whats the hold up? You k ow the dems are gonna go along with you. If its an emergency declare one. Stop the talk and take action. We voted for you and a wall. What are you waiting for?
Is that why Homeland security and the TSA aren't funded right now?
Is that why Homeland security and the TSA aren't funded right now?
Simon Gouet i think he's great 🤷🏻‍♀️
Matthew ELoEL
Simon Fabrice Bautista Stance nation
Simon Fabrice Bautista Stance nation
Yeah so make all the middle class and poor people suffer then right?Because it’s their fault that the stupid wall won’t be built
Representatives, please put US citizen’s rights first by starting the process for the following:  Reconstruct the federal court system so that it’s more efficient, and they don’t throw out the appeals, especially misconduct appeals, of US citizens. Also a system that demotes and promotes judges based on their record on being overruled, etc.   Start a constitutional amendment to modernize the Presidential Election process. Start a constitutional amendment that makes: US Representatives elected on odd years, a US Senator term four years long and elected on even years opposite the president, so their constituents have a representative to vote for every year, etc.  Make a law that gives nonaffiliated candidates and voters access to primary ballots. Create a government website for voting constituents to state their concerns, and monthly rank those concerns by their importance to US citizens. Create a Federal Highway Patrol for our interstates and federal highways that gives returning veterans opportunities for jobs, and federal highway laws.  Improve the interstate system by: raising the minimum speed limit, lengthening busy entrances and exit ramps that will make it safer and help eliminate delays, etc.  Mandating more required car safety devices.  Define a minor as someone under 20, and extend free education for dependent minors through a community college or high school college accredited courses, and free public preschool.  Protect employees who make written complaints for improper or illegal company actions. Require public schools and government facilities’ computers accessible to local US citizens. Set up an investigation into updating the future of climate change, etc.  Sincerely,  Cecil James Roth P.S. Constituents, if you ‘like’ this, like it whenever you see it.   https://m.facebook.com/The-Great-1461-Day-Adventure-360025854356893/
Yeah
Burda Alex jojo pose
Burda Alex jojo pose
Agree
President Trump keep fighting for America...Jesus was persecuted too and we killed him you are chosen to do this job last administration was weak and hate America not wonder why Obama's network before he enter to the WH was only 1 million 1/2 after now his network is 45 millions??? How this happened...this guy didnt wrote a book or invented nothing to make this amount of money as a president with a salary of 400 hundred thou...we can see how crooked he was not wonder why our Country is in a such big whole 👎👎👎
Your propaganda does not hide the fact that Secretary of Defense, James Mattis - a REAL patriot, resigned because your world view is dangerous to the Republic. Cadet Bone Spurs.
Great idea Tony Tomasino
Larry Smith hard to believe there are simple people that still believe that bulls hit.... FAIL
What are you talking about?? Putin is in the White House.
What are you talking about?? Putin is in the White House.
Let's cease to be a nation!!! Make America MEXICO Again'
IMO, Putin's puppet, djt, is 'not cooking on all four burners'.......just sayin’! https://shareblue.com/experts-trump-human-trafficking-excuse-wall/?fbclid=IwAR0I_rtDOYQpl0cnO69TOlTBZkX1Yl890CziZaAOgH48YwAJ_bT6q-Z1wgI
m e n a c i n g
Shut down the borders until the wall is built
GOD BLESS YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP.....JUDGE JEANIE SAYS IT BEST STOP PAYING THE DEMOCRATS......AN WHO IS BOSS HERE DID WE STOP PAYING THEIR PAYCHECKS AN SIR PLEASE STOP SAYING AN START ARRESTING..... WE ALL KNOW AN TRUST YOU... YOU ARE FOR THE PEOPLE NOT THE DEMS. AN HOW DARE THEM GO ON VACATION WHILE THE GOV. IS SHUT DOWN LOW CLASS PEOPLE....  REPUB...START TO STAND BEHIND OUR PRESIDENT.....
GOD BLESS YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP.....JUDGE JEANIE SAYS IT BEST STOP PAYING THE DEMOCRATS......AN WHO IS BOSS HERE DID WE STOP PAYING THEIR PAYCHECKS AN SIR PLEASE STOP SAYING AN START ARRESTING..... WE ALL KNOW AN TRUST YOU... YOU ARE FOR THE PEOPLE NOT THE DEMS. AN HOW DARE THEM GO ON VACATION WHILE THE GOV. IS SHUT DOWN LOW CLASS PEOPLE....  REPUB...START TO STAND BEHIND OUR PRESIDENT.....
This is a comment from another person on a different post, but the best message yet.  Here's what I wish the Democrats would say to Trump: Mr. President you can have your wall. You can get it the same way that President Obama got Obamacare; the way Lyndon Johnson got Medicare; the way Franklin Roosevelt got Social Security. In each case the president had a project he wanted enacted; so his administration crafted a bill. That bill went to Congress where committee hearings were held; amendments were proposed; studies were conducted that tested the cost, effectiveness etc. of the proposal; testimony was held in Congress; debate ensued and if the measure had enough support, a vote was taken and the measure was passed. That's how you legislate. It takes hard work, planning and the ability to actually negotiate. Your pet project doesn't get to leap frog over the pathway laid out by the Constitution and 250 years of precedent. You have chosen to skip over this entire process (even when you had majorities in both Houses) and have resorted instead to taking the American public hostage in exchange for your wall. You want a wall? Put down the gun you are holding to the head of the American people and get to work.
from iraq how are you mr president
Indigenous people supposed to talk like this rather than a president from immigrant background.
What about the people...L I A R..Should they start to learn Russian !
Amen
BS
Good
Yes
HEY SS, THERE ARE 63,000,000 WHO VOTED FOR TRUMP, AND HE COULDN'T HAVE MADE IT IF HE DIDN'T HAVE THE BLACKS AND THE MEXICANS RIGHT IN THERE VOTING, TOO. HILLARY HAD PEOPLE WHO VOTED MORE THAN ONCE AND SHE HAD THE ILLEGALS VOTING FOR HER AND SHE STILL FELL SHORT. THE ONE THING I LIKE ABOUT HIM, HE SAYS WE DID THIS OR THAT,OBAMA ALWAYS SAID "I DID THIS" AND SAYS IT 20 TIMES IN A 5 MINUET SPEECH. WHEN
The citizens of the United States is your main priority not your wall that won't stop any one your a fucking joke
True...
TRUMP 2020 !!!!!! 🇺🇸
Good job
Preach don
So true!
Best. POTUS. Ever.
Good job
Good!! The outdated concept of nations needs to be done away with. Nations lead to nationalism, and nationalism leads to hate, bigotry, and ignorance, and those things lead to people killing their fellow human beings.
Stay strong, President Trump, millions of us agree with you. So glad you canceled Pelosi's plane today. She doesn't need to go overseas to denigrate you. She needs to stay home and create a budget that includes the wall. Hopefully, we stay shut down long enough for you to get rid of 1000s of federal employees. Downsizing the government would be wonderful. #MAGA #pelosischumershutdown
Toby Ruiz, true story
The southern border of the US of A., does not belong to the NATO alliance and the adjacent four states are more Mexican (1846) than the U.S. of A....
The Dems do not want to call the wall, "wall".  Compromise then, will call it 'BUILD the WIDGET"
You mean like     "NORTH AMERICAN UNION"  SOON TO BE
Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is your cost-ineffective wall, Donny.  Agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so your shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
where i came from newfoundland canada last province to join canada dad was in second world war with britain we were not part of canada we don.t have much crime or immigrants too cold for people they like ontario where i came to work and vancouver that is hot  spots for  immigrants and mosques . all the people move to subburb
POS Fake Dictator Wannabe in Chief. Your days as a free punk are number. You will incarcerated for the rest of your miserable days in a military prison for crimes against this country. Mark my words. G
POS Fake Dictator Wannabe in Chief. Your days as a free punk are number. You will incarcerated for the rest of your miserable days in a military prison for crimes against this country. Mark my words. G
Trump is one of the best, if not the best, presidents this country has ever seen.  Too bad the Republicans in Congress wouldn't act together when they had both houses, because Trump would have cleaned house in the first few months.
please go do your "duty" in the bathroom and not crap on the working people that are now w/o pay but still working diligently-most live paycheck to paycheck.
Then why ruin it?
Jordanian Border Wall BUILT USING $500 BILLION U.S. TAXPAYER MONEY BUT WE CAN'T HAVE OUR OWN WALL?  "GOP AND DEMOCRATS FULLY FUND A BORDER WALL -- IN JORDAN By Neil Munro, March 22, 2018  The 2018 omnibus provides just enough funds to build 33 miles of fencing on the Texas border — but it also provides $500 million to help Jordan build a wall and defense line against jihad terrorists trying to cross its 287-mile border with Iraq and Syria. The omnibus budget says on page 394:  SEC. 9011. Up to $500,000,000 of funds appropriated by this Act for the Defense Security Cooperation Agency in ‘‘Operation and Maintenance, Defense-Wide’’ may be used to provide assistance to the Government of Jordan to support the armed forces of Jordan and to enhance security along its borders.  On page 375, the omnibus says:  For the ‘‘Counter-Islamic State of Iraq and Syria Train and Equip Fund’’, $1,769,000,000, to remain available until September 30, 2019 …  That these funds may be used in such amounts as the Secretary of Defense may determine to enhance the border security of nations adjacent to conflict areas including Jordan, Lebanon, Egypt, and Tunisia resulting from actions of the Islamic State of Iraq and Syria:  The U.S.-funded, $500 million, 274-mile Jordan-Iraq border wall was described by Vice.com, in a 2016 article titled “The Great Wall of Jordan: How the US Wants to Keep the Islamic State Out”;  The wall, which began as a $20 million project in 2008 to erect a set of surveillance towers along a 30-mile (50 km) stretch of the border with Syria, has since expanded into a program costing half a billion dollars, according to defense officials who spoke to VICE News. Called the Jordan Border Security Program or JBSP, the wall is ostensibly meant to stop weapons of mass destruction from getting out, but since 2013 has refocused on detecting Islamic State fighters and arms smuggling, as well as refugees, on both sides of the border …  The first phase of the JBSP, the erection of the towers, was completed in September 2009. Phase 1B, the beginning of the fence, was completed in March 2014. Phases 2 and 3, the building of a fully integrated and networked fence running along a 275-mile(442 km) stretch of Jordan’s borders with Syria and Iraq and costing some $300 million, are scheduled to be fully operational this year. Further phases will extend the fence along the entire border and improve surveillance and detection gear. Mobile surveillance stations and quick reaction forces will be stationed at vulnerable points or emerging hot spots.  It’s all paid for by the United States taxpayer."  https://www.breitbart.com/immigration/2018/03/22/gop-democrats-fully-fund-border-wall-jordanians/
Listen to this hypocrite Pelosi.                              https://www.facebook.com/vedatgurtan/posts/10158001839223776
Head on over to petitions.whitehouse.gov and sign the petitions to remove Pelosi, Waters and Ocasio-Cortez while your at it. Stand firm Pres. Trump real patriots are with you!
The southern grease fried food was destroying my appendix! I was so glad when Mexicans moved in and opened Mexican Restaurants with those delicious tacos, burritos, chilaquiles and tostadas.
Amen , America finally has a President who cares about our Children’s future!  Democrats could care less and rather keep the Government down for there political gain ! Enough is Enough build the wall ! Trump 2020 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Trump, the Pest with two Legs!
Then stop your disastrous TRUMP SHUTDOWN, and do some work, Mr. socalled deal maker.
Then stop your disastrous TRUMP SHUTDOWN, and do some work, Mr. socalled deal maker.
You dont have to LIKE him to see he is trying to save this country And keep it safe for ALL....
You dont have to LIKE him to see he is trying to save this country And keep it safe for ALL....
That’s about the stupidest thing he could say. We’ve been a country for over 200 years. We have always had a southern border and we have been a nation for all of that time. Where does he come up with things like this?
Shhhhh
Secret Service agents are working without pay during the shutdown. One agent warned how that could be dangerous.  "If you've got guys thinking about how they're going to make their house payment, I can just tell you, you're not doing your job right. Your head is not in the right place — this is affecting people."  😥😰 Secret Service maintains mission in face of shutdown, but lack of pay hurting morale
Secret Service agents are working without pay during the shutdown. One agent warned how that could be dangerous.  "If you've got guys thinking about how they're going to make their house payment, I can just tell you, you're not doing your job right. Your head is not in the right place — this is affecting people."  😥😰 Secret Service maintains mission in face of shutdown, but lack of pay hurting morale
Its now being reported that 2000 Hondurans rushed the Mexican Border last night and made it through and the activist Alfonso Ulloa stayed...”Gringos we are going to invade you just like you invaded us”  It’s time for Trump to declare a National Emergency!!!
i say keep troops in usa and protect usa canada should do same  but trudeau is not strong like you he is sissy which i didn,t elect he got in by pot vote and people tired of previous leader in too long
Sign the CR's and open the Government. Then negotiate the wall and if you don't get it, do your National Emergency. Doesn't make sense to keep it closed for something you are eventually going to do anyways.   #trumpshutdown
You seem to be doing a worse job at it than any President in modern American history!!  If you really believe in defending the US, you should resign, and make room for a real President; someone competent who can do the job.
DISGUSTING - MORE GOP LIES Thousands More Migrant Children Likely Taken From Families Than First Reported  https://www.nytimes.com/2019/01/17/us/migrant-children-inspector-general-family-separation.html?emc=edit_na_20190117&nl=breaking-news&nlid=53388860ing-news&ref=cta&fbclid=IwAR1mviIZgwrvygJMSq3rrn_7Q9_FSB85QMZBjSZfM98gWpOBtMuuDH406sY
Yes !
BS! It is to advance your failing businesses and feed your Ego driven image.  Worst POtuS ever. Now this from Christie's new book, so no AG for him. LMFAO! https://www.huffingtonpost.ca/entry/chris-christie-donald-trump-book_us_5c40336fe4b0a8dbe16dab4d?ec_carp=8725767980674213434
BS! It is to advance your failing businesses and feed your Ego driven image.  Worst POtuS ever. Now this from Christie's new book, so no AG for him. LMFAO! https://www.huffingtonpost.ca/entry/chris-christie-donald-trump-book_us_5c40336fe4b0a8dbe16dab4d?ec_carp=8725767980674213434
So don’t say not to the wall and you will have security like Hungary. Support the wall between Mexico and USA.
Make no mistake....the wall is to keep our asses in.
You don’t need a degree from trump university to see that Donald Trump and his buddies are going to make a lot of money off this wall if they can get it going. #CheneyHalliburton
You don’t need a degree from trump university to see that Donald Trump and his buddies are going to make a lot of money off this wall if they can get it going. #CheneyHalliburton
If you dont pay the army you cease to be the president!
Ffs you are a joke. Smh, this is not a reality show.
Ffs you are a joke. Smh, this is not a reality show.
don't use govt workers as pawns in your fight for a wall.... bad strategy.
Go Trump !! Build the wall! Let the left move to the country’s that these people at the border came for ! And trade spots ! The left wants to help them do bad trade spots with them !! Put your money where your mouth is !!
We The American People need and deserve National Security! It is our right!!!  This is the number one priority of the U.S. government...to protect America and Americans. Those that do not agree only wish us harm. All for greed and power.    Stats and Border Patrol say walls work. Even Jim Acosta proved this on air. I believe the professionals at the borders day in and day out know more than those that live in their ivory towers and their 'followers'. No a wall will not take care of all, but it will help! Safety First...it is a RIGHT for all Americans.
We The American People need and deserve National Security! It is our right!!!  This is the number one priority of the U.S. government...to protect America and Americans. Those that do not agree only wish us harm. All for greed and power.    Stats and Border Patrol say walls work. Even Jim Acosta proved this on air. I believe the professionals at the borders day in and day out know more than those that live in their ivory towers and their 'followers'. No a wall will not take care of all, but it will help! Safety First...it is a RIGHT for all Americans.
True!!!!!
Boom
Fake
TRUSAMP  ...
Stand Hard
I LOVE YOU
what a puts
Blue 👁 👀
God Bless u.
I admire many black people I do not admire the ones just like the white dinner anti-america
President Trump needs to call a mandatory bi-partisan team building exercise. Those who refuse to attend do not get paid. He needs to fly everyone to an unsecured section of the southern border where they will all camp out in tents, without the security of walls or fences. I wonder how many Democrats would make it through the night before leaving and heading home to hide behind their own walls?
President Trump needs to call a mandatory bi-partisan team building exercise. Those who refuse to attend do not get paid. He needs to fly everyone to an unsecured section of the southern border where they will all camp out in tents, without the security of walls or fences. I wonder how many Democrats would make it through the night before leaving and heading home to hide behind their own walls?
Good
Not!
Having the National Parks trash picked up and our food inspected are more important than your temper tantrum.  Stop the Trump Shutdown and resign.
Amen
Amen
SO TRUE
What a JOKE!
Hell yes
Very nice
rich piana
Indeed....
Simple!
We cease to be a nation when our president lies about everything.  What about the 4 Americans that died because you said we were pulling out of Syria?????
Yes, please defend us against the crooked establishment elected officials in DC and their cronies.  Difficult to drain the swamp when you are up to your ass in alligators..
Buck Strunk.  Who, beside trump and fox news told you the lie that the U.S. has "open border." The fact is we don't so stop spreading lies.
good man
Oscar, what a good looking guy
Amen.
I love you
You're right
Says Fatso.
True
Amen
Amen
Gold words
Thank you
Hell yeah
So right!
So right!
Amen!!!!
Lies
yes!
Stfu
Get Mexico to pay for your imbecilic wall like you said you would.
Amen
Amen
PURGE!!!
Not me
Fake news
I agree
Trump 2020
Thank You
Absolutely
Absolutely
Amen
Amen
Your ties are too long mr trump
GO TRUMP
Yes! Thank you
Amen
hi
Amen
Ba
Yes!
Bullshit
Trump 2020!!
11 admins 😉
AMEN
Nice
yes
AMEN
America first
America first
Get out!
we love you
What?
We Nigerians wish to have your type as our president, people don't know what they have, long live the president,long live America.
Amen
Yes Boss
Is Agree
TRUMP 2020
TRUMP 2020
Oh, yeah????
TRUMP 2020!
TRUMP 2020!
TRUMP2020
You The Man That Can! KAG☆
So true
Perfect
Yes, amen!!!
RESIGN
U the man
Amen
Fact
I agree
So true
LMAF
The Art of the Deal: You pout and cry until you get what you want.
Absolutely
Go trump
Go trump
Amen!!
Demagogue
Agreed
Wtf
Arthur Lagasse  Sure that’s a great idea because if don’t get the wall   You will be under sharia law
Michael Reed Yes please go to your second home in Russia,we will help pay for the ticket.
Go trump
Go trump
No wall!!
Liar
Liar
MAGA !!!! BTFW !!!!
Our Respect
Amen
YUUPP !!
I agree 100
Agreed!!!
Agreed.
Awesome
Amen
Yes sir
Ya Mitch
Amen
U r right!!
AMEN !!
True .  Absolutely
nice
Ivan Flores Just like you just said brother
Ivan Flores Just like you just said brother
Amen!
Amen!
I agree
Very very good
Jennifer Knapic  Yes!!!  BUILD IT BABY!!!
Maga
Amen!!!
Good luck 🙂
Hamberders
Hamberders
I am so proud
Agreed!
very true
So true
GO TRUMP!
MAGA! 💪  💪  💪  💪
SO VERY TRUE
What a pic! 🕵
100% TRUE !!!
true story
Yep
Agree  100%!
AMEN and we support you President Donald J. Trump
Trump 2020
Trump 2020
Isaiah 54: 17 🇺🇸💗 🙏
like leon
yes.
I sgree
Hi Mr. President.
Amen!
Don't. Give in.
Great
Sounds great!
King of USA
King of USA
Liar
No ,U !
Go Trump
Hi girl 👧
Thank You
MAGA
Right on !!
Right on !!
Just wait
dude.....
dude.....
STAY STRONG!
Awesome😀
Build it
My amazing man . . . xo
Yesss!
Shut up
Shut up
Thank you!!
I agree
Hang in !
Thank you
Bull crap
You are RIGHT, President Trump.
Apowerfulmen
Agreed
So true
Love Trump!!! 2020
trump2020
trump2020
Anthony Tan  haven’t sleep?
Anthony Tan  haven’t sleep?
Indeed
Indeed
God bless him
God bless him
😂😂
😂😂
Ali Mohammed  Avengers return of the wall😂😂💔
Amen
Get 'er done!
Bullshit
Of Russian
FACT!!!!!!
Sycophants.
TRUMP IS THE TRUTH. That's why he seems bitter to the other guys.
Thank you
Stop
Good job
Let's do it
Stay strong
FAKE PHOTO
Thank you
Pinocchio
AMEN
AMEN
علي بني آلعروس  خل يولي حشاك 😂😂
حسين الحسن هسة يقطك 😁😁
Horse
Horse
Kevin Lake still searching for a cure for the #Cult45
James Campbell calm down. They have found a cure for TDS!!  Hold your breath for 30 minutes straight and you will be cured. Have a wonderful day sunshine.
James Campbell calm down. They have found a cure for TDS!!  Hold your breath for 30 minutes straight and you will be cured. Have a wonderful day sunshine.
Kevin Lake so that's your best comeback? That I work at Walmart?  So what? It doesn't matter the job someone works, we are all Americans, just like our vote counts.  Attacking someone over their job, that's beyond weak! 😂😂😂
James Campbell I am sure he will take advice from a Walmart cashier right away. I am sure you knowledge of the world has led you to your esteemed position in life sunshine. Hopefully you wont be drug tested today.
James Campbell I am sure he will take advice from a Walmart cashier right away. I am sure you knowledge of the world has led you to your esteemed position in life sunshine. Hopefully you wont be drug tested today.
Sally Cochrane you really just said that? #Cult45
James Campbell Why? So Chuck and Nancy can turn this country into a socialist/communist country? Wake up and learn some history.
Resign!
Resign!
Stop Lying
Thank you
Exactly
Exactly
Amen
Go trump
Amen!
Love Trump.
Lies
Yes
DEFEND!
50,000. Impeachment
50,000. Impeachment
TRUMP 2020!
The  best
100%  Correct
We ceased to be the nation we use to be when you wouldn't take advise from the various people who you have fired. You have't drained the swamp, you are filling it up with people who have NO clue of what they should be doing. Everyone is laughing at you!
We ceased to be the nation we use to be when you wouldn't take advise from the various people who you have fired. You have't drained the swamp, you are filling it up with people who have NO clue of what they should be doing. Everyone is laughing at you!
Thank You! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Beautiful
YES!
To Russia?
To Russia?
Amen!
Very true!
Amen!
God bless!
Ours too!
Trump 2020
TRUTH
TRUTH
So very true!
President Donald Trump's former lawyer and "fixer" Michael Cohen confirmed a Thursday Wall Street Journal report that he paid a small technology firm to rig online polls in favor of Trump ahead of the 2016 campaign. "As for the @WSJ article on poll rigging, what I did was at the direction of and for the sole benefit of @realDonaldTrump @POTUS. I truly regret my blind loyalty to a man who doesn't deserve it," Cohen posted to his Twitter account.
You Bet!
Trump2020
AMEN!!!
You are going to jail 🎉🎉🎉
You are going to jail 🎉🎉🎉
Ty#
Agree
I agree
Trump 2020
Trump 2020
Thank you
Yes! 🙋🏻
Build it
Cool meme
Go Trump!
true
Strong!
Nonsense
AMEN
Mr. D. YOU Rock!
Amen!
arrest all the socialists as "Traitors to the republic".
Amen!
AMERICA
💯% truth🇺🇸
We know.
Howgh.
A M E N
A M E N
Amen!
Spot on!!
Number.  1
Wall. No amnesty!
Wall. No amnesty!
Lock him up!
Lock him up!
Better than being a bigot!
Snowflake......
Thanx for playing whatabout.
Thanx for playing whatabout.
Clinton and Obama are liars
https://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/425805-cohen-responds-to-report-on-poll-rigging-what-i-did-was-at-the?fbclid=IwAR0_tZW6Jz-u9y5shlvLIXw_KOw4GE7L0yhHQjFzpY-Okn-7PPDrnbjb37I
Liar!
Liar!
Trump 2020
Yep! Broken record.
Exactly
Riiiiiight
President Trump is NOT a Perfect man...but IS the 'Perfect Man'...for this Job...in Leading America...a President who 'loves' his Country...as he is fighting for Border Security with his every Breath...in getting the Funding for a Border Barrier...a much needed physical Structure ....to Stop the Invasion of ILLEGALS...and the flow of Drugs ...Drugrunners...Coyotes... and  Trafficking...entering through the 'Open Border'...
Agree
Go Trump
Yes
Yep
Stay strong
hamberders
I agree
WWG1WGA
AND THIS, makes the dems angry in so many ways, they don't want WE THE PEOPLE to feel safe, have confidence, be independent, be successful!  They want weak, dependent peaople, unable to think and live for themselves     THANK YOU MR PRESIDENT TO BEING SUCH AN INCREDIBLE PATRIOTIC PRESIDENT
Trump 2020
Great
AMEN...
Thank you
fake news
100% correct.
COMMON SENSE
PROCEED,
BUILD THE WALL PRESIDENT TRUMP WE ARE BEHIND YOU
Yes indeed
Individual 1 is unfit to be a president. He talks politics to the troops and Boy Scouts. Both are apolitical organizations. #Donthecon
Thanks.
Roger that
Amen!
Oh yes
Yes.
love Trump
love Trump
Yes!!!
Don't drink the kool-aid! It rots your brain.
I rather like President Trump. He is a straight talker. He does what he says he is going to do. In other words he gets the job done when other Presidents just talk about doing it because they are afraid of the outcome. What’s wrong with that. He is a little rough around the edges, but gets the message across. He has brought respect back to this US of A from foreign countries because they know he is not kidding around. I don’t care about his private life or who he did or did not have an affair with. I don’t care about any of this stuff just as long as he does the things he promised in his election campaign. If you think I’m wrong, just look at the total mess Europe is in and for that matter the rest of the world. We should be lucky to have a person like Mr. Trump who wanted to take on Washington and work for the people of this great nation.🇺🇸🇺🇸
I AGREE.
Russia?
Thank you!
Amen!!!
A joke
Liberal Elites have their minions (Libtard voters), and have so far seen ZERO ACCOUNTABILITY!!!  WHY would they change if NO ONE HOLDS them ACCOUNTABLE?? As the new Federal Dipshid once said..."GET IN THEIR FACES!", CALL them NON-STOP!, HARASS THEM EVERYWHERE YOU SEE THEM! If a Moronic,corrupt Senator can say it, PREACH it, publicly on TV then SO CAN WE!  Build the WALL! GO Trump!!!
Liberal Elites have their minions (Libtard voters), and have so far seen ZERO ACCOUNTABILITY!!!  WHY would they change if NO ONE HOLDS them ACCOUNTABLE?? As the new Federal Dipshid once said..."GET IN THEIR FACES!", CALL them NON-STOP!, HARASS THEM EVERYWHERE YOU SEE THEM! If a Moronic,corrupt Senator can say it, PREACH it, publicly on TV then SO CAN WE!  Build the WALL! GO Trump!!!
You know as Trump is really rich he could fund the wall himself if he truly did care as much as he claims.
You know as Trump is really rich he could fund the wall himself if he truly did care as much as he claims.
Lol please.
you realize he is pointing to nobody when he does that.  it's his idea of looking Presidential   MAGA.
If Russia determines who our President is, then we Cease to be a Nation.   Many people are Saying so, very strongly and powerfully, believe me!   Bigly!
If Russia determines who our President is, then we Cease to be a Nation.   Many people are Saying so, very strongly and powerfully, believe me!   Bigly!
100 percent
gotta love the anti-Trump trolls who still havent figured out that they keep losing every time they open their mouth
Yes
the upside is we can all stop paying taxes if we don't have a country...and my question is why are you funding the destruction of your country?
Mueller
Trump 2020❤❤
Trump 2020❤❤
Mexico should just stop exporting drugs to America for a month, the Americans will be the ones climbing over the wall.
Exactly!!!!
MAGA🇺🇸🦅🇺🇸
MAGA🇺🇸🦅🇺🇸
HereHere
Hi my friends!  It's a situation in Georgia, but you have repeatedly said, "We did not leave you and help you, and where is it? But they have wound up internal divisions, but what are we doing here ?!  The mafia has come into operation and my family is forced to sell the house, and here we are interested in the criminal authorities in Russia who are governing this government.  You leave me here and enjoy where it is and help them to get rid of the car that I can not even get back for a number of years and what is going to be a friend, so that's why Ivanishvili and Saakashvili can not dare to dare.  This is why the crisis, the obstacle, the problem and the back of the country and the country's business as well as the world's politics, because the amazi intrigues are cut down everywhere.  Yesterday the apartment building exploded, the children were killed, and I saw that this is a sabotage committed by the mafia and what we will see will be officially seen together with the mafia method of money laundering.  So please do this if you help us finish this mafia and rest you and we also took the country from the Russian mafia and the tries to keep them back to the source so you are cautious if you want to actually defeat the Russian mafia !!  With respect to me🇬🇪
Big Mac!
Then use DOD money ..... oh that would mean Defense contractors can't get their quarterly bonuses.. which in turn hurts your stocks in those Corps...
Truth !!!
Seems like following putins agenda is your highest priority.
Trump 2020
Geez
You had a year and change with a Republican trifecta and you choose to start the border wall as soon as Democrats tske control? What's your angle?
And this coming from a Republican.... Don’t hold Americans to hostage Mr Trump https://www.facebook.com/1087167058116488/posts/1186991381467388?sfns=mo
How about do your job mr. President. You're the one that took the blame for the shutdown. Now you should be the one to start it back up. Or are you waiting for the Democrats to look good because they started it back up.
You want to put up a wall by shutting down the government but yet the shutdown is hurting us. You don't care about us just your wall.  Did you even think of what all would happen. No more WIC no more help for families in need and even worse no more safety nets on the websites controlled by the government. This safety net helps stop hackers from getting our info.  People are working without pay and tons have been sent to stay home. You where all for us to have more jobs but yet now you have lowered that way more then ever now.  If you keep this shutdown going babys will go without milk kids will go without food. People will loose there homes and die from the cold.  Stop being so stubborn and stop this shutdown before things get worse. All you care about is the ones who make as much as you do.  Next time think and plan things out before you jump the gun.
The State of Florida is playing the President for the fool.... while thousands die.   No exaggeration in the least.....  From: Charles Ankner  Sent: 08/25/2017 2:17 PM  To: Demario, Frank <DeMarioF@pbso.org>  Cc: rick.scott@eog.myflorida.com; jackie.schutz@eog.myflorida.com; mayor@townofpalmbeach.com; daronberg@sa15.org; bradshawr@pbso.org; kblouin@palmbeachpolice.com  Subject: RE: Investigation of Homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER in Town of Palm Beach on Aug 5th, 2017  Thank you Col. DeMario, very much, for your email. Your human and compassionate touch is reassuring.  I am the victim’s blood Uncle, not her father.  The PBPD are not investigating a homicide, either by MCCAULEY or anyone else– and as a man of your background and experience can plainly see – a homicide was committed.   The PBPD has already proven their lack of worth by not complying with the new Florida Law related to opiate deaths recently signed by Gov. Scott. JFK found opiates in Nia’s system. She may have been a high functioning alcoholic; but, Nia did not abuse or even use opiates to our knowledge.  She had recently started a new clerical job for an older couple who attend her church here in West Palm. (Nia worked for the WV Governor’s Office before moving to WBP about 8 years ago) She passed a drug test less than 2 months ago for her new employer; and was soon to qualify for medical benefits.  My brother, I, and the rest of my family including retired FL State Parole/Probation Officer-Investigator Eric. P. Ankner; Nia’s other blood Uncle; formally request any investigation into the death of NIA LEE ANKNER be transferred to the PBSO.  The trust between the surviving Ankner Family and the PBPD has been irremediably broken; and we will have extreme difficulty working with them to a truthful, complete, and just conclusion.  However thankfully, our faith and trust in the PBSO remains intact. We also formally request an investigation into the PBPD’s handling of their investigation into Nia’s death up to this point – particularly for dereliction of duty, suppression of evidence, and obstruction of justice. If such an investigation is not within your Jurisdiction; please advise us of who’s it is.  Please, assume the investigation of NIA LEE ANKNER’s homicide.  Sincerely and Respectfully,  From: Demario, Frank [mailto:DeMarioF@pbso.org]  Sent: 08/25/2017 1:42 PM  To: Charles Ankner <charles@saintbrandcannabis.com>  Cc: kblouin@palmbeachpolice.com  Subject: RE: Investigation of Homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER in Town of Palm Beach on Aug 5th, 2017  Mr. Ankner,  I’m sorry for your loss and your frustration with the investigation of your daughter’s death.  As you know this investigation falls within the jurisdiction of the Palm Beach Police Department and I can assure you they have the ability and expertise to properly investigate her death.  Judging by your letter it appears you are familiar with the law and should understand that toxicology is a vital part of a death investigation and takes a considerable amount of time to receive the results and the ME makes the final determination of the crime classification.  I believe all your questions and requests will be answered by the PBPD investigator, in due time.  To conclude, I see no reason to request, assist or join the investigation that the PBPD is conducting at this time.  Colonel Frank DeMario  Law Enforcement Operations  Palm Beach County Sheriff’s Office  561 688 3018  From: Charles Ankner [mailto:charles@saintbrandcannabis.com]  Sent: Thursday, August 24, 2017 4:07 PM  To: kblouin@palmbeachpolice.com; jtrylch@palmbeachpolice.com; lmenniti@palmbeachpolice.com; dWilkinson@palmbeachpolice.com; gsilvestri@palmbeachpolice.com'; mayor@townofpalmbeach.com  Cc: rick.scott@eog.myflorida.com; jackie.schutz@eog.myflorida.com; Bradshaw, Ric L.; Gauger, Michael E; Demario, Frank; Penta, Louis L III; twills@sa15.org; daronberg@sa15.org; sherrif@pbso.org; rsaccone@pbcgov.org  Subject: RE: Investigation of Homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER in Town of Palm Beach on Aug 5th, 2017  **This email was sent from an external (non-PBSO) source.**.  Director Blouin, Officers,  Forgive me for causing your Department further trouble; however, I must voice my and my family’s extreme displeasure, if I dare say our disgust, regarding your handing of the death investigation, and your communication with the surviving family, of NIA LEE ANKNER.  What your responding Officers knew and were told by your own Department’s Emergency Medical Responders regarding Nia’s condition – blue to black skin color, pin-point pupils, no respiration, etc… indicated severe opiate poisoning; and yet, you/they let the repeat felony probation/parolee offender, prime material witness, who accompanied Nia, and most probably poisoned her…to walk away.  For the most part, your Department ignored information being provided by the victim’s family at the scene. Amazing…  KELLY A. MCCAULEY was not searched, not questioned at length – nothing – a repeat violent offender present during a very suspicious death – and you let her walk away. And then you had the victim’s family drive the crime scene vehicle back to the victim’s home, and the victim’s father to drive the prime witness / suspect to her home!?     As you know, Florida Law now requires homicide investigations related to opiate and other Class 1 Controlled Substance related deaths.   Forgive my USAF parlance; but, you’ve “screwed the pooch” from the arrival on scene up until now.  Your Department also kept communicating to my brother days on end as his daughter lay brain dead in a hospital - “she was only one mile into our jurisdiction and had just arrived”, “we don’t have homicides in Palm Beach”, “the drug problem comes from the mainland”. Should be criminal in an of itself.  Your Department cared more for your convenience and reputation than you did the Constitutional Rights of Nia – that being her right to life.  There are many other examples of your Departments’… how shall I say… ineptness, dereliction of duty, suppression of evidence, and obstruction of justice – which will come to light and be proven in due course.  Please retain, or surrender to the PBSO, all evidence you have and other reports related to your investigation of Nia’s death. We will have our Atty’s and investigators contact your and those Offices for that purpose shortly.  Detective Larry Menitti verbally told the victim’s father George nine days after Nia’s brain-death while collecting her cell-phone as evidence, “This isn’t Mayberry RFB you know. We’ll get to the truth of your daughter’s death.”  Well, we beg to differ Sherriff Taylor. And we want you and Barny Fife off the case.  Charles Ankner,  Greenacres, FL 33415  https://www.linkedin.com/pulse/palm-beach-county-opiate-massacre-reality-over-charles-ankner-cp/
SHUTDOWN SHELTERS: Domestic violence shelters are cutting services as federal funds run out. It's Day 27 of America's longest government shutdown 'We're going to stay out for a long time,' Pres. Trump said this week as he continues to refuse to re-open the government without $5.7 billion for a border wall.
Wouldn't surprize anyone if trump announced he was giving the "State of the State" speech from Moscow. Putin would stand with him to insure trumps safety.
That’s right you lock your doors ....don’t you.....
Why not do your job?
TRUE. THAT IS WHY HILLARY LOST. SHE IS IN BED WITH PUTIN
TRUE. THAT IS WHY HILLARY LOST. SHE IS IN BED WITH PUTIN
If we sell out to hostile leaders like Putin we cease to be a country even faster traitor.
We are with you President Trump. We have another Invasion on its way and two more after that. Whoever is Leading these Caravans needs to be Arrested. We see Lawyers down there from here encouraging these people. Please tell me we are not paying for these Lawyers. Any Lawyer who goes against our Law should be disbarred.
We are with you President Trump. We have another Invasion on its way and two more after that. Whoever is Leading these Caravans needs to be Arrested. We see Lawyers down there from here encouraging these people. Please tell me we are not paying for these Lawyers. Any Lawyer who goes against our Law should be disbarred.
Not only should we, but have a responsibility to secure our border from all that cause harm to our citizens. This does not mean that we ever refuse immigration. Liberals want people to believe that Republicans don't want immigration that is simply a lie.
Congressional Budget Office reported spending of $590 billion for defense. You Mr Trump have the border patrol working without pay. You Mr Trump have the Coast Guard working without pay.
Congressional Budget Office reported spending of $590 billion for defense. You Mr Trump have the border patrol working without pay. You Mr Trump have the Coast Guard working without pay.
Complete BS given your allegiance to Putin. You practice alternative loyalty. A weak despicable grotesque degenerate.
It really is.  If your country is not secure, anything bad can happen to it.  Thank God for Pres. Trump.  He puts the country first.
This Dimwit had two years of full Republican control to build a wall but instead chose to focus on tax cuts for the rich !
This Dimwit had two years of full Republican control to build a wall but instead chose to focus on tax cuts for the rich !
the money for your Donald Trump in 2020 president not for wall and war and gun and all the thing is for 2020 president Donald Trump right   nobody can do 2020 president this president is only Donald Trump right
Idiots come out of the woodwork
Nancy Pelosi was planning to visit her real bosses: the EU cabal HQ, the Muslim Brotherhood HQ, and the opium production HQ. THIS WOMAN NEEDS TO BE OUT OF OFFICE, SHE'S WORTH 200 MILLION BECAUSE SHE'S A TRAITOR
Then why, mr President, are You wasting our resources on a silly wall. That money could be better spent elsewhere. There are much more effective ways to secure our border than this boondoggle.
such hateful trolls on this page.  BUILD THE WALL!!!  Common sense is till alive just not among Democrats and Liberals.
Latest poll data: The president also faces some significant headwinds for re-election in 2020. Just 30 percent of registered voters said they will definitely vote for Trump in 2020, while 57 percent said they will definitely vote against him.
👑😈👑America can't afford to build a boarder wall Trump.. you can't see that by now..??Some things is just too expensive..even for you..👑😈👑5000 people with a million dollars = 5 billion dollars.. do the math..
Barry weakened America and made us the laughing stock of the world!  Time to make us the greatest nation on earth again!
Republican Congress for 2 years, no wall money in expenditure bills, now a national emergency? Bullshit. Total wall cost $50-60 billion. National debt $23 trillion.  You do t h e math.
Trump were  supporting u all the way at least YOU DO WHAT U SAY UR GOING TO DO
Trump were  supporting u all the way at least YOU DO WHAT U SAY UR GOING TO DO
Donald J. Trump  did Democrats steal $50 Billion in Border Security Barrier Funds? Please Read the link!!!  https://www.facebook.com/rod.koodray.7/posts/294366554791176Rod Koodray
Get outta here.  Our borders are doing very well as you well know.  Stop holding America hostage so you can claim a campaign win.  You don't care about border security.  You care only about yourself and your worshippers 😤
Get outta here.  Our borders are doing very well as you well know.  Stop holding America hostage so you can claim a campaign win.  You don't care about border security.  You care only about yourself and your worshippers 😤
Once again the one who are laughing ARE the domestic Enemies of America..................... God Bless theses United States
I agree we need to defend our borders and at first I was all for the wall but now that it’s hurting so many people I think discussing an alternative like placing our troops along it enforcing a no enter at all zone or you can fine Mexico. Mexico should be the ones stopping their people from coming or be fined. Americans that work and Veterans should not have to go without a pay check. The economy is going to suffer as well as people voting for you next election. Sit down and discuss another alternative to the wall and get these people back their pay please.
If we don't defend our constitution from YOUR fascist attempt at dictatorship, we shall cease to be a free nation.
If we don't defend our constitution from YOUR fascist attempt at dictatorship, we shall cease to be a free nation.
You Rock President Trump! #trumpdrivers2020
That's a pretty simple idea unless you have to deal with the Schumer's and Pelosi's of the world. The Dems in today's Congress speak in terms of power mongering, not common sense.Trump is no rocket scientist but even HE can see that border security is needed stat
But not a wall!   Border security, yes of course, not a wall, and definitely not this wall, this clusterfuk shutdown  for a chunk of red meat tossed out to your rabid base so you can guarantee their blind unwavering support in your bid for 46!?
Love our President Donald J. Trump!!
He wants to be re-elected so don't worry and be happy with Trump.
When the US and North Korea negotiate disarmament talks, Trump 's term ends in 2020.
Donald Trump’s companies have reached a ten year high in the number of foreign workers that they have recruited for low wage, unskilled jobs at Trump companies.  Trump has long campaigned on restricting immigration to the United States.  The Trump Organization requested and received at least 192 visas for foreign workers in 2018, according to Department of Labor data. That number appears to be the highest for the company going back to at least 2008 and likely much earlier, based on public records.  TPM, which reviewed the raw Labor Department information files.Those visas were almost entirely for the type of low-skilled foreign workers that Trump has claimed drive down American wages. Cooks, servers, housekeepers and farmworkers make up a large chunk of the Trump Organization’s requests, most of them making between $10 and $15 hourly.
keep your stance. state of the union in Arizona, Jeff Flakes home town, Angel moms, large stadium tv with live pictures of the caravans, show live shots of the poop on the streets of Calif invite the leader of china , and then thank Nancy p. for her help. maybe even a large scale model of her homes and wineries in the background. if she wants to play games we'll play. In order to protect us from this invasion no scheme is too outlandish....😁...
The Spanish problem has been a problem long enough. A solution to their problem will make your next anniversary happier. Happy 14th Anniversary: President Trump and First Lady Melania Trump also Barron who is blessed with a good father and mother.  Cortez Surname Popularity There was no name definition found for Cortez. User-submitted names:  CORTÉZ-Spanish  https://surnames.behindthename.com/name/cortez   There was no name definition found for Ocasio.  “In this week's episode of the Code Switch podcast, Mora tells the fascinating story of how, in the 1970s, Latino advocacy groups successfully lobbied the federal government to create a separate category for counting Hispanics and Latinos. Before then the government had classified those people simply as white.”  https://www.npr.org/sections/codeswitch/2017/08/03/541142339/heres-why-the-census-started-counting-latinos-and-how-that-could-change-in-2020
Stand your ground ,don't ever back down !!!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 #BUILDTHEWALL !! Thank you Nancy and Chuck for having so much HATE you refuse to work with the President. In turn keeping this shutdown going and in turn hurting the people !!!😡😡😡
Sheriffs around the country support border security.  Christian County is dealing with a lot of the drugs that are coming from Mexico and Columbia.   http://www.christiancountysheriff.net/press-release/sheriff-brad-cole-supports-president-trumps-border-security-efforts/
WRONG !!!!   The most important thing for you is ....  to get your way.
Honduran Caravan gathers together thousands of people to combat their gangs on their own #you will never hear that
Frank Valdez wrong stop watching Fake News brother .
Didn’t he say isis was defeated and ordered  troops pulled then recently isis just killed a bunch of our troops ?
#FUCKTRUMP BIGLY 🖕🏽
#FUCKTRUMP BIGLY 🖕🏽
We cease to be a nation with a traitor as president. #impeachthemotherfucker.
the nation if without decent and look the heyna attack in africa
GOD BLESS YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP. We are 100% with you. Dont give up. Build that Wall.
GOD BLESS YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP. We are 100% with you. Dont give up. Build that Wall.
Then why are you letting TSA go unpaid?
Rep. Kevin McCarthy said Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer are "stonewalling" President Trump on border security, and it's "hurting the American public."  MORE: https://insider.foxnews.com/2019/01/10/mccarthy-pelosi-schumer-didnt-want-hear-facts-misrepresented-what-happened-trump-meeting
I would hold the SOTU address in the White House and invite key Senators and Congresspeople.  And ignore Pelosi and her minions as if they did not exist.
If the defense of our nation is your highest and most important duty, END THE SHUTDOWN! Then we can have a civil discussion about border protection.
"I" am VERY happy with the job the President has done so far, but REALLY feel "the wall" decision is  a "BAD ONE"...! Hopefully, He knows what He is doing...as "HE" will have to answer for it,,,!!  "I" don't believe "a campaign promise" OR "that "THIS" is the right path to pursue"..is a VALID reason...!! We "ALL".. just want what is right..!
If you're a Democrat you are fighting for your own demise. If you don't believe me just keep an eye on the news the next couple months or so.
why not do it before the tax cuts fir the filthy rich
Obama has a handler, Valerie J. Hilary has a handler, Huma A. Trump has A handler, 63+ million patriotic Americans. God bless America
Obama has a handler, Valerie J. Hilary has a handler, Huma A. Trump has A handler, 63+ million patriotic Americans. God bless America
https://thehill.com/opinion/immigration/393675-americans-have-been-played-again-by-open-border-advocates?amp Americans have been played again by open-border advocates
Then quit holding the nation hostage. The terrorist trump shutdown is the biggest threat to our safety, but you don't care about that so it's clear Americans safety has nothing to do with this issue. Walls don't work! #ImpeachHim. https://www.usatoday.com/border-wall/story/drug-trafficking-smuggling-cartels-tunnels/559814001/
Wasnington  Post. Trump had 2,000 lies, in 11 month during 2018. Mean's 15 time dealy  Q. How does Donald Trump sleep at night ? A. First he lies  one side, then he lies on the other
Wasnington  Post. Trump had 2,000 lies, in 11 month during 2018. Mean's 15 time dealy  Q. How does Donald Trump sleep at night ? A. First he lies  one side, then he lies on the other
؜We must construe that wall on the southern border. Now the new president of Mexico is a declared socialist, admirer of Chavez, Venezuela, and Castros Cuba. When Mexico enters the classic Communist socialist crisis of the Cuba type, the ordas of Mexicans fleeing from Mexico through the border will be of biblical proportions. Remember the exodos of Cubans to USA, exodos of Venezuelans to the USA, from Nicaragua to the USA, ETC and these countries are NOT border with USA, analyze this.
Bob Dinius  No, I haven't.  But you thought of checking didn't you?  Why is that, you think?
Every go through the emojis and look at the few laugh and andrybfaces and realize they are all foreigners lmao
As an observer I will point out to others who are having a problem realizing what you are doing for America.  I am completely and utterly bewildered that immigration reform has not been addressed for a couple of decades.and has been allowed to escalate out of control and affects every aspect in the lives of legal American citizens. Please stand strong , you President Trump are honoring the oath you took when you were elected.. and that speaks volumes.
They altered the picture to make him look thinner they even tried to make his little fingers longer LOL what a phony
You have literally made us more unsafe by throwing a temper tantrum and shutting the government down!
You have literally made us more unsafe by throwing a temper tantrum and shutting the government down!
Yes, as President and Commander in Chief the safety and security of the Nation is your top priority.  Not handouts and not making friends.  Stay tough on this issue, we need it!  We won't see another no-nonsense president like you in my lifetime.
Why not just make it a felony with a minimum of 30 years in prison for employers (or anyone) that hire illegals.
EVERY AMERICAN knows, that for decades, we have had a border security crisis. That is old news.. The WALL, is not a RED/BLUE issue, it's a GREATER GOOD FOR AMERICA ISSUE...   ALWAYS, stand for what is right, regardless if your candidate is in office or not..   Always remember,  the wall and border security, protects and benefits ALL AMERICANS..
EVERY AMERICAN knows, that for decades, we have had a border security crisis. That is old news.. The WALL, is not a RED/BLUE issue, it's a GREATER GOOD FOR AMERICA ISSUE...   ALWAYS, stand for what is right, regardless if your candidate is in office or not..   Always remember,  the wall and border security, protects and benefits ALL AMERICANS..
Who ever thought that ‘Winning!’ would include so many -Lawsuits -Indictments -Criminal investigations -Testimony  -Dollars in debt -Fear mongering -Brainwashed lemmings  MAGA
Obie sent it to his terrorist friends in Iran.
Did you know 🤔 500 million dollars of US tax payer money went to fund a border wall for the country of Jordan. This was approved under the Obama administration with bi partisan support from Congress. I guess border walls only work for other countries? 🤔
Did you know 🤔 500 million dollars of US tax payer money went to fund a border wall for the country of Jordan. This was approved under the Obama administration with bi partisan support from Congress. I guess border walls only work for other countries? 🤔
James Hindle shut up, boomer. Your generation screwed up America...let it heal from your cancer
Oh, go grow one, Donald. Your most important duty was pretty null and void when you deferred . . .  what was it . . .  five times? What a useless excuse of a man!
There is a reporter named Major Garrett who said that this president has done many good things for this country but the media won't report on that.   They are focused on making him look bad for opening our eyes to "fake news'. To hell with them! They have been lying to us for far too long. I quit watching the news because they can't be trusted to report the news honestly. They only tell their side.
There is a reporter named Major Garrett who said that this president has done many good things for this country but the media won't report on that.   They are focused on making him look bad for opening our eyes to "fake news'. To hell with them! They have been lying to us for far too long. I quit watching the news because they can't be trusted to report the news honestly. They only tell their side.
You are the single biggest threat to our nation in history.
Blah blah blah...crap such fake patriotism...it’s revolting
Blah blah blah...crap such fake patriotism...it’s revolting
Stand Strong President Donald J. Trump.
Stand Strong President Donald J. Trump.
trai·tor  noun a person who betrays a friend, country, principle, etc. "they see me as a traitor, a sellout to the enemy" synonyms:	betrayer, back-stabber, double-crosser, double-dealer, renegade, Judas, quisling, fifth columnist, viper;
Imagine if Trump fined everyone who doesn't want the wall. Kinda like obama did with obamacare.....
The wall wasn't that important  2 years  ago when the Republicans were a majority.  Just now so he can fight with the Democrats
Try defending the Constitution, you POS.
Try defending the Constitution, you POS.
So you are a hypocrite.
We will only be closer to a Nation until the Non American democrats defeat you and us Deplorables. I Pray for God to help you restore USA 🇺🇸 and bring Pelosi and Schumer under His Control for the BETTER of All People. 🙏🇺🇸
It is so nice to have a President that loves America and wants to put the American people first for a change
It is so nice to have a President that loves America and wants to put the American people first for a change
I SAY THOSE WHO DON'T MUCH CARE FOR THE WALL GO AHEAD AND LEAVE YOUR DOORS AND WINDOWS UNLOCKED...
Donald Trump is Vladimir Putin's boy in Washington, bought and pay for! Farm bankruptcies are way up under Donnie! Farmers are going on welfare and food stamps under Donnie! Donnie is creating more toxic superfund sites for future generations to pay for! Donnie is destroying the environment and rewarding polluters with subsidies! Donnie is selling off public lands for pennies on the dollar! Donnie is trying to destroy the independent of the courts and Criminal justice system! Donnie Trump is trying to destroy NATO!  Will Vladimir Putin ever get tired of winning?
Donald Trump is Vladimir Putin's boy in Washington, bought and pay for! Farm bankruptcies are way up under Donnie! Farmers are going on welfare and food stamps under Donnie! Donnie is creating more toxic superfund sites for future generations to pay for! Donnie is destroying the environment and rewarding polluters with subsidies! Donnie is selling off public lands for pennies on the dollar! Donnie is trying to destroy the independent of the courts and Criminal justice system! Donnie Trump is trying to destroy NATO!  Will Vladimir Putin ever get tired of winning?
This man obviously doesn't know there is more than one way to protect our borders. We live in a world of electronic aids and plenty of service men to protect our borders. He is obeying the orders of Fox News and his base. You know those folks he bragged about being able to Con. He doesn't care about the destruction he brings to our people.
Well, going by the way you -or your staff- has suddenly started posting ralley-rhetoric multiple times per day on this FB page you knew your falsehood-filled con job speech didn't work.
God bless you Donald J. Trump.
Hang in there Mr. President. Mail them you State of the Union, you won't have to put up with the shout outs, and bad behavior from the Dems and then the press after. Instead have a rally....and show them the people who appreciate the work you are doing to protect our borders.
Jon Chiusano you were dancing on rooftops in jersey on 9/11 weren’t you Juan?
Nicki Michelle Literally not one person is saying the country shouldn't be secured... this is about nothing but an unneeded vanity wall... there are better ways to spend billions of dollars
Stop with the hostage talk I want my country secured, period
Your act is getting old… be the deal maker you claimed to be and find a compromise. Enough with the hostage negotiations… the US doesn’t make deals with terrorist…
Your act is getting old… be the deal maker you claimed to be and find a compromise. Enough with the hostage negotiations… the US doesn’t make deals with terrorist…
TRUMP ALL THE WAY 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸BUILD THE WALL
Well said Sir, Donald J. Trump
President Trump - you are loved by the American people and you have our prayers and support! Thank you for wanting to keep us all safe! The Lord is on your side - God bless you and keep pressing forward! Trump 2020 <3
Thank you! Get a venue and bring your SOTU to the American people without the Dems.
Thank you! Get a venue and bring your SOTU to the American people without the Dems.
A lot of you are absolutely delusional.
as I lay off the boarder patrol airport security the coast guard and the fbi. You sheep are hopeless!!
Trump suborned perjury which is a very serious crime.
They should just give him the drop in the bucket for border security, It's pretty effing stupid to put so many lives in turmoil trying to stop something that already exists in many areas.
They should just give him the drop in the bucket for border security, It's pretty effing stupid to put so many lives in turmoil trying to stop something that already exists in many areas.
The Narendra Modi of USA
Hold the line, Mr. President.   The caravan is coming -- it will be another powerful example of why we need to secure our borders!
Agree, we also need to pull out of the Middle East. It appears Isreal has been arming Hilary’s creation ISIS. We don’t know who we are fighting over there, not worth shedding any more blood of our children for oil and other nations regional ambitions.
TRUMP PENCE FOR PRISON 2020
TRUMP PENCE FOR PRISON 2020
Trump keep firm.  Evil is unashamed.  Everybody who voted for you are votin for you again
you had the senate, congress, and presidency from 2016-2018...so are you saying you were not defending the country for two years???  you said Mexico would pay for the wall, now you want to force US to....
You don't have to be Einstein to know that barriers work.- Border Patrol say a wall is critical to secure the southern border - #America1ST💯 #FundTheWall 🇺🇸️ 🎯💯
You don't have to be Einstein to know that barriers work.- Border Patrol say a wall is critical to secure the southern border - #America1ST💯 #FundTheWall 🇺🇸️ 🎯💯
Why aren't Texans along the border more interested in building miles and miles of walls along more than a 1000 miles of unfenced border? Land ownership issues?
Don’t always agree with our President on many issues - believe he’s absolutely RIGHt on this. This is another security measure. Just like cyber threats etc.  These initiatives need to be funded. And by doing so does not make our country less generous.  The generosity of this country is being misused by nefarious folks who are creating a bad name for the good, honest people. Also a wall is better than waging war on people - it doesn’t kill people and actually creates jobs.  If the Democrats are making this such a big issue then they should stop all this Russian interference talk - lift all the funding to cyber security and other types of security.
He needs to hit his head on every brick of the wall he wants to build
The fact that demorats hate you more than they love the american people says volumes.  Ill never vote demorat as long as i breathe but once im dead im sure to vote democrat!
And we are a great Nation unless we let the witch, Nancy Pelosi, continue casting spells of hatred and contempt in order to destroy our great President's agenda!!!! President Trump we are with you and will stand by you all the way!!!!!
And we are a great Nation unless we let the witch, Nancy Pelosi, continue casting spells of hatred and contempt in order to destroy our great President's agenda!!!! President Trump we are with you and will stand by you all the way!!!!!
President Trump, you are doing a great job. Stay firm & strong. Pelosi & Schumer are jealous that a non-politician is doing his job + better than any other president has. Also, please have your "Address"--don't allow her to stop your voice. She  says is it is about security--but the truth is, it's her security she is worried about and not the American people who want our border security + the wall.
President Trump, you are doing a great job. Stay firm & strong. Pelosi & Schumer are jealous that a non-politician is doing his job + better than any other president has. Also, please have your "Address"--don't allow her to stop your voice. She  says is it is about security--but the truth is, it's her security she is worried about and not the American people who want our border security + the wall.
you’ve posted this meme 57 times already. chill out grandpa....
You are doing a GREAT and really hard job with all the internal enemies you have to contend with in the USA.My family and I will definitely vote a straight Republican ticket in 2020 as we need bout 8 more years of President Trump at least. Dems are really indifferent  to the suffering and of USA citizens and do not care bout their safety nor  their welfare.
Then why would you tweet about a trip government officials are planning on taking to afghanistan?  You're such a petty, vindictive man.
Why is Nancy Pelosi living in a house that is fenced in and in a gated community? What a hypocrite.
We've been defending our borders for hundreds of years. We will always defend our borders. Stop trying to create a fake crisis to distract from your obvious Russian collusion and conspiracy.  https://www.thedailybeast.com/cohen-hired-it-firm-to-rig-online-polls-for-trump-says-report?source=articles&via=rss
It appears someone has read our constitution and understands THE security and safety of the United States citizen IS the #1 priority for the position of The President of the United States of America! 🇺🇸
It appears someone has read our constitution and understands THE security and safety of the United States citizen IS the #1 priority for the position of The President of the United States of America! 🇺🇸
Still not  sure why the border is such a crisis right now!  Why wasn't something done during the 2 years you controlled both houses?!?   Something is not right here....   OH!   I know what it is!  You're using federal employees as pawns in a political game!   I know you care NOTHING about those citizens not getting paid because how many times have you done this in years and decades past?!?    Well done 45, running this country like your businesses... Into the ground that it!     #FailedPresident #CaresNotAboutCitizens
This piece of s*** can leave the White House at any time you really care about America when you're not paying the same people you swore to protect.  How is somebody supposed to live without the money you don't give a s*** about America if you did then work with the Democrats at some point or at least are paying the federal employees for the jobs they are doing for your America
Precisely!! the first order of the President is to keep this nation safe.
So you stopped paying the Coast Guard. Yep. You're smart.
Trump didn't you say Isis was destroyed??? yet again you know nothing, Pay your own first ,they do not all have a millionaire DADDY to bail them out like you had.
Who's going to defend us from Russia
This will help immigrants to realize they have to come legally and safer for them.  Our country will turn into a country the immigrants are leaving if we don't have order
This will help immigrants to realize they have to come legally and safer for them.  Our country will turn into a country the immigrants are leaving if we don't have order
Thomas String Breaker Chew Teck Andres Pek  'MURRRICAAAAAAAA HELL YEEAHHH !!
Thomas String Breaker Chew Teck Andres Pek  'MURRRICAAAAAAAA HELL YEEAHHH !!
That's why his best friend is our ally, you know, because he cares about our safety and all
It is funny all this started when you started is you are doing the same thing they did in the 50 and 60 trying to keep people afraid
Thank Russia for this stooge,,and dumb people that voted for him,
🐄💩  that's another lie so many vital personnel being furloughed because the government shutdown you're not interested in true security of this country you're interested in keeping your 2020 vote because Fox called you out on your stupid wall
FIGURE IT OUT YET? DEMOCRATS DONT WANT BORDERS & DONT WANT VOTER ID!!! THEY SOLD AMERICANS & YOUR FUTURE OUT!  Come on Patriots! Show your support! Give what you can every payday! Patriots never quit defending the homeland EVER🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸❤️❤️❤️ https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
FIGURE IT OUT YET? DEMOCRATS DONT WANT BORDERS & DONT WANT VOTER ID!!! THEY SOLD AMERICANS & YOUR FUTURE OUT!  Come on Patriots! Show your support! Give what you can every payday! Patriots never quit defending the homeland EVER🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸❤️❤️❤️ https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Mr.  President Donald J. Trump please take note. Dale Jelinek said and I agree 100%.    "Trump/Sarah Sanders should have a sign always at hand that reads something like:  "For the xxth day in a row, the White House invited Chuck Schumer and Nancy Pelosi to a working lunch today to discuss the border security and government shutdown. They once again refused to attend. The invitation was extended to lunch tomorrow as well." The daily press briefing should start and end with that message. Mr. President Donald J. Trump  should say it whenever a microphone is shoved in his face.  For myself Mr. President Donald J. Trump, I stand behind you 100%. The Union should be standing behind their workers with a fund for strikes shutdowns etc.  It's not like this issue isn't threatened 2x a year every year for the last 22 years.  If they don't have catastrophic events coverage for their members they are not protecting their members in the spirit of what a union is supposed to be for.
Greatest President ever!  Has corrected much of what “The Incompetent Bower in Chief“ did to destroy this country!  Brought us back from the brink of destruction!  The little ignorant communist trolls don’t believe that because their tiny robotic minds are incapable of handling the truth!  God Bless President Trump!!  America First!!  Build The Wall!!  🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Greatest President ever!  Has corrected much of what “The Incompetent Bower in Chief“ did to destroy this country!  Brought us back from the brink of destruction!  The little ignorant communist trolls don’t believe that because their tiny robotic minds are incapable of handling the truth!  God Bless President Trump!!  America First!!  Build The Wall!!  🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Every Custodian of a Country should have to say this confirmation to his Countrymen, I see nothing wrong with His Excellency President Trump here. Well done.
I appreciate your defending us.   We’re up against people who actually want us to cease to be a nation.  They refer to us as “nationalists”, using the term (which I consider to be patriotic) disparagingly.   They loved Barack Hussein Obama — he was a citizen of the world who bowed before Arab princes.  These people are our enemies.
President Trump: please move the SOTU speech.  Nothing says you have to give it in the House.  Nancy Peloso looks foolish!!
President Trump: please move the SOTU speech.  Nothing says you have to give it in the House.  Nancy Peloso looks foolish!!
As an African and living in Africa, I think The President is 100% right in building a wall. Protecting your country  is your duty sir. All those fighting to enter USA illegally should return and work for the betterment of their countries.  I have only one plea from you sir, Help us institute good governance in Africa. That way Africans will not be trying to enter USA or any other country illegally.  Courage and Bravoooo
Why is trump's support mostly from the uneducated ? For those that support him I'd guess you have no idea.
Why is trump's support mostly from the uneducated ? For those that support him I'd guess you have no idea.
you to https://www.cnn.com/2019/01/17/politics/trump-team-prepares-response-mueller-report/index.html.
Indeed!!!! God bless and keep you Mr.president. Thank you!!!!
Trump, just saw released photos of various slat wall designs you've supported where the we're defeated with saws...  Middles of the fences just missing?   Why are you suppressing these failures and still promoting this failed technology that now has been shown not to work?  Is this yet another Trump Inc deal with some builders?
"There is nothing manufactured about children arriving at our borders dehydrated and sick. There is nothing manufactured about migrants being exploited and abused by human traffickers. There is nothing manufactured about lethal drugs pouring across our border." ~Sec Nielson WOW
if we cease to be a nation then there is a world full of rogue soldiers
ISIS is not coming through the southern border... they are attempting to FLY in... Let's build a ceiling !
🇱🇷❤️'s  President Donald J. Trump  Thank you for all you do!
If that dip sh*t Pelosi & her caucus are so worried about people not being paid, she would park her Liberal a** in a chair in a meeting with the President ready to compromise. The reality is she does NOT care. She ONLY cares about making sure President Trump doesn’t fulfill his promises to Americans. 😡  It’s time President Trump had a ‘Come to Jesus Meeting’ with Pelosi & Schumer to remind them of their job descriptions & remind them who is the President of the United States of America. Those two dingle berries have forgotten their place! 😡
Obama gives 150 billion $$$'s to IRAN and President Trump cannot even secure 5.7 billion $$$'s for the WALL/FENCE/BOLLARD - what is wrong with this picture?????  GO PRESIDENT TRUMP and stop NANCY and CHUCKIE.   🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Please end the shut down... Put more energy into the these 800,000+ Americans that need you to end this so they can work... This is detrimental for our economy and our lively hood... that's  almost 1 million people out of jobs, that's not what you promised, please put your pride away and do the right thing by us...that's almost 6 billion we could use for so much more for our country , that is more important than a wall
Bull as president you seem to only be interested in making money for yourself and to hell with the people who pay your salary
What a great gift it is to finally have a president who believes his most sacred duty as President of the US is to defend and protect America! #KAG! Behind you 10,000% #BuildThatWall
Cannot do it  money comes from congress. He is a multi billionaire. If he wants it that bad, pay for it, with his own money.
Dr. T.D. Tommy,"Much of the aerial perspective is a system that it is a place." go.nasa.gov
You are a Russian operative!  The KGB said it would destroy the USA from the inside and you're how they're doing it!
Oh lovely,lam happy to hear this powerful comments by USA action president trump,sir,truly you are dependable,and can be trusted.
AMEN. Thank  you  for  all  that  you  do  President  Trump!  :-) USAF  Vet.  -  Georgia
AMEN. Thank  you  for  all  that  you  do  President  Trump!  :-) USAF  Vet.  -  Georgia
No reason we can't build our Wall, continue supporting our Kurdish allies in the Middle East, And investigate Nancy Pelosi (treason?) on why she would rather shut down our government than spend just 5 billion on Border Security!!
R.I.P. United States of America!!! You raised the cost of living so high that both parents are always at work, rather than spending time with their children (single parents stand no chance). You took God out of schools. Parents were told 'No you can't discipline your kids'. Well, America, our kids are disrespectful. You shall reap what you sow, and we have lost a whole generation and turned them into rude, selfish, brats who have no respect for people, property or authority! You deemed people with terminal illnesses and some with only a few months to live…fit for work!!! You allow our veterans of war to go homeless and hungry but give out millions to foreign aid!!! You save drug addicts over and over again but refuse to give free diabetic supplies. You bend over backwards to be politically correct, too scared to say enough is enough, in case you offend. You put the retirement age up so people must work until they drop!! People depend on handouts and food banks, while we give aid to others who can work for it. Our retired generation rely on inadequate state pensions, their thanks for working hard. Things need to change!
Real terrorist is not the Latino look at 9/11 who was the real terrorist Islamics and now when have one in the white house who is destroying our rights our families he cuts out free lunch and now food stamps for what a wall that's why we have brothers and sisters in arms
Right  so  are  you  going  to  build  a  wall  on  our  northern  border  ?  Or  just  a  border  between  us  and  the  brown  people  ?
trumpneill spend his life giving rallies telling everyone the USA is going down the rabbit hole cause hole cause  he is no  longer prez .
But we're not being attacked. Mexico and Canada are our allies, in spite of your many attempts to antagonize them. They have not declared war on us.  If you want to spend billions on defending our nation, spend it on effective, evidence-based ways to treat drug addiction. Spend it on mitigating and adapting to climate change.
If you don’t pay your employees you cease being human.
So proud of our Great President. Thank you President Trump for everything you are doing. TRUMP 2020.
So proud of our Great President. Thank you President Trump for everything you are doing. TRUMP 2020.
If all presidents were that way over the years we would have had that wall long ago, both parties have been kicking the can down the road until now, Build the wall and about 3 days after it's started hold a news conference to announce it and stop the shutdown and put those people back to work. Blame it all on the Democrats for all the stalling and costs to the taxpayers, it's a win win for you on both points.
If all presidents were that way over the years we would have had that wall long ago, both parties have been kicking the can down the road until now, Build the wall and about 3 days after it's started hold a news conference to announce it and stop the shutdown and put those people back to work. Blame it all on the Democrats for all the stalling and costs to the taxpayers, it's a win win for you on both points.
BREAKING: Former Trump lawyer Michael Cohen asserts that he paid a tech firm to rig online polls in Trump's favor during the 2016 campaign "at the direction of and the sole benefit of" Trump.  It's clear that Trump and his cronies will go to extreme lengths to undermine our elections and bury the truth.
You must give your state of the union address at the capitol. Nancy House Speaker Nancy Pelosi is freaking out to the fact that she will get embarrassed on national TV at the biggest stage. Time for payback.
You must give your state of the union address at the capitol. Nancy House Speaker Nancy Pelosi is freaking out to the fact that she will get embarrassed on national TV at the biggest stage. Time for payback.
"Donald Trump asked Cohen to lie about the Trump Tower Moscow deal, then he assertively and repeatedly lied about it to the American people.   And Mueller has documentation proving it."
"Donald Trump asked Cohen to lie about the Trump Tower Moscow deal, then he assertively and repeatedly lied about it to the American people.   And Mueller has documentation proving it."
Cure For PTSD  Rub dab of coconut oil on  2 inch circle  Top of brain stem on back of head  NOW Rub rice size dosage of RSO into circle  ✌️☮️✌️☮️✌️
your ego is in the way of doing what is right for the country. I will be glad when the republicans grow a pair and do what they know is right SHUT YOU DOWN ! what a waste of space and air
This will be Trump's biggest problem. He is demonizing Democrats, but since the House now has a Democratic majority, he can't get a single bill passed if he can't get any Democrats to vote with him.
Wake up people. The wall between the left and the right in Washington DC is probably the most impermeable wall ever constructed it's not a physical wall but it's definitely an impermeable wall.
Wake up people. The wall between the left and the right in Washington DC is probably the most impermeable wall ever constructed it's not a physical wall but it's definitely an impermeable wall.
I would love to see a "fireside chat" on TV, with only the American people. No press, no Congress and definitely no papers sent to Pelosi ahead of time.
we all know Chucks Anal dildo collection says "made in Mexico" .
A Trump government shutdown should NEVER be used as a negotiation.
I certainly want to hear the State of the Union Address, so don’t let Pelosi intimidate you, and deny this to the Patriots of the USA.
I just read these pro trump comments and it really is just amazing, hook  line  and sinker
If only the Dems would admit the truth about border security.
use El Chapo's $ to build the Wall
STAND YOUR GROUND! BUILD THE WALL! SCREW THE DEMS! CALL FOR A NATIONAL SECURITY EMERGENCY NOW!
2nd - doing something with the people who call you names-- 2020
No. Protect, defend, and uphold the CONSTITUTION is your highest priority.
Now it is “ no wall no country”  Dictator 101  Egomaniac 101  pick your poison
Now it is “ no wall no country”  Dictator 101  Egomaniac 101  pick your poison
Donald J. Trump during the campaign you said the eight years assault on the Second Amendment was over. And then you nominate William Barr for AG. If confirmed I WILL NOT VOTE FOR YOU next election. You lied to us.
Donald J. Trump during the campaign you said the eight years assault on the Second Amendment was over. And then you nominate William Barr for AG. If confirmed I WILL NOT VOTE FOR YOU next election. You lied to us.
And fix the voting system. Or all is lost by democrat socialists & Soros cheating.
When have we stopped defended our borders. Maybe when you closed the government?  Are you trying to create a problem so you can justify the wall.
Please keep America Shutdown! More Federal Employees hating you 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂❤️
Please keep America Shutdown! More Federal Employees hating you 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂❤️
Amen! Keep Standing Your Ground! So proud of you President Trump!
Stop congresses pay they will be willing to come to an agreement than!  Stand strong president Trump!  Just reopen the rest of government like they want and shut down congress! They will stop fighting you than!  You’ve done what they want by opening up the govt but until they can act like adults they get no pay!  Problem solved!  If they all quit than swamp is clean!
YOU'RE RIGHT AS USUAL PRESIDENT TRUMP
makes sense. when you put up the wall put pelosi on the other side of it. thanks in advance.
Since you stole the Presidency that’s when the US ceased to be a nation !!! Get it !!!
If we dont defend our democracy, we end up with a white nationalist dictator like you. RESIGN-do it now, get yr pardon and GET OUT of the people's house!!
Pelosi tells the President he shouldn't come to what the Constitution tells him to do. When actually, she is coming to HIS address.   He has Constitutional Authority to CONVENE one or both Houses. That's what he's doing. He's not going to THEIR event, they're coming to his.  That's funny.  Article 2 Section 3 of the U.S. Constitution (Presidential Powers, "He" being the President): (Note: He can adjourn THEM for as long as He wants)  ***** He shall from time to time give to the Congress Information of the State of the Union,*****   and recommend to their Consideration   ***** such Measures as he shall judge necessary and expedient; *****   ***** he may, on extraordinary Occasions, convene both Houses, or either of them, and in Case of Disagreement between them, *****   with Respect to the Time of Adjournment,  *****  he may adjourn them to such Time as he shall think proper; *****  he shall receive Ambassadors and other public Ministers; he shall take Care that the Laws be faithfully executed, and shall Commission all the Officers of the United States.
Pelosi tells the President he shouldn't come to what the Constitution tells him to do. When actually, she is coming to HIS address.   He has Constitutional Authority to CONVENE one or both Houses. That's what he's doing. He's not going to THEIR event, they're coming to his.  That's funny.  Article 2 Section 3 of the U.S. Constitution (Presidential Powers, "He" being the President): (Note: He can adjourn THEM for as long as He wants)  ***** He shall from time to time give to the Congress Information of the State of the Union,*****   and recommend to their Consideration   ***** such Measures as he shall judge necessary and expedient; *****   ***** he may, on extraordinary Occasions, convene both Houses, or either of them, and in Case of Disagreement between them, *****   with Respect to the Time of Adjournment,  *****  he may adjourn them to such Time as he shall think proper; *****  he shall receive Ambassadors and other public Ministers; he shall take Care that the Laws be faithfully executed, and shall Commission all the Officers of the United States.
Some Suggest, Shutting Down the Legilatures funding.  Unfortunately Trump signed a bill to fund the Legislature before the shutdown.  Legislators have the power to get things passed even if the President Veto's it.  Regular government workers have no such power.  All Trump asked is that Congress send him a package that includes $5 Billion for a Wall for Our Border Security and he will sign it, and the DEMS refuse.
DISGUSTING - MORE GOP LIES Thousands More Migrant Children Likely Taken From Families Than First Reported  https://www.nytimes.com/2019/01/17/us/migrant-children-inspector-general-family-separation.html?emc=edit_na_20190117&nl=breaking-news&nlid=53388860ing-news&ref=cta&fbclid=IwAR1mviIZgwrvygJMSq3rrn_7Q9_FSB85QMZBjSZfM98gWpOBtMuuDH406sY
if so,why are your people in foreign countries...Afganistan,Sirija....and  are conducting violence and crime,especially drugs which they bring to U.S.A
Cam Fedun Senior next election Northern friend...I hope your Country gets away from the liberal agenda happening currently. You guys need someone like Trump. He is a fighter, but the liberal agenda is thick here...its very irritating to say the least 🙄
Canada supports and needs your help President Trump
Canada supports and needs your help President Trump
Isn't idiot your nickname prsdnt? 😂😂
Dont back down. Declare a national emergency,  and do the job the unamerican democrats wont do. They should be the ones NOT GETTING PAID during a shutdown.
INVITE A FEDERAL WORKER OVER FOR DINNER~  Trump is telling people who live paycheck to paycheck to "make adjustments" to live with no pay because he wants a wall.  You can’t adjust what you don’t have. One of the only good things to come out of this shutdown is that Trump is showing how out of touch and indifferent he is to the lives of ordinary people.
MR. A GREAT GENIUS PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP ALL COME TO THE TABLE LET ALL  SHARE THERE DESIGNED IDEAS ON HOW TO BUILD THE UNIQUE SPECIAL MONUMENT BORDER WALL. MAKE SURE IT GOES IN THE WORLD GUINNESS BOOKS  RECORD FOR ITS UNIQUENESS ECT. WE'RE WAY OVERDUE FOR ONE MORE WONDER . REMEMBER THE SEVEN WONDERS OF THE WORLD. DESIGN THE MONUMENT BORDER WALL WITH ALOT OF LOVE. BUILT THE MONUMENT BORDER WALL TO BECOME THE 8TH WONDERS OF THE WORLD !!!
I've just realised. President Trump could apologise for all the things he's ever done "wrong" in the eyes of the left, post it on Facebook and people would still react with that laughing emoji
Tell the Democrats the Russian issue is a "manufactured crisis". And they come right Back at ya with "several thousand people invading our country is a manufactured Crisis."   Reminds me of childhood games.   "I am rubber.  You're glue.  Whatever you say sticks to you."   God, give me strength. And this is our government?
fb://nt_screen/FB-SCREEN-FB?a=%7B%22analytics_module%22%3A%22charitable_giving%22%2C%22title%22%3A%22Fundraisers%22%2C%22hide-search-field%22%3Atrue%2C%22pull-to-refresh-enabled%22%3Atrue%2C%22custom-story-render-location%22%3A%22fundraiser_page%22%7D&p=%2Ffundraiser%2F&q=%7B%22fundraiser_campaign_id%22%3A396590294410571%2C%22post_id%22%3A396599124409688%7D&b=%5B%5D
If Americans can't defend themselves in their homes our borders won't matter! In 2016 you pledged to defend the 2A and now support Red Flag laws and an anti-gun AG! We'll remember this in 2020! #CONVENTIONOFSTATES
Peter Arnold  You r jeolous you don't have the ability that are Great President Trump has! Too,too bad! Keep pushing the Mc Donalds burgers and fries!
Your highest and most important duty? How about right after your first priority of fleecing anyone and everyone of every last dollar you can? They don’t call you Don the Con in Manhattan for nothing Mr. President.
We will cease to be a nation the longer putin controls you.  Right now putin is in charge of our nation thanks to you,, traitor.....
In all reality it should be all the crime happening in the United States you’re worried about stuff that hasn’t even happened yet
President Trump GOD is with you and so are the American people.  Praying for you, your family, staff, and the American people.
Yes sir it is! Thank you so much for putting our country & the safety of American citizens first! Also, thank you for taking the time to meet with all the Angel moms who have PERMANENTLY been separated from their children and not ignoring or hiding from them like Nancy Pelosi did! God bless you sir for keeping your campaign promises and for standing firm on doing what is right! I know its been hard with the Democrats constantly opposing everything you work so hard to achieve for us, but God is with you! He sees it all, the way they treat you and how the MSM constantly lies and deceives! Many Americans are on your side as well and so many of us keep you, your beautiful family, and all those who are working for the good of this nation in our prayers! You are truly the peoples President!! We love you President Trump!! Keep fighting the good fight! #Trump2020Landslide 🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸
Donnie  does that  include  our  northern  border  or  just  the  one  where  the  brown  people live  ?
Former Trump lawyer Michael Cohen asserts that that he paid a small tech firm to rig online polls before the 2016 presidential campaign "at the direction of and the sole benefit of" Donald Trump. https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/politics-news/michael-cohen-says-he-paid-tech-firm-rig-online-polls-n959746
Former Trump lawyer Michael Cohen asserts that that he paid a small tech firm to rig online polls before the 2016 presidential campaign "at the direction of and the sole benefit of" Donald Trump. https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/politics-news/michael-cohen-says-he-paid-tech-firm-rig-online-polls-n959746
Trump And Pence till 2032. That should do it. MAGA
Trump And Pence till 2032. That should do it. MAGA
Start demanding equality .. Civil right of people give identies back to the people .. Stand up for people . every thing I have said spoke stated I have personal experiences in this ....people want justice for all .. Kids that are molested in foster care .. Human trafficking that occurs in our system . when reported nothing done just like someone using ur number and it being reported nothing done all the proof is there .....
WRONG!  “Defend and uphold the CONSTITUTION OF THE UNITED STATES”, ya dummy.
WRONG!  “Defend and uphold the CONSTITUTION OF THE UNITED STATES”, ya dummy.
If we don't get rid of Trump, we cease to be taken seriously as a nation.
If we don’t take care of our veterans who is going to protect the nation?   Why don’t you fix that first instead of a wall the majority don’t want.
If you'll kindly stop spewing these chaotic defecations of reality about the border from your grass hut skull we can get to the higher priority of protecting our constitution from you,  Mr. Russian Asset.
These are looking more and more like dictator propaganda posters. I’m totally out of this mess in 2020. This is why the GOP, and America is losing.
Build a solid wall with electrifying razor wire on both sides all the way to the top.  The piece of crap that's there now is a joke.  I could climb over that
It amazes me how democrats are so unwilling to see any good in Trump even when he mimics all their favorites from the recent past. Some who want to run for President against him are truly dangerous. Beto wants to eliminate the constitution and others are willing to institute sharia law
Obvious you don’t care about people not getting paid  It’s all about you Donny
If Americans of all "democrat" don't respect their own country, they can't demand respect from others!!!
Cindy Sue no illegal immigrants do not get social security. Your so clueless! They pay their bills, they buy things, they work, they eat.  Just how do you think anyone that lives in America gets out of all taxes, work, and bills?   https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/fact-checker/wp/2016/08/20/trumps-false-claim-that-undocumented-immigrants-collect-social-security-benefits/?utm_term=.b87654fbfa1b
Fyi they take care of themselves for the most part. They work and pay over 300 billion in taxes.   http://immigrationimpact.com/2018/04/16/undocumented-immigrants-pay-taxes/
Cindy Sue they don't care. They will argue to a brick wall that anchor babies (15k plus if tax payer pays for birth) free healthcare (worth $400+ a mo.), Gov assistance (welfare $300+ per family member a mo.), public schools (7k plus a year per child) doesn't cost us that much.  Over 200 billion a year is just to far fetched...rrrrright.
Cindy Sue wrong about 11,000,000 illegal immigrants are currently in America only about 55% are Mexican but chump wont tell you that. Chump does not mention any illegal immigrants that have white skin.
Jason Erhardt is that a CNN poll/stat 😂
Jason Erhardt is that a CNN poll/stat 😂
Let me put it into numbers you might be able to understand. Chump supporters equal about 1/3 of the voters 63,000,000 about 35% of those supporters want a wall about 22,000,000. All voters equal roughly 235,000,000. Now that means about 9.5% of the voters want a wall. No you dont have the people behind you.
Let me put it into numbers you might be able to understand. Chump supporters equal about 1/3 of the voters 63,000,000 about 35% of those supporters want a wall about 22,000,000. All voters equal roughly 235,000,000. Now that means about 9.5% of the voters want a wall. No you dont have the people behind you.
Dear Mr. President…please bring all of the Angel Families to the State of the Union address. Tell each individual story of horror, sadness and loss of a loved one. Go into detail. Then have the family stand holding the picture. When you are done with all the families, share all of the staggering facts you were told by border security agents. Crossings of people from countries other than Central America, Gang members, drug seizures, deaths from overdose; go into detail because most Americans are not aware of the true numbers. Then ask “if what I just said is true will are brave border patrol officers please stand to affirm those numbers as accurate”. Then on National TV declare the National Emergency and build the damn WALL. We are behind you 110%. Thank You for saving our country and trying to repair the devastating intentional damage caused by the previous administration. God Bless you and your entire family.
National Emergency do it and stop talking about it..they will not budge so do what has to be done Mr. President.
We are not a nation now. We are a crybaby country.
We stand behind you Mr. President! Nobody believes the media! They had to edit Nancy’s videos to show her not stuttering after you backhanded her yesterday. Dems are cracking, now ask for 10 billion!!
We stand behind you Mr. President! Nobody believes the media! They had to edit Nancy’s videos to show her not stuttering after you backhanded her yesterday. Dems are cracking, now ask for 10 billion!!
God Bless you President Trump!  2020🇺🇸 🇺🇸 🇺🇸
God Bless you President Trump!  2020🇺🇸 🇺🇸 🇺🇸
America coude do much better it coude be a country of biggest oportunities its nation coude do much better but America has been supporting to everyone around to millions of emigrants and many of them came to US just to live on peoples taxes Trump is the one who wants to stop this ! all he wants is to see his country grate !
Exactly what the socialist commies want an globalist open borders society, well except for the rest of the nations. It only applies to us!
You’re working for Putin and yourself, you don’t care about America. Resign, traitor.
trump is not a president he is a dictator wannabe, and is so uneducated he cannot see that a wall is obsolete, and  technology is the answer.
Hold your ground! These traitors want another 20 million that we all end up paying for!!!
Trump is building a sheep coral to keep you all safe or the coyotes will get you BUILD THE WALL
Every United States President and presidential candidate for the last 30+ years has made the same statement... “We have a border crisis”.   Now, President Trump not only makes that statement, but tries to actually do something about it, and the democrats and media claim that he “invented the crisis”.    BUILD THE WALL!!
Every United States President and presidential candidate for the last 30+ years has made the same statement... “We have a border crisis”.   Now, President Trump not only makes that statement, but tries to actually do something about it, and the democrats and media claim that he “invented the crisis”.    BUILD THE WALL!!
Do Not go for the 3 week open for a possible talk on some kind of border resolution. The Dems are Liars and do not go for it.
the LIAR in chief is at it again! he does NOT want a secure border. he is using this to stoke his base and shutting down the government shows how little he care about our citizens! there are hundreds of thousands of federal employees and millions of people in the HUD program that are suffering because of dumbass donnies stand. people are choosing prescriptions or food to survive and he does NOT care one little bit about their troubles. he has NO compassion or empathy for anyone.
the LIAR in chief is at it again! he does NOT want a secure border. he is using this to stoke his base and shutting down the government shows how little he care about our citizens! there are hundreds of thousands of federal employees and millions of people in the HUD program that are suffering because of dumbass donnies stand. people are choosing prescriptions or food to survive and he does NOT care one little bit about their troubles. he has NO compassion or empathy for anyone.
No she-it? No wall equals no nation? What is it, you got a team of monkeys thinking of these slogans?
Trump is making America crazy!...not great again!! Am I the only one who can see that!!
Helen Stein didn't hear of Clinton or Obama serving in the military either.
I guess that is why you are a draft dodger! How are those Bone Spurs? ROFL!
I guess that is why you are a draft dodger! How are those Bone Spurs? ROFL!
yall not understand a wall thats trying to keep us in he dont care about yall and you voted for this bum this guy that basically gonna put us back into depression he not making america great he making america broke n depressed
No, you made making us the puppets of the Russians your highest priority, over covering your sexual indiscretions.  https://www.buzzfeednews.com/article/jasonleopold/trump-russia-cohen-moscow-tower-mueller-investigation?ref=hpsplash
His oath with GOD & You try to all Americans legally.
But what we really need is protection from the likes of you people.
OPEN THE GOV YOU RUSSIAN SPY‼️
Own it Trumpers.You got scammed by a New York con artist indebted to Putin and his fellow oligarchs. Don't let his shutdown distract you from his imminent impeachment proceedings.
No, appears your highest priority is getting your way.
You’re FOS and here’s why From total defeat to miracle comeback in less than 30 days!!!  Trump Today: President declares ISIS defeated in Syria as he relents on border wall By Robert Schroeder Published: Dec 19, 2018 2:34 p.m.  ISIS Attack in Syria Kills 4 Americans, Raising New Worries About Troop Withdrawal By Eric Schmitt, Ben Hubbard and Rukmini Callimachi * Jan. 16, 2019  Pence says ISIS is 'defeated,' hours after attack in Syria By Dave Boyer - The Washington Times - Wednesday, January 16, 2019 “Vice President Mike Pence said Wednesday that the Islamic State “has been defeated,” hours after U.S. soldiers were killed in Syria in attack for which the terror organization claimed responsibility. “The caliphate has crumbled and [the Islamic State] has been defeated,” Mr. Pence said in an address to the Global Chiefs of Mission conference at the State Department.”
interesting that Trumps thinks of visiting troops is always a PR stunt. Very insulting to the troops.
interesting that Trumps thinks of visiting troops is always a PR stunt. Very insulting to the troops.
Thank you Mr. President for standing up to evil giants in our government! I pray God bless you and help you and protect you! You stand for the Americans that voted for you! Thank you! #POTUS #TRUMP #USSS Can you please show Him my comment 🙏
GO TRUMP JUST LOOK AT THESE TRUMPED COWARDS.. MAGA!
You ARE the man, Sir!
Your highest and most important duty is to protect and defend the Constitution. That was the oath you took when you were sworn in. But you have never been good at keeping oaths, have you?
In my itchy bitchy teeny winnie polka dot opinion, President Trump should give the Executive Order to Nancy Pelosi, Schumer, and all democrat and republican politicians to work WTIHOUT PAY during this Partial Government Shut Down Period......To use their pay to pay all 800,000 federal employees working during such period. Furthermore, No back pay must be pay for them!
and our voting machines, and  the fake charities everyone has for  pay to  play... and the blackmailing of  politicians and judges, and stopping child trafficking (thank you Mr. President for that!), and stopping the  corruption of our intelligence agencies and  subversion of  Five Eyes, and  going after the  Rogue CIA and  unfair targeting of IRS and well , all the evil in Washington!
Why didn't tRump do something about it when he had the House & Senate behind him for over two years???   Why has his ridiculous wall suddenly become a crisis perpetrated by Democrats???  Why isn't Mexico paying for it like HE promised they would???
I feel sorry for trumpsters they are like a battered women They never want to believe the truth . Every bruise and black covered up. They continue to lie to cover his crimes. As  the  walls close in on individual one which slide of history will you be you be on ? Im guessing there will be alot of you feeling like fools when it all goes down. Trump=treason
The Dems opposing him need to be rounded imprisoned and/or executed.  They are treasonous and it's time to put an end to them.
STFU!! Stay in your country you fake snowflake......
What about banning guns from your country so your children and other children will have a safe country to live in
Loved you in Family Guy.
Cohen is gonna make Dumpster fall to his flabby orange knees. Hang on.
And stop all payment to all Democrats while they are on strike in a government shutdown if our men and women who are defending our country are not getting paid then those worthless pieces of garbage should not get paid either
Defense of our nation is most important?? 5 TIMES! Not 1 but 5 times you used your privilege to dodge the draft. Sit your orange ass down n stfu.
your  in to make money dam cheater crook.
You are right Mr. Trump
Why Walls are good for immigration:  https://piusarinzehas.blogspot.com/2019/01/walls-have-gates.html?m=1
Stay strong mr. President hundred million Americans are behind you
My Album support of: @FBI @WhiteHouse @FLOTUS @theresa_may @AbeShinzo @ecoyuri @realDonaldTrump YouTube, Billboard,@Twitter @instagram @Spotify @SoundCloud ,@PaulMcCartney , @ladygaga ,@StellaMcCartney,, @BBCWorld @RyanAFournier @SaraCarterDC http://www.kurrentmusic.com/artistalbum.html?artist-id=undefined&album-id=7CkonTCkstYZg2fOWpFyrS&artist-name=undefined&artist-album=Strictly+Rhythm+House+Space
Trump said when he gets into office he will get rid of all the lazy people referring to those on government assistance! Schools are running out of funding which means lunches. SNAP is releasing the last of it’s funds the 19th, after that no more funds. Commods will be done as well. Housing developments aren’t funded so people who are on housing and HUD will be evicted due to non-payment. Prisons aren’t getting food. Not to mention nobody will get PELL right away which means a lot of families will go without. Farmers are seeing an effect by not being able to pay their bills. Medicaid/IHS will be limited as they will use the resources they have.. Families will go hungry enough to start robbing food and riots will start breaking out! Crime rates are going to increase too. All thanks to those of you who voted for Trump! 🤡 Pat yourself on the back... real proud of your President ain’t cha! I’m waiting for the simpsons episode to come true! I’m ready for impeachment!
If we don't pay our employees and contractors, we're Donald Trump, the businessman.
If we don't pay our employees and contractors, we're Donald Trump, the businessman.
Donald J. Trump during the campaign you said the eight years assault on the Second Amendment was over. And then you nominate William Barr for AG. If confirmed I WILL NOT VOTE FOR YOU next election. You lied to us.
Donald J. Trump during the campaign you said the eight years assault on the Second Amendment was over. And then you nominate William Barr for AG. If confirmed I WILL NOT VOTE FOR YOU next election. You lied to us.
May God send Trump back to the hell he crept out of!!!  MAKE AMERICA SANE AGAIN  #MASA
The south shall rise again
You don't want to defend America , you want to defend your Ego !!
You don't want to defend America , you want to defend your Ego !!
No. The arresting and prosecution of judges and other officials that commit and enable these crimes by repetitively refusing to enforce the law is what should be you priority to "keep us safe". However, you and EVERY elected official REFUSES to do so in spite of our continued peaceful requests to do so.  Therefore, We the People hereby declare a vote of NO CONFIDENCE for the ENTIRE United States Government, including the states and local government entities.
So you support russia and a traitor now. Good luck a-holes.
I’m giving you a FINAL WARNING https://youtu.be/ToOFtvvFGGo
I little bit mistake it was
We love you POTUS! Glad to see you put an end to Nancy Pelosi's Vacations. She should be worried about Americans and our safety. She is selfish and careless with American lives. You postponing her trip 30 minutes to take off is Priceless. President Trump - you are as my kids would say - Savage af. Thank you sir, you made our day.
I feel you about the wall if they dont want to help you when they seek your help veto everything and show them how it feels but please this government shut is hurting millions and no one seems to care. So when they call upon you for something give them a whole cup of veto juice Obama did in till he got what he wanted .
I feel you about the wall if they dont want to help you when they seek your help veto everything and show them how it feels but please this government shut is hurting millions and no one seems to care. So when they call upon you for something give them a whole cup of veto juice Obama did in till he got what he wanted .
House Republicans introduced a bill last Wednesday that offers to pay federal employees who work during the government shutdown. As the government is in a partial shutdown, five Republican lawmakers, Ohio Rep. Bob Gibbs, North Carolina Rep. Mark Meadows, Indiana Rep. Susan Brooks, Colorado Rep. Scott Tipton and Virginia Rep. Morgan Griffith, introduced legislation that would require federal workers be paid during the partial shutdown. “While Democrats continue to play politics with border security, federal employees dedicated to their mission of keeping America safe and our border secure are still going to work knowing they will be missing their paychecks,” Gibbs said in a Wednesday statement. Gibbs blasted Democrats for the shutdown in the statement, saying they are the reason federal workers are not being paid: They should not be caught in the middle of political ploys by politicians who are not serious about securing our border.  If they are working to protect America and the lives of our citizens, they should be getting their paychecks on time.  We shouldn’t be forcing these men and women to shoulder the burden of Democrats’ unwillingness to work with President Trump and Congressional Republicans to solve the humanitarian and security crisis on our Southern Border.  Mr. President, please approve this bill as Federal and necessary people are working without pay!  They need to pay their bills and put food on the table. You can't make them suffer during the shutdown!  If this bill is passed, these people can get paid and you can still have a Government shutdown to accomplish getting the wall built.
House Republicans introduced a bill last Wednesday that offers to pay federal employees who work during the government shutdown. As the government is in a partial shutdown, five Republican lawmakers, Ohio Rep. Bob Gibbs, North Carolina Rep. Mark Meadows, Indiana Rep. Susan Brooks, Colorado Rep. Scott Tipton and Virginia Rep. Morgan Griffith, introduced legislation that would require federal workers be paid during the partial shutdown. “While Democrats continue to play politics with border security, federal employees dedicated to their mission of keeping America safe and our border secure are still going to work knowing they will be missing their paychecks,” Gibbs said in a Wednesday statement. Gibbs blasted Democrats for the shutdown in the statement, saying they are the reason federal workers are not being paid: They should not be caught in the middle of political ploys by politicians who are not serious about securing our border.  If they are working to protect America and the lives of our citizens, they should be getting their paychecks on time.  We shouldn’t be forcing these men and women to shoulder the burden of Democrats’ unwillingness to work with President Trump and Congressional Republicans to solve the humanitarian and security crisis on our Southern Border.  Mr. President, please approve this bill as Federal and necessary people are working without pay!  They need to pay their bills and put food on the table. You can't make them suffer during the shutdown!  If this bill is passed, these people can get paid and you can still have a Government shutdown to accomplish getting the wall built.
Imagine if Trump fined everyone who didn't want the wall. Kinda like Obama did with Obamacare.
Stop it with the 🐎 💩 and open the government
Trump is a fighter and he will win no matter what the cost is or who it affects just so he can get his TAX BREAKS, oh sorry WALL
Jason Martinez your ass should be put on a bus back south
Lil Donny, your at a point where you are losing biggly! Good luck with that wall idea of yours. 🤗🤩🍾🥂 Also I agree, his address should first be put on paper.
Its obvious what the dems are doing, I'm quite tired of the BS, its time to take back America!! Who knew it was our own holding America back. Truly a sad sad time in life. Glad to know who our enemies really are.
It is the responsibility of the Commander in Chief to protect our National security against all foreign and domestic threats.   Pelosi is a domestic threat.   President Regan spoke to America for 4 min. from the Oval Office after the Space Shuttle Challenger disaster in place of giving the SOTU address.  President Trump, if necessary, ought to speak of our National Security Emergency also from the Oval office and forgo addressing Congress, and ridiculous Pelosi's antics.
All CODEL Postponed....  This is a Great Opportunity for Mrs. Pelosi and President Trump and other's to get together and take care of the situation at hand in regards to the 800, 000 American Citizens and our Security at Our Border.  Get to the compramize of getting our government reopen and give our border Agent's what they need to do their job.   Country Before Party! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Pay your taxes. Don’t expect us tax payers to pay for the wall out of our money when you don’t even want to pay your taxes to cover the expense as well.
When you fail as a president, you become irrelevant
Best President Ever....We are so thankful for your leadership n that you love America n the American people so much!! Thank you President Trump n have a Blessed day!
Best President Ever....We are so thankful for your leadership n that you love America n the American people so much!! Thank you President Trump n have a Blessed day!
For two years you had both Senate and the House and you thought it best to give your top 1% a $1 trillion tax cut. And now when the House went away your pathetic drama LMAO.
Finally a PRAYING PRESIDENT... Donald Trump My President & GOD BLESS U.S.A....
Pelosi didn’t you take an oath to protect the American people (not the Mexican cartel).  I took the oath to protect and defend my country and even though our pay was delayed because the military wasn’t always given their minute raise we were still at our assigned post.  What makes you any difference?  Oh yea, you’re STILL GETTING PAID while other aren’t.  President Trump Homeland Security has support this security event.  HAIRY PELOSI YOU LIE!!!!!!Taking after your sister Hiliary.
Individual 1 trashed Comey for being a good friend of Mueller which is not true. Comey and Mueller did not socialize, they had working relationship. What is true, his AG nominee, William Barr, admitted that he has been a friend of Mueller for 30 years. #Donthecon
to protect our country
SHUTDOWN the Gov for as long as it takes Donnie..its time the corrupt anti american party to know..people can continue to live their lives without eating the poisonous cakes of lies..one does not compromise with the insanity of the corrupt globalist minions! #MAGA
There has been borders before you became President and America never ceased to be a Nation. Small hand
The democrats are no longer Americans.  They are the socialist party now that wants nothing good or safe for our country.  Declare a National Emergency at the border President Trump and continue building the people's wall.  Thank you.
The democrats are no longer Americans.  They are the socialist party now that wants nothing good or safe for our country.  Declare a National Emergency at the border President Trump and continue building the people's wall.  Thank you.
STFU!!!!!!!!!!!
STFU!!!!!!!!!!!
I stand 10.000%  Mr. DONALD TRUMP,  President of the United States of America !!!!
If we have a President who works for Putin, we cease to be an independent nation. You want to defend our nation, start with defending it against Russian influence.
If we have a President who works for Putin, we cease to be an independent nation. You want to defend our nation, start with defending it against Russian influence.
We could probably just run that goddamn tie you're wearing the length of the border and call it good.
Give them DACA, only IF they fund the wall, fix the loopholes and end Birthright Citizenship.
Now Playing Buzzfeed: Sources say Trump directed Cohen to lie to Congress  https://www.cnn.com/2019/01/17/politics/buzzfeed-trump-cohen-lie-congress-moscow/index.html
Hey Hambergerilar, I can give the State of the Union address: Some jackass is in the White House un-employing 1 Million workers. He has a few Minions, one who states: Not being able to eat or pay your bills is a vacation,” and one who won’t put it up on the Senate floor.  Our Union is being controlled by a guy who thinks it’s All About Himself—Well, It Isn’t!
Hey Hambergerilar, I can give the State of the Union address: Some jackass is in the White House un-employing 1 Million workers. He has a few Minions, one who states: Not being able to eat or pay your bills is a vacation,” and one who won’t put it up on the Senate floor.  Our Union is being controlled by a guy who thinks it’s All About Himself—Well, It Isn’t!
If you don’t get the hell outta office.  There isn’t gonna be a America or government
If we don’t build the wall it it is a open invitation to all drug dealers , human traffickers, violent gangs , diseases not to mention expense
Trump's vanity wall's primary missions are to keep his supporters happy, protecting his presidency from sliding into irrelevancy, and maintaining GOP authority, after its members have sold their souls for complicity in not speaking up against Trump's less than stellar language and behaviors.  If Trump was truly concerned about effective border security, he wouldn't have placed so much importance on a 'wall' being the centerpiece, or at least would've consulted engineers, ecologists, financial planners, and sociologists to ensure the walls/fences/barriers would be designed thoughtfully, meeting the most effectiveness possible, while limiting ecological, environmental, and financial disaster.  He's only had 3 years to do the leg work, so of course his argument is STILL based upon xenophobic hyperbole and easily disprovable misinformation.
Trump's vanity wall's primary missions are to keep his supporters happy, protecting his presidency from sliding into irrelevancy, and maintaining GOP authority, after its members have sold their souls for complicity in not speaking up against Trump's less than stellar language and behaviors.  If Trump was truly concerned about effective border security, he wouldn't have placed so much importance on a 'wall' being the centerpiece, or at least would've consulted engineers, ecologists, financial planners, and sociologists to ensure the walls/fences/barriers would be designed thoughtfully, meeting the most effectiveness possible, while limiting ecological, environmental, and financial disaster.  He's only had 3 years to do the leg work, so of course his argument is STILL based upon xenophobic hyperbole and easily disprovable misinformation.
HOW SO?
HOW SO?
You are failing us who supported you, by damaging our second amendment, if this continues I will not vote for you
Under democrat leading, we will NOT be the United States of America - we WILL be KNOWN as the Socialist States of America
Photoshopped to hell XD what a fucking joke. The slimmed him up and made his finger longer XD  https://i.redd.it/arl9gme5n1b21.gif
we have your back, because you have ours
President Trump takes a working vacation at the White House and its called a Shutdown.  Muslim Obama took a NON-WORKING vacation and its called golf. @@@
KEEP US SAFE MR.PRESIDENT TRUMP, WE THE PEOPLE VOTED YOU TO USE ALL YOUR POWERS TOWARDS KEEPING AMERICA SAFE AND SECURE AT ALL TIMES. WE WHO VOTED FOR YOU TRULY BELIEVE YOUR DOING GREAT, SO DON'T STOP, DO IT...
Trump is not a leader.  A leader is someone who unites the people and moves the agenda forward and does not place blame or excuses for the obstacles. Trump promised that Mexico would pay for the wall and now he is holding Americans as  hostages because of a promise he can't fulfill. But in reality, this wall issue, is just a distraction of the investigation of his anti-american behavior.
Trump is not a leader.  A leader is someone who unites the people and moves the agenda forward and does not place blame or excuses for the obstacles. Trump promised that Mexico would pay for the wall and now he is holding Americans as  hostages because of a promise he can't fulfill. But in reality, this wall issue, is just a distraction of the investigation of his anti-american behavior.
Mr.Pres.Trump, I think we ceased  being a nation already.....8 years of obummer.
Mr.Pres.Trump, I think we ceased  being a nation already.....8 years of obummer.
Mr President I agree with you however there are people working without pay meanwhile Congress an Senator's are still being paid so who are you out to punish the American people who voted for you I hope that isn't your intention we love the work you are doing just please don't punish us.
There is NO crisis at the border!!!!   The issue now is NOT the border, nor the stupid wall!!!!   The crisis now is this crybaby President hijacking not only our government, but almost a million of our citizens' livelihood!     #WorstPresidentEver  #Crybaby #CaresNotAboutTheCitizens
"Defense of our nation is my highest and most important duty" YEAH RIGHT  Except you dodged the draft so you couldn't defend your fellow americans in Vietnam.  Except you conspired with Russian agents to fix an american election.  Except you shut down the government, leaving airport security understaffed and cancelling safe-food inspections.  What is it you are protecting again? Other than your own tax returns and your criminal family?
President  trump I don't know you
You spelled offense wrong
Just another NOPE! You know the rest. 💩Resign💩
yes it is very important and that is why we need a President of sound mind to keep us safe, not a President who is just wanting adulation. Scary.
Why do you hate America? Its policies and rulers. is not it.
Why do you hate America? Its policies and rulers. is not it.
Dan Rather: “Here's what I wish the Democrats would say to Trump: Mr. President you can have your wall. You can get it the same way that President Obama got Obamacare; the way Lyndon Johnson got Medicare; the way Franklin Roosevelt got Social Security.  In each case the president had a project he wanted enacted; so his administration crafted a bill. That bill went to Congress where committee hearings were held; amendments were proposed; studies were conducted that tested the cost, effectiveness etc. of the proposal; testimony was held in Congress; debate ensued and if the measure had enough support, a vote was taken and the measure was passed.  That's how you legislate. It takes hard work, planning and the ability to actually negotiate. Your pet project doesn't get to leap frog over the pathway laid out by the Constitution and 250 years of precedent.  You have chosen to skip over this entire process (even when you had majorities in both Houses) and have resorted instead to taking the American public hostage in exchange for your wall.  You want a wall? Put down the gun you are holding to the head of the American people and get to work."
Dan Rather: “Here's what I wish the Democrats would say to Trump: Mr. President you can have your wall. You can get it the same way that President Obama got Obamacare; the way Lyndon Johnson got Medicare; the way Franklin Roosevelt got Social Security.  In each case the president had a project he wanted enacted; so his administration crafted a bill. That bill went to Congress where committee hearings were held; amendments were proposed; studies were conducted that tested the cost, effectiveness etc. of the proposal; testimony was held in Congress; debate ensued and if the measure had enough support, a vote was taken and the measure was passed.  That's how you legislate. It takes hard work, planning and the ability to actually negotiate. Your pet project doesn't get to leap frog over the pathway laid out by the Constitution and 250 years of precedent.  You have chosen to skip over this entire process (even when you had majorities in both Houses) and have resorted instead to taking the American public hostage in exchange for your wall.  You want a wall? Put down the gun you are holding to the head of the American people and get to work."
Stand strong President Trump. Thank you for protecting us, The left has lost their minds. How anyone can't see it this crisis @ our border is beyond me. Progressive democrats have become so out of touch with America that they have become a danger to our nation.  We are standing with you, President Donald J. Trump.  Do what you need to:   #BuildTheWall   🇺🇸#Safety 🇺🇸#Sovereignty
He’s like the sheriff of the country 👍👍
Nanzi pelosi wants to stretch the existing border fence to make it appear younger. A fence lift.
Nanzi pelosi wants to stretch the existing border fence to make it appear younger. A fence lift.
and if 800k Americans are not getting paid the heck with them right?
we are not dead more
10% TAX on all monies wired outside the USA pays for the World....Democrats know how to tax, don't they?
10% TAX on all monies wired outside the USA pays for the World....Democrats know how to tax, don't they?
So pay Border Patrol. You are the one withholding their pay. Disgraceful !
#MAGA Trump 2020
Jessica Manoo . Women’s March tomorrow. Look up locations in the city
Paul we need someone to defend us all from Trump.... he is not part of our nation. 😑
Paul we need someone to defend us all from Trump.... he is not part of our nation. 😑
Defense by shutdown- your logic is nonsense
Promises made must be kept, we are willing to shut down government for a year unless we get  the wall!
How much of a nation will be left as the poor begin to starve because food stamp benefits will stop.
God bless you president Trump
my name is Timothy Gadberry .... a 52 year old white male who was born and raised in Oklahoma city.  I am a American citizen.  I am asking if you too are American Citizens.   from what I understand, ...the Russian government have been working hard to divide the people who make up our democracy, .. claiming to be American Citizens throughout social media outlets.  the goal is to sway public opinion as well as causing division within our United population of men and women who have faith in our great democracy. are you guys American Citizens  ??
Weird, because you fucking that up really bad.
From a recently retired veteran (USArmy):  I URGE EVERYONE TO STOP VOTING FOR POLITICIANS THAT HAVE NO IDEA ABOUT NATIONAL SECURITY/FOREIGN POLICY.  THIS IS TOO RECKLESS FOR OUR COUNTRY.  PEOPLE HAVE BEEN KILLED BECAUSE OF POOR DECISIONS!!!!!!!!!!!!  ALSO, NATIONAL SECURITY AFFECTS ALL OF US.  NOT JUST WEALTHY POLITICIANS THAT WORK IN WASHINGTON D.C. AMERICA PLEASE START PAYING ATTENTION TO THE DECISIONS THAT WE ARE PURSUING ABROAD.  I KNOW THAT DOMESTIC POLICIES ARE A PRIORITY. BUT THE PRESIDENCY'S PORTFOLIO IS 50 PERCENT DOMESTIC POLICY AND 50 PERCENT FOREIGN POLICY.  PLEASE DO A BETTER JOB EVALUTING THE CANDIDATE BASED ON THEIR FOREIGN POLICY BACKGROUND AND NOT BASED ON YOUR EMOTIONS.   BY THE WAY, I AM NOT VOTING FOR A CANDIDATE THAT IS WEAK IN NATIONAL SECURITY/FOREIGN POLICY FOR #2020.  I DO NOT CARE ABOUT HOW POPULAR THE CANDIDATE IS.  NO ONE SHOULD OCCUPY THE OVAL OFFICE WITH NO FOREIGN POLICY CREDENTIALS.    AS THE COMMANDER-IN-CHIEF, YOU NEED TO KNOW ABOUT NATIONAL SECURITY/FOREIGN POLICY.    WE NEED BETTER GLOBAL LEADERSHIP.........CURRENTLY, WE LOOK STUPID ABROAD.  STOP SUPPORTING OR ENABLING (NO ACTION) RECKLESS POLICIES ABROAD.
WALL WALL WALL WALL      WALL WALL WALL  WALL WALL WALL WALL      WALL WALL WALL WALL WALL WALL WALL      WALL WALL WALL WALL WALL WALL WALL ✊✊✊✊✊✊✊✊✊
President Trump if you really care about the denfense of our nation you would open the government back up.  Our government is less secure when it is closed.  Praying for you.
And shutting the govt down for a walk doesn’t help that matter.
Oh... here's another one
Trump is doing the right thing, Build that Wall https://www.facebook.com/numbersusa/videos/1719233824799972/?hc_ref=ARRBhIU2frDYotGfNwu1g-11zy68S6vuhhNNk2StgKcsHW0NOcX4BjncGl3JyNWfLgw&__xts__%5B0%5D=68.ARCiuDeXwizm_Y3cf-pOBQ8YjzncQTYe5sHDcPIleab0R_-Ug-MbiByDpVL2fo48MjQcVJrQYnTYq5aoctQ84p4ydKQuKC-m-l8Ad28McfB0e5stZGmFBkfEMor1cclpjAjrQ1U0VTnn4GF0fuOMGuSuw9r3kq9LROm2XJIQwBpHX8geBjc38OlgDXhmsaysR7RVuuk43ulLhwhH7zqS9TS5ThxlCVrFtbYM24mrm8OrDgQhdTnudx9yh0I7fX-XNPjsL1JnVf5pDFwnrcJH3v9M01SbBfOMP1LU1cFlN48xXMs6ot8Id3cmI-TRpfCfN6HA0BcRTth8QHqinJRgMw_Ibl1iqiP_qoo1-ioOi0UPctUdqtWte3o&__tn__=FC-R
Trump is doing the right thing, Build that Wall https://www.facebook.com/numbersusa/videos/1719233824799972/?hc_ref=ARRBhIU2frDYotGfNwu1g-11zy68S6vuhhNNk2StgKcsHW0NOcX4BjncGl3JyNWfLgw&__xts__%5B0%5D=68.ARCiuDeXwizm_Y3cf-pOBQ8YjzncQTYe5sHDcPIleab0R_-Ug-MbiByDpVL2fo48MjQcVJrQYnTYq5aoctQ84p4ydKQuKC-m-l8Ad28McfB0e5stZGmFBkfEMor1cclpjAjrQ1U0VTnn4GF0fuOMGuSuw9r3kq9LROm2XJIQwBpHX8geBjc38OlgDXhmsaysR7RVuuk43ulLhwhH7zqS9TS5ThxlCVrFtbYM24mrm8OrDgQhdTnudx9yh0I7fX-XNPjsL1JnVf5pDFwnrcJH3v9M01SbBfOMP1LU1cFlN48xXMs6ot8Id3cmI-TRpfCfN6HA0BcRTth8QHqinJRgMw_Ibl1iqiP_qoo1-ioOi0UPctUdqtWte3o&__tn__=FC-R
Rigged Polls in his favor! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Rigged Polls in his favor! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Rigged Polls in his favor! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Stfu. You have done so much damage to our country we will be running you out of office asap.
Very true your Excellency Sir. Protect  United State Of America boundaries. Build the WALL
Toni Scavo Whats taking so long?
Everybody wants to defend our borders, President Doofus. We just want to be smart about it. That leaves you out.
Everybody wants to defend our borders, President Doofus. We just want to be smart about it. That leaves you out.
How much money are the cartels paying the swamp to keep the borders open ? #askingforafriend
If we won't defend ourselves, then we cease to be human. That goes for all of you who sit back and allow the corruption in the government to continue. We need a change and it's not another president we need another leader. Who can format a better system, that doesn't rely so heavily on money. Yeah that'll still be a currency, but there's so much that should be free. Instead of having to pay for food and water people could volunteer time to work. It's natural resources people grows from the ground that means it is free. Stop allowing them to charge you to live here.
I agree with you Mr. President.  Wholeheartedly.  But please don’t attempt to divide God’s Land, Israel, in any way.  West Bank, Jerusalem, or any portion. It belongs to God Himself.  Peace plan or no peace plan, help to keep Israel intact.  You’re doing a great job Sir, but please STAND with an INTACT ISRAEL.  God bless you, your family, the USA, and His land Israel.  JERusaLEM jerUSAlem 🇺🇸♥️🇮🇱
Mr. President, I know you were hoping that the Democrats would quit with their childish antics and start working for the people again that they were supposed to be representing in the first place; Sadly I don't see it happening. Just declare the emergency and get it built... They're not going to come around because they're losing nothing with the shutdown, they're just letting the people of this country suffer so they can blame it on you.
Mr. President, I know you were hoping that the Democrats would quit with their childish antics and start working for the people again that they were supposed to be representing in the first place; Sadly I don't see it happening. Just declare the emergency and get it built... They're not going to come around because they're losing nothing with the shutdown, they're just letting the people of this country suffer so they can blame it on you.
God Bless you President Trump! 🇺🇸 🇺🇸 🇺🇸
God Bless you President Trump! 🇺🇸 🇺🇸 🇺🇸
Greatest president ever
Stay strong! We've got your back!
I'd live here, anyway. Wally West
America - a gated community
Thank you POTUS !!
Yes. Rational people agree. Now do it,
AMEN TO THAT!!
PHOTO SHOPPED crisis
Thanks Mr. President !!!
Lower the age for retirement then the wall
Best President ever
STAY THE COURSE
Altered photo fake black supporters.
The great divider!!
We hear you Nehemiah
Google say:idiot,haha
I love you trump.
Yes it is! And you sir are the only who seems to care.
Go Mr president!
Party Of Crime???  https://pbs.twimg.com/media/DNbkp33UQAAnM7a.jpg
Pepa pig aint getting hes wall period.
Pepa pig aint getting hes wall period.
"We cease to be a nation" ?????????  WTF??
If you don't, who will? 😏 #Trump2020
If you don't, who will? 😏 #Trump2020
Hey Donald, ISIS WAS NOT DEFEATED! WHY ARE YOU ALWAYS LYING?
Hey Donald, ISIS WAS NOT DEFEATED! WHY ARE YOU ALWAYS LYING?
Rigged Polls in his favor! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
SO YOU SAY YOU NEED TO  DEFEND OUR BORDERS IN ORDER TO BE A SAFER NATION BUT YET YOU ARE USING THOUSANDS OF AMERICANS AS HOSTAGES FOR YOUR SO CALLED DEFENSE FOR THE AMERICAN PEOPLE  !?!?!? IT SOUNDS LIKE WE NEED PROTECTION FROM YOU INSTEAD!?!   THIS IS THE PERFECT DEFINITION OF  CONTRADICTION AT ITS FINEST. DO YOU EVEN BELIEF THE PRINCIPLES YOU PREACH? OR DO YOU JUST USE THEM IN ORDER TO MANIPULATE? OR MAYBE YOU ACTUALLY DO BELIEVE THE CRAP THAT YOU SAY? IF SO....THEN YOU ARE ALREADY LIVING IN YOUR KARMA. YOU ARE LOST, SOULESS AND CONFUSED. WHICH MEANS YOUR FUTURE DECISIONS AND CONSEQUENCES ARE PREDICTABLE.  THEREFORE. I CHOOSE NOT TO REACT IN FEAR AND INSTEAD REACT WITH FAITH AND TRUST THAT WE AS A NATION WILL GET THROUGH THIS AND WE WILL BE STRONGER BECAUSE OF IT. SO THANK YOU FOR SACRAFISING YOUR SOUL SO THAT AMERICANS CAN LOOK MORE PAST THE BLACK AND WHITE SPECTRUM AND REACH  MORE INTO THE GREY AREA OF SOLUTIONS AND TOGETHERNESS.  I KNOW YOU WANT ME TO BE AFRAID, AND I KNOW YOU THINK YOU KNOW US. BUT I HAVE NEWS FOR YOU TRUMP.... IT'S NEVER TOO LATE TO LEARN SOMETHING NEW!!!  MOST OF US KNOW STRUGGLE ALREADY, WE LIVE(D) IT... AND CAN SURVIVE THINGS THAT YOU, YOURSELF WOULD CRUMBLE FROM. YOU UNDERESTIMATE OUR CAPABILITIES AS A PEOPLE.   WE MAY HAVE BEEN DISTRACTED BECAUSE OF THE OBSTACLES PLACED AGAINST US BEFORE THIS SHUT DOWN, BUT YOU HAVE OUR FULL ATTENTION NOW AND I PROMISE YOU...WE WILL SURVIVE!!  WOULD YOU THOUGH???
Says wealthy people who threatened to take their wealth out of the US.
Rigged Polls in his favor! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
pray for trump, pray for the USA
I'M WITH YOU ON THE WALL... MAKE AMERICA SAFE AND GREAT AGAIN. PAY HOMELAND SECURITY NOW.!  THE USCG WORKING WITHOUT PAY IS A DISGRACE!
Kellie Spieges Mexico well pay for it just because they not gonna give a check to trump don't mean Mexico won't pay
Trump said Mexico would pay for the wall. Now, Mexico said fck no, and the people don't care...   Hmmm, what other lies has he told...
Trump said Mexico would pay for the wall. Now, Mexico said fck no, and the people don't care...   Hmmm, what other lies has he told...
Rigged Polls in his favor! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Stand firm Mr President
TURN UP THE HEAT ON THE DEMONCRATS PRESIDENT TRUMP. LETS DESTROY THIS CORRUPT PARTY.
Don’t let others enter and dictate your laws ... stand strong on immigration ... and shame on shonky Dems and self interest
They altered his finger to look longer😃 https://youtu.be/ujqHCanoJZg
Donald tell the truth, you really believe your most important duty is to line your pockets with cash.
MR. PRESIDENT,I SUPPORT YOU AND WILL VOTE FOR YOU IN 2020---I HAVE CONCERNS ABOUT MUSLIMS IN CONGRESS---WHY IS THE 1952, MC CARRAN WALTERS ACT NOT BEING ENFORCED?---IF MUSLIMS ARE ALLOWED IN OUR GOVERNMENT WE WILL LOOSE OUR COUNTRY.----PLEASE ENFORCE THIS 1952 BAN ON MUSLIMS IN OUR COUNTRY.
While we leave our seas and airs open like a 2 dollar hooker
While we leave our seas and airs open like a 2 dollar hooker
There are eight hundred thousand people suffering for not getting paid for this big ego. Instead of buying lunch for a team that you paid for just pay them as many of these employees are governing our safety. Hope you are proud of being the President to have the longest shut down. All for a wall that you said Mexico would pay.
https://youtu.be/S-Jjb94G5ls  King James Version  Rev 22:18-19 This Book  Exodus 24:7 The Book  One Matthew 23:9 Father  Jerusalem Galatians 4:26 Mother of us all  One Matthew 23:8 All ye are Brethren  Exodus 23:20-22 Behold  Isaiah 29:15 Woe unto them that  Seek Deep to hide  Their counsel from  The Lord, and their  Works are in the  Dark, and they say,  Who seeth us? and  Who knoweth us?  John 8:17 It is also written  In your Law, that  The testimony of  Two men is true.  One Genesis 41:25 Pharaoh  1 John 1:5 Light  1 John 5:7 The Holy Ghost  Zechariah 14:9 His Name One  Luke 3:21-23 The Holy Ghost  John 5:35 Light  John 1:13 Which were born,  Not of Blood, nor  Of the will of  The Flesh, nor of  The will of man,  But of God.  Revelation 19:4 Alleluia  Revelation 4:2 One sat on The Throne  Isaiah 29:28-29 Bread  Corn is bruised;  Because he will Not  Ever Be Threshing  it,  Nor Break  it  With the wheel of  His cart, Nor Bruise  it  With his Horsemen.  Romans 9:17 Pharaoh  Ezekiel 10:20 This is Pharaoh  John 1:49 Thou Art  Exodus 16:15-16 Omer  Acts 8:6 Philip  Daniel 2:31-38 Thou Art This Head Of Gold  Job 30:30 Black  Ezekiel 10:20 Living  Revelation 1:15 Many Waters  Isaiah 28:29  This also cometh  Forth from the Lord  Of  Hosts, which is  Wonderful in Counsel,  And  Excellent in Working.  Psalm 137:5 If I Forget Thee, O Jerusalem,  Jerusalem Galatians 4:26 Mother of Us All  One Matthew 23:8 All ye are Brethren  Ephesians 4:6 One God  Psalm 119:105 Light  Psalm 136:15 But overthrew  Pharaoh  And his host in  The Red Sea: for  His mercy Endureth  For Ever.  Job 35:1-4 it  Psalm 35:5 Let  Them Be As Chaff  Before The Wind:  And  Let the Angel of  The Lord Chase  Them.  1 Thes 5:5 Light  Ephesians 5:8 Light  John 12:34-36 Light  Job 34:27 Because they Turned Back From Him, And Would Not Consider Any of His Ways:  Ecclesiastes 4:8 One
Hey you guy who think solutions from 771 BC are still good solutions, your wall is useless:  https://www.ifsecglobal.com/smart-home/drone-patrols-ai-surveillance-15-home-security-innovations-ces-2019/ #yourWallisUseless
Looks Photoshopped  https://twitter.com/twitter/statuses/1086125320258895872
Looks Photoshopped  https://twitter.com/twitter/statuses/1086125320258895872
Ya take your 5 billion & build afford able houses along border. Call Trumps Border. B the first 2 solar wind free frash water.
GO GETT'EM DON. KEEP MAKING AMERICA GREAT AGAIN.                             #MAGA.                           #STILLWINNING
THANKS SHELDON GREAT CHOICE HOPE TO SEE MORE VOTES WE SURE NEED TO GET THE HOUSE BACK ,THE SENATE AND OUR GREAT PRESIDENT THAT OUR LORD JESUS CHRIST BLESSED THIS NATION AND HER PEOPLE WITH
In order to protect us against terrorist, Mr. President, I would strongly urge you to expel their leader Nancy Pelosi . . . and her sidekick, Chuck Schumer.
I wish Facebook would do their job and protect us from YOU.
Build the wall. End the shut down. Protect citizens from  Pelosi's and Schumer's hidden  Agenda of destroying America  On behalf of Soros and Isis.
Build the wall. End the shut down. Protect citizens from  Pelosi's and Schumer's hidden  Agenda of destroying America  On behalf of Soros and Isis.
MR. PRESIDENT! WE CANNOT GET ONE GOVERNOR IN THE WHOLE UNITED STATES TO TALK TO US ABOUT 800,000 CHILDREN DISAPPEARING IN THE UNITED STATES EVERY YEAR. CAN WE GET A LETTER TO THE GOVERNORS TO ADDRESS THE CRISIS?
THIS IS RIDICULOUS.  YOUR RELATIONSHIP WITH YOUR BUSINESS PARTNER PUTIN HAS PUT OUR COUNTRY IN DANGER.  YOU ARE WORKING FOR PUTIN, NOT AMERICANS.
Declare a national emergency 🚨Mr President you are doing a great job,keep up the good work🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
According to Trump, we are not a nation from 1787 to 1994. What a maroon. It's astounding just how dumb the things Trump can allude to simply to vomit out his rhetoric.
According to Trump, we are not a nation from 1787 to 1994. What a maroon. It's astounding just how dumb the things Trump can allude to simply to vomit out his rhetoric.
The Secure Fence Act of 2006 The Secure Fence Act of 2006, which was passed by a Republican Congress and signed by President George W. Bush, authorized about 700 miles of fencing along certain stretches of land between the border of the United States and Mexico. The act also authorized the use of more vehicle barriers, checkpoints and lighting to curb illegal immigration, and the use of advanced technology such as satellites and unmanned aerial vehicles. At the time the act was being considered, Barack Obama, Hillary Clinton and Chuck Schumer were all members of the Senate. Obama, Clinton, Schumer and 23 other Democratic senators voted in favor of the act when it passed in the Senate by a vote of 80 to 19
The Secure Fence Act of 2006 The Secure Fence Act of 2006, which was passed by a Republican Congress and signed by President George W. Bush, authorized about 700 miles of fencing along certain stretches of land between the border of the United States and Mexico. The act also authorized the use of more vehicle barriers, checkpoints and lighting to curb illegal immigration, and the use of advanced technology such as satellites and unmanned aerial vehicles. At the time the act was being considered, Barack Obama, Hillary Clinton and Chuck Schumer were all members of the Senate. Obama, Clinton, Schumer and 23 other Democratic senators voted in favor of the act when it passed in the Senate by a vote of 80 to 19
WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! WE WANT A WALL !!! APPROVE THE WALL !!! \
Look at those tiny hands
Dear Sir! Having taken a recent vote, at that time 71% are in favor of  what you're doing, and the others favor the Dems .It's apparent you are constantly referring this as being a National Security issue,  and apparently have the means of getting the sufficient amount to complete it,  Don't talk yourself out.. We see  Dems digging their grave and will become all the more obvious now they' have the House.
Plummeting in the polls  ... what's next Donnie? How's the ego holding up? Is it worth the pain and suffering you are causing so many folks? Bye bye  Donnie! #TrumpResign #TrumpShutdown
BUILD THE WALL.. WE THE PEOPLE LOVE YOU. NEVER GIVE UP.  DO NOT GIVE IN PRESIDENT TRUMP.   WE LOVE YOU.  PRAYING FOR YOU (family and VP Pence too)  CONTINUALLY WITHOUT CEASING IN THE POWERFUL NAME OF JESUS CHRIST.  USA! USA!! USA!!! BUILD THE WALL! BUILD THE WALL!! BUILD THE WALL!!!  WooHoo!! I can SEE it already and it is a BEAUTIFUL WALL!!!
BUILD THE WALL.. WE THE PEOPLE LOVE YOU. NEVER GIVE UP.  DO NOT GIVE IN PRESIDENT TRUMP.   WE LOVE YOU.  PRAYING FOR YOU (family and VP Pence too)  CONTINUALLY WITHOUT CEASING IN THE POWERFUL NAME OF JESUS CHRIST.  USA! USA!! USA!!! BUILD THE WALL! BUILD THE WALL!! BUILD THE WALL!!!  WooHoo!! I can SEE it already and it is a BEAUTIFUL WALL!!!
Trumpateers, I’ve seen the debates on both sides of who’s to blame for the shutdown. For 2 years Republicans were in power and this could have been settled. Then last fall,up comes the Cohen thing and Manafort thing and possible collusion by Russia. Mid term elections came and Democrats win the house. All of a sudden, there’s a big border wall crisis. Trump shuts down the government and Republicans leave the house Dec. 13 cause there is no use. January 1st comes Democrats are in power with no government,meaning further inquiries into trump’s allegation go nowhere. That’s why trump is going to make this last and why Mitch McConnell is hiding. Make any sense?
Well cease to be the nation we are for many other reasons other than this border "crisis". Only difference is the border crisis would take longer to ruin us. Right now because of your shut down, people are suffering and losing everything NOW!! And you don't care!! https://www.cbsnews.com/news/colorados-forests-at-risk-for-wildfires-due-to-government-shutdown/?ftag=CNM-00-10aab6a&linkId=62572813
Yes we have to.. we lost the borders en Vietnam , we lost the border in Siria.., we are  in venezuela protecting our border...We need walls all over the world...before Mexico take back  all their land.
Okay, so why did you neglect Puerto Rico, and then show nothing but contempt for the nearly 3,000 people who died there??
Okay, so why did you neglect Puerto Rico, and then show nothing but contempt for the nearly 3,000 people who died there??
The freshman congresswoman said Wednesday the shutdown was not really about Trump’s demands for a wall on the U.S.-Mexico border or “the well-being of everyday Americans.” Instead, she said, it was “about the erosion of American democracy and the subversion of our most basic governmental norms.”  ”It is not normal to hold 800,000 workers’ paychecks hostage. It is not normal to shut down the government when we don’t get what we want. It is not normal for public servants to run away and hide from the public that they serve,” Ocasio-Cortez added. “And it is certainly not normal to starve the people we serve for a proposal that is wildly unpopular among the American people! https://news.yahoo.com/alexandria-ocasio-cortez-torches-trump-114238067.html
It is and paying people is your job too! U can open the government  and work on BORDER security.  U don't need to be a baby about it when nearly a milluon people  aren't getting paid
It is and paying people is your job too! U can open the government  and work on BORDER security.  U don't need to be a baby about it when nearly a milluon people  aren't getting paid
DECLARE MARTIAL LAW DISSOLVE CONGRESS
The only things Trump and his base preach is hate and division on a daily basis, never ends.
The only things Trump and his base preach is hate and division on a daily basis, never ends.
Fact: Trump lies about the length of his fingers like he does about everything else  Source: https://www.reddit.com/r/PoliticalHumor/comments/ah26x0/trumps_facebook_page_slimmed_him_down_and_made/
Mr President PLEASE use this and spit in the Demonrats faces and have the State of the Union anyways!!!  https://www.usconstitution.net/xconst_A2Sec3.html
Imagine if #Trump fined everyone who didn't want the Wall. Just like #Obama did with ObamaCare...🤔 #thedoublestandartisreal
Pray for the last Trump!
Pray for the last Trump!
Withholding pay from CBP is a failure to defend our borders.
Withholding pay from CBP is a failure to defend our borders.
call emergancy and build that wall before the rest of the trash gets here, arm military with real amo.
Milton Freeman how do we stop illegals from coming in. In recent times large numbers.
We don't need the wall.  Most Americans don't want it. Be a President,  not a pandering politician.
Proud to be a trump supporter. Trump 2020!
Why  can  Congress fund 10 billions for foreign countries ABORTIONS........But will not fund 5 billion for the wall............
But you become IN Fucking SANE!!!!!
Stay Focus on our Borders. .........Mexico is Not Our Friend they are partners with Drug Cartel .   They love the American $$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$&$$$s  Corrupt just like Venezuela 😡👎🏽
Wonder why the DNC was trying to delay the state of the union? Are they afraid Trump will get direct media coverage, or is Disney still fine-tuning their new Ginsburg animatronic?
R we going to build a wall around the whole usa or just mexicos border?  Jerk
Your a joke!! https://www.cbsnews.com/news/government-shutdown-claims-immigration-judge-paychecks-as-court-morale-hits-a-historic-low/?ftag=CNM-00-10aab6a&linkId=62718789
You are doing the right thing, President Trump!  Stand strong!   Doing the right thing is not usually the most painless thing, as any of us know.  We are with you!
We must have border security and the wall! We support You President Trump!!🇺🇸🇺🇸
People need to contact legislators and tell them to fund the barrier and open the government. Democrats want to fund foreign aide to the tune of $18 billion but can't take $5 billion to fund the wall? I think we should be taking care of our own country and citizens before any other country.
Your president Donald Trump can only do so much and I think he knows it, he's got a bible, he knows what he's up against not flesh and blood but something way bigger than him, New World Order is on its way. They have already paved preparation to reveal the Anti Christ to the world and President Donald Trump is there to slow him down abit. Satan has to have people working for him to push his agenda through? Congress and Democrats are doing that for him.
Your president Donald Trump can only do so much and I think he knows it, he's got a bible, he knows what he's up against not flesh and blood but something way bigger than him, New World Order is on its way. They have already paved preparation to reveal the Anti Christ to the world and President Donald Trump is there to slow him down abit. Satan has to have people working for him to push his agenda through? Congress and Democrats are doing that for him.
Actually I am not American citizen but my full support and best wishes with you Mr Donald Trump because you and your team doing work well that's why I am doing Appreciate you all team work                                                  God bless you                                                                  Mr. Donald Trump                                                                                                  God bless you                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                  American citizen                                                                                                               God bless                                                                                                                                       America                                                                                                     your well wisher                                                                             SYED ZEESHAN HUSSAIN RIZVI                                                                    Passport Number                                                                                             GE 9892312                                                                                                              National Identity Card Number                                              41204_8988231-3                                             Contact Number                                                                              +923323684027                             +923003841734                                             Email Address                                                       szhr.1980@hotmail.com          szhr1980@gmail.com                                      szhr.1980@yahoo.com                                                         House No R-245 Block 20 Fb Area Karachi Pakistan
Where do you want to spend the money? Spend a little at the front end on a barrier or spend a lot at the back end on bureaucrazy and crime?
WELL SAID MR PRESIDENT DONALD Donald J. Trump
Says the Putin puppet who repeats Kremlin talking points.
Says the Putin puppet who repeats Kremlin talking points.
Which Nation are you defending? It seem your are doing everything you can to help Putin.
MAGA 2020!! HE IS YOUR PRESIDENT!!
Keep up the good work Mr. President. The silent majority supports you.
Keep up the good work Mr. President. The silent majority supports you.
Trump forever!!!!!
Why can't you work for citizens insteed you are busy working russians
If we don't have an OPEN government, we cease to be a nation.   OPEN the Government.    NOW....................
AMEN.  Have to stop the invasion of our country!!!  Thank God for President Donald J. Trump.
Thank you President Trump Stand strong, it is time to stop voting for the lying hypocrite communiste socialiste liberal democrats that are holding this country hostage BUILD the WALL.
Real News: Two very sober and thoroughly argued calls for the House of Representatives to launch an impeachment investigation (to see if impeachment is warranted):  https://www.washingtonpost.com/opinions/michael-hayden-and-neal-katyal-the-house-should-investigate-impeaching-trump/2019/01/18/0588e84a-1b70-11e9-88fe-f9f77a3bcb6c_story.html  https://www.theatlantic.com/magazine/archive/2019/03/impeachment-trump/580468/  The first is written by Michael Hayden and Neal Katyal in the Washington Post. The second is written for The Atlantic by Yoni Appelbaum, who notes:   “Impeachment is a process, not an outcome, a rule-bound procedure for investigating a president, considering evidence, formulating charges, and deciding whether to continue on to trial.”  “As a House Judiciary Committee staff report put it in 1974, in the midst of the Watergate investigation: ‘The purpose of impeachment is not personal punishment; its function is primarily to maintain constitutional government.‘ Impeachable offenses, it found, included ‘undermining the integrity of office, disregard of constitutional duties and oath of office, arrogation of power, abuse of the governmental process, adverse impact on the system of government.’”
Meme granny
Bless you 🇺🇸
Bless you 🇺🇸
Ms. Pelosi, tear down your walls!!
Impeach Nancy Pelosi.
Pay the Coast Guard!!
words obummer never spoke
Our president is very very Wright
Public Law 85-804
Disaster smh 🤔🤔🤔
Mr President God Bless you.
Mr president 👍
Stay strong Mr. President!
Strong words 100% true. #G
I need my food stamps💁‍♀️
Absolutely correct!!!!!!!
If we don’t defend America against you, then we cease to be a nation.  If you cared you would open up the government!  But, you sir can careless.  Lies, corruption and a traitor. Your future looks bright. Till your exit,  we true Americans will fight for “our” nation and it’s people!   You’ll be a dark ugly spot in History. And nobody knows better about ugly darkness then you.
Meanwhile, hardworking Americans are starving while their life savings are dwindling down to nothing, all over petty political stubbornness on both sides of the aisle. There's nothing to celebrate here.
DAD MADE, VLAD PAID
I love my President!!!
Hang tough, Mr. President.  You're doing the right thing.  God bless you and protect and give you wisdom!
Online shopping Is it your dream to shop online or play free online games . then look no where else .. This site can help you shop online with btc you don't need to have credit card before you do shopping though you can shop with those cards and also it has a very affordable delivery services. No matter which part of the world you are, you can still go for this site.   I personally recommend this convenient site for you. Do all your shoppings and play all your online games here.  👇👇👇 http://www.tripleclicks.com/19539144TripleClickstripleclicks.com
Let the Border Security Workers decide how to spend the 5 billion. Then it wont be Trumps Wall-it will be the people on the front line deciding where it is best spent!
Trumpaganda Style.
Rabbi rabbi can you heal me said the peasant yes my child said Jesus if you can pay me in full or have insurance said Jesus looking down on the peasant as she crawled to the gutter.
Representing all American citizens and doing what's best for them as a whole is your civic duty. Not pandering to your base and fearmongering to get your way.
Stop immigrants also from MUslims countries you have enough
Never give up
The best one ☝️
Get er done then!
We are with you.
Slow n make it long.
You’re doing a great job!!
You got the power.
You are doing a great job
Yes sir, I agree.
""WE NEED HEALTHCARE""
Thank You Mr. President
Love my president
Agree! Please secure!!! Don’t give in!
Here's an idea - No Security Detail for any Congressional leadership- until they take the American people's safety and security and this nation's sovereignty as serious as they take their own personal safety.....  Has anyone asked how much taxpayers pay for  Pelosi and Schumers Safety and Security on a daily basis? How about this- we pay only 1$ for their protection and treat them the exact way they treat the American people, and Good Luck To Them.
Here's an idea - No Security Detail for any Congressional leadership- until they take the American people's safety and security and this nation's sovereignty as serious as they take their own personal safety.....  Has anyone asked how much taxpayers pay for  Pelosi and Schumers Safety and Security on a daily basis? How about this- we pay only 1$ for their protection and treat them the exact way they treat the American people, and Good Luck To Them.
He needs a new tailor.
The number of fake acounts claiming to support Trump is alarming! How come this is accepted by the same people that claims to protect american borders? You are fighing over a fence! Meanwhile Putin is invading from inside. Please be smarter than that!
Ronaldo is better than u
Thank you my president  DONALD TRUMP
Thank you Mr. Trump !
Trump 2020 #MAGA #1
I love Donald Trump
#with all love our Lord guides all people to #lslam💚💙💛
#with all love our Lord guides all people to #lslam💚💙💛
And you suck at it 😂😂😂
am a liberal who will vote for #TRUMP
What bullshit!!!
Hi what's up dady
Hi what's up dady
just declare a national emergency and build the wall, the slats and get this over with. the longer this non payment of workers goes on the worse it gets and NP says no to everything so just do it. I read where Kuschner said not to do it. well who are you going to listen to.
Stand your ground Mr President, the country is with you!
NOT DEFENDING OUR BORDERS, IS THE SAME AS NEVER HAVING ANY POLICE DEPARTMENTS ON EARTH EVER AGAIN, SO YOU ALL COULD SUFFER DUE TO DEMOCROOKS NOT ALLOWING US TO HAVE THE WALLS!
NOT DEFENDING OUR BORDERS, IS THE SAME AS NEVER HAVING ANY POLICE DEPARTMENTS ON EARTH EVER AGAIN, SO YOU ALL COULD SUFFER DUE TO DEMOCROOKS NOT ALLOWING US TO HAVE THE WALLS!
Mark Warren talk to the Border Patrol, their saying they really need the wall!! Their there every day not us or politicians!!!!
Mark Warren How about talking to the Border Patrol, they are saying they need the wall!!!!
borders are defended
Defending our borders does not only mean having a wall. It also means ensuring we are not attacked by foreign enemies that compromise our democracy. In short your collusion and hidden discussions with Putin are a far greater threat than refugees wanting to be part of our country.
MAGA President Donald J. Trump. Why is no one talking about impeaching Pelosi and Shoe-mer?
Amen to that!!
FUND the WALL!
Absolutely  right "
Wtf over a fukin wall nigga u pay for it
Spreading fear again?
Stay strong!
Heaven has a wall with a Golden Gate how will you enter ?
And always remember i love you
And always remember i love you
Trump2020❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️
Hang tight, we love you!
(y) YES (y) YES (y)  YES (y) YES (y) YES (y)
https://giphy.com/gifs/snl-trump-bannongreat-GX4DUEze7yVnG.   berserker.  Hahahahahahaha
Send to the request of his friendship I need your arrow
We have 2 borders dum ass
Kenny Kats u and I will build it with cardboard paper 😂😂😂
Build that wall!!
Why only you who come with such idea
Yeah, Russia world
Good work I lol vote for hen again go Trump
BUILD THE WALL! GO TRUMP! 2020 🇺🇸
God bless United States of Kenya
Hamberder Helper
Putin says what?
Not the people?
Damn that's all it takes
All hail the king
you very good person
7880910964-9532443357-India
Ur the best mr. president ❤️🙏🇺🇸
He is wonderful!!
He is wonderful!!
I believed The President Trump.
You are our HERO 🍀💚
I wish we had a president like that
You pay my part jerk
LOVE YOU! KEEP GOING!!!
LOVE YOU! KEEP GOING!!!
President Trump, you are the best! ! !
Thank you Mr Président 👮
We love you Mr. President
Donald J. Trump, persevere! We're praying for you!
Colorado’s crime rate is growing faster than most of the country. We are a sanctuary state. We are paying a high price. We need security. DENVER (CBS4) – Colorado taxpayers paid more than $522 million to imprison illegal immigrants convicted of crimes over the past 20 years, according to a CBS4 investigation.
Colorado’s crime rate is growing faster than most of the country. We are a sanctuary state. We are paying a high price. We need security. DENVER (CBS4) – Colorado taxpayers paid more than $522 million to imprison illegal immigrants convicted of crimes over the past 20 years, according to a CBS4 investigation.
STAND TALL!!
No, we cease to be a nation when we've forgotten our values and humility. We ceased being a nation the moment you became President.
No, we cease to be a nation when we've forgotten our values and humility. We ceased being a nation the moment you became President.
2020  all the way
That's my President
Damn straight
That’s right
We do not. What rubbish
Thank You Mr.President!
Best. President. Ever!!!!
Best. President. Ever!!!!
Thank you Mr.President.
And you are AMAZING at it!!!
soooooooooo your nuts too?
What about the People
Build our wall!!
AMEN TO THAT!!
your creating chaos
Change your suit
Never truer words.
Absolutely!
Still making America great,2020
There he is!
We are behind you 100 %.
In Syria? Run away.
Opinion only folks....
Snowflakes are flying
As it should be!
WAR or WALL! come on....
WAR or WALL! come on....
You are so right! 👍
What a joke. Thank god he will soon be gone.
Very good, one and all
Crazy fear mongering dotard.
'This is witness intimidation': Internet gasps after Trump threatens Michael Cohen's father-in-law in angry tweet https://www.rawstory.com/2019/01/witness-intimidation-internet-gasps-trump-threatens-michael-cohens-father-law-
142 people have 0 common sense
The wall is coming !! MAGA
TRUMP = WHITE SUPREMACIST
yes sir! thank you!
BBB!!! (Bravo, brave "bonespurs")
I agree Sherri
Smoke and mirrors.
We are behind you.  🇺🇸
WAR or WALL! come on....
WAR or WALL! come on....
Thank you Mr President!
We appreciate you!
Movie/TV stars sooo mad!!!
Don't give in President TRUMP
Then why are you NOT paying TSA workers, you lying POS?
Then why are you NOT paying TSA workers, you lying POS?
Apparently, both sides pan Nazi Stephen Miller’s border script, read by Emperor Fullofshiticus:  News Analysis In Trump’s Immigration Announcement, a Compromise Snubbed All Around WASHINGTON — Immigrant advocates denounced it as cruel. The conservative right howled that it was amnesty. What President Trump billed on Saturday as a compromise to end the country’s longest government shutdown pleased neither the Democratic congressional leaders whose buy-in he needs to strike a deal nor the core supporters whose backing has always been at the heart of his insistence on a border wall. Instead, in offering temporary protections for about one million immigrants at risk of deportation in exchange for funding for a wall, Mr. Trump did something rarely seen during his presidency. He tried to reach beyond his base of supporters — which polls have begun to show is losing patience with him as the partial shutdown drags into its fifth week — and speak to a broader swath of Americans. The Saturday afternoon speech from the West Wing was an attempt by Mr. Trump to, at the very least, shift the narrative of the past several weeks and show that rather than spoiling for a longer shutdown fight or making unreasonable demands, he was looking for a broadly acceptable way out of a morass he once boasted he was proud to wade into. “I think you could tell by the president’s remarks today,” Vice President Mike Pence said, “that we’re reaching out.” Yet in seeking to inch toward the center, Mr. Trump alienated portions of his hard-right base, the core supporters he most depends on and the group he and his closest aides have most feared losing. That raised the possibility that, in his zeal to get out of an intractable situation, he may have landed himself in the worst of all worlds, without a clear solution or the support of his most ardent followers. The tensions and anger over the policy have been quietly playing out in the West Wing as well, as Jared Kushner, the president’s son-in-law and senior adviser, fended off Stephen Miller, the architect of much of Mr. Trump’s immigration agenda. Mr. Kushner has long been a proponent of protections for undocumented immigrants brought to the United States as children, while Mr. Miller has pressed for aggressive measures to crack down on both legal and illegal immigration. In recent days, as White House officials had been working out the details of the compromise, Mr. Miller intervened to narrow the universe of immigrants who would receive protection, according to people familiar with the internal discussions who described them on the condition of anonymity. While the original idea had been to include protections for as many as 1.8 million undocumented immigrants eligible for Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals, the Obama-era program known as DACA that protected those illegally brought to the United States as children, Mr. Trump ultimately proposed shielding only the 700,000 who are enrolled. Mr. Kushner conceded in a briefing after the president’s speech that he did not see the proposal as a solution for the DACA program, which Mr. Trump moved to rescind in 2017. “At this moment in time,” Mr. Kushner said, “this is a good path forward.” Many conservatives did not share that view. “Trump proposes amnesty,” the conservative commentator Ann Coulter said on Twitter. “We voted for Trump and got Jeb!” she added, referring to Jeb Bush, who challenged Mr. Trump for the Republican nomination in 2016 and supported a broad immigration overhaul that would have given undocumented immigrants a path to legal status. Still, in the eyes of many White House officials, the prospect that Mr. Trump could use the proposal to shift blame for the shutdown and pressure Democrats to end the impasse was worth trying. Mr. Pence argued on Saturday that the speech was a “sincere effort” by Mr. Trump to break the logjam, and he and other White House officials suggested that the measure could attract enough support to succeed from centrist Democrats fed up with the shutdown and willing to side with Republicans. But such a coalition did not appear to be forming, and courting one bears considerable risk for a president who is most comfortable when he is defying convention, eschewing compromise and being hailed as a hero by supporters who often equate bipartisan deal making with weak-kneed capitulation. The vast majority of Democrats knocked the approach. While many of them have pressed for measures to protect DACA recipients and immigrants living in the United States under Temporary Protected Status enacted when their countries were destabilized by war or catastrophe, most regard the proposal he put forth on Saturday as woefully inadequate. It offers only three years of protections for the DACA recipients and those who hold T.P.S., which the Trump administration has also moved to end for several countries. “This is not an amnesty bill,” Mr. Pence said. “There is no pathway to citizenship in this proposal.” That was high on Speaker Nancy Pelosi’s list of reasons to call the plan “unacceptable.” That is unlikely to matter to the president. Despite saying publicly last month that he would be proud to own a shutdown over the wall, and privately displaying confidence that his base would stick with him through the fight, Mr. Trump has been dismayed to find otherwise in recent days. An NPR poll released last week showed Mr. Trump’s approval ratings down and the first cracks in backing among critical supporters, including whites without a college education and white evangelicals. Such pressure from what he has called the forgotten men and women who elected him and chant “Build! The! Wall!” at his arena rallies has swayed Mr. Trump before, including last year, when the conservative news site Breitbart branded him “Amnesty Don” for considering a similar deal that would have provided $25 billion in wall funding for a path to legal status for those the DACA program was created to help. The president ultimately abandoned that agreement, concerned about angering his base and after Mr. Miller and others advised him he should insist on additional immigration restrictions. On Saturday night, Breitbart panned Mr. Trump’s latest idea with the headline “Three-Year Amnesty, Most of Border Remains Open.”  Reported by The (We Are Doing Very Well, Thank You Very Much) NY Times
Very beautiful wonderful man
Stay strong!
Fight the good fight Mr. President
Is this a Jojo reference
LUV THE TRUMPS.
I am a TRILLION PERCENT BEHIND YOU!  That is Your primary duty, and You do it Excellent!  Don’t budge even a little; or they will know You can be intimidated, just like all the Presidents before You!  Tell Linsey, “THANKS, BUT NO THANKS”!
Small hands. Small brain.
I agree l be praying
Mr.Trump are u an ex-army veteran..?
Open the govt
TRUMP  TRUMP  TRUMP.     2020 ❤️🙏🏻🇺🇸
MAGA TRUMP 2020!
Hey Trump, how about protecting our own country from these lone gun massacres people. There are more in our own country than come in from MEXICO
Yet you are failing to pay members of the coast guard, TSA, and border patrol agents. You’re a #Failure #UnfitForOffice
God bless you Mr President
Truly said!!!
He will be impeached.
I am so proud of you!
Don't give in!  Build that wall!
Nice photoshopping.
PLEASE RELEASE GERMANY
choose one....defense or attack
Fucking joke.
As it should be! Thank you!
And that's the truth
Stay strong!
God bless Mr Trump
Democrats are aiming for that
We will get our " Wall"
We will get our " Wall"
Thank you Mr. President
NO WALL EVER!!!!!!!
Eat a dick Donnie.
Pay the coast guard!!
GOD bless the president.
The same holda true with the SECOND AMENDMENT
Amen Mister President
Keep on Keeping on !!!
Hold the line Sir
boarders*   right?
Go Trump!!!
Iies and propaganda.
Make America Great Again
We ceased being a nation when you sold us out to Putin
Congratulations God trump card
Your right on
Action now mr president.
Thank you Sir.Trump
Stand Strong Mr. President!
Where can I get poster
Thank you, Mr. President!
Stay strong!
WTG PRESIDENT TRUMP.
what ever dotard
Thank you!!
Reagan said almost the same thing
Representing all nations
POTUS is absolutely right
Build the wall higher deeper stronger today
Great Leader!
🤣🖕 have another hamberder ding dong. 😉🖕
🤣🖕 have another hamberder ding dong. 😉🖕
Love the pose on this pic!! 🤴🏼
WE CAN HELP MR. PRESIDENT !!
Love you Prez!!! YOUR SIMPLY THE BEST!!! Salute!!
Thank you Mr. President
Build the wall. Build it tall
Good job. Trump 2020.
Standing with you Mr. President!!  ❤️❤️❤️👏👏👏👏👏👏🙏🙏🙏🙏
Sunday February 3rd... State Of The Union @ the SUPERBOWL!
we are behind you all the make america grt again
Thank you Mr President !
He is right!
He is right!
Yes sir. Thank you
Absolutely TRUE
God Bless you Mr. President
YES WE NEED THE WALL
Thank you Mr President
I with you, Honey.
build bridges rather than walls 🤕
We love our POTUS
thats a fuckin jojo pose
Want to move to Canada
Thanks Mr President
Thanks Mr President
I love my President.
.  .  .  or at least, cease being a SAFE  NATION.
#GREAT PRESIDENT45.
We love our president
100% standing with you 🇺🇸 protect our great country 💕
100% standing with you 🇺🇸 protect our great country 💕
God bless my nigga President Trump
USA under president Trump is Saying to China..'WE WERE FOOLED..BUT WE WILL OUTSMART YOU IN EVERY REGARD FROM NOWONWARDS'
I love my President!!
Build the wall.  Trump 2020
Thank you Mr. President
Thank you my President!!
The Senate Judiciary Committee hearings for Attorney General nominee William Barr have focused heavily on Barr’s views on Special Counsel Robert Mueller. But nobody is asking about Barr’s legal crusade for blanket immunity for federal agents who killed American citizens.   DO NOT CONFIRM WILLIAM BARR. NOT ONLY DOES HE SUPPORT MUELLER, HE WAS INVOLVED IN THESE CRIMES.  https://ussanews.com/News1/2019/01/16/william-barrs-connection-to-ruby-ridge-defending-fbi-snipers/
God bless always 💐💐
All empires fall
Pretty sure we have been fine all this time without a wall. we will cease to have a nation because.you shut it down.
Pretty sure we have been fine all this time without a wall. we will cease to have a nation because.you shut it down.
God bless our President!
Thanks President Trump
I salute you sir
TRUMP TRAIN ALL ABOARD!CHOO!CHOO!2020AMEN!
Just cave in. We won’t hold it against you.
Love u President Trump
Trump is the best
STAY TOUGH BOSS
Watching rep Hoyer from Maryland speak......sir, it's you holding back the gov opening up.   We need to stop the dangerous flow from other countries over our border.
Thank you Mr. President! 💯❤️
Together we stand. 🎯
Great PRESIDENT!!! ✌🍷🤗
Thank you President Trump
Stay the course Mr. President !
Then start paying TSA
TRUMP 2020!! 👍🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
True, even for those who don't like it.
True, even for those who don't like it.
So true and we are behind you 100%.
Demos dont want to be a nation,how sad is that?
30 ft razor wall
i have to go pee
That's actually true
Keep on winning.
Love My POTUS!!
NOW -----NO OPEN WITHOUT.......
Amen amen amen Halleluia
Wish others felt that way
Taking a quick break from the lies and exaggerations about the border situ, let’s take a Check In on the other lie about Coal Country.  These facts are startling: https://youtu.be/KRKIqTmmhcA
Amen to that
Thank you Mr. President
Where dem yankees at
What doing that fur
Absolutely true!!!
The Liar in Chief!!
Amen president trump
Amen president trump
Ur my budd boomer
It's to late
Pay our Coast Guard
That's Right!!!  #maga!!!
Trump knows that :"The winter is coming" so for that he needs the Wall and it will be built. Until now why The America didn't need any walls? Why only after 54 years the UK leaved the EU. They know what is coming. Less vital resources means fight for survival.Have a nice day and don't forget to smile.😁
Absolute Genius move today, Sir! that’s why REAL AMERICANS LOVE YOU! BEST PRESIDENT EVER! ❤️🇺🇸 KEEP UP THE GREAT WORK! AND THANK YOU FOR FIGHTING THE GOOD FIGHT FOR US! #MAGA2020 #TRUMP2020 #DemocratShutdown
*Bone-spurs permitting.
TICK TOCK Donnie
No it doesn't.
TY President.
Rock on ! Thank you !
STAND FIRM,NO WALL,NO DEAL
You do squat!!!!!!
Keep up the great work..
overexagerrated..stfu grow up
#MAGA - AKA a deplorable!!
Drones, RVs, and ATVs.
The best president,keep being determined the way you are the previous ones didn't do anything for the people of America.
T H A N K   Y O U
then fund the coast guard
Tax returns as promised.
Impeachment is coming.
Blessings  from Belgium
We want the wall
Mexicans are digging tunnels right now.
Even Heaven has gates!
Doing it well
Your doing an amazing job.
Thank you!
Against  an  imaginary  enemy?
Nice joke for tonight 😂😂😂
We do and we are.
I agree with you, Mr. President!
I love You somuch Daddy Trump🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹🌹
Rod Novoa ur just jealous u can't get free money
Somebody's border.....
You’re lying stop it.
Great...then resign!
Doesn't make sense
STAY ON 'EM BULLDOG
God bless Robert Mueller
GO MR TRUMP!
THANK YOU PRESIDENT
My president
Did you... photoshop yourself?
Open the governement
I say the same thing! BUILD IT!!!
Yes sir, you are correct.
Yes sir, you are correct.
Fbuild that wall
Why don’t you have lips ?
RIGHT ON!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!👍👍👍👍👍👍👍🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
RIGHT ON!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!👍👍👍👍👍👍👍🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
I agree!  MAGA 2020!
Trump #2020 🇺🇸
READ ABOUT THE WALL IN REVELATIONS
Sounds good...
Sounds good...
Standing with President Trump, very proud of him.
And so it should be.  Thank u Mr President!
Not a very smart statement!
He the best
Get it done then Mr. President.
Keep on fighting, Mr. President!!
Thank you President Trump.
Defend or destruct
He is the enemy!!! Get him out!!!
Voting for Trump 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸
Right on!!!!
Thank you Sir. We r with you.
Thank you Sir. We r with you.
Please keep trying
As it should be .
Including the influence of Russia. Stop posting pictures of yourself!!!
Great American
Thank you!
The illusion of hope
Absolutely true.
Go Trump Go
Thanks President Trump
Think, then type.
We ceased to be a nation when YOU took office.
America will not be America anymore...after 2024...
EXECUTIVE ORDER THE WALL POTUS.
Amazing .... My dear Sir President DONALD J. TRUMP .... Amazing ❗🌎  That's right- My dear Sir President DONALD J. TRUMP .... ❗🌎  I love my dear Sir President DONALD J. TRUMP and AMERICA .... ❗🌎
Amazing .... My dear Sir President DONALD J. TRUMP .... Amazing ❗🌎  That's right- My dear Sir President DONALD J. TRUMP .... ❗🌎  I love my dear Sir President DONALD J. TRUMP and AMERICA .... ❗🌎
Love my President!!!
Support trump 100% 💪America💪 God bless trump and america 👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏
Support trump 100% 💪America💪 God bless trump and america 👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏
Absolutely!!!
Build the wall!!!! 👍👍💪💪🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸❤️
Thank you.
Photoshopped longer fingers 😂😂😂
What is going on????
Thebgreat faker.
Oh wow is somebody threatening a war at the border
25th Amendment
Yes, it is!
OUR OWN BACKYARD 1ST   .☆´¯`•.¸¸. ི♥ྀ.
This is very true
Thank You Mr President 🙏
Nancy pelosi wants president Trump to postpone the state of the union because she wants security for herselfwell what about America security Nancy call her out on this president Trump we need more people to go to the capital or to real news and tell their stories
Defend our nation from Putin's Russia
I love our President and First Lady
I love our President and First Lady
Amen!! Wake up, people!
THANK U SIR!!!!
Put  pelosi  on  no  fly  list
Go President Trump 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
thank you mr president
Agreed! Don’t back down!!!
Trump's administration has more criminal indictments and convictions, after only two years in office, than any of the past ten presidents accumulated in their entire terms of office.  Explained in simple English for the benefit of Trump supporters:  THIS IS THE MOST CORRUPT ADMINISTRATION OF YOUR LIFETIME.
Resign, comrade...
Promote constitutional carry.
Ever hear obama say this??
True!    Trump 2020!!!!!!!!!
He's doing that Jotaro pose
Fake President and Liar in Chief
Build the Wall Sir
Don the Con
ONWARD! CRUSH THE COMMIES!
GREAT JOB, MR. PRESIDENT! BUILD OUR WALL!!!
Defining moment boss.. Stay the course... Secure the funds.. Hold out til you get it.. The tides are shifting.. The whole world is watching America's President willing to do Annnnything to protect our Country!!! Proud to say Trump IS my President! We are with you & will be in 2020! Imwithhim8!! #theotherwomen #walkaway Peace
Defining moment boss.. Stay the course... Secure the funds.. Hold out til you get it.. The tides are shifting.. The whole world is watching America's President willing to do Annnnything to protect our Country!!! Proud to say Trump IS my President! We are with you & will be in 2020! Imwithhim8!! #theotherwomen #walkaway Peace
We are with you.
Exactly, look at europe...
A chump President for a chump type of America
common con artist
What a joke....
very very true
Build my wall
thank you.
Photo shopped.  Then man's obese.
President Pence?
Nixon2 is coming..........
Spaseeba, comrade!
#BuildTheWall Nazi Pelosi, now!!
Great leader and commander.   USA USA😇🇺🇸
SO TRUE !
The only problem with that is the rest of the Illuminati Legislature in the Senate and Congress does not agree and promotes open border instead so they can pull the New World Order down over our eyes.  "Trump has went against the Illuminati", and therefore is about the only one left with any common sense and US Patriotism.
The only problem with that is the rest of the Illuminati Legislature in the Senate and Congress does not agree and promotes open border instead so they can pull the New World Order down over our eyes.  "Trump has went against the Illuminati", and therefore is about the only one left with any common sense and US Patriotism.
Get over yourself Trump!
Absolutely! Stand strong!
Your a 5 deferment draft dodger
Not one penny.
Shut up, Donnie
Amen.  Keep up the good work
Thank you Mr.President
Joshua Yang Thanks To President Trump, the Asian workers have the highest job rating EVER!
Why didn't you have the Republicans fund your wall when you had the chance to? It's too late for a wall now you piece of waste.
That’s right
As it should be.
Closed your Eyes M.r Trump 🌸
Dont fold Mr. PRESIDENT!
Dont fold Mr. PRESIDENT!
Good job President Trump
Good job President Trump
Keep pushing Donald..
This is why the people elected you! Don't back down, you have the support of the people behind you!
correct what are you waiting for?
The whole country should go on strike
LOVE THIS PRESIDENT!!! 😊
Amen God Bless you President
absolutely right
Please CLOWN
Thank You Mr. President!
I don't mind adding the DREAMERS to the WALL NEGOTIATION but I want the PRESIDENT to up the WALL price to $50 billion so it can be DONE RIGHT the first time, so we DON'T KEEP GIVING AMENISTY every FEW YEARS for ILLEGAL ACTS with the SAME ISSUES and maybe he should be ADING IMMAGRATION REFORM with the DEAL also to further stop the LOOPHOLES.
Love the numbers
Border security is a must
He said "duty" lol
Ya one pager lmfao
Polls dropping. You need to end this shutdown
100% Agree build Americas Wall.
good for you.
I'm with him 2020 baby
Thank you Mr. President.🇺🇸
OUR BEST EVER PRESIDENT!
OUR BEST EVER PRESIDENT!
BS and you are going to believe a poll.
POLL: Marist Poll Finds Donald Trump’s Approval Rating at 39%, Losing Support Among Republicans, Evangelicals, Suburban Men & Voters Without a College Degree
You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress.
Thank God, Amen....
So what’s your point thick orange skull?  Borders are drawn on maps and you don’t need a wall to defend them.
Proud of my President.
Thank You!!
Thank You, Sir.
ALL THE WAY THE U.S MAGA TRUMP 2020 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸💪
ALL THE WAY THE U.S MAGA TRUMP 2020 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸💪
Need a wall between Russia and you and your cohorts.
Need a wall between Russia and you and your cohorts.
Keep em scared Donnie. Can you defend us against your EPA? Rolling back Mercury requirements really? Sad
Amen.  Stand Steadfast
Nice photoshop. XD
Like the headlines today? Your goose is cooked. The wall is the least of your concerns. #prepareyourlies
Like the headlines today? Your goose is cooked. The wall is the least of your concerns. #prepareyourlies
Oh no, owe know, current see currency flow, nay shun. Death algorithms, owl go rhythms, ssS5ss5Ssscream it all. President "ray gun", & oblivion claimed him, hem, hymn, in front of the herd, heard. mmm mm m
Nice photoshop.
Pelosi and Schumer’s plan
BUILD THE WALL! 100% of America agrees Sir  #trump2020 🇺🇸
BUILD THE WALL! 100% of America agrees Sir  #trump2020 🇺🇸
Waiting on you Sir.....
Waiting on you Sir.....
Mr.Trump❤❤❤ go on.....
That's Why You're There.. GREAT LEADER.. Don't Trust Any of them Lying DEMO'S. BUILD THAT WALL > MAKE IT HAPPEN.
Someone needs to tell trudeau
We need Trump action figures!
I agree it should be
Awesome PRESIDENT
It is not normal to hold 800,000 workers’ paychecks hostage. It is not normal to shut down the government when we don’t get what we want. It is not normal for public servants to run away and hide from the public that they serve, and it is certainly not normal to starve the people you serve for a proposal that is wildly unpopular among the American people. Trumps shut down of the government is something we are ALL going to pay for.
It is not normal to hold 800,000 workers’ paychecks hostage. It is not normal to shut down the government when we don’t get what we want. It is not normal for public servants to run away and hide from the public that they serve, and it is certainly not normal to starve the people you serve for a proposal that is wildly unpopular among the American people. Trumps shut down of the government is something we are ALL going to pay for.
TRUMP  2020!!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Russia is our enemy.
Russia is our enemy.
Dr. T.D. Tommy,"Much of the aerial perspective is a system that it is a place." go.nasa.gov
hahahahahaha.  What a joke.  IMPEACH!
A wall, vetting and one voter identification card along with a census and immediate deportation is necessary
A wall, vetting and one voter identification card along with a census and immediate deportation is necessary
No building an idol for the deplorable.  Impeach the russian backed traitor.
Somebody get him a chill pill.
God bless you!!!
God bless you!!!
or if we allow Putin's puppet to keep calling the shots, we will cease to be a nation
Walls work!  https://piusarinzehas.blogspot.com/2019/01/walls-have-gates.html?m=1
Walls work!  https://piusarinzehas.blogspot.com/2019/01/walls-have-gates.html?m=1
With you 100% President Trump time to settle all loop holes & build the wall/ barrier 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Thank you, President Trump!  We love you!
Thank you, President Trump!  We love you!
President Trump is the man
President Trump is the man
BUILD THE WALL. Call today BUILD THE WALL Pelosi's # 202-225-4965 Schumer # 202-224-6542 US Capitol Switchboard 202- 224- 3121 - request Senate. COPY and PASTE!
Then open.the government so the coast guard can get paid
We do defend our borders. Ridiculous statement.
We do defend our borders. Ridiculous statement.
hello sir am asking for your help am martha taulo lungu am form zambia plz help my childere they need to go back to school they we don't have money to pay for there school fees there is a balance for last year my husband his not work me am not working
It looks like Sphincter Pelosi takes the Birdbox Challenge every time she puts on her face in the morning.
He's actually right about this, so it's unfortunate that he is too incompetent and corrupt to carry out that duty.
Ask an Indian.
Nice one Mr president do not back out...
God Bless you,  President Donald J. Trump !  We stand with you!  ThankQ  #Trump2020
God Bless you,  President Donald J. Trump !  We stand with you!  ThankQ  #Trump2020
If we don’t defend our borders, then we cease to be a nation.  If we don’t defend our Republic from those who do not enforce and uphold their Oath of office. They should resign as per the House committee on Ethics.
Build the south wall than build the north wall!! Thank you sir!!!
yes that is really your work mr president
doesnt make any sense
doesnt make any sense
Everybody on the face of the earth wants  safety, so Trump must be presenting himself wrong to make democrats rebel against him.
Backbone President 2020
Backbone President 2020
It’s Mueller time😆
It’s Mueller time😆
Yeaaaaaaatrump 2020
Yeaaaaaaatrump 2020
Get em Donald!!!
Get em Donald!!!
Corey McKenzie trump looks like he been hitting the gym Here haha
Corey McKenzie trump looks like he been hitting the gym Here haha
Andre Rebel Chiaradia hows does it feel to have a fifth grade education?
You are doing a horrible job for Americans. End the shutdown, let people go back to work!
BBB! Bravo, brave "bonespurs"!
Agreed. Hold the line.
Agreed. Hold the line.
Start the IMPEACHMENT ,,,TRUMP IS UNFIT FOR OFFICE
I voted for him and will vote for him in 2020.
I voted for him and will vote for him in 2020.
Yes, absolutely true ❤️
Yes, absolutely true ❤️
Close the borders Trump
Close the borders Trump
I have your back Mr President !!
I have your back Mr President !!
Build that wall and clean up all these corrupted agencies Thank you President Donald J. Trump
Build that wall and clean up all these corrupted agencies Thank you President Donald J. Trump
Keep up the good work
Keep up the good work
This is so very true.
Yes sir that's really great
Yes sir that's really great
Thank You President Trump!
Thank You President Trump!
Amen!  God bless America!
Amen!  God bless America!
True because there are Biblical stories about such
True because there are Biblical stories about such
Never Give In !!
Thank you president Donald J Trump
Thank you president Donald J Trump
As they vote to take away sanctions of a Russian oligarch while our government is shut down
Good morning President Donald J Trump
Good morning President Donald J Trump
AMEN!  #BUILDTHEWALLNOW!!
AMEN!  #BUILDTHEWALLNOW!!
Love my President Trump
Lookin pretty sharp DJT
Keep it up!  Build the wall!
Stay strong!  Build the wall!
Stay strong!  Build the wall!
Such a drama queen. Exhausting
Such a drama queen. Exhausting
So Unpresidential!
So Unpresidential!
Trump I'm glad ur shutdown everything  at least people will open there eyes see that ur not playing  good Joe keep the good work up
NEVER GIVE UP!
NEVER GIVE UP!
Thank you Mr. President!
Thank you Mr. President!
dont  worry  Mr.  President  we  are  behind  you  100%,  keep  it  up,  the  only  thing  we  would  like  to  see  is  them  evil  ppl,  the  weeds,  go  to  jail  for  a  change,  we  are  waiting.
God bless our President
Keep on Trumpin. ❤️
Keep on Trumpin. ❤️
Thank You Sir, God Bless You & God Bless America
Thank You Sir, God Bless You & God Bless America
GONGRATULATIONS MR DONALD TRUMP
GONGRATULATIONS MR DONALD TRUMP
You have my support!!
You have my support!!
Godspeed Sir!
Godspeed Sir!
THEN BUILD THE WALL.
THEN BUILD THE WALL.
You mean distracting while you crimes and treasonous acts are becoming clearer.
God Bless you President Trump! 🇺🇸
God Bless you President Trump! 🇺🇸
Mandatory E-VERIFY
Mandatory E-VERIFY
Thank you Mr. President!
Way to go daddy Trump 👍
Way to go daddy Trump 👍
Keep doing what you do 👍🏼
Keep doing what you do 👍🏼
So shut down the people that protect our borders?
Why spend hundreds of billions abroad to "protect" the USA if an invasion can easily occur from the south?
No it isn't.  Getting your way is the most important thing for you so you can put Putin first
Thank you Mr. President!
Thank you Mr. President!
Commander-in-Chief
Commander-in-Chief
Stay strong build wall
Stay strong build wall
John Mudri what lies?!
You got elected on lies
You got elected on lies
Thank you Sir.
Thank you Sir.
Stay Strong Mr. President
Stay Strong Mr. President
This from a man who is colluding with Russia. He is literally being investigated for being a Russian asset.
This from a man who is colluding with Russia. He is literally being investigated for being a Russian asset.
Keep up the good fight!
Keep up the good fight!
So true! President Trump!
So true! President Trump!
We nerd security borders
We nerd security borders
MAGA 2020 TRUMP 2020 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
MAGA 2020 TRUMP 2020 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Yup. Without a wall we will cease to be a Nation, a United States of America, of American Citizens.
Yup. Without a wall we will cease to be a Nation, a United States of America, of American Citizens.
Go Trump! Keep fighting.
Oh get over it already!
Oh get over it already!
Trump 2020❤️❤️❤️
Trump 2020❤️❤️❤️
Handsome 💜 💛💛 💛💜 💜
Post pone the Union Address  because of Goverment Shutdown  Says the LADY Who Didnt PostPone Her Chistmas Beach Vacation in Hawaii  Because of the Government Shutdown
Drain the swamp.
Drain the swamp.
Build it! Trump 2020 👍🙏🇺🇸
Build it! Trump 2020 👍🙏🇺🇸
WE’RE gonna defend OUR borders!! #MAGA ♥️
WE’RE gonna defend OUR borders!! #MAGA ♥️
Christopher Goodwin I thought so too.... even the tie is proper length.  ..lololol...
Christopher Goodwin I thought so too.... even the tie is proper length.  ..lololol...
Nice photoshop fatso.
Nice photoshop fatso.
end the Trump shutdown
end the Trump shutdown
Love My President Trump!!  ❤️
Love My President Trump!!  ❤️
As it should be! God bless you!
As it should be! God bless you!
Build the wall.... ❤️
Build the wall.... ❤️
Maybe you could end this childish shutdown so the people who defend us can get paid?
Thank you President Trump for your courageous fortitude 🙏🏼❤️🇺🇸
Thank you President Trump for your courageous fortitude 🙏🏼❤️🇺🇸
Amen 🇺🇸 🇺🇸 2020 🇺🇸 🇺🇸
Amen 🇺🇸 🇺🇸 2020 🇺🇸 🇺🇸
As your statement says, defending this nation against foreign nationals is your highest priority so then, declare this situation a high security risk. Leave those Dems in your dust.
Much love from Kenya.
Much love from Kenya.
donate 5 $ for a head count after reading the page...Check donations..send to We Fund the Wall, Inc. PO Box 131567 Houston, Texas 77219-1567  credit card donation.. GoFundMe page by Brian Kolfage..and if you have donated, you can opt to move to the main fund or have a refund..https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Yes Mr President
Yes Mr President
Keep doing the job
Keep doing the job
AMEN!  KEEP FIGHTING!  GOD BLESS YOU!
AMEN!  KEEP FIGHTING!  GOD BLESS YOU!
Best Potus ever
Best Potus ever
Let the traitorous opposition further sink.  Speak to us citizens, that know that to stand is the only way forward, if our nation is to be saved.  God bless and guide our President, and America!
Respect from India !!
Respect from India !!
Pull an Obama on that wall.  For us.
Pull an Obama on that wall.  For us.
You are right!!
You are right!!
You make me cry!
Stand Strong 💪
Stand Strong 💪
Staying 🇺🇸TRUMP STRONG🇺🇸
Staying 🇺🇸TRUMP STRONG🇺🇸
Stat strong Mr President  The people are with you!
Stat strong Mr President  The people are with you!
Don’t back down. The patriots of this country stand behind you and are cheering you on
Build our wall
Build our wall
Libturds are cancer.
Libturds are cancer.
Open the government!
Open the government!
Truer words have never been spoken!  America's sovereignty hangs in the balance. The choice is to secure our border now, or allow the U.S.A. and everything that millions fought and died for to perish from the face of the earth. There is no higher priority at this point in time. I choose to stand with President Trump. 🇺🇲️
Still standing with you 🙂
Still standing with you 🙂
Thank you Mr. President.  Stand firm.
We ceased to be a Nation when you Shut Down our Government! FOOL
🇺🇸❤🇺🇸 ABSOLUTELY!!!🇺🇸❤🇺🇸
🇺🇸❤🇺🇸 ABSOLUTELY!!!🇺🇸❤🇺🇸
Open the government
Open the government
A real leader. It's been so long
A real leader. It's been so long
We have your back. Thank you!
We have your back. Thank you!
Yes  build the wall
Yes  build the wall
Fund the wall, Dimms!
Fund the wall, Dimms!
If we elect a Russian asset then we cease to be a nation too.
If we elect a Russian asset then we cease to be a nation too.
ABSOLUTELY CORRECT SIR
Resign today Traitor
Resign today Traitor
Blessings from Norway
Blessings from Norway
What is a waste of money is to leave the border open but add more border agents and technology.Democrats want to make this a high tech game of the road runner vs Coyote.
Supper powers don't panic
Supper powers don't panic
Agreed Mr President.
If our president is a russian asset then we cease to be a country
#digin mr president! #buikdthewall! #maga2020
#digin mr president! #buikdthewall! #maga2020
Don't back down Mr. President!  The majority of this country wants the wall!
I know why the Democrats are against President Trump.  The is keeping his campaign promises and it is making them look bad.🇺🇸
I know why the Democrats are against President Trump.  The is keeping his campaign promises and it is making them look bad.🇺🇸
Fully support you and will return to work when ever my POTUS feels he can get proper work done despite the Dems blocking everything that makes sense for American people.
Fully support you and will return to work when ever my POTUS feels he can get proper work done despite the Dems blocking everything that makes sense for American people.
TRUMP 2020!!! MAGA AMEN! !!!! GOD BLESS AMERICA!!!!
Kinda seems like the defense of your ego is your priority but okay.
President Donald J. Trump supporters read this. https://drrichswier.com/2019/01/17/medical-jihad-means-death-to-the-patient/?fbclid=IwAR3XppqZyA-wJ2btBugADp-EtFCHit37sYaLxAcB-5RCxWJDnyJir_UggbU   Make Muslym Brotherhood and CAIr illegal organizations and boot them out of the US. And send all their supporter packing, like that Tlaib woman.
President Donald J. Trump supporters read this. https://drrichswier.com/2019/01/17/medical-jihad-means-death-to-the-patient/?fbclid=IwAR3XppqZyA-wJ2btBugADp-EtFCHit37sYaLxAcB-5RCxWJDnyJir_UggbU   Make Muslym Brotherhood and CAIr illegal organizations and boot them out of the US. And send all their supporter packing, like that Tlaib woman.
Let's defend our borders  Trump all the way I stand with Trump🤩🤩🤩🤩🤩
And The Left are Truly Destroying The USA!
And The Left are Truly Destroying The USA!
Bill Klein, you must really hate America if you think any of what you just spouted off was a bad thing.and btw Russia wouldn't have wanted him to do any of that. What he has done is the best thing for America. TRUMP 2020 MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGAIN.
Day 27 of the tRump government shutdown. Trump has a tendency to propose wild ideas out loud and then repeat them before coming to his senses or getting talked off the ledge. An off-the-top-of-our head list: Leaving NATO. Bombing Iran. Death penalty for drug dealers. Birthright citizenship. Firing staff. Firing Mueller. Leaving the World Trade Organization. Blowing up Iranian fast boats in the Persian Gulf. Withdrawing troops and families from South Korea. Nationalizing a 5G network. Withdrawing from Syria, (just to name a few) you saw what happened yesterday. According to the Washington Post President Trump has made 6,420 false or misleading claims. That’s the President of the U.S. Let me say that AGAIN “That’s the President of the UNITED STATES” We’re living in the shameless society, where accountability and apology are just white flags for the weak.
Day 27 of the tRump government shutdown. Trump has a tendency to propose wild ideas out loud and then repeat them before coming to his senses or getting talked off the ledge. An off-the-top-of-our head list: Leaving NATO. Bombing Iran. Death penalty for drug dealers. Birthright citizenship. Firing staff. Firing Mueller. Leaving the World Trade Organization. Blowing up Iranian fast boats in the Persian Gulf. Withdrawing troops and families from South Korea. Nationalizing a 5G network. Withdrawing from Syria, (just to name a few) you saw what happened yesterday. According to the Washington Post President Trump has made 6,420 false or misleading claims. That’s the President of the U.S. Let me say that AGAIN “That’s the President of the UNITED STATES” We’re living in the shameless society, where accountability and apology are just white flags for the weak.
Presley Mark I think you're so stupid that you don't know what your own position is. Have fun with your liberal, socialized, anti-private property wall.
Chris Jackson You probably voted for the communist party.
Chris Jackson You probably voted for the communist party.
Chris Jackson Trump 2020, and I hope you snowflakes melt.
Chris Jackson Trump 2020, and I hope you snowflakes melt.
Chris Jackson you must be one dumb person if you think I'm a liberal and if you think a Wall for border security is also dumb you might be a socialist 🐖 Democrat with no common sense .
Chris Jackson you must be one dumb person if you think I'm a liberal and if you think a Wall for border security is also dumb you might be a socialist 🐖 Democrat with no common sense .
Presley Mark That’s because the average person who comes over the wall using a ladder has more to offer America than you, the supporter of a democrat who wants to build a socialized wall using eminent domain, stealing property from Americans to build a wall that will stop virtually zero illegal immigrants or drugs. Have fun with that, ya lib!
Chris Jackson finish the Wall and take it all the way to Canada sounds like a good idea to me .
Chris Jackson finish the Wall and take it all the way to Canada sounds like a good idea to me .
Presley Mark so he’s going to trigger himself and the fools who voted for him? That’s cute, cause they’re usually too dumb to see that they’re on the losing end of his policies. Dumb!
Presley Mark so he’s going to trigger himself and the fools who voted for him? That’s cute, cause they’re usually too dumb to see that they’re on the losing end of his policies. Dumb!
Kelly Belden While I find your inability to provide any defense of Dumb Donald at all hilarious, your inability to do it without bringing up a party I didn’t vote for either makes laughing at you even more fun! Sad!
Chris Jackson Trump has six more years to trigger liberals just hang in there big guy.
Chris Jackson Trump has six more years to trigger liberals just hang in there big guy.
So since you want to defend the borders, you’ll drop the plan for a wall that will literally never perform as promised.   We need freedom more than anything else, and you are even more anti-freedom than the last 5 dingbats in chief
So since you want to defend the borders, you’ll drop the plan for a wall that will literally never perform as promised.   We need freedom more than anything else, and you are even more anti-freedom than the last 5 dingbats in chief
President Trump I did not vote for you but in my opinion you are doing an outstanding job....let this man have his wall....if you want my vote in 2020 you should end The Federal Reserve.....keep up the good work
Why don't you pay attention to things that actually matter?
Good job president Trump
Good job president Trump
$10 billion bucks and you can't get a suit that looks good on you. Sad. 😂
"We don't have a country without a border" President Donald J. Trump
"We don't have a country without a border" President Donald J. Trump
Russian puppet!
Russian puppet!
you are the man!
you are the man!
Give em hell Mr. President Sir...
Give em hell Mr. President Sir...
Defense from what?
Defense from what?
Is Russia doing the propaganda photos here?  Very nice.
Is Russia doing the propaganda photos here?  Very nice.
In September 2018 trump submitted his budget requests to Congress for the year 2019...in it he asked for $1.6 billion dollars for 'border security", which Congress approved.   Not my opinion, the congressional records tell the tale for all who want to know that truth of what really happened.  Trump came back 4 months later with new demands, was told NO, and is temper tantruming because that childish strategy has always worked for him before.  Mean old Nancy Pelosi however, has decades of experience dealing with old white entitled rightwing males and young children.
Okay so lets be totally honest to ourselfs the wall will not solve all the human trafficing issues or prevent anybody from coming when clearly there are plenty tunnels that have been found is it really necessary to have ppl working without pay the same ppl that probably voted for you just so you can feel better about yourself get over it... I know at the age you are in its hard because your once again in your toddler stage your throwing a tantrum, Im a caregiver so I deal with ppl like you everyday sadly its a part of growing old
Imagine that, a US president taking his oath of office seriously. It's about time. So glad we don't have the apologizer-in-chief any longer. More US politicians need to do the same.
****MUST SEE****: https://www.facebook.com/groups/190731591408608/permalink/550823282066102/
****MUST SEE****: https://www.facebook.com/groups/190731591408608/permalink/550823282066102/
Sure a huge amount of stupid on here must be a snowflake sight
Sure a huge amount of stupid on here must be a snowflake sight
You mean besides eating cheeseburgers, watching Faux Noise, and tweeting?
You mean besides eating cheeseburgers, watching Faux Noise, and tweeting?
Mary Dios T Ama   Our government is SECULAR nor a theocracy.  This, deciding policy in the name of God is not allowed.  These are the same rules that ensure you will always be able to  worship as you please.  God did not elect Trump...unless you feel he also elected Obama.
Mr. PRESIDENT,  You are not alone, You do what GOD sent you to do, and "WE THE PEOPLE" are 100% with you since day 1,   we will obey what God sent us to do in his word ( 1 Timothy 2:1-2) to pray at all the time for those in power , you, and your administration, and all those in authority, pray   for wisdom, protection and strength. You will overcome in the name of Jesus, if we understand what 2 Chronicles 7:14 says " if my people, who are called by my name, will humble themselves and pray and seek my face and turn from their wicked ways, then I will hear from heaven, and I will forgive their sin and will heal their land."  WE THE PEOPLE WILL SEE THE HAND OF GOD, how will destroy all this barriers ( " enemies") that are in the way in the name of Jesus . Amen 🙏 God bless you  and God bless🇺🇸 America 🇺🇸❤🇺🇸
Stay Strong Mr. President 🇺🇸🇺🇸
Stay Strong Mr. President 🇺🇸🇺🇸
GUESS WHO ELSE ISN'T GETTING A PAYCHECK? THE LEAST OFFICER KILLED BY AN ILLEGAL. BUILD THE WALL!!!
GUESS WHO ELSE ISN'T GETTING A PAYCHECK? THE LEAST OFFICER KILLED BY AN ILLEGAL. BUILD THE WALL!!!
<3 MY President!
<3 MY President!
How about getting the people working again. You don't care about anybody except yourself.  Your a spoiled millionaire.
How about getting the people working again. You don't care about anybody except yourself.  Your a spoiled millionaire.
Thank you Mr. President
Thank you Mr. President
God bless you Present Donald Trump.
God bless you Present Donald Trump.
#GoodFencesMakeGoodNeighbors  Saw a post yesterday and can't find it but it really made sense. Something like this-  We all have our homes and lives we are responsible for in general. You try to be good neighbors and good citizens, but in general- you're responsible for your own homes yards and families. And while you care about your neighbors, do what you can to be a good hospitable neighbor, and care what happens on the other side of the fence- you're ultimately not responsible for their yard bills problems or livelihoods. You're responsible for what goes on within the perimeter of your own home, your people, and living space- as does America as a whole. So what happened to that concept on a broader spectrum? Where is the leadership in Guatemala El Salvador Mexico etc? What happened to them taking responsibility for the care and well-being of their own citizens as the United States of America does theirs? Does a portion of other countries hard earned paychecks go to support the American people ever? NOPE- NEVER- But it's always the other way around, America manages to take care of their own and still be the most generous Nation on Earth.  So If other nations can't at the least manage take care of their own citizens, By No Fault But Their Own Fault, what makes them think that the American people have the resources to take care of the entire third world's failures they brought upon themselves ???????? It's Not Sustainable- Period.
#GoodFencesMakeGoodNeighbors  Saw a post yesterday and can't find it but it really made sense. Something like this-  We all have our homes and lives we are responsible for in general. You try to be good neighbors and good citizens, but in general- you're responsible for your own homes yards and families. And while you care about your neighbors, do what you can to be a good hospitable neighbor, and care what happens on the other side of the fence- you're ultimately not responsible for their yard bills problems or livelihoods. You're responsible for what goes on within the perimeter of your own home, your people, and living space- as does America as a whole. So what happened to that concept on a broader spectrum? Where is the leadership in Guatemala El Salvador Mexico etc? What happened to them taking responsibility for the care and well-being of their own citizens as the United States of America does theirs? Does a portion of other countries hard earned paychecks go to support the American people ever? NOPE- NEVER- But it's always the other way around, America manages to take care of their own and still be the most generous Nation on Earth.  So If other nations can't at the least manage take care of their own citizens, By No Fault But Their Own Fault, what makes them think that the American people have the resources to take care of the entire third world's failures they brought upon themselves ???????? It's Not Sustainable- Period.
all you got to do mr president is give the patroits the word and they will fix the damn democrats for you period
The job of the federal government is to protect the people. That was to be their only job.
Very hard to come back in the next term please stop your failing The US management, ruling and directing More umbigity with you   You are not honesty for the world
We all need and want you President trump to defend our border. If you do that you have defend the whole America. President trump sign up to be President of America, to help them to where America was. President trump did not sign up for game in America. We stand with you 2020. Thanks you the best President ever.
We all need and want you President trump to defend our border. If you do that you have defend the whole America. President trump sign up to be President of America, to help them to where America was. President trump did not sign up for game in America. We stand with you 2020. Thanks you the best President ever.
As it should be.
As it should be.
SKULL YEAH BROTHER 😎😎😎
SKULL YEAH BROTHER 😎😎😎
Quit trying to scare the people. We are not a frightened populace!!!
Good ! You are doing great job! 😍😘
Good ! You are doing great job! 😍😘
You're the best
You're the best
Go Trump ! BUILD THAT WALL !!!
Go Trump ! BUILD THAT WALL !!!
I think you can build your wall ... just in your dreams
I think you can build your wall ... just in your dreams
We want a WALL.
Build that Wall !!!
Build that Wall !!!
Lets build wall!!
Lets build wall!!
https://amp.businessinsider.com/immigration-myths-open-us-borders-debunked-2018-8 7 myths about immigration and open US borders, debunked
STAY THE COURSE
STAY THE COURSE
Says the turncoat! What a joke he turned out to be!
YES SIR, it is!!!!
YES SIR, it is!!!!
No borders, no nations!
No borders, no nations!
Waiting for your call
Build the Trump wall !!!!
Build the Trump wall !!!!
Build the WALL PRESIDENT Donald J Trump  I stand with president Donald J Trump
Build the WALL PRESIDENT Donald J Trump  I stand with president Donald J Trump
THE BEST PRESIDENT EVER!!! ❤❤❤
THE BEST PRESIDENT EVER!!! ❤❤❤
Stand strong.!!
Stand strong.!!
You’re married to an illegal. Which of the criteria for the Einstein Visa did she meet??  🤔 https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/EB-1_visaen.wikipedia.org
You’re married to an illegal. Which of the criteria for the Einstein Visa did she meet??  🤔 https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/EB-1_visaen.wikipedia.org
Nacy Pelosi #BUILDTHEWALL
Nacy Pelosi #BUILDTHEWALL
We need the president like D. T. is. 🇭🇷
We need the president like D. T. is. 🇭🇷
Here's who we're dealing with: A tyrannical infant draft-dodging pussy chickenhawk who is so conflicted about everyone knowing he evaded the draft with rich daddy's help that he refuses to listen to the advice of any military advisors.   https://www-m.cnn.com/2019/01/16/politics/donald-trump-isis-syria-warning/index.html?r=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.google.com%2F
Here's who we're dealing with: A tyrannical infant draft-dodging pussy chickenhawk who is so conflicted about everyone knowing he evaded the draft with rich daddy's help that he refuses to listen to the advice of any military advisors.   https://www-m.cnn.com/2019/01/16/politics/donald-trump-isis-syria-warning/index.html?r=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.google.com%2F
AND Don’t Budge🇺🇸💥⚖️🗝✅,,,,,,,,,,,
AND Don’t Budge🇺🇸💥⚖️🗝✅,,,,,,,,,,,
Emergency declaration!
Emergency declaration!
Build The Wall.  We Proudly Support You🇺🇲🇺🇲🇺🇲
Build The Wall.  We Proudly Support You🇺🇲🇺🇲🇺🇲
Action speaks louder than words
Thanks for actually doing what you said you would do and working so smart and hard to MAGA President Trump! Praying God's protection, blessings and favor for you, your family, America and all citizens!
Your obstinate stance to obtain a border wall is perverse as you hold the lives of 800,000 federal workers and their families hostage in this dispute with Democrats.  Shame on you! So cruel!
ISIS DEFEATED MISSION ACCOMPLISHED SYRIA BIG BOOM AMERICANS DEAD
Keep fighting President!
Keep fighting President!
It's that simple!
Oh look, another triggered snowflake
Trump needs to resign. He is a disgrace to the office. He needs to stop with all the lies and be truthful to the American people.
Trump needs to resign. He is a disgrace to the office. He needs to stop with all the lies and be truthful to the American people.
MAGA 2020 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸TRUMP
MAGA 2020 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸TRUMP
I will vote. Trump 2020 💯%
I will vote. Trump 2020 💯%
Come to the UK and sort our Fkn mess out please !!
Yay President Trump!
Yay President Trump!
Trump 2020 🇺🇸
Trump 2020 🇺🇸
Please keep America Shutdown! More Federal Employees hating you 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂❤️
Trump 2020 🇺🇸
Trump 2020 🇺🇸
VoicesImportant📞SendACall too leave msg Now 📞Security is Priceless💲Call Pelosi NOW Fund Wall 202 225 0100 📞📞
❤️ POTUS ❤️🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
❤️ POTUS ❤️🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
What about the government's workers ?
What about the government's workers ?
Hold our ground!!!
Hold our ground!!!
Walls DO WORK!!....  SAN Diego wall Built in 1992 Illegal Immigration down 92%  El Paso Wall Built 1995 Illegal Immigration down 95%  Tucson Wall  Built 2000 Illegal Immigration down 90%  Yuma Wall  Built 2005 Illegal Immigration down 95%  🇺🇸💪🇺🇸#BUILDTHEWALL
National Vote. Lets get it over with already. There is no way 535 Ivy League people can't come to an agreement yet both Republican and Democrat civilians can agree on a national vote. May the best team win. That simple. 🤷‍♂️
Like in Europe! There are no more countries in Europe' it's just a big BS called EU who destroyed valued, traditions, economies, etc!!
Like in Europe! There are no more countries in Europe' it's just a big BS called EU who destroyed valued, traditions, economies, etc!!
According to Texas Department of Public Safety (DPS), 251,000 criminal aliens have been booked into local Texas jails between June 1, 2011 and April 30, 2018, according to DHS status indicators. These criminal aliens were charged with MORE THAN 663,000 criminal offenses.  Just in TEXAS ALONE:  > 1,351 homicides;  > 7,156 sexual assaults;  > 9,938 weapons charges;  > 79,049 assaults;  > 18,685 burglaries;  > 79,900 drug charges;  > 815 kidnappings;  > 44,882 thefts;  > 4,292 robberies  https://www.justice.gov/opa/pr/departments-justice-and-homeland-security-release-quarterly-alien-incarceration-report  Anyone who opposes the wall is giving warrant and sanction to mass murder, rape, violent crime and human trafficking - and there is just no way for them to spin themselves out of it.
Facts are the only thing that combats ignorance.   https://www.npr.org/2019/01/16/686056668/for-seventh-consecutive-year-visa-overstays-exceeded-illegal-border-crossings
is going a good job of making us a nation
is going a good job of making us a nation
18 people (here) posted a hate emoji to defending our nation. Wonder who they are!
Use DOD budget to build the wall and move on already.  Seal the border... all of it.  Can't count on the demoncrats to keep us safe.  Do it to it.
Here is a real president
Here is a real president
The skin colour thing is real still in this world ,God come and rest the case.
Ummm...right???? Is that Why Major Political descions seem to aling with Russian Interests....say Asbestos for 1, Syria, Um inviting them into The G7, turning our backs on Nato, Hmmmmmm need we go on.....how about the undisclossed Plans For A Russian Trump Hotel with a Vlady Penthouse, or burning the tapes from the "Private"  meetings wuth Putin 🤔🤔🤔🤔🤔🤔Right.....alll of this is completely Normal......for ....a.....TRAITOR!!!!!!!
Stay strong! Thank you Mr. President.
Stay strong! Thank you Mr. President.
“Sen. Mitch McConnell is blaming Democrats for the government shutdown. Yes, the same person who won’t even let the Senate vote on a bill he knows would pass with a veto-proof majority and reopen the government is accusing Democrats of keeping the government closed.” - Allen Clifton
As long as u don’t pay TSA workers to protect the airports which is proven to be a port for terrorist, you continue to prove this wall is all about you and not national security.And let’s not forget our borders which connect to the seas that coast guards protect without being paid. Brilliant plan!!
# need work & end shutdown ☆ strong w/- 202045K a trillions toast!
Build the dam wall ..
Build the dam wall ..
BUILD THAT WALL!!!!
You have a funny way of defending Americans, by keeping the government shut down putting many of their lives in jeopardy.
Stop it. Just RESIGN
Stop it. Just RESIGN
KEEP PRAYING TOGETHER  One Nation under God. Prayers, Praises & Faith. May God protect and guide our President! MAGA 2020
Maybe trump should start fining people who don't want the wall, like obama did with Obamacare. Funding would be available fast...
DAY BY DAY YOUR PRESIDENCY IS CORRODING!!!!! YOU WILL SOON HAVE A 0% APPROVAL RATING!!!!!! Putin has already whispered that he is going to spill the beans on you. He is nearly done using you.   STAY TUNED!!!!!
Real News: When #BigotPresident meets #MoronPresident: San Antonio does not have a border wall and is 157 miles from the U.S.-Mexico border.  President Trump incorrectly claims San Antonio has a border wall  Speaking to reporters Saturday, the president cited San Antonio's nonexistent border wall as the source of improved security in the city.  January 19, 2019 WASHINGTON, D.C., USA — Ahead of his "special announcement" Saturday on the government shutdown and the border, President Trump told reporters that "walls work," citing San Antonio's security improvement since putting up a wall.  "You look at different places," Trump told members of the media, "they put up a wall, no problem. You look at San Antonio, you look at so many different places. They go from one of the most unsafe cities in the country to one of the safest cities immediately. Immediately. It works, we have to put them up, and we will put them up. We've got to."  San Antonio, however, does not have a border wall and is 157 miles from the U.S.-Mexico border.  Trump visited the Rio Grande Valley along the edge of the U.S.-Mexico border last week. During his visit, the president took part in a roundtable discussion on border security and met with Border Patrol agents stationed along the border.  Throughout the government shutdown, which has lasted nearly a month, Trump has insisted that a crisis exists at the border which would be fixed by a border wall.  During the president's visit, Texas Lt. Gov. Dan Patrick told him the state will build a wall along parts of the U.S.-Mexico border if the federal government pays Texas back.
Amen, President. Do the State of Union and Build the Wall!
Amen, President. Do the State of Union and Build the Wall!
Hold the line Sir!
Hold the line Sir!
Best president ever 🙏
Best president ever 🙏
Let the Immigranfs pass, but must go straight to Canada, and collect two hundred to help them stay. No more wall just guidance and everlasting to.
Other than selling us out to the Russians, of course.
Understand that PUT-IN has offered "PUT-IN's BARREL BUDDY BOY / TOY" the use of the Kremlin for The State of the Union Address.
FORMER CIA DIRECTOR AGREES DONALD TRUMP IS A 'CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER' TO U.S. NATIONAL SECURITY BY TIM MARCIN ON 1/16/19  John Brennan, former director of the CIA, on Tuesday agreed with an assessment that President Donald Trump presented a "clear and present danger" to the United States's national security.   (Does he agree with former Department of Justice counterintelligence head David Laufman, who assessed that Trump was a "clear and present danger" to U.S. national security?)  "I know David Laufman well. I worked with him for many years and have tremendous respect for his intellect as well as for his judgment," said Brennan. "A number of people have been saying for quite some time that the actions, and the policies, and the statements that Mr. Trump has been making undermine our national security. So I think David Laufman brought it together in a very crisp and succinct way."  Hayes followed up by pressing for a more direct answer. "So you don't think he's wrong?" the host asked.  "I don't think he's wrong at all, no," Brennan said. "If Donald Trump is thinking about taking the United States out of NATO, the organization that the United States and our European allies have, in fact, formed in order to prevent the Soviet Union's expansion for so many years, and now stands in the way of Russia moving westward. This is something that is just totally mind-blowing, that the president of the United States would actually entertain this notion."  Laufman had earlier told MSNBC host Rachel Maddow that he felt a "moral obligation" to speak out when a Washington Post article reported that Trump had concealed notes and details from a meeting with Russian President Vladimir Putin.  “The notion that the president of the United States would be trying to conceal the details of conversations with the leader of our principal foreign adversary was positively chilling,” Laufman said.  Trump pushed back against the idea that he was working for Russia, which, The New York Times reported, had been the subject of an FBI inquiry.
Tell your idol, Putin, that.
Tell your idol, Putin, that.
Then let the people who keep us safe back to work
America first!!!
America first!!!
Build the WALL, the ENTIRE WALL, from Brownsville to San Diego. CLOSE THE BORDER and keep it closed until THE WALL IS COMPLETED!
I suppose Old Man Trump knows Just how much Racial Hate He stirred up In the bloodpot of human hearts When he drawed That color line...  Woody Guthrie 1954
"What you've just said is one of the most insanely idiotic things I have ever heard. At no point in your rambling, incoherent response were you even close to anything that could be considered a rational thought. Everyone in this room is now dumber for having listened to it. I award you no points, and may God have mercy on your soul."
HE IS RIGHT ...they were ALL for it until they realized THIS MAN WOULD DO HIS SWORN DUTY ....THANK YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP
What about native Americans
What about native Americans
It is sad that our previous commander in chief did not concider this a sacred duty of the president.
It is sad that our previous commander in chief did not concider this a sacred duty of the president.
Just took 2 years to get around said duty
Be honest.  This isn’t about border security.  This is about TRUMP security.
Finally a president who cares. Thank you President Trump. I’m proud that your my president. Keep up the good work.
Cool then lets start rounding up all your white supremacist supporters and put them in jail before they commit more acts of terror. Sadly those white supremacist will disagree with this comment because they support hate.
no, your ego is.. and a big phallic wall.
Gavin Rey the Netherlands have never had an issue with Belgium having half of the economic structure nor has Belgium had cartels running the country killing and beheading teachers in the middle of the street for their beliefs. 333000 people from Belgium or not rushing to change citizenship to the Netherlands anyway and refusing to work don't pay taxes, these comparisons idiotic.
This is the Netherlands and Belgium border.  I don’t see any wall, built during a time of record budget deficit. They are still very much independent nations.  https://commons.m.wikimedia.org/wiki/File:Baarle-Nassau_frontière_café.jpg#mw-jump-to-licenseFile:Baarle-Nassau frontière café.jpg - Wikimedia Commonscommons.wikimedia.org
Stand strong Mr President.
Democrats are proving themselves Communists more everyday.  Stand for America President Trump.  MAGA!!
if you dont stand up solid against the dems they will weaken you to their way of thinking AND BESIDES YOU WOULD BE LETTING THE ONES PROTECTING THE BORDER THAT AND OTHERS DOWN take some of that money in the bill that they want to pass (50some billion) to send to other countries and use it for the border . why should we support countries that hate us?DO NOT SUPPORT A BILL THAT FUND ABORTIONS, AND WASTED MONEY TO COUNTRIES THAT HATE US
Too bad democrats don't have such high standards.
Too bad democrats don't have such high standards.
The President --> Waahhhhh Nancy won't let me come to Capitol Hill for SOTU and Lie about my useless border wall. Booohoooo! Somebody please change my Diaper!
we stand with you Sir
we stand with you Sir
Andrew Vincent, yes and 5.7 billion is only 1/60th of the annual interest of 22 trillion in debt
Bob Segal considering most undocumented folks come through ALL ports of entry, perhaps we should build levees and a giant rooftop over the continental US..  It is not my job to be proactive. That would be the commander-in-cheif's job. My responsibility is to vote accordance to his performance...😬😒   Idk where you got the "no wall" info. It is well known what the Dems have to offer and the wall is apart of the deal. It is the pricetag that goes with it.   And how convenient to place a broken promise 2 years after the fact. You know it was a race baiting sales pitch pipe dream to appeal to the disenfranchised and you know it. And dont try and weasel in anti-obama rhetoric to prove a point. We all know it was a Democratic agenda that was haphazardly dependant on young consumers who are, for the most part, young and healthy.
Bob Segal considering most undocumented folks come through ALL ports of entry, perhaps we should build levees and a giant rooftop over the continental US..  It is not my job to be proactive. That would be the commander-in-cheif's job. My responsibility is to vote accordance to his performance...😬😒   Idk where you got the "no wall" info. It is well known what the Dems have to offer and the wall is apart of the deal. It is the pricetag that goes with it.   And how convenient to place a broken promise 2 years after the fact. You know it was a race baiting sales pitch pipe dream to appeal to the disenfranchised and you know it. And dont try and weasel in anti-obama rhetoric to prove a point. We all know it was a Democratic agenda that was haphazardly dependant on young consumers who are, for the most part, young and healthy.
Andrew Vincent,   1) either be proactive or reactive about immigration. Your entire foundation is reactive because it doesn’t come with a better plan   2) meet halfway? You mean by Pelosi and Schumer saying no wall is meeting halfway?   3) I put Mexico paying for the wall in the same bucket with shovel ready jobs and affordable healthcare. Mine is now $1,440 per month and I have bern taking it on the chin for years. Some ideas just can’t be fulfilled! Let’s not act like politicians haven’t failed us in the past!
1) just because my offered solution doesnt meet your criteria doesnt inheritly mean I want nothing done. Stop thinking in extremes. You either agree or dont. Either is fine.  2) Seems like the Democrats are trying to meet the president half way which has proven to be fruitless at the expense of Federal worker furloughs.  3) ...I thought Mexico was going to pay for it?
1) just because my offered solution doesnt meet your criteria doesnt inheritly mean I want nothing done. Stop thinking in extremes. You either agree or dont. Either is fine.  2) Seems like the Democrats are trying to meet the president half way which has proven to be fruitless at the expense of Federal worker furloughs.  3) ...I thought Mexico was going to pay for it?
Andrew Vincent, ok, let’s examine all you said...  1) by not having a better solution other than a wall, you’d rather take a pragmatic approach and do nothing. This means illegal immigration, which costs anywhere between 54-125 billion annually not only continues, but grows in expense. Do you think such a response will increase, decrease, or have no affect on 22 trillion in debt?   2) what does “enhanced border security” mean? Democrats can’t even come up with a number of how many agents would be required, much less generate an annual expense.   3) I’d rather spend 30 billion today on a wall, about 10% of the interest alone on our debt (that no American benefits from) to possibly curb the obvious increase in illegal immigration costs. Then if years later, some resident genius comes up with a better solution, then let’s go for it!
Bob Segal idk but I was hoping 1 out of 300m voters could come up with a solution. My solution is the most logical but least popular which is to legalize narcotics, squander cartels, cease citizens uprooting themselves and risking life here, and use that wall $ for rehabs and drug prevention centers.  Let's face it. This whole problem stems from our country snorting and shooting up the issue that ultimately turned our current issue into fruition.  All of this is our fault. I am one of the few who humbly admits it.  And to counter argue your point, getting over, under, and through the wall has also become more advance as well. The wall is an expensive short term simplistic solution.
Bob Segal idk but I was hoping 1 out of 300m voters could come up with a solution. My solution is the most logical but least popular which is to legalize narcotics, squander cartels, cease citizens uprooting themselves and risking life here, and use that wall $ for rehabs and drug prevention centers.  Let's face it. This whole problem stems from our country snorting and shooting up the issue that ultimately turned our current issue into fruition.  All of this is our fault. I am one of the few who humbly admits it.  And to counter argue your point, getting over, under, and through the wall has also become more advance as well. The wall is an expensive short term simplistic solution.
Andrew Vincent, last century? Unless you also live in a last century house, technology has improved all we build, even using sensors to help see tunnels and other things. To use a medieval analogy isn’t being very truthful   But how do you process people legally if they can walk in undetected nearly everywhere? Plus how do you guarantee work for amounts of immigrants you can’t control their entry?
Bob Segal I just think the wall is a simplified last century solution to a modern problem. I believe in processing folks legally or claiming asylum... which is a human right
Bob Segal I just think the wall is a simplified last century solution to a modern problem. I believe in processing folks legally or claiming asylum... which is a human right
Andrew Vincent, then what you are saying is you aren’t interested in Pelosi or Schumer taking some of the 54 billion in discretionary spending available to fix the water issues in flint? If not, what would you like them to do with the money?
Bob Segal or 100% repairing Flint MI some drinking water. Or solve world hunger for a year.  But hey, it is his legacy he wants to taint...🤷‍♂️
Bob Segal or 100% repairing Flint MI some drinking water. Or solve world hunger for a year.  But hey, it is his legacy he wants to taint...🤷‍♂️
$5B wall < $25 ladder
$5B wall < $25 ladder
God bless the POTUS. #FUND THAT WALL
I found this post from a California resident giving his version of what's happening in CA.. "It doesn't matter what color we vote, The Dems have rigged the elections in California.. An illegal gets a driver's license and is automatically registered to vote.. He then gives his absentee ballot to a ballot Harvester Who votes blue and turns in the ballot..Voter ID is not required in California.."
I found this post from a California resident giving his version of what's happening in CA.. "It doesn't matter what color we vote, The Dems have rigged the elections in California.. An illegal gets a driver's license and is automatically registered to vote.. He then gives his absentee ballot to a ballot Harvester Who votes blue and turns in the ballot..Voter ID is not required in California.."
Best president we’ve ever had!!  He cares about YOU!  The American citizens, Republicans, Democrats and all!
Democrats have ceased to be Americans. They only care about illegal aliens for their voting base.
Yes indeed
Yes indeed
http://www.fox10phoenix.com/news/border-rancher-ready-to-give-up-land-for-wall?fbclid=IwAR0RT-lefSAdy3Lx1nwW_JKW4lEwPFoWDMqiPyedIxxK73YOdowFTeR5IXc Can some of the money we donated go toward helping this man build the wall on his land!!!
http://www.fox10phoenix.com/news/border-rancher-ready-to-give-up-land-for-wall?fbclid=IwAR0RT-lefSAdy3Lx1nwW_JKW4lEwPFoWDMqiPyedIxxK73YOdowFTeR5IXc Can some of the money we donated go toward helping this man build the wall on his land!!!
Build that wall!
Build that wall!
You just need a giant distraction from what's REALLY going on. #orangefraud
You just need a giant distraction from what's REALLY going on. #orangefraud
Agolf Twitler is a Russian asset and Giuliani all but admitted it...
Agolf Twitler is a Russian asset and Giuliani all but admitted it...
Thank You President Trump, Please, do not sway, keep up the good fight to hold Congress accountable to fund the wall and border security.
Thank You President Trump, Please, do not sway, keep up the good fight to hold Congress accountable to fund the wall and border security.
We r 20 TRILLION in debt !!!   We can Not take everyone in the world in all at once.   Protect. US Citizens 1st !!    COUNTRY b4 PARTY POLITICS !!!    COME HERE LEGALLY.
Another Outstanding message to those who truly rely on the President.
We need  Donald  in  N.Ireland  right  now👊
Agreed.  The only problem is it should have been done 30 years ago.  Whether we want to admit it not,  our nation hasn't existed for a long long while.
Agreed.  The only problem is it should have been done 30 years ago.  Whether we want to admit it not,  our nation hasn't existed for a long long while.
That is the goal. They disrespect our flag and National Anthem. They hate the founding fathers and the Constitution. Why does it surprise you that they want to weaken our borders? It kind of fits a pattern.  Oh and just a reminder. Lock her up. Good day Mr President.
"Commander And Chief Of The Armed Forces"....I would definitely say it's about defending our Nation!
Is this a common Paranoia for people with small penises?
Emigration is a state of rules and regulations of life in a country, an organization to establish order and security in the community, mainly on the border, that our President focuses on the behavior of the illegal, with a border wall . Families that cross the border using children, knowing that our president does not separate children from their parents, it is right to return to where they came to Mexico or their country, it is unfair that parents have traveled with innocent children, to continue living as illegal immigrants
You are the cause of the destruction of the United States of America and will fall under your rule, Trump
This wall is not an emergency. It takes 10 years to build knock at the f*** off and pay them people.
USA TRUMP ALL THE WAY 2024!! BUILD THE WALL!! DEPORT ALL ILLEGALS!!
LET'S PUT YOU AT THE BOARDER THEN!
You have my full support Mr. President.... Trump 2020
You have my full support Mr. President.... Trump 2020
“Don’t give up... If there’s a concrete wall in front of you, go through it, go over it, go around it, but get to the other side of that wall.” -Donald Trump Wagner College, 2004
Latest Trump Approval Poll Reveals: His Base (Cult) Is Turning on Him  On Thursday,the results of a recent NPR/PBS Newshour/Marist Poll were published showing that Trump’s approval rating is currently 39 to 53 percent. This means the president’s approval rating has gone down seven points from December when it was 42 to 49 percent.
The Border Is Pretty Safe Border cities get a bad rap as violent, but the Rio Grande Valley is extremely safe. Of the 24 Texas metro areas ranked by the FBI, Brownsville comes in dead last, with 240 incidents of violent crime per 100,000 people. Nearby McAllen comes in at #18, with 286 per 100,000.  Things are closer to the middle of the pack in El Paso and Laredo, which place at #13 and #10, respectively. The murder rate in each city is low, at 1.4 and 1.5 (Brownsville also comes in at 1.4, which is the second-lowest behind Abilene at 0.6). The numbers in El Paso, Laredo, and McAllen are all slanted heavily toward aggravated assault. In Brownsville, meanwhile, though the overall numbers for everything are very low, robbery crimes make up a surprisingly high number of cases, at 58.1 per 100,000, good for almost 25% of the violent crime in the city.  The Parts Of South Texas North Of The Border Are Somewhat Less So Corpus Christi, Victoria, and San Antonio all place within the top 10 on the list (at #7, 8, and 9, respectively). The numbers for all three cities are pretty similar—although Victoria, like Amarillo, has a surprisingly high number of reported rape cases, at 71.5 per 100,000. The average for all Texas cities listed is 36, which means that, again—either Victoria (and Amarillo) have more than twice as many rapes occurring than the rest of the state, or they’re being reported more frequently in those cities than elsewhere.  That statistic aside, there’s not a lot to parse about those numbers: Corpus has the highest murder rate, at 5.4, of the three, while San Antonio has a lower robbery rate than the other largest metro areas in Texas, Houston and Dallas.
President Trump, please allow Americans to donate to the steel slat wall and have our name & message embossed on a slat!  Takes care of financing, and America can pocket the income generated by Mexico on the USMCA trade deal!!  Win/Win!  America First 👍❤️🇺🇸🙏🏆👏👌
President Trump, please allow Americans to donate to the steel slat wall and have our name & message embossed on a slat!  Takes care of financing, and America can pocket the income generated by Mexico on the USMCA trade deal!!  Win/Win!  America First 👍❤️🇺🇸🙏🏆👏👌
Well said!!
Democrats turning their backs on their own constituents, the poor, the working class...... Well the American ones.  Only a Democrat would stick their neck out for everyone but Americans.  Those already here who need government assistance in any form should be opposed to open borders. They will be bankrupting the very programs they depend on and stealing your children’s seats in the classroom.
We can defend our borders without your wall.  We can have border security without your wall.  We can have a nation without your wall.  The U.S.-Mexico border has basically been where it is for about 160 years, and our nation has persisted all that time.
We can defend our borders without your wall.  We can have border security without your wall.  We can have a nation without your wall.  The U.S.-Mexico border has basically been where it is for about 160 years, and our nation has persisted all that time.
We need the wall ASAP...get it done, democrats are NEVER going to agree to the wall...they need the illegal votes...HOLD ON President Trump 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸❤️❤️
We need the wall ASAP...get it done, democrats are NEVER going to agree to the wall...they need the illegal votes...HOLD ON President Trump 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸❤️❤️
WE WANT YOU TO CEASE BEING THE PRESIDENT
WE WANT YOU TO CEASE BEING THE PRESIDENT
For Demon-crats, voter fraud & illegal votes are their most important duty.
For Demon-crats, voter fraud & illegal votes are their most important duty.
President Trump let the people of the U.S.A voice be heard let the people vote for the wall!
President Trump let the people of the U.S.A voice be heard let the people vote for the wall!
Obviously a lot of those furloughed jobs are not really necessary for the country to function. I say, let them go permanently.
President you're saying write.  Our defence is the highest powerful.
Navy Veteran Nicole Lauer tells CNN's Jim Sciutto: "The Coast Guard is the wall. They are the ones out there actively protecting the borders ... and they are not funded right now."  She says she and her colleagues feel "forgotten," as Coast Guard members will not receive a paycheck for the first time in US history because of the ongoing government shutdown.
Navy Veteran Nicole Lauer tells CNN's Jim Sciutto: "The Coast Guard is the wall. They are the ones out there actively protecting the borders ... and they are not funded right now."  She says she and her colleagues feel "forgotten," as Coast Guard members will not receive a paycheck for the first time in US history because of the ongoing government shutdown.
If you don't get rid of the corruption from within your nothing more than a phony.
“Defense of our nation” includes our military throughout the world who have been been used as pawns due to an uncoordinated foreign policy while you obsess on our southern border.
“Defense of our nation” includes our military throughout the world who have been been used as pawns due to an uncoordinated foreign policy while you obsess on our southern border.
The US-Canada border is 5,525 miles long and it receives less resources and fewer border agents than the US-Mexico border (which is 1,954 miles.) The number of illegal border crossings along the US-Canada border has increased by 142% in just one year. Fenatyl, Marijuana, Ecstacy and coke are the most common drugs smuggled into our country from Canada. It also serves as an easy entrance for terrorists to enter into the US. Border agents along the US-Canada border have made statements about how easy it is for human trafficking and drug smuggling to slip through, due to the lack of man power and resources. Thousands of traffickers and smugglers illegally cross, completely unnoticed by border security and drawing all of our attention on the Southern border only makes it easier for them to do so. The Northern border is currently a bigger threat to us than the Southern border, so why is it we choose not to pay attention?
Without a functioning government, we've pretty much already ceased to be a nation.
WALL THE ENTIRE COUNTRY IN SO NO BAD GUYS CAN ESCAPE
Let's build the wall then send Democrats to the other side to inspect it... and don't forget to call the Mexican federales.... then the democrats can learn first hand how immigration laws work..
If I may make a suggestion Mr. President, take action in the face of the Democrat's inaction, call for an emergency to fund the wall, end the Gov.shut down on your terms.
You're the best, President Trump!  #MAGA !!
You doing great job President Trump and we all support you may God bless you thank you President Trump for a great job❤️🙏💝🙏💝👍
You doing great job President Trump and we all support you may God bless you thank you President Trump for a great job❤️🙏💝🙏💝👍
A false man that you are not defending your borders but crossed your borders for your ambitions, lover of money🖕🖕🖕🖕
Take Charge, & declare the National Emergency!!  Bypass ALL who oppose you, Mr. President!  That way, once "You are in control", all issues can be taken care of....fast!
If y’all hater don’t like the President. Go live with Obama And or  Bill and Hillary😂
If y’all hater don’t like the President. Go live with Obama And or  Bill and Hillary😂
President Trump,Many people in the no, know.  you are the man.
It's time to build the wall without Pelosi. She's not going to move on this and we need the wall with all the other immigrants coming. I think declare an emergency and get it done. Yes, there will be a court fight but that's going to happen if you wait to do it too, better to get on with it.
America First 🇺🇸
America First 🇺🇸
OMG why should anyone believe you, seriously you can't even put up a real picture of yourself and the people doing your photo shopping need glasses.
Why didn't the Republicans give you the money for the wall for the two years they controlled the House and the Senate?
Kimberly Fransesca Chapman Consider the 80k employees of the Department of Health and Human Services.  The CDC is great... 14,000 employees... Indian Reservation Hospitals.. 15,000... who makes up the REST of the 51,000? States need the employees, not the feds.
4 more days until the government purge can begin. Reduction in Force rules will apply.  Take your pick Mr. President.  DOJ, FBI, IRS, NEH, etc.  Round'em up, move'em out... Drain the Swamp!
4 more days until the government purge can begin. Reduction in Force rules will apply.  Take your pick Mr. President.  DOJ, FBI, IRS, NEH, etc.  Round'em up, move'em out... Drain the Swamp!
If we keep Trump as president, we cease to be a nation.
I'm praying for you Mr. President! I know the Lord will give you the strength you need to keep fighting for our country!  God Bless you and your family!
Indian Opposition Leaders learn from this by Criticizing Modiji in his pursuit to Make the Defense of our Nation impenetrable u r doing harm to Nation’s Security
Lol, all the Democrats are concerned about the ‘Costly Ineffective Wall’... Where were these same people’s concern when Obama drove us into Trillions of National Debt?? 😂🤣#Hypocrites
We are 1 United nation under Russia 🤣🤣🤣
This is slavery forcing people to work without pay.   No Wall
This is slavery forcing people to work without pay.   No Wall
We are a Republic for which we stand United beside you Mr. President.
We are a Republic for which we stand United beside you Mr. President.
We will see how stuck we are.
You are stuck with her for 2 years, just like we are with Trump.
If we don't defeat Pelosi we cease to be relevant.
In a dictatorship world....looks like you've pulled the wool over a lot of Americans eyes....your all a bunch of fools if you can't see your government is in turmoil. Rise against the machine and take your country back. Don't let rednecks rule the world....lol
In a dictatorship world....looks like you've pulled the wool over a lot of Americans eyes....your all a bunch of fools if you can't see your government is in turmoil. Rise against the machine and take your country back. Don't let rednecks rule the world....lol
Tell the Democrats to stop smearing Lindsey Graham who is standing up to them.
POTUS45 Trump will act on border security whereas previous administrations only paid lip service.
POTUS45 Trump will act on border security whereas previous administrations only paid lip service.
How are things in Crazytown today Donald? BTW, aren’t you do for your annual physical? Borderline obese. Too many BigMacs? The Trump shutdown is damaging the people you claim you care about! Loser!
So stop making sneaky backdoor deals with Russian oligarchs. #MAGA8645
So why don't the people who voted for Trump, stand up and march on Capital Hill?
Bob Segal The DHS and ICE study this all the time.  There are government stats.  You’re trying to tell me that they are all made up.  C’mon man!
Bob Segal The DHS and ICE study this all the time.  There are government stats.  You’re trying to tell me that they are all made up.  C’mon man!
Paul Chiplock, let me ask you a question about this immigration on the border being at a decline. If immigrants are crossing into America undetected in the first place, then living here under the radar, how can they be calculated? Therefore by what logic can a decline narrative be created and be even somewhat accurate?
Maybe you are on drugs ,then make sense your comment.
Bob Segal: The border security budget wasn’t even all spent last year.  Immigration at the south border has been on the decline.  Why does Trump all of a Send say there is a crisis?
Bob Segal: The border security budget wasn’t even all spent last year.  Immigration at the south border has been on the decline.  Why does Trump all of a Send say there is a crisis?
Paul Chiplock, then why do some portions of a wall exist today? That means it had to be an issue before? Why not today?
Paul Chiplock, then why do some portions of a wall exist today? That means it had to be an issue before? Why not today?
There is no crisis at the border.  If there is, they should have done something the past two years.
There is no crisis at the border.  If there is, they should have done something the past two years.
As a former democrat of 40 years, I have never been so proud to have left the party.  President Trump, God bless you.  I am proud to be a Trump supporter.
As a former democrat of 40 years, I have never been so proud to have left the party.  President Trump, God bless you.  I am proud to be a Trump supporter.
Howdy.  To recap: I’m a licensed structural and civil engineer with a MS in structural engineering from the top program in the nation and over a decade of experience on high-performance projects, and particularly of cleaning up design disasters where the factors weren’t properly accounted for, and I’m an adjunct professor of structural analysis and design at UH-Downtown. I have previously been deposed as an expert witness in matters regarding proper construction of walls and the various factors associated therein, and my testimony has passed Daubert.  Am I a wall expert? I am. I am literally a court-accepted expert on walls.  Structurally and civil engineering-wise, the border wall is not a feasible project. Trump did not hire engineers to design the thing. He solicited bids from contractors, not engineers. This means it’s not been designed by professionals. It’s a disaster of numerous types waiting to happen.  What disasters?  Off the top of my head... 1) It will mess with our ability to drain land in flash flooding. Anything impeding the ability of water to get where it needs to go (doesn’t matter if there are holes in the wall or whatever) is going to dramatically increase the risk of flooding. 2) Messes with all kind of stuff ecologically. For all other projects, we have to do an Environmental Site Assessment, which is arduous. They’re either planning to circumvent all this, or they haven’t accounted for it yet, because that’s part of the design process, and this thing hasn’t been designed. 3) The prototypes they came up with are nearly impossible to build or don’t actually do the job. This article explains more:  https://www.google.com/amp/s/mobile.engineering.com/amp/17599.html  And so on.  The estimates provided for the cost are arrived at unreasonably. You can look for yourself at the two-year-old estimate that you see everyone citing.  http://fronterasdesk.org/sites/default/files/field/docs/2016/07/Bernstein-%20The%20Trump%20Wall.pdf  It does not account for rework, complexities beyond the prototype design, factors to prevent flood and environmental hazard creation, engineering redesign... It’s going to be higher than $50bn. The contractors will hit the government with near CONSTANT change orders. “Cost overrun” will be the name of the game. It will not be completed in Trump’s lifetime.  I’m a structural forensicist, which means I’m called in when things go wrong. This is a project that WILL go wrong. When projects go wrong, the original estimates are just *obliterated*. And when that happens, good luck getting it fixed, because there aren’t that many forensicists out there to right the ship, particularly not that are willing to work on a border wall project— a large quotient of us are immigrants, and besides, we can’t afford to bid on jobs that are this political. We’re small firms, and we’re already busy, and we don’t gamble our reputations on political footballs. So you’d end up with a revolving door of contractors making a giant, uncoordinated muddle of things, and it’d generally be a mess. Good money after bad. The GAO agrees with me.  And it won’t be effective. I could, right now, purchase a 32 foot extension ladder and weld a cheap custom saddle for the top of the proposed wall so that I can get over it. I don’t know who they talked to about the wall design and its efficacy, but it sure as heck wasn’t anybody with any engineering imagination.  Another thing: we are not far from the day where inexpensive drones will be able to pick up and carry someone. This will happen in the next ten years, and it’s folly to think that the coyotes who ferry people over the border won’t purchase or create them. They’re low enough, quiet enough, and small enough to quickly zip people over any wall we could build undetected with our current monitoring setup.  Let’s have border security, by all means, but let’s be smart about it. This is not smart. It’s not effective. It’s NOT cheap. The returns will be diminishing as technology advances, too. This is a ridiculous idea that will never be successfully executed and, as such, would be a monumental waste of money. 🤷🏻‍♀️  This is set to public. Have a blast sharing it.
Go ahead President Donald Trump and always with.
Hell yes!! Build the wall! Also stop muslims from entering our country and holding a office
Hell yes!! Build the wall! Also stop muslims from entering our country and holding a office
Quit talking about it and do it
Are. U coming out and announcing one world goverment. With this statement
Democrats hate Trump more than they love America. Thank you President Trump for listening to the people! MAGA - #America1ST💯
Democrats hate Trump more than they love America. Thank you President Trump for listening to the people! MAGA - #America1ST💯
Liberals say it's ok to have an abortion at 20 weeks . That's murder , so why would you trust any of them who support that?? Hillary is for it  This world is gone nuts
#Is justice that God punished Jesus in order to forgive us our sins?
#Is justice that God punished Jesus in order to forgive us our sins?
Updates with the world on "climate change" as usual.
Making libs breakdown & meltdown since 2016 #MAGA
Keep going President Trump we have your back!
Hehehe the infiltration is seating on the throne and eating KFC McDonald's what bitter does he eat only what he ordered himself?
Isn't what they want? No more United States of America.
So you are going to hold hard working government workers pay hostage to get funding for a wall that has an amazing chance of never being finished
You have balls Trump!! All of this is hilarious to us.  So glad you are standing your ground against yhe Dumocrats!
THEN OPEN THE GOVT.-YOU JUST DO NOT CARE!!!!!
THEN OPEN THE GOVT.-YOU JUST DO NOT CARE!!!!!
Why is your picture edited to have a longer finger?
Cathy Bellin tell that to the people who risk their lives every day. They need walls or barriers as well to help them do their jobs more effectively to keep us all safe. Ask any Angel mom.
You better start defending then.  Why are you fixated on the wall?  You do know that border security measures include added personnel, drones and smart tech...why not use those?
Trump is so awesome! Thank you for keeping America safe! Democrats were elected to shut down the government Stand strong gladiator Trump
You’re highest duty is to make money 💰 for yourself. That’s it. You will break the law, lie and cheat to that end !
We need to have the ability to remove Senators and Congressmen when their are not for America and it's people. I want to remove them at any time, not just at Voting time. Also the lifers. Term limits! Congressmen for the most part are all for themselves? Not for us, never were.
This picture looks like um pull my finger I’m in 5 th grade 🖕
Border security is the best answer!Build the wall.Stand Strong!!!
i wish nigeria can learn from you
why are ALL the people in Congress getting there pay there are part of the Government while the little people don't get paid they just get screwed
Donald, just build the damn fence.
Keith Vaz  Aw jealous because your not getting any!  Best President Ever! Vote Trump 2020! We the people back you 100%!
Course it is when there is no more pussy to grab.
Absolutely, Mr. President! Thank you for standing up against the Washington Party!
This civilian salutes you Sir!!  thank you for your strong care and concern for the safety of this country, please don't back down about the wall
I support you.  I want the “State of the Union Address”.  Give it to them!
Trump out !!! You are destructing the world 😤
Trump out !!! You are destructing the world 😤
My kids father was murdered by an illegal immigrant right here in the US. Build the Wall Mr. President! I still want to remain in this nation called the United States of America! No open borders!
I am maybe from Czech Republic but i am grateful for you Mr. President Trump. Yuo are fighting for the entire Christian world. Dont stop, keep in your way.
I stand with President Donald Trump.
You want to open unsecured channels to people who leave their country, go to another country, "earn" money and send it back to the country they left behind , shallow lending sounds risky to me but the people that cause it are suspect at the very least, wait.... They're not American? $&#@!!?
Very good mr president trump  We are we you 100 percent  You are the number one presodent End unite state of american  We love you end you family too God bless you for ever mr President end the family trump
Does collusion with the enemy fall into that category?
Long Live, President Donald J. Trump. May the almighty God continue to guide, protect you and complete the "WORK" ahead, of you, in the mighty name of Jesus Christ, "AMEN".
I think when we have a shutdown we should take the Congress and the Senate pay check off also and see how fast they come together
Blessings and peace be upon you Mr Trump..
You have now become a one trick dog
Enjoy your prison walls https://www.yahoo.com/news/ex-trump-lawyer-rigging-polls-direction-trump-142621277.html
Enjoy your prison walls https://www.yahoo.com/news/ex-trump-lawyer-rigging-polls-direction-trump-142621277.html
PROTECT 2A!!!  I see what you up to.
My SON AND HIS HUSBAND voted for Trump!  Don't believe the democrats' lies!
this president has no time for politics he wants to deliver on his promises to the amerian people starting from his first tenure
Dear mr. President I defend your policies to a point I support you until you go against your oath of office shall not be infringed upon means exactly that please reconsider your opinion unread flag laws shall not be infringed upon is in our constitution not take them and some poor busted up veteran can't afford to get his rights back or her rights back is not right
Im canadian, please tell me what I dont understand. Are you starving your people because you cant build a wall?
The most important thing  The wall
Where are American Billionaires in three digits (Example Jeff....)?  One of them can sponsor the US southern  border wall and end this damn government shutdown.
Donald Trump needs to be impeached and removed from office!!
Call a national emergency and just build the wall!
The best solution to deport so-called illegal immigrants would be ceasing to be No.1 in the world.
Thank you very much for caring us Mr President, God bless you!
The photo is edited so many ways to make this joke of a president look better  https://www.reddit.com/r/PoliticalHumor/comments/ah26x0/trumps_facebook_page_slimmed_him_down_and_made/?st=JR2135E8&sh=03c4d92b
That’s true actually. Surprised how it’s turning out
Stay Strong, Mr. President, Stay Strong! We support you!!
Stand fast, Mr. President! We support you wholeheartedly, don't give an inch to the Democrats! Thanks for all you do.
As President your duty should be to the people and to the Constitution
Keep up the fight Mr President the true Patriots have your back!!!
Mr. President I thank GOD you are the Commander
The days of " give us your tired and weary " are over.  Sorry. Try getting into Switzerland.
Trump for president for South Africa👍👍👍👍☝
Then why are selling us out to Russia 🇷🇺?
Use all seized cash from drug busts to fund the wall. In a sense, this is Mexico paying for it. Done.
Really. What about us simple people having food on our table. Is that not ur first n foremost responsibility. Look n listen to the cry of the people. Boarder can wait but hunger cannot. We r only humans I don’t know who u are. U enjoy ur food everyday n when u eat don’t u think of us who are not paid n have no food to eat.???
could build the wall easily and have money left over if we made 2 new aircraft carriers instead of 3.  we would still have like 10x more aircraft carriers than other countries too
Words from one who dodged the draft....
Right.. so stop fooling around with other nations and let them feel like the way you want your people to feel.. arrogance at its best !
SO GLAD he's our PRESIDENT!!!!
Nancy Pelosi, talking about someone told her about how she couldn’t buy her insulin because of the shut down, I’m thinking, well my god Nancy, why don’t you do something about it, come to an agreement instead of going to Hawaii vacationing. She don’t give a damn either about this persons insulin or her health. POLITICS.
Common sense says build a wall for the USA. Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Shumer needs to go simple as that... 👍
If so, then stop the shutdown and MAKE A DEAL !
If so, then stop the shutdown and MAKE A DEAL !
Stand strong Mr.President!
So defend our nation and end the shutdown!
Thankas for hospitality... :* Anna is importent
Build the wall. Thank you, Mr. President!
Build the wall. Thank you, Mr. President!
Trump 2020 Build the wall
Trump 2020 Build the wall
I adore reading all the pro-Trump posts and noting all poor the grammar and spelling. Don’t forget, all you pitiful fans of the dope, that Trump openly said he LOVES the uneducated. LMFAO  And there you go, he LOVES you. Hope that thought pays your bills! 🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣
Said the Russian troll mole president.
Ryan Gerhart. thank  you m
Thank you Mr. President.
Thank you Mr. President.
That's what the radical left wants.
Yes vote for us President! Together make America great again! I love it!!!!! 👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼
But Mr. President you said Mexico would pay for the wall and not spuriously through savings from the replacement for NAFTA. Remember your promise.
But Mr. President you said Mexico would pay for the wall and not spuriously through savings from the replacement for NAFTA. Remember your promise.
That is correct. Nations are mainly defined by borders.
Meanwhile, the airports are more compromised.  From the "stable genius."
I guess we have not been a nation from day one.....hmmmmmm
God bless you!  PRESIDENT DONALD J TRUMP 👑  🍁
Draining the swamp?? lol. He keeps filling it with sewage water and then either fires them or they resign. Then he replaces them with more sewage !!!
Draining the swamp?? lol. He keeps filling it with sewage water and then either fires them or they resign. Then he replaces them with more sewage !!!
You are doing what we elected you to do!  Build the wall and drain the swamp.  Keep it up!
Tell Russia and NKorea that, not Mexico.
Defend them! Only morons would say otherwise!
she says open gov and then we will talk border.no. you tell her secure border and then open gov. this is a  dig from them cause they never have held up to their part in the past
exactly Prez we can defend everyone one else but not our own borders...stupid
Truth. It's an existential question facing us.
So glad we have you! Just having things be how they always were, doesnt mean you should keep it that way!!! I am so happy you are IMPROVING our country. I love how so many are loudly against you, and its brushed right off of your shoulder. Keep right with God and we can have a wonderful nation! Thank you from my household. My name is Mercy and I am praying for you!
Then, by what you've said countless times, we haven't been a nation these last couple hundred years...
1. Cut taxes.  2. (Try) to repeal ACA  3. Shutdown over national security  Soooo, if you know how to count, we see that security comes after money.  Security is his 3rd priority.  Please, tell me how counting is fake news or a liberal conspiracy...  Sad thing is I can break it down to literally 3 steps, hold your hand through it, and you still will refuse to grasp the painfully obvious and mathematically proven point!
Joey Montaña said the illegal haha!
That’s a crock of bullshyt!!!! Your killing the American dream!!!!!!! Your very untrustworthy!!!!
We Support You 100% BUILD the USA WALL.
Cognitive dissonance on display yet again. Fallacies r trump.
44,000 people have liked this post. 7.6 thousand loved it.  Only a few hundred have disliked it.  We are not the minority.  We are the majority!  TRUMP build that wall!!  TRUMP 2020!!!  I love my President.
if we don't secure our country from RUSSIA.....🤔✊
Trump.... Creating new Democrats with every missed paycheck!    2020 can't come too soon.
Wall or no wall.....he STILL has my vote in 2020!! I'd rather not get the wall, than to EVER have a democRAT be in office again!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸
Wall or no wall.....he STILL has my vote in 2020!! I'd rather not get the wall, than to EVER have a democRAT be in office again!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸
Your doing a great job Mr. President. Apparently most Democrats are eligible for a Darwin Award.
Then bypass congress and build the wall.
Keep giving them hell Big Don!
If the U.S. can build hundreds of miles of wall to protect Jordan why can't we build one here?  I'm pissed.
Declare a national emergency, build the wall and be done with it.  What's the hold up??
You were given 40 billion over 2 years for border security...
EMOJI POLL says Trump 2020🇺🇸
Get FOX NEWS do a interview with you and have them put it on TV..
Good point.  Maybe we should start defending our borders dinner day, Mr. Hyperbole.  🙄🤣🦆🦆🦆
Thank you. Drop leaflets for the caravan saying their not getting in. Dems hands are covered in blood
That money would benefit Americans better with universal healthcare so
That money would benefit Americans better with universal healthcare so
Executive order, President Trump.
I am with you on this!  Stay strong and force Congress to do the jib they promised Reagan if he would grant amnesty to 11 million illegals! They promised absorbing 2006 but failed!  STOP PAYING CONGRESS UNTIL THEY GET THE JOB DONE!
Finally a President who has guts enough to do something, or at least try, about the influx of illegals.  Stand the ship Mr. President, lots of we Americans are with you.
Finally a President who has guts enough to do something, or at least try, about the influx of illegals.  Stand the ship Mr. President, lots of we Americans are with you.
If Pelosi wants the SOTU address postponed, just go live from the Oval Office!
cease to be a nation?  hmm...your puppetmaster would LOVE that.
Stand firm and address our Nation ❤️
What have we been the last 250 years?
#Trumpshutdown day 27 (Longest in US history). Stop your temper tantrum and end it. It's all on you, as you said yourself. Federal workers and their families are hurting and this is not about national security.
How did Mexico paying for your wall become not paying Americans to blackmail taxpayers for paying for your wall? #Trumpshutdown
Behind you 100%!!!  BRILLIANT move today dealing with ol' Nasty Pelousey!  Been LMAO all afternoon!!  You should've told her to take her broom!!!  😁😃😄😀
GREAT JOB, MR PRESIDENT,,,,,,NEVER NEGOTIATE WITH THE FOSSILIZED FOOL,,,,,,,
How old is this picture this isn't the man that's in office right now LOL
What a BUFFOON! And that picture is HILARIOUS 😂🤣😂🤣
What a BUFFOON! And that picture is HILARIOUS 😂🤣😂🤣
God is with you President Trump.....Protect America....
Yeah, sure. Anything you say........is a lie!
Yeah, sure. Anything you say........is a lie!
Then give my native American ppl our land back
The security of our southern border in perspective…. President Trump is asking for 5.7 billion out of an annual budget of 4.407 trillion …. In other words President Trump is asking for $57 out of an annual budget of $44,070 …… think about that for a minute. Put that in perspective…. Imagine your wife/husband saying we’re not going back to work, the kids are not going back to school and no bills are being paid unless you give up the idea of spending $57 to fence in our yard…. This is what Pelosi, Schumer and the democrat obstructionists have halted our government for.
The security of our southern border in perspective…. President Trump is asking for 5.7 billion out of an annual budget of 4.407 trillion …. In other words President Trump is asking for $57 out of an annual budget of $44,070 …… think about that for a minute. Put that in perspective…. Imagine your wife/husband saying we’re not going back to work, the kids are not going back to school and no bills are being paid unless you give up the idea of spending $57 to fence in our yard…. This is what Pelosi, Schumer and the democrat obstructionists have halted our government for.
Thank you President Trump.
LOVE THIS GREAT PATRIOT PEOPLES PRESIDENT ❤️🇺🇲❤️
Do not BACK DOWN! PLEASE! WE middle class TAXPAYING CITIZENS and Seniors, VETERANS IN NEVADA NEED HELP!!!!!! The state where our GOVERNOR is going to Take YPU  ON MR. PRESIDENT!He us all for open BORDERS! HkusingMs13 gang members! Where d oes that leaves us????.? I worked hard my entire life I have no extra money to SUPPORT them!
Do not BACK DOWN! PLEASE! WE middle class TAXPAYING CITIZENS and Seniors, VETERANS IN NEVADA NEED HELP!!!!!! The state where our GOVERNOR is going to Take YPU  ON MR. PRESIDENT!He us all for open BORDERS! HkusingMs13 gang members! Where d oes that leaves us????.? I worked hard my entire life I have no extra money to SUPPORT them!
If you want money for the wall you should declare all Military flights by. Legislators Dry Flights.  Nancy will come to the table faster than the Road Runner.  No wonder she is still here. Alcohol is a preservative.   .https://www.businessinsider.com/nancy-pelosis-in-flight-food-and-drink-costs-101000-2010-1
Your FENCE is:  1) INCOMPLETE  2) EASILY CLIMBED  3) EASILY DESTROYED  4) BUILT ABOVE EXISTING TUNNELS  5) Nothing but a waste of OUR tax dollars  You're a fucking JOKE.
In the honor and memory of every murdered US  citizen by an unvetted illegal I proudly support #HoldThatLine and #BuildThatWall   http://www.ojjpac.org/memorial.asp
In the honor and memory of every murdered US  citizen by an unvetted illegal I proudly support #HoldThatLine and #BuildThatWall   http://www.ojjpac.org/memorial.asp
A hundred miles of 30-50 feet high steel. Will stop illegals 100% more often then an open valley with a drone or camera. THE WALL IS COMING #Trump2020  #Buildthewall
We love you!!!!   Commander in Chief! Leader of the free world! ❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️
Real Americans want the wall.
Put down the french fries and open the government.
COMRADE TRUMP FOR PRISON 2019...MAGA !!!
COMRADE TRUMP FOR PRISON 2019...MAGA !!!
"If we don’t defend our Constitution, then we cease to be a nation. I suck big league!"~Donnie J. Rump~
"If we don’t defend our Constitution, then we cease to be a nation. I suck big league!"~Donnie J. Rump~
Got your 6 President Trump!! Build the Wall!!
Got your 6 President Trump!! Build the Wall!!
Too many delusional people out there that want to keep the status quo.  This needs to get done.
i love USA & the President of our Country.   He did not to go through all of this crap you guys put him through bc he is wealthy yet he still does it, why ?   bc he loves our country !!!
Oh look, another triggered snowflake
Oh look, another triggered snowflake
You should stop typing like you're six years old.
Then u shold start telling the truth. Almost half this nation believe your lies and turning on the half of the nation. Was that your objective, to divide a nation? U certainly have done that!!!!!!!!!
Then u shold start telling the truth. Almost half this nation believe your lies and turning on the half of the nation. Was that your objective, to divide a nation? U certainly have done that!!!!!!!!!
Then RESIGN before you cede all to Putin!
Nick Lorica  oops.  https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.businessinsider.com/republicans-slam-trumps-syria-retreat-after-isis-claimed-attack-2019-1
James Campbell ISIS the military force is defeated. ISIS the idea lives on, and the idea is what the radicals are loyal to. Expect to see a lot of sleeper cells popping off in the coming days, as they run out of options with their supply chain and leadership destroyed and default to "blaze of "glory"".
You claimed ISIS was defeated. They definitely aren't!
You claimed ISIS was defeated. They definitely aren't!
Until someone pays him to do otherwise like Russia, Saudi Arabia, UAE, etc etc etc!!! Our Nation is for sale!!! All for Trump pocketbook!!!
We fully support you President Trump!
Funny I thought it would be bending over for Putin
Funny I thought it would be bending over for Putin
GO PRESIDENT TRUMP BUILD THE WALL IF THE DEMS HAVA A PROBLEM THEY CAN MOVE TO ANOTHER COUNTRY
GO PRESIDENT TRUMP BUILD THE WALL IF THE DEMS HAVA A PROBLEM THEY CAN MOVE TO ANOTHER COUNTRY
The only thing Pelosi does good is Clicking her eyelashes when she talk. Another thing, she has so much botax that she looks Surprise when she talks. It is sick to see her on tv.
The only thing Pelosi does good is Clicking her eyelashes when she talk. Another thing, she has so much botax that she looks Surprise when she talks. It is sick to see her on tv.
Wrong again trumpy...  if a country allows foreign hostile countries to buy their so called president and interfere with our democracy and elections and instruct that so called president to cause chaos and division....then we cease to be a free country....its time for you to go back to your  mother land...Russia
Go home Mexicans and towelheads.
(R) No Longer Stands For Republican (R) Means The RUSSIAN PARTY
(R) No Longer Stands For Republican (R) Means The RUSSIAN PARTY
How many AMERICANS can tRumP force to file bankruptcy (as he has several times) by holding them Hostage- Seems he cares more about RUSSIANS then Americans by fulfilling Putin’s wishes & Dreams then the American’s he is suppose to serve!!   NEGOTIATE the Dems want Immigration Reform & Security also!!!
How many AMERICANS can tRumP force to file bankruptcy (as he has several times) by holding them Hostage- Seems he cares more about RUSSIANS then Americans by fulfilling Putin’s wishes & Dreams then the American’s he is suppose to serve!!   NEGOTIATE the Dems want Immigration Reform & Security also!!!
U not getting no fucking wall. Knock it off
U not getting no fucking wall. Knock it off
You are making us less of a nation you traitor.
You are making us less of a nation you traitor.
Агент Трамп con artist deception and deflection propaganda.
Агент Трамп con artist deception and deflection propaganda.
Trump is right, no matter what anyone says. A Nation needs secure Borders, never more so obvious than now.
Trump is right, no matter what anyone says. A Nation needs secure Borders, never more so obvious than now.
Nancy is on the Tarmac could you send her an Uber?
Everything has been just fine until you were elected now it's a problem
Everything has been just fine until you were elected now it's a problem
No joke I thought this was an action figure standing next to the text haha awesome!
look at this nigga deadass hitting that Jotaro stance
here comes caravan number 5 from central america and yet no wall
Yes defend our borders. But Mr. president how much longer on the government shut down?  The first of March it will start effecting housing. It shouldn't effect anything.  If it effects anything at all  take pay cuts in all government officials.
Mr President why did you lie when you said the 2nd A mendment would be safe with you as long as you were President .You think the 5th amendment [due process should not be held up] Red flag laws violate the 2nd and 5th amendments, now I am sorry I voted for you.
Mr President why did you lie when you said the 2nd A mendment would be safe with you as long as you were President .You think the 5th amendment [due process should not be held up] Red flag laws violate the 2nd and 5th amendments, now I am sorry I voted for you.
I am for the wall, but the longer it takes to make a decision and to act on it knowing the left will never approve. It will also take time to physically build it why aren't we considering that. Time is of the essence .
Mr President the outcome of this government shutdown will be more harmful to ur governance and might make new history in America for the President being removed from the office
Mr President the outcome of this government shutdown will be more harmful to ur governance and might make new history in America for the President being removed from the office
I know you read these, Mr President so you should know we support you and WE WANT THE WALL.
Absolutely Right. We need to stand with our president.
Declare an emergency and start the Wall!
All alone or in twos the ones who really love you walk up and down outside the wall
Stay Strong President Trump
That goes against the Demonrats. They seem to care more about non citizens.
On point Mr. president. I love saying that.
Donald, admit it... the Washington bureaucrats live on negotiations, and you are no match.
Mr. President how the House and Senate vote overwhelmingly for $716 Billion military budget to finance any future unwinnable wars, and when it comes to a very national security small budget, it was denied?
Mr. President how the House and Senate vote overwhelmingly for $716 Billion military budget to finance any future unwinnable wars, and when it comes to a very national security small budget, it was denied?
And get rid of Republican and Democrat parties and be a team player as one
Is this ever going to end this I getting way out of hand for everyone we need pray for a miracle to happen
God bless you President Trump!!!! God sent you to us patriotic Americans!!!! We Love You!!!!!!
Keep up the fight Mr President.God Bless you And protect you and your family
Continue to fight for the United States, don't back down Sir, don't ever back down!!!...  Continue to invite the democratics every morning to negotiate and tell us every evening if they show up.  Keep the American Public informed Publicly so that all know.  Keep up the fight, make the Congress take responsibility for their actions.  I am a federal employee and am willing to go through this with you, Stay the Course Mr. President.
I have only voted once in my life, and I voted for Mr. Trump, we were needing a big change, the government is so crooked and we needed change, Not saying that Mr. Trump can get this place cleaned up but it is  a start.
Stupidity is everywhere..
Yes thank you Mr.President for being a real leader.
.....Then position more workers at the ports of entry!!!!!!
I feel like this picture of him was photoshopped, something seems off
Mr. President, your pick for Attorney General said he is for these unconstitutional red flag laws. Nobody should have a right to search your house and confiscate your guns without due process. What I mean by that is facing your accuser in court in front of a judge. Anybody that wants to get you in trouble or is just afraid of guns can make up anything. One of my neighbors saw me putting my shotgun in a case in my trunk and approached me and said she doesn’t feel safe because I have guns at my house. If we had red flag laws then I’m convinced she would have called the police and reported me. My gun collection is an investment for me. So if someone falsely accuses me my collection would worth a lot less when I get them back because you know the police aren’t going to take care not to damage them and if you read some of these laws they aren’t responsible for any damage. You promised before the election that “the attack on your 2nd amendment rights is over”. So far you’ve have been worse than Obama in his 8 years in office.  These laws put law enforcement at unneeded risk. I know I won’t let them in my house and I’ve always supported them. We already had one death in Maryland because of this law and I don’t think it will be the last. I was appalled that the democrats made Brett Cavanaugh prove his innocence and this law is doing the same thing to gun owners. I thought in this country that you were innocent until proven guilty not the other way around. The gun owners put you in office on your promises to have our backs and you would fight these anti-gun laws that do nothing other than infringing on the legal gun owners in this country. I don’t see any politician suggest we go after all of the gang violence where most of the shootings occur. The other thing is if you look into a lot of these shootings the person had weapon charges against him or her but they seem to always plea-bargain down to a lesser offense because the prosecutors feel this aren’t that important. I hope you take this to heart because you need us to win in 2020. Thank you and take care.
God Bless President Trump.
Don't give in and open Gov't .The Dems are liars and they screwed Reagan. DO NOT FALL FOR IT.
Don't give in and open Gov't .The Dems are liars and they screwed Reagan. DO NOT FALL FOR IT.
What about the families that will be going without food.
5.7 billion dollars is the start up money so ur saying that Americans is going to have to be in danger of starvation and homeless to put a wall up all these years we haven’t had a wall just wake up or even better all of the supporters if they donate money you can have the wall build
Please ride on Mr President. Keep doing the right thing for Americans God' s got your back
Don't give in, build the wall! This Ohioan and many others want you to stay strong!
Mr. President Donald j Trump . Why can’t you’ll meet in the Middle an make a decision about the Boarder Wall or Walls Security. An open back up the GOVERNMENT PLEASE.....ENOUGH IS ENOUGH...
That camera angle does a decent job of hiding Trump's obesity.
That camera angle does a decent job of hiding Trump's obesity.
Close...but your most important duty is to preserve, protect, and defend the constitution.   “I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the Office of President of the United States, and will to the best of my Ability, preserve, protect and defend the Constitution of the United States."
Build the wall! Thank you for standing firm.
Build the wall! Thank you for standing firm.
Tell Nancy Pelosi to ride her broom on the junket trip
Naziism at its finest.  Wake up people.
lets build the wall,  now i feel i need security, when i used to be young i never needed any security any walls
Here’s how to end the shutdown:  All Trump has to do is just ***SAY*** that the Wall is being built and his supporters will believe it.
Love you Mr. President Donald J. Trump and thank you for taking this duty so seriously. You and your family are in our prayers <3
Love you Mr. President Donald J. Trump and thank you for taking this duty so seriously. You and your family are in our prayers <3
Did you pay to rig this poll too?
Did you pay to rig this poll too?
OK trump won the election  in 2016 why didn't  he build the wall then why did he wait so damned long to decide to build the wall if he thought  our country  was in such danger of illigal  immigrants  from Mexico  and other places down past Mexico  the republican had the house for a long time he could  have gotten his money then why the hell did he wait so long to cry wolf now that he can't get what he want he's making  the American  people  suffer he's trowing a tatrum  my 2 year old grandson  acts better than he does grow the duck up trip open the government  up so the people  can go back to with  stop holding American  hostage  just because  you can't  get your  way
God Bless President Trump.
Hang tough Mr. President! This whole thing is just Pelosi being her skanky self. MAGA!
Hang tough Mr. President! This whole thing is just Pelosi being her skanky self. MAGA!
Keep going Trump! This shut down directly affects my income. I still support you.
Anyone against Trump needs to move to Canada
Keep up the fight Mr. President ........  STAND FIRM #BUILDTHATWALL
Atta President 👏👏👏👏.  she should've been back on the bus a long time ago
We ceased to be a nation when you were elected.
We ceased to be a nation when you were elected.
Keep standing your ground sir! We the people stand behind you and want the wall.
Trump is selling out and letting illegals become US Citizens and I won’t be voting for this draft dodging weakling in 2020
I agree with u dear president, best wishes—-a Chinese guy who is eating watermelon.
Anybody here actually live near the border?
Not your fault its in you're jean
Go, Mr. President,  GO! stay FIRM and DETERMINED... what do you have to lose!? If it's going to be is because GOD  already said so... the dems have nothing to do with it...
Go get 'em, President Trump!  We're with you.
Saw Nancy Pelosi, who looked a little older, saying that for security reasons the President should cancel his State of the Union address in the House. She forgot to mention that Secret Service members are ready for the address. Mr. President please give your address. we the people want to know what is going on in OUR country.  CONGRESS DO YOUR JOB THAT YOU WERE ELECTED FOR
Saw Nancy Pelosi, who looked a little older, saying that for security reasons the President should cancel his State of the Union address in the House. She forgot to mention that Secret Service members are ready for the address. Mr. President please give your address. we the people want to know what is going on in OUR country.  CONGRESS DO YOUR JOB THAT YOU WERE ELECTED FOR
The media's new censorship is to have the hosts talk over the live speech as they use his speech as background
No, the people of the Great America need money to survive, we are talking about people who work, so do what is right, must not what you want, give these people a chance to survive ... I voted for you, but you have let me down ...
So says the man with bone spurs who never fought for his country
We the People need to get Mexico out of our butt.
PLEASE HELP THE PEOPLE OF ZIMBABWE!! 😔
WOW!!! What a bunch of moronsllll
Federal workers can get paid if they will go to Navy federal bank get up 2 2 thousand plus 5 hundred dollars and they get their money back when u return to work doesn’t get any simple then that but u r not going to see this on your nightly news who would thought .
Thank you for standing firm!
Mr. President in addition to the wall being built please cut the Federal budget by the 400,000 non-essential employees that are not working now!
Mr. President in addition to the wall being built please cut the Federal budget by the 400,000 non-essential employees that are not working now!
this is wall you should be promoting https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Inner_German_border?fbclid=IwAR1TUt7-FKrtqe7FWduRreN7VZXXnS3tv7JSqhGKczRDGt45ZnhWBecjdnQ
How is this hard to understand?
National Republican Congressional Committee tell Rep.Pelosi to get out of the way because we know there are enough Representatives to vote the money for the wall.
National Republican Congressional Committee tell Rep.Pelosi to get out of the way because we know there are enough Representatives to vote the money for the wall.
But just the southern boarder and who cares about tsa checking people flying in and out of our country?
But just the southern boarder and who cares about tsa checking people flying in and out of our country?
I'll vote for Donald a 2nd & a 3rd time if I neef to.The Dems are trying to destroy this country.
That's what Germany fails to understand
Our president is absolutely correct, if you guys don't understand what he said, or what the consequences will be without the wall, read his statement slowly, think about it imagine it in your mind, who's going to pay for all of these people, where are they going to live. And most but not least who are they? It's that easy folks, no wall, COMPLETE CHAOS, CIVIL WAR and the United States will never be the same again. In fact your constitutional  rights  will be gone. There has to be some control over this you're not all that stupid? Are you?
I agree with border security- but get rid of all the specialty visa”s and stop allowing wealthy people from around the world to come here for 3 months and have their anchor babies as well - it is a very multifaceted problem - chip away at the loopholes.
Says some lefty soy boy, try asking your heroes nancy and chuck about that, oh wait they are all partying in P.R. while all those useful employees await pay lol
Say's the man who won't pay 800,000 of his government employees
Be an online nation. Cyber nationalism. Tax the world. Feed em with hamberders
You are definitely not interested in AMERICA
SIIR...build the wall...you don't have to ask for permission...
He looks like a basketball coach on the photo.
fb://nt_screen/FB-SCREEN-FB?a=%7B%22analytics_module%22%3A%22charitable_giving%22%2C%22title%22%3A%22Fundraisers%22%2C%22hide-search-field%22%3Atrue%2C%22pull-to-refresh-enabled%22%3Atrue%2C%22custom-story-render-location%22%3A%22fundraiser_page%22%7D&p=%2Ffundraiser%2F&q=%7B%22fundraiser_campaign_id%22%3A1954885174817328%2C%22post_id%22%3A1954889914816854%7D&b=%5B%5D
The wall will not stop drugs.  Maybe a few on foot.  Some come in at regular ports of entry.  I say stop holding the country hostage for purely political reasons.  Look up Trump on immigration 2012.  He must have needed them to work his hotels.
Here is an idea if an illegal women has a baby give baby citizenship. Then send them home because a baby can’t be raised alone. Then at 18 then that child can come here legally to get an good education job. That give mom 18 years to become legal  and come with her child  common sense
Except the problem is people coming in on legal visas and then not returning home, thus becoming illegal. You know, like Melania did with her modeling career. How about going after the models? 🤣
#DonaldTrumpTheGeek.. Build that wall sir nothing will happen, no more debates.
Millions of Thanks President Trump.
Amem. Build the Wall & PUT YOUR NAME ON IT. THINK THAT WOULD  REALLY TICK PALOSE OFF?
Mr Trump the correct Nazi salute is with the palm flat. a wall to defend the US is a wall on the northern border next?
11 days later dad. 4 days remain. Still waiting...
borders a must to be protected #pray for us Kenyans to b safe
As a republican, I would never vote for someone like 45. He has done such harm to our country and the republican party is no longer the republican party, its the trump party, and thats NOT a good thing. He makes me ashamed of my party.
As a republican, I would never vote for someone like 45. He has done such harm to our country and the republican party is no longer the republican party, its the trump party, and thats NOT a good thing. He makes me ashamed of my party.
God bless president Trump. From Africa
Fuc# Nancy pistole and chuck gutter ratscumer. They are holding the country hostage. ASSINATE THEIT ASSES
That is his primary duty under the constitution.
I WILL BE VOTING FOR TRUMP IN 2020! BEST PRESIDENT!
Pelosi is only House Speaker and Donald Trump is the President of America, you have all the power Pres Trump dont give up. Fight
‍‍‍‍‍‍ ‍‍  ‍‍‍‍‍‍ ‍‍ “I’m going to surround myself only with the best and most serious people. We want top of the line professionals."  Donald Trump  "...revolving door of deeply flawed individuals -- amateurs, grifters, weaklings, convicted and unconvicted felons -- who were hustled into jobs they were never suited for, sometimes seemingly without so much as a background check via Google or Wikipedia."   NEW JERSEY FORMER GOV. CHRIS CHRISTIE- R, a member of Trump's presidential campaign staff, has a book coming out. In it he writes of Trump's appointees: (Source: Axios)
then defend them with that military budget lmao
then defend them with that military budget lmao
Seems like a pretty obvious thing
Since when did we become such a bunch of scared babies who need a father figure to protect us?  We have a military for defense. We need affordable health care for everyone because we are losing more lives to lack of proper health care. Americans are not living as long as before. Our health status is the crisis.
Since when did we become such a bunch of scared babies who need a father figure to protect us?  We have a military for defense. We need affordable health care for everyone because we are losing more lives to lack of proper health care. Americans are not living as long as before. Our health status is the crisis.
you can only say this here on his page
We cease to be a nation when the elected head of government colludes with a foreign power to diminish our democracy.
The most important duty to you is to buy berders with many many fries.
Yes, and so says our constitution. Problem is, its not their constitution.
Do a CLEAN Governemnt Pay Bill.  To get the workers paid and back to work.  Then fight over the rest.  CIV PAY ONLY
Second, is fu@@ing  with  the  libtards.🙃
Yes! And "Support and Defend" means absolutely nothing to the Democrats their leadership and some Republicans. Disgraceful!
Might wana check Pelosi for a UTI..she talking crazy.
Mr. President thank you for all your are doing for our country. I have a solution how to pay for the wall don’t fight Pelosi all you have to do Tax the money sent to Mexico .
B.true d..weather..she said.papa.bad.
Why is there an invading army coming? Last time I checked it was refugees and woman and children
We the people elected you as our President and we are behind you all the way. The Democrats in office that are trying to stop you were put there long ago and seem to have lost there way as to what is good for America as a free country. The only thing i can see the Democrats are trying to do is push socialism and one world order on Americans. The sad thing is a lot are falling for it. Now my question is " what is in it for those trying to stop the President from doing his job" . It definitely can't be in the best interest of Americans.
The power grab has been made. Be ready for defense of your family and nation. God be with us all.
I thought that to be a "great nation"  We have to take care of our veterans? I guess i wrong.......
If we elect a Putin Puppet, we cease to be a nation
Trump you look like a college basketball coach about to take your team to the final four I love it
Mr. President i am from Philippines but I salute you for what you are doing.
Mr. President i am from Philippines but I salute you for what you are doing.
that's right "borders" both South & Northern borders and ask for a real wall 50ft high and 10 billion or build nothing! Don't make a joke out of this important national crisis BUILD THE WALL or resign
who pelosi and schumer
Why do so many people not understand this?
But I though Mexico was going to pay for the wall...
AMEN,THANK YOU LORD FOR SENDING PRESIDENT TRUMP
Fear mongering has always worked ig
I'm glad Trump has accepted full responsibility for the shutdown of the government.
According to Donald Trump  , If I say it people believe it.
Tell the nation this week how many high paying jobs this wall will create. Mention how Pelosi doesn't want Americans to have 50+ grand salaries
Tell the nation this week how many high paying jobs this wall will create. Mention how Pelosi doesn't want Americans to have 50+ grand salaries
Never give in, never surrender! Build the wall
I don't understand what the Democratic Party is about anymore, Protect our Nation!!!
Stay strong Mr. President - we voted for you and we will continue in 2020
Europe and England had open borders before African and Muslims try to enter Europe.
Except when it comes to Russia
This is coming from an orange Russian agent sitting in the oval office!#putinspuppet#impeachthemotherfucker!
Stand your ground Mr President you are doing a fantastic job. Thank you.
God bless you President Trump
I'm sorry but you need to take care of the thousands of workers that are not being paid. I voted for you Mr President but having my husband work for over a month now with no check well that's just not right. Please get the government back opend
While you just give away everything to the Russians instead!
By the way stand your ground on the wall !
Well lets see now. How high did it rank when you dodged the draft 5 Times?
Trump you had 2 years when Republicans controlled BOTH the House & Senate.  Why didn’t you get the wall money then? Why wait to ask Dems who already said they don’t want a wall?  And why has the Senate proposed nothing as they are STILL controlled by Republicans. I don’t blame Pelosi for this shut down.  This is on you Trump!  And on Republicans who don’t really want the wall or they would have done something about it when they controlled everything 😡
I love President Trump!i will vote for him again
You have many people hoping you don’t get week we know you are best president in long time
This is a future plan...I pray in Jess's name the plan succeeds
This is a future plan...I pray in Jess's name the plan succeeds
I think its time to change the channel on Celebrity Apprentice. A government can not be run like his TV show. He should return to NY while he still has a business to run  with all the swamp he brought with him .
God Bless The President!
We are going to cease being a nation if there isn’t voter ID laws by Nov. 2020.
We are going to cease being a nation if there isn’t voter ID laws by Nov. 2020.
President Trump has explained why we need secured borders, I would like Nancy to explain how Open Borders help our country and how she is going to protect us from Illegal Aliens that murder rape and assault our citizens.   IF she says she is for border security  then she needs to explain why President Trumps plan doesn't work and what her plan is and explain without using political rhetoric.   WE have an immigration problem and I would like our political leader to fix it for the good of the country not for their own selfish political benefit.
President Trump has explained why we need secured borders, I would like Nancy to explain how Open Borders help our country and how she is going to protect us from Illegal Aliens that murder rape and assault our citizens.   IF she says she is for border security  then she needs to explain why President Trumps plan doesn't work and what her plan is and explain without using political rhetoric.   WE have an immigration problem and I would like our political leader to fix it for the good of the country not for their own selfish political benefit.
Yeah, ....well how about defending our borders from your russian counterparts
Just  do  an  executive order  and  stop  this  nonsense.    It  is  not  fair  to  the  people  who  depend  on  their  salaries  to  exist.    Stop  this  government  shutdown.
God, I love this President, elect him again in 2020 and 2024 what hell , the Dumocratic try it all the time, sometimes they even get away with it. 🤔
if walls don't work ..... then why does China have one that can be seen frome space!!!!!
THE IDEA OF THE WALL IS GENIAL IT WILL BE GREAT IF TRUMP CAN MAKE IT REAL
Keep up the good work Mr President.  You've got  millions of people praying for you a d your whole administration.  You are a great leader which is something our country hasn't had in a long long time.  God Bless  you and thanks again.
Before Trump was born,the American borders were secure, how did his ancestors got to America?
I cant believe that many cant understand this
Boy u sure stirred them up with this!
Y'all really trust that a wall will save us? Lmao #ImpeachTheCrook
Stand your ground Mr President !
What happens if the debt becomes unsustainable?
Am an African i don't support evil America is for Americans period close the borders for the safety of your nation
Bruh, Donald Trump looks so Badass in this post 😎🇺🇸
Get it done Sir! Real America is with you!
Wrong, defending and preserving the rights of US citizens is.
Yeah Mexico and Canada will finally invade your country!
Not having borders is how we became a nation... 🙈
Good Morning My Beloved Friend... My Dear... Two days ago Mr. Chuck wanted to negotiate and open the government... This delay causes damage to you alone... You should meet and open the government today... And they will finance the wall... Trust that...
Dear Mr. President,  Why do we continue to produce so much rhetoric about illegal immigration, without truly recognizing the root cause of the problem.  Th major reason we have so many illegal immigrants is because these people are desperate to find a better life for themselves and their families.  Why build a wall?  This is an ancient idea that had a specific purpose in mind.  The Great China Wall was built to ward off intruders from the north that were warriors on horseback.  Our intruders from the south are not warriors.  They are a desperate people lookimg for relief from a life of extreme hardship.  They are more apt to be a people armed with a shovel and maybe a Boro.   They will start to dig tunnels as soon as the wall is being erected.  If we were to establish an economy based project that would benifit both countries it would be more beneficial.  I would propose a system of reservoirs along the Rio Grand River with pumping stations in the mountains to pump the water up and over the continental divide to flow through a series of reservoirs on the border south of New Mexico and Arizona.  A wide and deep canal could also be established at the southern border of California.  This system could produce hydroelectric power, could use windmills to pump the water up, could use the water for irrigation in a very arid desert on both sides of the border and could provide a better source of water for fighting the south west wildfires.  This project could generate an economic boom for both sides of the border, and could be accomplished in a state of cooperation with our neighbors to the south.
Please anyone can help me.   How can contact with trump
awesome! i wish here in finland was the same. :)
America needs to stand United to be strong and safe. The Dems have created one plan after another to divide and conquer us. The more we fight with each other over things that they have brought up or to attention, the less we are United. Our laws need to be plainly defined and strictly enforced. Corrupt  officials, law enforcement, etc, should be held accountable at the highest punishment bc they have no respect for the very laws they swore to uphold. People should fear the consequences of crime. Our nation should promote safety and peace due all those who uphold the laws that keep it that way.
Donald J. Trump , listen man, I need you to open the FAA for a day so I can talk to them.  Please!!   Then I’ll help you with the wall
Impossible to make everyone happy but thank you for trying to protect everyone.
If we don't get our boarder completely secure, our country will be taken over and then it will be to late to do anything.
Thank you President Trump !
Mr Trump....Tell it to Mrs.Merkel
God Bless you, President Trump!
We stand behind you President Donald J. Trump!  We want a safe nation and we love what you're fighting for.  Stay strong...we love you :)
Agree with border security! Since they are against a physical wall, why don’t we try invisible electrical partition? Like those in sci-fi movies?
Charge each time they say TRUMP.
Great Leader President Donald J Trump ❤❤❤
The only ones hating is those from another country. But when terrorist attacks there family they will thing otherwise.
We stand with you Mr. President 🇺🇸
So what have you done for the firat 2 years and 17 days of your administration.  Left the borders unsecure?
My Heart... Cancel US withdrawal... And promise revenge... This shy politics must end... 2019 will be the year of revenge and the destruction of all the oppressed...
I voted for Trump because his policies are for women, especially unborn women.
we also need protection in our homes.  Not giving up any Second Amendment rights.
On the Right Path Mr President. My President. My Pride.
Calling May in UK . Can U C See .We Need Him  NOT U  ?
I kind of feel with those who aren't getting paid, like there being punished for the acts of people coming over to USA. It's all sad
AMEN, What can I do to help?
I c u not paying the other wall the coast guard
you said you dident need your income for being a president  so take that and put it on the wall
This is no power play by us ;WE NEED THE WALL FOR SECURITY!!!!
Thank you Mr. President God bless you ❤️🇺🇸
You're the man! I know you will get this done!  Proud to be an American!  Protect our borders PRESIDENT TRUMP!
Build the wall AND do the State of the Union!! :D
Build the wall AND do the State of the Union!! :D
You are not under attack by Mexico what in the world are you talking about !! All you are looking for is to line your pockets.... if you were concerned with the borders why did you wait 2 years????
pt mine momentu ala a umplut paharu. Nu vreau sa ne calce iar rusii frate. Daca tu vrei asta zi drq pe bune si hai sa nu mai ne contrazicem atat. Agree to disagree si gata
S a facut de ras la Helsinki in vara cand a zis “i think it wasnt putin” si dupa acasa s a cacat pe el ca a zis de fapt “it was putin”. Sau asta nu se da la russia today?
Cosmin Vcn ce strică?
Cristian Marius Bunea ba o sa vedem in viitor cine are dreptate. Initial am fost incantat de el dar pe plan extern e jale. Strica tot ce s a construit de la Reagan incoace. Si daca nu vezi asta inseamna ca tu te uiti numa de o singura parte a mediei
Cosmin Vcn s-a văzut în politica externă. Tu doar de pe media de stânga te informezi? Putin e cel mai bun prieten al UE din motive de gaz.
Your best friend is the russian president:)))))
Your best friend is the russian president:)))))
keep up the great work making America great again!!
Why is it on HGTV ~~House Hunters International - so many Americans are buying houses in Mexico? So it can't be all bad. And the Mexican President already told "them" they can stay.
Please stop waiting on democrats Mr President do what needs to be done, get it done.
Please stop waiting on democrats Mr President do what needs to be done, get it done.
Please be the BIGGER MAN and open the government!
You act like we don’t do anything at all.   Rhetoric
I hate selfies  are people to lazy  to say what they mean  just put a picture
God bless you Mr president
President Trump, appreciate all you do!  Have your address & Tell the American people that Pelosi is worried about her security & not the American security we want at the border + the wall. She does not want you to talk about the border to the American people . She knows she has voted for it before & is doing it to spite you. Have the cameras on her when the border is discussed or the familes are discussed. Thank you!
President Trump, appreciate all you do!  Have your address & Tell the American people that Pelosi is worried about her security & not the American security we want at the border + the wall. She does not want you to talk about the border to the American people . She knows she has voted for it before & is doing it to spite you. Have the cameras on her when the border is discussed or the familes are discussed. Thank you!
Don't open the government for three weeks or 3 days until you get at least $5.9 billion for the wall!  The Dems & MSM are trying to play our President and he is to smart to be duped by them!
At the expense of Americans.
Please “ , Don’t forget the Real Reason you was voted in. DRAIN THE SWAP!!!!!!!! And then the Border. Thank you. God Bless You and keep up the great work.
" I have the best words..." "I'm a stable genius..." "Hamberder..."
Don't give in to demented dems!
I get that but taking food stamps peoples pay checks and so on your creating chaos people will steal for food and be living on the streets put troops at the border give men jobs wall is to expensive unreasonable
Yes Master commander in chief. You are absolutely correct.
Look at the good deal with the Turks president....
If we are a good nation we work with other nations and not shut them out
So many triggered people in this thread 😂😂
Tell Pelosi the illegItimate
Thank you, President Trump, for defending America!
Brilliant so that means you are resigning
Gee we've made it just fine since Rev. War without your medieval wall!
Love you president Trump,
If you don’t pay American Federal Workers & they suffer, it’s on you.  Very sad...
If you don’t pay American Federal Workers & they suffer, it’s on you.  Very sad...
Faith Is Trust God even though you cant see what hes doing
NEED TO BUILD THAT WALL ON THE CA.-AZ.  BORDER, CA IS GOING TO BE A FORIEGN ENTITY VERY SOON...!!!
Fire Trump, Pence n McConnell 🤔🖖
WRONG. His most important duty is to uphold the Constitution. Committing crimes is a betrayal of that duty and the oath of office he swore.
Fight on Mr President. Safety first, America first
He’s awesome no filter cus I don’t have one either  And that is what we need! Keep being a dbag trump nobody cares
We lock our houses,we lock our doors. Where's the disconnect?
Great, defend your  own  nation and can you please stop "defending " Europe ! ! !
No two ways about it. God bless President D. Trump.
Keep fighting President Trump. You are doing the right thing.
We keep voting for trump, it means we keep our nation great and the safest world.
Stand firm on border wall 🇺🇸
What about funding the Coast Guard..?
Keeping the finance sector closed is not wise. Something needs to be done. SBA and people need loans to keep the economy healthy. I agree with the defense spending including a physical barrier.
From Germany , you are my Präsident , help us please .
Actually to protect the constitution...
I support the wall! But it is time for ALL of them to come to an agreement!! If not!!  STOP ALL OF THEIR PAYCHECKS!!
less russia plus united states
Thanks for doing what it RIGHT  & NECESSARY.... despite the evil opposition 🙏🙏🙏 Amen
the defense of the country is more important than the well-being of the citizens that makes no fucking since throw the whole damn government away
Your doing great Mr President! Thank you for standing up for the USA and defending our borders and not backing down. Build the wall!!!
If we elect an Immoral, Dishonest, Narcissistic Sociopath to President, do we cease to be a nation too???
TRUMP IN JAIL! Thats how US will be safer!!
Well, you had better resign then. No?
Build the wall to secure our borders.  Americans safety is #1.  Thank you Mr. President for standing firm and not caving to the Dems!  They are hippocrites!
And your trying to do a good job. If the jerks would leave you alone!
When are you going to start? Just curious.
How about a fence with African lions inside so if they climb over into starving lions.cheaper
The border is not the problem it's you allowing all these radical mu@_#__s in this country. there the ones going to hurt the American people.
Stop paying senators and congressmen and this will end
You look different. Is this you in the pic or Alec Baldwin? Since when do real public servants manipulate their photos to make them look better? But of course, you ARE the #FakePresident.
That’s the most freaking photo shopped image of you I’ve ever seen. His gut and frazzled hair just went away.
Pray for our leaders 1 Tim 2
I wish I could take credit for this but I copied it from another poster The US Southern border is approximately 1935 miles in length, however a physical wall/fence is only feasible on approximately 1600 miles. Recently (2018) the GAO issued an estimate that was similar to a 2017 Brookings Institute study on construction of a US Southern border barrier estimate of $20 million per mile in easily accessible areas and where there were no land/property acquisition issues and would take over 7 years to complete. The construction costs per mile for difficult to access some areas is estimated to run $70+ million per mile.  Regarding private land disputes (land usage, access and eminent domain) along the border area the legal costs for the US government could easily exceed $10 million per disputed mile per incident and take decades to resolve. On top of the legal fees, there would be annual lease payouts to the private land owners estimated at $1-2 million per mile or one-time purchases of approximately $10-16 million per mile. Some Texas land owners have previously petitioned for and received special border barrier access portals because they own and operate agricultural/farm/ranch/oil/gas land on both sides of the border that cost approximately $3 million each to construct and cost approximately $300K annually to operate and approximately $100K annually to maintain. There is precedence regarding Eminent Domain on the Southern border stemming  from the Secure Fence Act of 2006 signed into law by GW Bush 43. Any Eminent Domain assertion is challengeable in court and historically those court challenges have ended projects or stopped projects from starting and or progressing for decades. Previous federal Eminent Domain attempts along the Texas border have led to more than a decade of court battles where the federal government has so far lost practically every case.  Estimates for total annual maintenance and repair costs on a mixed concrete and steel barrier were estimated at $1 to $12 billion annually depending on age, needs and damage.  Bernstein Research estimated the easily accessible area construction costs at $17 million per mile and did not estimate costs for difficult to access areas and or legal disputes.  DHS estimated the construction costs at $13 million per mile and did not estimate costs for difficult to access areas and or legal disputes.  You can perform the math to project the total cost for each possible scenario.
Gun down all those innocent civilians seeking asylum, screw the US Constitution!!
dick.  figure out why the people are coming.  dick.
It is time for President Trump to cut a wall for dreamers deal. It is also time for our Congressman to stop embarrassing themselves by not making a deal
You're going to jail going directly to jail do not pass go do not collect $200
You're going to jail going directly to jail do not pass go do not collect $200
Stand strong we are with you Mr. President
Fundamentally, you are a great person whom keeps his promises. Yet, you should understand the implications of the government shut-down. A handful amount of federal workers are struggling disastrously due to your stubbornness, these people need to feed their family everyday .you and I both are well aware of the fact democrats will never approve to fund for your walls. You’d better come up with a better idea.
I'd rather us cease to be a nation than have you continue to "lead" it. Cuz youre gonna end us anyway.
So... US is not a nation from the past up to now???
I said this before with all the jobs auto and candy makers in Mexico that country should be a boom town for jobs   Oh I forgot Uncle Sam has FREE Aid while WE the tax payers have to fight tooth and nail for help
I don’t get it.....  CANCEL. ALL.  FREE. Handouts. To. The. I’llegals.......  we could build 10 walls.......
I don’t get it.....  CANCEL. ALL.  FREE. Handouts. To. The. I’llegals.......  we could build 10 walls.......
GO DONALD. NEVER NEVER GIVE UP!,  ANS NEVER STOP!!!
Stand strong Mr President...we need you now more than ever!!
Get it done. Screw what they think. Is was important to all of them. Till you came into office. They will oppose everything you do.
Unfortunately our nation is self destructing and may be too far gone for you to save. I am praying for you and our nation
We aren't solving anything by holding government aid hostage. Many have died, more will too, over aid cuts. Its important to make a friggen decision and MOVE FORWARD before section 8, food, and water are unavailable to the group's and individuals who need it.
God bless you Mr president 🇷🇺🇷🇺🇷🇺🇷🇺
SOTU should be held at the Statue of Liberty!
Why don't you start tobrun the country instead of building walls. Control don't need a wall.
And the whole time we have Americans sneaking to Canada for free health care.
Legalize cannabis you can build that wall.
Shivam Kaushal, your not a American!
if we are a nation that does not like our president ...we cease to be great
Laser blaster Paradise California
ANYONE CAN SAY ALL THE BAD THINGS.BUT BE SURE I AM VOTING TRUMP 2020
I thought it was my little pushy disturbing me here in Uganda. Mr president bravo #donald j trump. I wish you became our President too
Keep the United States citizens safe Mr. President.God  Bless You
What nation, Russia? You’re making Putin proud.
Democrats I love America is made in China....Trump all the way...
U need to stop this shut down.  We the America people r getting hurt for what a wall get your money and pay for it.
President Trump told you all that he would get Mexico to pay for the wall
Absolutely!! Stay strong Mr President. ❤️
Even Heaven has gates and not everyone can enter...
Even Heaven has gates and not everyone can enter...
THAT'S RIGHT MR. PRESIDENT. ALL OF US MUST HELP TO DEFEND OUR BORDER.
From day one your emergence as the president was a divine mandate and not by popular demand. We know they don't like you but keep the good work. for if it were to be man power for you to be elected the president you wouldn't near the premises of the White House. No hard feelings just the Good work!!
AMEN and PLEASE pay no attention to these trolls that are clueless to what is REALLY going on - they want to ignore what is going on.....If Dems have their way we will be a socialist country - DON'T LET THAT HAPPEN!!
Chain migration was stopped right after your wife got her parents into the country.  Hippocrates.
He's a BEAST and he's eatn the dems alive! I love it! Winning, winning, winning!
I believe you took an oath to uphold the constitution...have you read it yet?
you're an a****** we don't need no wall and now I just seen that wick is shut down because of you I said shut down because of you and federal employees ain't getting paid because of you so what good does that wall do
Keep up the good work, President Trump. And thank you for being such a good president in spite of all of the opposition you are having.
Don’t cave to the Demoncrats
No....you are wrong.  If we don’t show humanitarian acts the we cease to be a nation.  Border security yes ...wall no!!!!!!
This statement is soooooo true........there is no more room in my payck to cover  police costs or any other costs for people who run over the line looking for free help or to get into the sad illegal trades
I voted for you, and you are doing exactly what needs to be done. PLEASE KEEP IT UP!
Crystal Ward because there's already the Rio Grande that is part of the border... And a lot of them can swim!
Instead of a wall why can’t we build a canal stretching from Texas to California instead? Just a different idea idk!🤷🏻‍♀️
Border security is an endless money pit.
stay strong sir and hold your ground with the dems, they are killing this country
MR. PRESIDENT ! , So Nancy P concerned about security for the state of union ... hmm but NOT SECURITY for our country !!!
Why Pelosi has to go for the trip ??? Isn't she ...speaker???
I want chicken nuggets on a sliver platter
Build the wall and stop all immigrantion until this mess is figured out.
Love you so much President Trump !!!
But our National Security is at Risk and giving Putin our National Secrets!
So then why did you conspire with Russia to destroy it?
Keep it closed. We're all still doing fine.
I am standing up with you you are doing the right thing for our country
You a billionaire that’s so generous , how about you put the 5 billion since your so worried? Oh your not really a billionaire 🤔
Uh, Canada doesn't defend its border.  Does that make it no longer a nation?  What is the definition of "nation"?
Build the wall!!! Stay strong President Trump!
It is news when Trump doesn’t lie.
IT SHOULD & MUST BE!  Thanks my POTUS.
If we don't pay our employees this country could pile on more issues!
Nancy is going for a Coup de ta
What if Mexico built stairs on their side of the wall? 🤣🤣
What if Mexico built stairs on their side of the wall? 🤣🤣
Voting for @trump was the proudest thing I have ever done ...sir shine on
Mr. President you can do anything.
You’re the best 😘 ...I agree 👌🏼
Sorry y’all aren’t getting paid tell Nancy to give the money to us right here not to foreign aid USA 🇺🇸 first always 👍👍
So true and for all we know ISS will try to slip in with them.
WHAT ABOUT THE ARCTIC SEA YOU WERE GOING TO FUND TO PROTECT
Since youre mostly bots  Heres my password  FUTrumpTheTraitor1234
Totally with you!  America first!
We need too!!! I am with you all the way.
How do "they" not see this?
This is the greatest President we ever had!  Doing the right thing is always controversial.  But doing what is right,is always the Best way to go.
Bye, I have to go look for work.  Ramona Jeannine
We cease to be a nation when you don’t support the people that actually live in it and work for you! End the shutdown and let your people get paid and get the economy back!
DT where you get these suits, hot damn!
DT where you get these suits, hot damn!
build an Electric wall its hot enough in Arizona to put up solar panels to keep it electric
SHUT THE BORDER DOWN NOW.
President trump is the best President go Mr President so the liberals you mean business
Thank you President Trump!!
Donald J. Trump, thank you for securing our borders! Please END the assault on the Bill of Rights and our Right to Bear Arms.
Great job President Trump !!!
Great job President Trump !!!
Absolutely mr trum is Right.  Congress need to take steps back and release funds for American Border. Every country need there security then why not America? Support mr Trum... 🙏🏻
If we don’t pay our working people we cease to be humanitarians and weaken our economy
Lmao, dumbest thing to say.
Me to í voted for DONALD TRUMP as Hispanic woman I love you My president
All these people out of work should be your priority, it's way more imortant
PLEASE DON'T GIVE IN - DELIVER THAT STATE OF THE UNION TOO!!!!! WE HAVE A RIGHT TO HEAR IT!!!
This bad hombre is a good campaigner!
EXCLUDING YOUR SELL-OUT TO RUSSIA!!!
How sad ! Maybe the US will be great again someday.....perhaps.
Sorry, my bone spurs are acting up. Cant help today.
Commander Bone Spurs always comes up with a good one.
Absolutely!!! America is starting to repeat history that didn't go well. We came to this country from England and wherever seeking freedom. We came here and the native Americans fed, clothed, and helped us survive the beginning of this great nation. So obviously we killed them drove them away and took their land for ourselves. If they don't approve the wall, it's going to happen again, except this time, we'll be the native Americans. I may be wrong but I doubt it.
Defending America!!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build that Wall!!! Make America Safe!!! This is what the American People want!!! Chuck and Nancy are not with us!!! Keep fighting President Trump!!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build that Wall!!! Make America Safe!!! This is what the American People want!!! Chuck and Nancy are not with us!!! Keep fighting President Trump!!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Stand your ground.  If we can give 12 billion in foreign aid, we can spend 5 billion on border security.  Better than the 25-40 billion Dems proposed in the past.
Stay strong Mr President 💪. Millions of us stand with you.  Forgive the haters and keep on doing a great job. Some would disagree with me on that, but that will not change my mind. Thank you and God bless you.
Thank you President Trump
I voted for you Mr Trump and felt you have been awesome but right now hearing on the news people who work for the government like coast guard are not getting paid I don't understand how making the little n poor people suffer will get the Senate n Congress to back the wall they are not suffering they still collect their pay the don't care about the less fortunate step on Congress toes take care of the lil peeps 💖
I thought you defeated isis and we have more terrorist threats?
....after your collusion with Russia and numerous blunders, of course
Exactly what liberals and our enemies want.
Adonus Lloyd I’m not worried about it. If they wanna get our guns let them there are over 5million Americans with guns who would laugh at them trying to get them. No one is going to put them down I say about out of the 5 million maybe 100 thousand would disarm them selves that’s about it.
The law was rewritten on the definition of machine guns. Which could lead to something else being ban.
the real definition of an assault rifle is a full auto with a select fire but the liberals say anything that holds more than 10 rounds. My point is that he banned something and is not going to refund anyone for them which is thief.
Adonus Lloyd define assault weapons.
Don't be surprised if he does an assault weapons ban cause he already ban bump stocks. He use to support the assault weapon ban years before he ran for president. He has already went against the promises he has made.
I'm with the Government shutdown. It sucks but the Dems are to blame. With you 100% Mr President.
Stay the course, build the wall!!
Farmers support you  and are sacrificing every day so you can negotiate better trade terms. Those sacrificing every day during the shutdown to build border protection are not victims but more American patriots. "The tree of liberty must be refreshed from time to time with the blood of patriots & tyrants." Endeavor to persevere everyone. Resist the Dems hostage taking.
Farmers support you  and are sacrificing every day so you can negotiate better trade terms. Those sacrificing every day during the shutdown to build border protection are not victims but more American patriots. "The tree of liberty must be refreshed from time to time with the blood of patriots & tyrants." Endeavor to persevere everyone. Resist the Dems hostage taking.
That's right! And then who will help the world! Love our President and First Lady!!!🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸❤️ Our President standing for our country to keep us strong, and then we can continue to help the world. America first so we can, as always, help the world.
We’ve sustained this long. Your idea isn’t so awesome
Voted for Trump and still happy I did.  He is a business man trying to exist in the world of politics.  Business people set goals and try to reach them along with bringing profits to their stock holders.  I consider myself to be a stock holder in America and I hope our President can bring our country to its full potential like any other business.  On the other hand all the Dems seem to be interested in is getting reelected, get with it guys, if you can't help make America great go away, we won't miss you!
Great real word @ Respect the real Government and keep Happiness to all the  country in 2019 till our Life end......God bless you.....we are the world !
Make an action figure of this. Major sales guaranteed!!
BUILD THE WALL LONG AND TALL!!🇺🇸#MAGA
BUILD THE WALL LONG AND TALL!!🇺🇸#MAGA
The Dems are playing reverse psychology , ppl will now have empathy and compassion for immigrants looking for a better life; especially, for children walking for weeks, without food. SMH, President Trump's fell right into that trap. Ppl have been without a paycheck, and becoming scared; imagine not being able to support your family for years..
He seems to be the only one in D C who knows that
Build the wall and immigration reform
Keep up the good work Mr. President!
Keep up the good work Mr. President!
If we go to other country we can't go in the way these caravan want to come in we have to go the right way thats why we need the border
You have opened our eyes on how corrupt politicians are. Gas prices are at an all time low, unemployment all time low, I'm saving a lot of money on my land taxes..and I thank you for all of that. Washington is mad because you have shown the American people we don't need big government and you are hurting their purse strings. I can't see why anyone would vote for a crooked politician again.
YES! MAKE AMERICA SAFE AGAIN. USA, USA, USA!!
Liberals want more power but America isn't big enough. They're hoping for world domination so dissolving America is their first step. Of course the borders and the constitution have to go.
30 of shutdown & you can start draining the swamp... just a few days to go!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
I love you trump  I am indian
Who is President not Laura kelly LoL
Then end the shutdown so our TSA agents can get paid.
America First Mr President...
President trump why don’t you just fine everyone who doesn’t want the border wall like Obama fine everyone who didn’t want healthcare that’s one way to get the money
The most important issue for border protection !!! White House policies. Policies should not produce an enemy.
Yes, MR. PRESIDENT:  You said it, and we know you MEANT I T:  Thank GOD FOR PUTTING  YOU  THERE  IN  THE  FIRST  PLACE.  Americans are blessed  because of God choosing you as His President of the United States of America.  We are praying that Gods will be done through “you”.  Amen!!!!!!!
Stand your ground. Build the wall! MAGA🇺🇸
Thank you President Trump. I know you’ll get it done. Build the wall.
Ha! They made his fingers longer and took off 20 lbs.
If feel he is holding this country hostage because he’s not getting his way. I try to be opened minded but not on this wall issue.
Someone lock this Treasonous Trump up before he destroys the US.
Bi pass the Dems .  Don’t let them stand in your way.
You are ceasing our nation either way it goes.
Photoshopped fake news because you are alot fatter in real life.  Hamberder
We are with you to the end Mr President.
Pretty sure  thats that’s what  they  want .    ☹️
That is exactly what the democrats are trying to do.
The thing is, people will argue about this, even though that is one of, if not the most important job of ANY president.
Nice how you spit on the work of the CBP.
-Hang tough President Trump, We The People are with you.
Northern border is a really big threat to our security and safety, but you don't care about that...
My family and I are standing behind you. God always has your back!!!! No weapon formed against you shall prosper. All the. evil talk coming against you and all the hatred can't stand up against God!!! God Bless you!!!! Heavenly Father please soften the hearts of the ones prolonging building the wall. I pray they realize the importance of our safety for our country and come in agreement with President Trump to build the wall. In Jesus name Amen.
🇺🇸🇺🇸2020!!!🇺🇸🇺🇸 This election should be called perfect vision 20/20
I have the view of the US soap opera from outside. And can't believe how pathetic and ridiculous this country has become, tks to the 45th. U guys have no shame? The whole world is watching. 👀
You can defend ur borders but not building a wall fence! If each country builds a wall, what do u think will happen?
Why are your fingers long and your skin toned whitened?
Canada have no borders because of Justin Trudeau
President Trump is a man our nation can count on to do the right thing for our United States.  He is the best.   Thank you President Trump and God Bless You.  💕🇺🇸️💕
Government shutdown needs to end.  Compromise or do something please
Distraction from Cohens testimony I see...
Distraction from Cohens testimony I see...
Thanks for standing up for the American people Mr. President Trump!
You are the greatest danger to our country.
Thank you President Trump 🇺🇸❤️
you President Trump haters need to stop eating the tide pods, so your brain functions normally....you're the reason we have to put instructions on shampoo
I voted for you in 2016 and will vote for you in 2020. Keep up the good work !!  We are behind you.
👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼  People need to understand this. A President’s job is Commander & Chief, his primary job isn’t solving social justices etc it’s protecting our nation!Something other Presidents clearly didn’t do a good job at. Finally a president doing his job!
After honoring God, the security of our nation must be our first priority. What does it matter if we have health insurance if we are under attack?  What does it matter how good our schools are if our children are not safe? What does it matter what minimum wage is if our country is going broke from supporting illegals?  What does it matter if we protect the environment if we don't protect our people?  The people and "leaders" of this nation must understand that defending our nation must come before all other issues - that all issues become meaningless without  a strong military and secure borders.  Honor God, Protect our Borders, then everything else can be addressed.
Dear Mr. President... I have been informed that Mr Barr "supports"  "Red Flag Laws"..... these laws are UnConstitutional and he should know that and respect our rights according to the Bill of Rights  especially the 2 and 4th as it applys to this issue.  Please do not support such Constitutional attacks on our Rights!
unfortunately nothing is being done to protect us from within, don't be fooled into thinking all is well
Its funny how so many are flipping to being common sense Republicans. And so many Democrats are losing base..
And let no one convince you any different !
If we dont protect our endangered species then we wont have an earth to live on. You are destroying their protection. I voted for you, but you have signed away protections for jobs. Jobs are not everything, there is a balance and you are incapable in seeing that. Look up rulers and the consequences of their actions when it comes to the destruction of their environment or protections. When the bees are gone, what is your family going to eat? Everybody knows money isnt everything. There is a balance, you in business should know that.  I'm for the wall, for tariffs that have been extremely off set, I am hoping there will be someone running that is a business man AND AWORLD WILDLIFE MAN
That’s interesting we’ve existed for over 200 years till you came along.
That’s interesting we’ve existed for over 200 years till you came along.
So happy we are not fighting over what bathrooms are!!!
God's blessings will be with the United States. The power of the United States with God 's temple is great.
Simple to find. Even for a dumbocrat https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Border_barrier
100% have your back!!! Stand firm Mr. President!! You're doing awesome!!!!
The defense of our nation is top priority!!!
The defense of our nation is top priority!!!
Good make some arrest on capital Hill for being enemies of the state
Lol back in 2020 lol man you're funny
Sorry but your fighting a loosing battle. https://www.theguardian.com/news/2018/apr/05/demise-of-the-nation-state-rana-dasgupta
Everything about this administration is a lie: https://www.reddit.com/r/PoliticalHumor/comments/ah26x0/trumps_facebook_page_slimmed_him_down_and_made/
Cross China or North Korea borders n you get shot.
So what are you waiting on
Stand strong Mr. President; we are with you!!!
No problem right now president AMLO will help more to México.... Thank you for nothing.... And Good luck with CHRYSLER and GM automotive taxes...
The enemy always on your back.
What about selling us out to the Russians? Is that defending our nation?
"American's will not pay for the wall they will"
Yes I agree #realDonaldTrump #buildthewall
Can we deport the demonrats - please?  If only!
If he builds a steel wall he's just wasting our money.
Put military bases on the border. Military exercises, desert training, live ammo, drones, etc.
So your a “nationalist” then white guy...
Then pay TSA agents for protecting our nation's Ports of Entry
What nation are we if you continue to take away the funding that Americans need and depend on to live and survive in this country? The shutdown is doing damage to many families outside of the reported 800,000 federal employees! People are going unpaid, USDA loans for homes and so much more frozen, school’s reimbursements for feeding children of low income for free are at a halt and just beginning to feel the effects of the shutdown, families that struggle daily and live pay check to pay check that pay taxes and do all they can to provide are going to lose food stamps, College students that have school loan via government funding are now not getting funded and are at cross roads (impacting employees funding and students), people that work and need assistance for childcare are at cross roads doing to funding being at a halt, farmers, and so many more! This shut down is sickening to me to think it is the fix to “Making America Great Again”. I am not for or against the wall but what I do know I am for is opening the government back up sooner than later as it is doing no favor to a huge some of Americans and their families!
This rat would crap his pants if called to duty, that’s a responsibility unfamiliar his entire life.  Big office big talk!  He really would not know how to keep a tight ass when Hell happens.
Why then, did you not defend your nation when called and instead manufactured bone spurs that didn't exist?
Just exercise your right to exercise a national emergency.  Build the well needed wall and move on.! Stop the war between Pelosi and you!  Serve the American people!
Time to step down and bring President Bush back...people are loosing health insurance and can't pay for car insurance car payment...
Now see if you can make a priority of the Dam ...sorry Dems
Did trump lose weight?  And his shoulders are much broader......he must have been working out.....wait...I think he's taller too.....
Pay our Coast Guard Trump!
Declare the emergency. Build it and end this. Only way!
Are you guys building a wall from Canada?
The biggest attack we have ever had came through the airports which are unprotected with this shutdown.
Stand Strong the Nation of Patriots are behind you! AND most importantly GOD is with you.
Im just very curious,im not rep or dem! But i would love to understand how the fck is a wall ever guna hold anyone back from coming to US did we forge they can also come threw ocean or tunnels?! 🤦‍♀️ i really don't understand gow this stupid wall is guna change anything
Thank you for putting America first President Trump! God bless you! #MAGA 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
...Yes sir, Mr President, if we don't protect our borders, we will not be a good nation state but a poor globalist state like the EU members.
I stand with President Trump! 👍👍
Stop letting Pelosi walk all over you. just do it......
Another name for the NWO EU, is Fourth Reich. PLEASE keep us out of it.  https://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/2016/05/15/the-fourth-reich-is-here---without-a-shot-being-fired/
Nancy wants protection for her. Trump wants protection for the whole country!
The Canadian border is open because it's okay so far.  The Mexican border is far from safe and needs to be walled!!!
This is the soul purpose of the government.
Which nation is he talking about? Russia or the U.S.?
It’d just a campaign promise to your base.  Keep it up your base isn’t enough to get you elected in 2020 .
Hold the line . Leadership like a boss. I am so proud you are my President.
Mr president Trump the great 👍
Agree need wall, but don't keep punishing the working class to get it.  If shutdown keeps going, the next thing we'll face is a major Recession.   No money to pay bills, let alone buy anything or even go out to eat.  Use your executive order and end the shutdown
The  real  enemy  is  within. Trust  me.
Russia has you in their pocket. That’s why you can’t stand up to Putin.
Donald J. Trump is the best President & Leader we ever had.
If we don’t have people to defend our nation, a wall is just a wall
You are the only politician working for the people to protect our country.
Of course-Any Country should have safety.
Thank you Mr.President!!!Stay the course...Build that wall!!!
Maybe fund the TSA so every boarder is better protected?
Stand you ground, build that wall
Just say no to open borders.
We need you in Sweden. Our prime minister is like a pajamas boy.
Amen to common sense and love of country.
Hmmm. So Nancy won't let Trump give the SOTU speech in the House. Sen. Rand Paul says Trump should do it in the Senate. Both those venues suggest seats filled by "tickets" given to radical protestors (like at hearings) liable to be disruptive and removed. On the radio yesterday, Rush suggested Trump rent a gynormous stadium like he does for his rallys, let the American people fill it, and give his SOTU there. Imagine a captive audience of constituents who WANT to hear what he says, viral videos on the internet so Americans can see and hear what POTUS wants us to know, and what the MSM will cut with commercials or edit out.
Sheldon I just see a man not a color. Thank God we are free to vote for who we want. God bless the USA.
You should just resign: it would protect our nation a whole lot.
OMG does this really need explaining.
****" 100% "American and Love His People , Great Lion Rora Our Beloved Lion King....!!!! :) " ****
Well I know I'm going out of state to vote in 2020 just so the orange faced baby handed devil doesn't get that second term
Well I know I'm going out of state to vote in 2020 just so the orange faced baby handed devil doesn't get that second term
Your most important duty is to resign and leave the fuckin country bc YOU AINT JACK SHIEEET!!! 😂😭
This has to STOP! https://insider.foxnews.com/2015/03/02/irs-defends-giving-refunds-illegal-immigrants
Stay tough President Trump! We know you truly  have the best interest for our nation unlike the rest of the government officials. Go in fighting... you got this
We need to get Flint clean water, fix are D rated infrastructure,  stop gun violence, and pay people a living wage.
Americans should pay a visit to the homes of Pelosi or other Democrats in the Congress.Find out whether their homes have no walls. Ask them why the have walls all over.
Americans should pay a visit to the homes of Pelosi or other Democrats in the Congress.Find out whether their homes have no walls. Ask them why the have walls all over.
do the wall -do the wall  do the wall,,,,,, with snipers too,,,
Nancy got TRUMPED! STAY THERE AND DO YOUR JOB!
Nancy got TRUMPED! STAY THERE AND DO YOUR JOB!
Good thing they're not under attack
Just give him the ok for the damn wall. So government employees can have pay
Mr PRESIDENT,  PLEASE FORCE the IRS to immediately STOP  giving tax refunds to illegal aliens!
this country has been a free for all for decades!!!! Build that wall Mr. Trump!!! America supports you!!! TRUMP 2020!!!!
I do not see anything wrong by securing our borders.  Entering LEGALLY was and is always an option.  God bless you MR. President.  Hold your grounds in Making America Great Again.  Looking at Europe's current crime crisis from illegal immigration only praying that wall will be built and built soon.
Our nation needs a defense from you!
So declare a state of emergency already!
History will not be kind to Trump and rightfully so.
Praying for our faithful President!💖
Thank God for our President..strong and powerful
Hope she cancels your so called state of the union! We all know what state we’re in these days!
All of them voted to Trump as refugees Mohamed Coméz and loe chan  WTF
Use your power and build the wall. Clearly the dems will not concead
Defend it against the liberals 1st ...
And why is your suit only wrinkled on your left side all the time?  Is that the side you sleep on when in the Oval office?
In the last election I don't see how anyone could have voted, the people were not given an adequate selection of candidates yet, forced to vote for what they think is the lesser of 2 evils, sad neither side can still get anything done,.. Years later the same thing is happening thus proving the systems broken. Yall think its going to get better you are sadly mistaken
Will c when were homeless without pay but still have to be at work by 4. Trump 2020 all the way but boss you give me a check and I help protect this county I can't do it on E.
We stand with you Mr President
🦅❤️🇺🇸🙏🏻✝️🙏🏻🇺🇸❤️🦅 GOD bless America!
Thank you, President Trump.
Praying  for our President  and our Nation
Don't give up Mr President
Truly, there is never a secured nation without border security.
Tell the Dems to stick it where the sun don't shine, We want money NOW for the wall.
Stay with it Mr. President. We want border security.
You are not doing a good job . Time to lockdown the Democrats no movement out of the country until the wall is built
Amazing #MAGA #2020 Mr President
Do anybody remember when he had that show on television he was firing everybody just think about it for a minute he's the same way as he is now he should not be president of the United States
You must be the people that's got it made already you forgot the people that work everyday who suffers out here but don't forget I asked the Democrats to go to the table and resolve this wall situation which day is right we do need to build a wall but the thing is is that we got to make sure that nobody is lining their pockets with money can you agree with me on that one
Cheap fast and dirty, President Trump... first 10 miles inside the border is a temp military base... new rules, no cost... What happens when you trespass on a base without authorization? No Congress needed, executive order... done and done
I support you your excellency
We ceased to be a nation when YOU got elected by the Electoral College, NOT the American People.
You can add cheese to my burger ..tax me baby I want that tax . immigration is your yelling for da wall
So you want me to put mo cheese on my burger for wall tax
As indeed every democratically elected leader should do.
#TheLyingBullyingBuffoon is incompetent.
Yes we must defend our boarders. And our hamburgers!
Which country is that? Asking for a friend in Russia.
People don't give up on him, there are 5 other very happy years coming up with President Trump😁👌
If security is top priority DO NOT DIVIDE ISRAEL!
If security is top priority DO NOT DIVIDE ISRAEL!
Agreed!  Keep fighting President Trump!
GOT YOUR BACK MR PRESIDENT - also please fix healthcare Obamacare 🤢
Who is going to split the ham
I think that this isn't best shot with that corner piece of the flag 😁
Let him do his job! He is protecting all our interests!
Some want wall, and I just want for cholesterol to hurry up.
Keep standing strong Mr. President.  We are behind you all the way 100%.
Extinction is knocking at our door .....and borders
Andrew David Johnson  clearly you didn’t hear the story about the guy who flew with a handgun two days ago...  https://www.nytimes.com/2019/01/14/us/delta-passenger-gun.amp.html
Matthew Zabor tsa has already stayed that they are doing the job and have yet to encounter a problem
Why not get the government open so TSA can do its job then????
Ummm your finger looks longer...strange
Well, that is actually what you were elected to do...
bless our country mr, president truimp . the ppl . loves you
Please mr president u r our last hope to bringing peace in afganistan do more
With you 100% Sir.  Stand your ground!
Yes it is.  If only you would really do your duty, instead of trying to divide the nation with paranoia
He will get it done he's a business man👊👊🙌🤜🤛
Then maybe you shouldn’t have conspired with Putin.
He's CAPTAIN AMERICA  to me !!!
True so stop wasting time and SECURE OUR BORDERS
Just another lying politician.   Backstabber.   Putin’s B****.  39% approval rating.  🤣
Very True!  Thank You President Trump!
Funny how many families are going without food so they can get to work or medicine he thinks this is a joke bc he aint going without I bet he couldn't live one day in the wk of the average citizen therefore has no empathy as to what they are going through open the dam government pay your employees and then discuss the stupid wall......If it was so important than why not do this when you had both the house and congress instead you feed your wealthy friends like the poor lil boy at school who had no friends until he bought them
I voted for Trump and he has fixed a lot of lingering problems and done a lot of good BUT...it is so easy for us who are not Federal employees to say "Build The Wall" while some are losing their homes and going to food banks because they cannot even buy food right now. There has to be a better way of doing this than causing such good hard working people with children to suffer greatly....:(
Just keep doing what you're doing President Trump!!
Rachel Hokanson You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Keep fighting for what we need, Mr. President. This could be our last real chance to get the wall that we need and start doing things right at our border, which is best for all. The folks missing pay now will eventually get paid. This goes beyond that for so many reasons, like our children’s future. Don’t give in. That’s what the Left is hoping you’ll do, but you can’t. 💪🏼💙❤️🇺🇸🙏🏻
That is the whole point as the elite and super rich want cheap labour that is easy to control and won't stand up and fight back.
enough already call for a  state of emergency and  be done with it.
Yes build the wall then we can start fixing other problems.  Keep up the good work sir
Just do it. you're the president. but REMIND the German's wall went dawn, the china wall is a barrier for the development and communication.  use intelligence, use technology. use ELECTRIC FENCE, SOLAR ENERGY, CAMERAS, BUILD  houses for soldiers. every five miles, do a better job. stop to talk. act. 🇲🇾
That's what the demorats want!
He is focused on the right stuff.
We are the American people support you appreciate you and pray for you and God bless you
I see the trolls are out in force to try to negate the amazing accomplishments of President Trump.  Trump 2020!!!!
What good are borders without a functioning government.
Why the delay on implementing sanctions on Russia, and lack of funding for a cyber security task force to prevent further election hacking?
I don't trust William Barr.
We support you and thank you for your tireless efforts toward our safety and security. 2020 🇺🇸🇺🇸
IF THE BORDERS ARE NOT PROTECTED THERE IS GOING TO BE AN INVASIVE INMIGRATION!!!!!!
Is this the PHOTOSHOPPED photo everyone is talking about? Making your waist look smaller (not possible with all that fast food you eat) and making those baby hands look BIGGER?
Thank you President Trump 🇺🇸
I am with all Trump voters who will vote for him in 220.:-)
Lee Grant well bitch I replied so go f your self
Lee Grant  you are obviously a trump cocksucker.... if you mean the current speaker no not a fan but I wouldn’t support trump because he could careless about you or me trust me I have seen his 20 plus years of destruction from AC to Fort Lauderdale so don’t come at me you little cocksucker..... I served my country unlike the draft dodger 🖕🏻
Jarrod Williams I would reply...but you’re obviously a Nancy.  Good day
All you are looking for is to line your pockets.... if you were concerned with the boarders why did you wait 2yrs????
You put a wall over our exonomy
President Trump Is Right !!
Ok so what about north border hey they are coming in from Canada...😒
This is the beginning of martial law
Time to fire people,  30 days of shutdown approaching fast😂
Job one !  And helping us in protecting our nation from  Rouge  Democrats  who swallowed the socialist rotten bait   hook line and sinker !  And  the damn bobber !
Job one !  And helping us in protecting our nation from  Rouge  Democrats  who swallowed the socialist rotten bait   hook line and sinker !  And  the damn bobber !
Put them on the no-fly list until we have America’s borders safe
Thank you President Trump!!
@realDonaldTrump @SenateMajLdr Ted Dobias Time: Secure our Nation’s Security & Border, Army Corps of Engineers should build/maintain southern border: "Mission to "Deliver vital public and military engineering services; in peace & war to strengthen our Nation's security." https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_Army_Corps_of_Engineers
Unfortunately, My President is starting to kowtow to the Democrats.
Isn't your job to be president for all of the people and not just one party. OPEN THE GOV'T,  unless, of course you need Ann Coulter's permission? How about Hannity's?
Well, as pence said: they’ve caught 17,000 ppl trying to enter illegally. Seems the boarder we have now works just fine.
If we don't impeach this crook, we cease to be a nation!
Yes , Can’t wait until the 30 days are over new changes!
Thank You my/our President Donald Trump. Blessings
Weapons of mass destruction turned out to be a lie.  This could be one too.
Weapons of mass destruction turned out to be a lie.  This could be one too.
The same happens if we don't defend our 2nd amendment sir. You AG nomination is an enemy of the 2nd.
You left all the ports unguarded
Save our daughters from abduction, sadism, and slavery. Safe Borders, Safe Life
We've been a nation all this time. It takes this dude to come and tell us we're not?? I'm really getting tired of you bad-mouthing American Trump
We will always prevail with Trumps keen political skills
Wow you’re hands look so extra towards tiny in this poster. You need a better graphic designer.
Gooooo President Trump!!!  We are with you sir.
Stay strong Mr. President. This is our only chance to add to our existing fence. Thank you for all you do.
Weapons of Mass Destruction have been found in Mexico! #MAGA
Absolutely.    Declare State of Emergancy and get our Wall built !!!  Get this crap over with. That’ll Shut Down Pissy Palosi and Commi Chuck.
BUILD THE WALL OR SHUT IT ALL DOWN!
But  pease  look  into  GMO  foods  which  are  killing  us  &  the  FDA  is  behind  so  many  coverups https://explainlife.com/top-5-additives-banned-in-europe-and-russia-but-approved-by-the-fda-in-u-s-7609/?utm_source=Explainlife.com+Newsletter&utm_medium=email
Get it done!!!! Thank you for doing what is good for America
We have your back and Proud to call you President!!!
Then passing executive order and build the wall we need it
The bell tolls for thee. Impeachment is around the corner
Love ❤️ God bless you (English) אַלוהום יברך אותך (Hebrew) خدا خیرت بده (persian)
If we dont care for our citizens we cease to have humanity
If we dont care for our citizens we cease to have humanity
Alright enough I agree with the wall but that's a little dramatic
Why is your AJ choice agreeing with Maxine Waters over red flag laws and said he's for gun control. Making it hard for me to see voting for you again.
Thank you, President Trump. ♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️
Maybe you should build a army base at the border & patrol from there ( guess the Congress would be opposed to that also)
YES...and that's why we love you and voted for you and will vote for you again.
As a filthy rich and cold blooded businessman...... my priority is???????
Please start a civil war!
Thank You President Trump, may God Bless you.
Can you please repost this BS twice a week?.... 3 times a day is too much border security already!
President Trump please keep standing strong against these anti-American, Globalists, Open Borders people! "We The People" want you to build the Wall for our protection! Thank you and God bless you, Sir!💖
Now, who could possibly have a problem with his statement? People who don't care about their country...😠
#DonaldTrump you have Got to STOP the chemtrail spraying and the HAARP machines!!! It is killing everything on this planet!!!!!
Question...why doesn't he build it?
What fancy propaganda pics he has.  Wonder if he has "propaganda pics" penciled in his schedule
Thank you Mr. President for taking the responsibility of keeping the people of our nation safe.  It appalls me to see how lightly congress is taking this matter.  May God bless you and keep you strong through this battle.
Ummm the only way sovereignty is taken away is if a nation marches on our nation and no one tries to stop them. Nice try feat mongering my guy. That’s not how it works
The single most important role of the Government is the protection of its citizens
Stick to your guns...let everyone know where NANCY IS...
So do it and the hell with the Nancy's. And chucks. Don't buckle , they need to listen to the people.
Thank God for President Trump.
Real Americans support President Donald J. Trump!  MAGA!!  Impeach Nancy Pelosi, Communist Pelosi.
Real Americans support President Donald J. Trump!  MAGA!!  Impeach Nancy Pelosi, Communist Pelosi.
So declare a Sate of Emergency and BUILD THE WALL ALREADY !!!!!
And that sir was my number one priority!   So many coming in and trying to change our ways. As ILLEGALS.
Walls dont work,  Joshua 6;20,  wall of Berlin.  Name it. Hatred walls wont do good.  But hey lets waste money on it its cool.
I live by the border and this is the huge waste of money ego ploy.
Then why talk about leaving NATO?
Mabey he should put up his billions to pay for it.
Yes because actually running the country isnt in his job description...dont have to run the country if its shutdown. 🤔
Than how come the tax break for the wealthy was forced through while there were no checks and balances instead of your useless wall?
Yes Sir!! That's right!! Thank you President Trump!!
How about telling the truth? Where does that land on your priority list? Does it even make the list?
We've all had enough.of it. Declare the security emergency at the borders, we the people who still know common sense realize the drugs are coming in from outside the USA. Then reopen the government, and then announce you will be addressing the nation on January 30th from the Senate!! That is a great idea.from Rand Paul.
We've all had enough.of it. Declare the security emergency at the borders, we the people who still know common sense realize the drugs are coming in from outside the USA. Then reopen the government, and then announce you will be addressing the nation on January 30th from the Senate!! That is a great idea.from Rand Paul.
Go build that way, that is why we voted for you. Thank you for all you can do in spite of all the hate. My President Donald J. Trump
YES IT IS AND WE PUT YOU IN AS PRESIDENT , you have kept your PROMISES!!!
I’ll volunteer for a Years duty patrolling our southern boarder
BUILD THE WALL, MR. PRESIDENT!!!
We have more than one border. Why is it you only worry about the one where the brown people cross?
SO QUIT RUINING EVERYTHING LIZARD FACE !!!
Justice has fallen in the streets and truth has turned away backward, pretty well describes where our congress has finally struggled and has reached.  From the Bible.
Well our airport are in danger so that defending our country Your hard to deal with god help you're putting our country in danger.
Putin loves this site, he, the Saudis and the KKK own it.
I would like to see a bill introduced that would take all pay checks from elected officials in the event of government shut downs. I mean ALL ELECTED OFFICIALS, from county to nationals. Also they forfeit them days of pay so you don't get it back. This would get them to the table quick. The people we elect hurt us so it's time we reverse the favor.
Go Trump for 2020! Build your wall! It's important for everyone. Stop drugs! Stop metamphetamines and crack on borders plz!
Dear Madame Speaker:  Due to the Shutdown, I am sorry to inform you that your trip to Brussels, Egypt, and Afghanistan has been postponed. We will reschedule this seven-day excursion when the Shutdown is over. In light of the 800,000 great American workers not receiving pay, I am sure you would agree that postponing this public relations event is totally appropriate. I also feel that, during this period, it would be better if you were in Washington negotiating with me and joining the Strong Border Security movement to end the Shutdown. Obviously, if you would like to make your journey by flying commercial, that would certainly be your prerogative.  I look forward to seeing you soon and even more forward to watching our open and dangerous Southern Border finally receive the attention, funding, and security it so desperately deserves!  Sincerely,  Donald Donald J. Trump
Love My President, He is thinking about you and me!
That’s the reason why we voted for you,because of your Patriotic spirit of loyalty to our Country ,and braveness to defend’t,for all of that Thank you Mr President and people on your side. Blessings to all .we love America.
woah dont give the democrats any ideas now, lmao
If we do not get this treasonous lying piece of crap  out of our government we will no longer exist as a free nation!
what about people over staying visas? wall wont help that, i aint saying a wall wont help with the border but its not the only problem
The democratic stance against secured borders indicates that they are involved in drug and human trafficking.
It is sickening  to see people giving  fake news that they made up & giving opinions on it...all for money.  One day when your country doesn't look like it once did because of your lies, you will reap what you caused! Lacey 🙏
Let’s hope he takes the SOTU to a friendlier venue and fills it with real patriots
you're everything the establishment hates and we love you don!
Keep up the great work Agent Orange! Love Vlad
The Da Fence of our nation!
Thank you, Sir! We're behind you 100%!
Praying for President Trump, America and all us Americans 🙏🏼🇺🇸🙏🏼
We love you Mr. PRESIDENT.  Build the Wall and take down the obstructionist
If sheep could vote, they'd probably pick the guy that feeds them.....Even if it's the same guy that'll slaughter them later..
Thank you Mr. President! We stand with you. Trump#2020
Take  back  the  deal  and  declare NE. I  think   it’s clear they  will  not  do  anything but  obstruct  any  promises you made  to  the  American people. 🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸
Thank you Sir for being a true Patriotic American hero and for being a man of his words to keep our great nation safe for all true Patriotic American citizens by standing firm on BUILDING THE WALL and knowing Sir that we all love you and respect you for all that you have done for all of us and our home that we all call the U.S. of America 🇺🇸. God bless you Sir, my 6th Commander-in-Chief that I am very proud to work under and it is truly an honor for me to call you my President as well Sir. May God always bless our country the U.S.A. 🇺🇸🗽, Amen 🙏
Have to secure and defend the border!
At least he love our America! Thank God for our Great President Trump!!!! 🙏🇺🇸
Build the wall Mr President
God bless you President Trump.. .we the American people ❤️ you
God bless you President Trump.. .we the American people ❤️ you
Keep standing your ground Sir. Thankyou for protecting us President Trump.
Yes!!!! My President My Vote  ❤️🇺🇸❤️
It is tyranny from inside instead of outside if we don't. We have to much of that already, Donald J. Trump.
Keep laughing  Darrell James
Why has America ever been attacked?
I’m behind you Mr President!
Exactly what is needed Mr President
Y'all know it's not up to Trump and he works for Putin right
#openthedamngovernment This is ridiculous.
Thanks Pres. Trump stopping the flow of taxpayer money to countries that dislike us and squander it.
The group, consisting of 247 people, turned itself in to authorities near the Antelope Wells Port of Entry just after midnight on Wednesday, January 16, 2019.  The Border Patrol said the majority of individuals in the group are from Central America.  After they turned themselves in, the group immediately claimed the need for medical care.
Take security from the DNC see how they like it...
Use El Chapo money to pay for Wall..
Love my president!! Makes me proud!!
Please make it so that congress won't get paid during a government shutdown.
Yeah cause apparently getting the people their money isn't
AMEN God Bless Mr President Trump
"Donald Trump was the dumbest student I ever had." - William T. Kelly, former professor at the University of Pennsylvania, Wharton
Do not back down.  No money for the wall.  Keep it closed down.
I honestly don't think you even understand what it is that makes us a nation, which is why you will never be considered a great president. For everyone else, though, here's a reminder: http://constitutionus.com/
Everything else is waste if our boders aren't safe.
So I see you've had them photoshop you somewhat,
if the gov wont build the wall we will build the wall!
PRESIDENT TRUMP don't give in we need the WALL.
Arrest them for attempting the first coup this country has known.
We are already ceasing to be a nation letting these muslims in Congress
Doing the job and doing it right.  Citizens first, America strong.  MAGA!
In order for the US to be safe, you need to resign. I'm tired of you running this country like you ran your bankrupt casinos.
What’s so bad about that ?!!!   TRUMP 2020🇺🇸
AMENDS! C U OVER AT Christian Conservatives for Trump.
Yes we will cease to be a country when mexico invades and takes over
put   Schumer on  no  fly  list
Build the wall Mr. President " we're standing with you against these spineless democrats!
Last 4 Presidents have wanted the same thing ..   so I'm not sure what the big deal is
False it's the constitution #fakepatriot
Look at all these paid Russian trolls .
Article 1 section 7   Side not Trump is only 1 of 3 branches of Government. Congressional representatives speak for us. Let them Vote
How about paying those who are defending the borders!
EXACTLY MR PRESIDENT...BUILD THE WALL
thank you Mr. president, we support you. a new group of illegals heading our way right now.
and it's the dems least cared about duty!
HANG IN THERE SIR !!!!!    WE HAVE YOUR 6
HANG IN THERE SIR !!!!!    WE HAVE YOUR 6
Thank God for President Trump.
Thank God for President Trump.
THANK YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
So the 21,605 people guarding the SWB aren’t enough?  Asking for a friend!
He is the only president in YEARS to actually want to do the right thing for the AMERICAN public. If it saves just one life Isn't it worth it!
President Trump please save our country.
Considering that roughly a third if the populous believes you are a great President, maybe we should cease...j/s.
Keep up the great work, we are behind 110%
You are right. We need the Wall. We are with you all the way 150%. Go for it.
Stop voter fraud  Stop paying for foreigners  Stop paying welfare for people who don’t deserve it  Stop welfare fraud
Thank you President Trump!! God bless you!!  #presidenttrump2020 #buildthewall
We don't deserve such an awesome President.
we defend every other border why not ours? Korea,Syria....
we defend every other border why not ours? Korea,Syria....
Britain has failed to defend our borders and we are in danger of ceasing to be a nation! We are actually in danger of becoming somebody else's nation! Build the wall!
Well, after lining my own pockets of course. Mueller is coming!
Thank you President Trump, we appreciate you. Don't back down from the traitor progressives/socialists.. 👍
We’ve done alright so far 😕
I'll leave Will Hurd right here...Republican Rep.in Texas...ask him his view...it's been well quoted.
I will vote for him again in 2020 also!
Huaa All the last 9 President's were in it 4 the $
And the Dems know it which is why they are trying to stop it
Be strong Mr. President and don't let Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer control you !
Mr President please build that WALL.
Lol probably, trump one day u will vacate that seat, others have come and gone is not a family inheritance
😂😂😂 His selection of pictures on these posts is comical! Are they supposed to be action shots or something??
Yes Mr President, that’s your 1st duty!💕💕💕🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🙏🏻🙏🏻🙏🏻
How did we become a notion again 🤔
They photoshopped you nice in that photo
THANK YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP FOR PROTECTING THE AMERICAN CITIZENS THAT VOTED FOR YOU!!
Thank you, sir. Best President in my life time since John Kennedy! Build the wall ❤
86/45........make America less embarrassing again.
The way you’re running the country, there won’t be much left to protect
The countries that DO have open borders have nothing to lose.
i think you should go on strike
people need a broader news intake; too many Americans simply refuse to pay attention to what's actually happening, and that's the only thing you have to rely on for 2020.
If you dont open the government we have no nation.
To preserve and protect is the President s job.  Ignore nonsense Nancy and her political agenda.   Build the walk.  Give your State of the Union address
Our nation has a stronger backbone than you would care to consider. If we only had a leader of the caliber she deserves!
I think that's why the bill that the house passed, the senate did a voice vote with 100% support, and YOU agreed to sign included $1.6 billion for border security isn't it?
RELEASE IN FULL FAST & FURIOUS PLEASE.
RELEASE IN FULL FAST & FURIOUS PLEASE.
You can't argue with that!
The end is near prisoner Trump!
Aren’t the thousands of miles of coastline considered borders ? And ceasing funding for the coast guard. As well as border patrol itself is not showing that you care about border security.
Its amazing that we lasted 245 years without borders, but now "we will cease to be a nation" because of it
Stand tall, stay strong and never back down!
We that  voted for you are behind you a 100%, build that wall.
Thank you President Trump!! God continue to bless you and your family! 🙏🏼
Thank you President Trump!! God continue to bless you and your family! 🙏🏼
Thank you President Trump. Praying that your administration and America will stand strong on border security.
I concur. When will TERM LIMITS be on the ballot????? We insist upon it.
then RESIGN go live with Putin in Moscow
We have a TRAITOR as our President.
Trump loves América.Pelosi loves globalists.
Am, at long long proyd of our country and the best ever leader..Urah
God bless Mr.President Trump.
Thank you President Trump! #buildthewall ❤️🇺🇸
Airbags and walls protect...TRUMP 2020!👍🇺🇸
Thank you sir for being so strong
Now is time for national emergency Mr trump build the wall
I like Trump but he's screwing up like Nixon did......

Please provide the budget for how the 5.4 billion will be spent.
Thank you for doing your job right for the American people!
Hold paychecks from Congress a Senate..............
Thank you, Mr. President.  Please stand strong!!  Build the wall.
Besides Mexicans who else coming? O thats right you dont know?    I dont want any more 9 11 incidents.   Our country under attack.   Build wall keep my family safe also people live here and country.   Thats priority!!
God Bless President Trump
I always felt that protecting our borders was No.1 on the list of government jobs. It about time! Get it done!
I always felt that protecting our borders was No.1 on the list of government jobs. It about time! Get it done!
Were getting sprayed like bugs. Stop the Chemtrails.
Not enough shares of this post!
All u care about is yourself
The only wall America needs is between church and state.
Yes, it is.  And now you have to fight the left-wing loonies too.
IT DAMM SURE NOT THE DEMOCRATS!
I just hope the Wall isn't meant to keep US in.....LOL
It will only cost $5.7 billion to open the government back up! DO IT!!!!
He could use executive order or his "humanitarian crisis" yet he seems to want to have the parties unifying and agreeing for it. The Democrat party members used to want that wall, Obama, Schumacher ,Pelo etc, did.  Why the change of mind? Why ?
Jaimie McCammon You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Best president ever! In parallel, most insulted president ever! Thank you Fakenews for ruining (with your lies and nothing burgers) the image of this great man.
Yes it is and we finally have someone doing the right thing and for that I thank you, stand your ground we are with you.
We are not under attack by Mexico what in the world are you talking about ?
No other like my brother.
It's Pelosi and Schumer ' s least important duty.
Resign or be impeached Putin's puppet!
So what do you think a wall will do? People go over, under and around walls. Yet there are no walls at Area 51 and you cannot get within a mile of the border without getting caught by military police! Why? Because they use 21st century surveillance and tactics. We are a 21st century super power, time we start acting like it!
This is what i have said MANY times.
Stand Strong. The people who count are with you!
The best President in the wall is trump  end I Will vote For hem again
Then stop siding with the NRA to ban stuff Bloomberg does't want The People to have. A rifle behind every blade of grass...
Your tie needs to be longer #realdonaltrump to compensate for your flabby neck.. Just sayin'
Nice photoshop on the stomach 😏
Tick tock tick tock tick tock tick tock tick tock.....
Tick tock tick tock tick tock tick tock tick tock.....
If it weren't we wouldn't have an Army or the oath of office.
Give ‘em HELL President Trump!! 👍 🇺🇸
That’s what the democrats are trying to accomplish
And WE support you fully!  🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸❤️
Our Nation has three equally powered bodies! Respect our constitution!
Sen. Jon Tester. You should listen to the smart guys.
A little Photoshop goes a long way.
Thank you Mr President..my family is alot safer because of you❤️
I agree, but it is also being destroyed from within.
Just declare emergency what’s so hard about it just DO it♥️🇺🇸🇺🇸
The democrats dont understand this even though Homeland Security and top border personal have stated publically we need a fricken wall including Obama's formal top border agent but this is too confusing for the democrats to grasp.
We voted for Pres Trump, but since he won't build a wall, and shut down the border, we're not sure at this point if we will vote for him !
We’re nationing so hard right now.
Thank you President Trump
"Pericles"  " it is right to endure with Resignation what the Gods send , and to Face one's Enemies with Courage"
Please do not cave to those that want the worst for our country.  Do not give Cry'n Chuck a reason to celebrate in not giving any wall funding.  Please don't waiver your position!
Best President in my lifetime.
Everyone surrender to Nancy Pelosi!
thank you president Trump
Standing Trump Strong 💪.  I agree 💯 you’re doing a GREAT JOB!!!!
Standing Trump Strong 💪.  I agree 💯 you’re doing a GREAT JOB!!!!
But only with words and money god forbid he would actually join up when he was younger...all mouth no guts
Trump please we the Nigerian about the upcoming election, we no longer need huhari
What on earth are you like 😂😂😂😂😂
Exactly.  He gets it. Why can’t certain Dems??
Stand strong for the people of the United States.  God bless you for standing strong .President Trump
He followed is promise to keep is country save , God bless Mr President God bless America.
Time to drain the swamp some more
Americans are just mad because he doesn't bomb other countries as much.
Great move; perfect timing..Awesome way to casually pull the rug out from Pelosi. Keep an eye out the new swamp creatures are going to exploit the taxpayer dollars; through trips and fringe benefits. Expose them.
Great move; perfect timing..Awesome way to casually pull the rug out from Pelosi. Keep an eye out the new swamp creatures are going to exploit the taxpayer dollars; through trips and fringe benefits. Expose them.
All of you blindly supporting Trump are not realizing all those affected (or don’t care) by this government shutdown. And it really shows.    And you won’t notice until each one of you are directly affected. You’re all acting like children calling those who disagree with you “snowflakes”  Grow up and do your homework. Stop watching the news.
Best President ever!! TRUMP 2020 WINNING!!
Call 1-800-350-6647 for a No on the 🍊🤡s Wall. Just press “2”
Peoples wages and lives are NOT
Got that right we should have kept the TRUMP family OUT!
We the people hired this man to do a job. He has come through on more items than any president in decades! Ask why these people oppose. What is the real game here. The democrats have something to lose and you can bet its monetary. We the people need to rise up.
Take your SOTU speech to the senate floor and forget Nancy and Chuck....Just do it!
Take your SOTU speech to the senate floor and forget Nancy and Chuck....Just do it!
Never been more prouder of a president of the United States than I am of Donald J Trump!!!! We need you!! Thank you for keeping us safe!!
I LOVE My #PresidentTrump
Pelosi & Schumer.. politics as usual!
#SupportTrump.  #BuildaBarrier. #ImmigrationReform - stop chain migration, stop anchor babies, require E-verify, implement merit based immigration, decrease immigration numbers, tighten asylum criteria, etc.  #Improve border security per Border Patrol needs/requests (drones, cameras,personnel,judges,etc)
Trumps administration so far: 33 indictments, 187 criminal charges, 32 separate guilty pleas
Best president ever !!!  Trump 2020 !!!
Except our borders are and have been defended this whole time....🤷🏻‍♀️
Except our borders are and have been defended this whole time....🤷🏻‍♀️
Explain this again when all the TSA agents go on a very justifiable strike.
THANK YOU!!! RRR PROTECTIVE PRESIDENT TRUMP!!!
Lee Mcclelland maybe you should get a job and put your moms basement
“We will cease to be an nation.”   Fear mongering over nothing 🤷🏻‍♂️
TELL MITCH TO GO NUCLEAR! Enough is enough!
TELL MITCH TO GO NUCLEAR! Enough is enough!
Stand strong and give that speech.  I will vote Trump 20/20. Build that Wall and this is a DEMOCRATIC SHUTDOWN especially Nancy Shutdown.
Anyone who is against walls please remove all the doors to your home. Practice what you preach.
God Bless Our President 🇺🇸🇺🇸🙏
And it should also be the duty of all of our congress people.  But the progressive/socialists that now control the DNC want their politically correct hope and change mandate to over ride all laws and the Constitution which would have been gone by now had HiLIARy been elected.
Seems it was not important to our last president.
TOO BAD PELOSI AND SCHUMER DON'T FEEL THE SAME WAY.
How much is that defense budget? Need some more? Suurree
Exactly.  We will have the Wall👏👏🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸❤️❤️
Praise the Lord we didn't end up with Clinton.  Trump has saved this country from evil plans.
Yes yes yes yes build wall defund  legislators
god bless you President Trump x
Agree, it's time too take action as the democrats are out of their minds!
He had this photo photoshopped !!!!😂😂 Longer fingers and he is acting like he is skinny!! alternative president!!😂😂😂❄️💦🇺🇸
Both Borders? Just the one the Brown people are coming thru?
True our borders must be safe to protect us and America
Andrew David Johnson conspiring with a foreign government isn’t lemming
Renee Lenga border security is constitutional
Renee Lenga border security is constitutional
If we can’t defend the constitution we cease to be a nation. Resign!
If we can’t defend the constitution we cease to be a nation. Resign!
I guess those 240 year before you showed up don't count.
Oh twitler,you're done for!
“After I take Russian sanctions away so they won’t release the pee tapes or tell America I’m broke and Russia owns me”.
This is what desperation looks like.
How about paying your employees?  That’s important.
Thank you, President Trump!!!!
I think the military should be deployable to defend our borders.  Those laws should also be changed.
That's what it should be!!!!
I voted for Trump as a Puerto Rican resident of the State of Washington and had quite a few disagreeable moments with some of my  Liberal  friends and relatives but I held my chin high and said: "He will prove you all wrong!" And he has! I will vote for him again in 2020! 👍🇺🇸🇵🇷
I voted for Trump as a Puerto Rican resident of the State of Washington and had quite a few disagreeable moments with some of my  Liberal  friends and relatives but I held my chin high and said: "He will prove you all wrong!" And he has! I will vote for him again in 2020! 👍🇺🇸🇵🇷
The dems want open borders for exactly that reason.
YES !!! except the wrong ones are not getting paid !!!!!!! we need a law
Thank you Mr. President. You’re doing the right thing.  I can’t wait to hear your State of the Union speech.
You're the one we need the most defense from...
I agree with President Trump 100%
What a change from the last guy.
Here is the latest oppression efforts lead by Facebook.. Now, when we like something you say, We are being sent to detention and not allowed to express our opinions, It happens every time, I make a  comment about standing up for America and the border wall.. Lets hope the Congress and the New AG will Look into how tech company's are suppressing free speech and thought by abusing there tools... Perhaps the FCC needs to be involved too... start asking some hard questions and laying serious fines down! Thankyou Sir ..Suggestion for the Suggestion box..!! Have a nice day....
James Campbell remember when they busted them in that lie about all 17 supported that? 😂🤣
Mark Hack you're joking right?  He put sanctions on Russia, closed two diplomatic compounds and also expelled many Russian diplomats.  Trump? He believes Putin over our intelligence agencies, removed some sanctions and also has taken his time putting on Congressional sanctions.
it only took place while obama was president... " he did nothing "
Tasha Dawn there is no proof of that. There is proof, however, that Russia meddled in our election. All intelligence committees agree as well as the Senate.
Tasha Dawn there is no proof of that. There is proof, however, that Russia meddled in our election. All intelligence committees agree as well as the Senate.
Foreign interference like illegal invaders voting?
Foreign interference like illegal invaders voting?
Sherri Giddings Latimer sure go ahead and avoid the facts 😉
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Why haven't you defended our elections from foreign interference then #Dotard?
Why haven't you defended our elections from foreign interference then #Dotard?
STAY STRONG MR PRESIDENT!  WE NEED THIS DECADES OLD PROBLEM RESOLVED.
STAY STRONG MR PRESIDENT!  WE NEED THIS DECADES OLD PROBLEM RESOLVED.
Hell yeah.👍 Support Donald Trump. It looks like Soros wants to  bring down American economy by inundating it with thousands of caravan people. It has evil Soros written all over it.
Stay strong Dems. Not one dollar for Trump's worthless wall. Not one. #NoWall #TrumpShutdown
"your highest and most important duty "....it is clear it is to protect Putin !
And that includes all members of Congress duty too.
And that includes all members of Congress duty too.
BUILD THE WALL NOW! NATIONAL EMERGENCY!
I have a question, you are require to give congress a state of the union address but Representative Pelosi has stated that is her house and because of security reason you can give it. (It's Americans house but we won't go there for now). Why can't  you address the other chamber of congress? Send her the address on paper like she wanted but give the address from the Senate floor.  How can she stop that.  She doesn't control that.  If she wants to be left out it's on her. Heck let her go on her trip then
Thank you for fighting so hard for Americans! Most would have given up by now. Praying for you and your family!
Thank you for fighting so hard for Americans! Most would have given up by now. Praying for you and your family!
Our borders arnt what make us a nation mr.president. We the people, together, form our nation. A once great nation before you "made it great again" 🤔🤔
Our borders arnt what make us a nation mr.president. We the people, together, form our nation. A once great nation before you "made it great again" 🤔🤔
So you like chess okay. White knight to black rook. Your move marfema auswitz 999 op nation Z initiate peg12go###
Why is this image photoshopped? Lmfao!!!
Why is this image photoshopped? Lmfao!!!
Stop the salaries of Congress and Senate.  Let's see how fast they come up with a wall and budget.
Stop the salaries of Congress and Senate.  Let's see how fast they come up with a wall and budget.
Mr. President, I 100% support your position about the wall--it is needed especially with another caravan headed our way. As a forever Trumper, I would suggest calling their bluff in front of God and the entire country. Here is my suggestion on a dialogue for the SOTU message----You should reopen the government DURING THE SOTU MESSAGE,.You should say that "I have always stood for doing what is best for the American people, for their prosperity and their security and because of that promise to the American people and because I want to show my willingness to negotiate and work with the Democrats... They have said that we should we reopen the government AND THEN we can talk so I am holding them to their word. I will give instructions to reopen our government immediately and I want to say thank you to all the people who have hung in there with us. I will also instruct that all people effected by the shutdown receive their back pay immediately. BUT, tomorrow, I will request a bi-partisan meeting to keep the commitment of the left to enter into honest and open negotiations about the wall. If we cannot then reach a mutual agreement to fund the wall/barrier, I will have no choice but to take an alternate measure of action. Hopefully, with another caravan heading to our border, all parties will realize the need for this border wall which has worked in places we already have a wall as well as how it has worked in other countries. I will do my part and I hope they will do theirs". I think it is a win for you showing your concern for those impacted by the shutdown and now they would have to put up or shut up. God Bless you Mr. President---I will be 100% with you in 2020.
Trolls are out  and about.
Fact.  Simple, blatantly obvious FACT.
You’re never going to get a border wall.  If you were to get the $50-$100 billion it would cost to build the wall it would not be built inside trumps lifetime. Which means before the project even got started the next president would end it.
You’re never going to get a border wall.  If you were to get the $50-$100 billion it would cost to build the wall it would not be built inside trumps lifetime. Which means before the project even got started the next president would end it.
Levi soldiers there to take care of the Border wall
Never give in, stand firm and hold out for the wall.
Never give in, stand firm and hold out for the wall.
Congratulations Mr President. I am a citizen of Brazil and big fan of your administration. God bless you and the american people!
Congratulations Mr President. I am a citizen of Brazil and big fan of your administration. God bless you and the american people!
Stand strong  PRESIDENT  TRUMP!!!👍🇺🇸💕
Stand strong  PRESIDENT  TRUMP!!!👍🇺🇸💕
And apparently the other duties include screwing people out of their living.
And apparently the other duties include screwing people out of their living.
Thank you!!! God Bless My President Trump!!!!
Thank you!!! God Bless My President Trump!!!!
President Trump, instead of having the SOTU Address being held in Congress, maybe move it to either the oval office or the southern border itself and stand with Border Agents and Angel Parents.
President Trump, instead of having the SOTU Address being held in Congress, maybe move it to either the oval office or the southern border itself and stand with Border Agents and Angel Parents.
OPEN THE GOVERNMENT! #TRUMPSHUTDOWN #NOWALL
I don't understand why we didn't vote to secure our borders when the Repubs had the majority !!
I don't understand why we didn't vote to secure our borders when the Repubs had the majority !!
Can you explain this simple facts to the swedish politicians as well?
Stand strong, we are with you, Mr. President
Stand strong, we are with you, Mr. President
President Trump,  If you were able to freeze ALL THE SENATES BENEFITS, including their pay, hospitalization, retirement funds etc, I believe they would approve the wall within minutes.  God bless you sir, and our great country!
President Trump,  If you were able to freeze ALL THE SENATES BENEFITS, including their pay, hospitalization, retirement funds etc, I believe they would approve the wall within minutes.  God bless you sir, and our great country!
O u r losing your home after just a few week of this if that was true u were already on slippery slopes with your bank they don’t want that dam house back remember they went through this before and all a sudden nobody was living in them they sold them a 500 dollar pony when the real true value was a 100 dollars pony u get my drift .
God has blessed America with this President at exactly the right time.
God has blessed America with this President at exactly the right time.
Show the country who the traitors are Mr. PRESIDENT. stand firm
Show the country who the traitors are Mr. PRESIDENT. stand firm
Can you Pay my cell phone bill Mr. President sir ?  I don’t get paid till next week😭
Can you Pay my cell phone bill Mr. President sir ?  I don’t get paid till next week😭
I think mr president should just penalize and fine everyone who doesnt want the wall… u know just  like Obama did to everyone who didnt want that worthless obamacare
I think mr president should just penalize and fine everyone who doesnt want the wall… u know just  like Obama did to everyone who didnt want that worthless obamacare
Yes,  Thank You President Donald Trump. Build The Wall Enforce The Law. 🇺🇸🙏🎺🇺🇸
Yes,  Thank You President Donald Trump. Build The Wall Enforce The Law. 🇺🇸🙏🎺🇺🇸
There is a vet who raised 9 million for wall on go fund me. Saw it once then gone. Must be that the Dems stopped this.
Stand Strong President Trump!!!
Agree but  the other side has no common sense  Mr President they want to ruin our nation something else has to be done about them
No wall no nation. Just like that toxic girlfriend.
No wall no nation. Just like that toxic girlfriend.
I totally agree with wall; we MUST protect our borders.  How about Congress and President going without pay until there's a resolution.  I bet that would hurry things along.
I totally agree with wall; we MUST protect our borders.  How about Congress and President going without pay until there's a resolution.  I bet that would hurry things along.
You don't give no s--- to Big Don.
You don't give no s--- to Big Don.
Don’t cancel the SOTU Mr President. Thank you for everything you’re doing for Our Country! This is how our country should of been managed for years. But there’s so much corruption in the system” that has been covered up, that’s why they don’t like you! Your bringing out the corruption!  Thank you!
Don’t cancel the SOTU Mr President. Thank you for everything you’re doing for Our Country! This is how our country should of been managed for years. But there’s so much corruption in the system” that has been covered up, that’s why they don’t like you! Your bringing out the corruption!  Thank you!
Rae Malee Dornick-Walsh  REALITY FOR THOUGHT! "Heaven" and "Hell" are human constructs from the creative minds of men.  LET THAT SINK IN!
Andrew Spencer that’s ok just my opinion 👍
Rae Malee Dornick-Walsh that is the most ridiculous thing that I've ever heard!! LOL!!
Rae Malee Dornick-Walsh that is the most ridiculous thing that I've ever heard!! LOL!!
FOOD FOR THOUGHT! “Heaven has a wall, a gate and a strict immigration policy. Hell has open borders! LET THAT SINK IN!😳
FOOD FOR THOUGHT! “Heaven has a wall, a gate and a strict immigration policy. Hell has open borders! LET THAT SINK IN!😳
So the dems want to do 2 things in the short run..1 have open borders and flood the country with new voters and/or 2 eliminate electoral college.  It's the ONLY way they can take back power.  Then they can eliminate guns, raise taxes, take control of major corporations like FB and control the conservatives and christians thru social credits.  They will turn us into a socialist country and wreck it, like Venezuela.  That is where we are heading...
Yea but at a cost of the American federal workers they have nothing to do with you holding there paychecks. Plus you are not giving them any incentive for this just not paying them. lol
If we can avoid a 5.7 billion dollar monument to Donald Trump, we could actually increase our border security!
If we can avoid a 5.7 billion dollar monument to Donald Trump, we could actually increase our border security!
Both houses of Congress were GOP control, you weren’t able to get wall than. How is this the dems fault?
Both houses of Congress were GOP control, you weren’t able to get wall than. How is this the dems fault?
Do it. Build the wall. This is an emergency.
Do it. Build the wall. This is an emergency.
💙❤🇺🇸Mr.President, I support you. LET'S BUILD THE WALL!!🇺🇸❤💙
Borders will be safe once you’re behind bars, TSA agents are paid, and Border Patrol employees are paid.
Borders will be safe once you’re behind bars, TSA agents are paid, and Border Patrol employees are paid.
Help me understand something... The South seceded the US for States' Rights (1861-1865) and the US Army promptly invaded, and after the bloodiest (4) years in history, the US said "No to States' Rights" by force. Now, we have New York, California and others who are demanding States' Rights for a range of things like illegals, marijuana, sanctuary, etc... costing the country way more than the taxes and tariffs imposed on the South (even with inflation) and the US does nothing? Am I missing something? And don't make this about slavery...it wasn't. Both President Lincoln and Gen. Lee are quoted, many times, that it was never about slavery. That's a myth. My point is simple, why allow states to reject US laws and nothing is done? Why are their actions not considered treasonous and criminally obstructive? Why not march the US Marshals in and arrest all those state and local politicians for Obstruction?
Help me understand something... The South seceded the US for States' Rights (1861-1865) and the US Army promptly invaded, and after the bloodiest (4) years in history, the US said "No to States' Rights" by force. Now, we have New York, California and others who are demanding States' Rights for a range of things like illegals, marijuana, sanctuary, etc... costing the country way more than the taxes and tariffs imposed on the South (even with inflation) and the US does nothing? Am I missing something? And don't make this about slavery...it wasn't. Both President Lincoln and Gen. Lee are quoted, many times, that it was never about slavery. That's a myth. My point is simple, why allow states to reject US laws and nothing is done? Why are their actions not considered treasonous and criminally obstructive? Why not march the US Marshals in and arrest all those state and local politicians for Obstruction?
This is one thing about Trump that baffles me. I would have been getting everything I could get done about border security while my party had total control of Congress. He wouldnt have had to put up with any BS from the Democrats. I think he is hurting himself even with his own supporters over shutting down the government for so long over something that could have already been handled.
Someone a war criminal, and insane
Someone a war criminal, and insane
14 Without wise leadership, a nation falls;     there is safety in having many advisers. Prov 11:14
14 Without wise leadership, a nation falls;     there is safety in having many advisers. Prov 11:14
Dont think you have lost support, we support you and we support the wall 100 percent #MAGA  #KAG
Dont think you have lost support, we support you and we support the wall 100 percent #MAGA  #KAG
Here's what I say to Trump: “Mr. President you can have your wall. You can get it the same way that President Obama got Obamacare; the way Lyndon Johnson got Medicare; the way Franklin Roosevelt got Social Security. In each case the president had a project he wanted enacted; so his administration crafted a bill. That bill went to Congress where committee hearings were held; amendments were proposed; studies were conducted that tested the cost, effectiveness etc. of the proposal; testimony was held in Congress; debate ensued and if the measure had enough support, a vote was taken and the measure was passed. That's how you legislate. It takes hard work, planning and the ability to actually negotiate. Your pet project doesn't get to leap frog over the pathway laid out by the Constitution and 250 years of precedent. You have chosen to skip over this entire process (even when you had majorities in both Houses) and have resorted instead to taking the American public hostage in exchange for your wall. You want a wall? Put down the gun you are holding to the head of the American people and get to work.”
Here's what I say to Trump: “Mr. President you can have your wall. You can get it the same way that President Obama got Obamacare; the way Lyndon Johnson got Medicare; the way Franklin Roosevelt got Social Security. In each case the president had a project he wanted enacted; so his administration crafted a bill. That bill went to Congress where committee hearings were held; amendments were proposed; studies were conducted that tested the cost, effectiveness etc. of the proposal; testimony was held in Congress; debate ensued and if the measure had enough support, a vote was taken and the measure was passed. That's how you legislate. It takes hard work, planning and the ability to actually negotiate. Your pet project doesn't get to leap frog over the pathway laid out by the Constitution and 250 years of precedent. You have chosen to skip over this entire process (even when you had majorities in both Houses) and have resorted instead to taking the American public hostage in exchange for your wall. You want a wall? Put down the gun you are holding to the head of the American people and get to work.”
Senator Graham is pushing his DACA, Pathway to Citizenship, TPS,and Amnesty nonsense AGAIN! We told you NO the last time! Quit constantly pushing your “comprehensive immigration reform” nonsense!
🙏🏼🇺🇸👏🏼 A man of his word!  Keep up the good work! Build the wall! ❤️
🙏🏼🇺🇸👏🏼 A man of his word!  Keep up the good work! Build the wall! ❤️
one term president if that
one term president if that
Your President may be controversial but given the way the world is these days, to have a leader that's creating jobs, boosting your economy, and doing something about your national security, has to be the right man at this time don't you think?
So has the democrats even suggested anything on what can actually be done to HELP security on  the borders. For some reason haven't heard anything on that
So has the democrats even suggested anything on what can actually be done to HELP security on  the borders. For some reason haven't heard anything on that
I wish Bush had addressed this right after 9-11. Our southern border is only part of what needs to be done. We also need to protect our northern border, our ports, our air terminals and cyberspace. All of these are access points which need federal protection.
I wish Bush had addressed this right after 9-11. Our southern border is only part of what needs to be done. We also need to protect our northern border, our ports, our air terminals and cyberspace. All of these are access points which need federal protection.
There are 14 of us from Thailand, #2020TRUMP.
There are 14 of us from Thailand, #2020TRUMP.
Yes sir mr. President finish that wall that's already been started
Yes sir mr. President finish that wall that's already been started
There down there partying while Trump is here trying to get something done oh,and may i remind you Trump is doing his job without pay!
There down there partying while Trump is here trying to get something done oh,and may i remind you Trump is doing his job without pay!
What's a wall going  to  do when they have tunnels? Air planes , and drones ???😂🤣😂🤣
What's a wall going  to  do when they have tunnels? Air planes , and drones ???😂🤣😂🤣
Forget doing the SOTU speech in Washington. Do it on the border before appreciative members of the Border Patrol. Or pick any city in the country and do the speech campaign rally style! #bothworkforme
Forget doing the SOTU speech in Washington. Do it on the border before appreciative members of the Border Patrol. Or pick any city in the country and do the speech campaign rally style! #bothworkforme
Whatever happened to the Mexico paying for the wall, now shutting down the government forcing US taxpayers to pay for the wall,at least ask Russia to pay for the wall to make you look good for a wile!!:)
Whatever happened to the Mexico paying for the wall, now shutting down the government forcing US taxpayers to pay for the wall,at least ask Russia to pay for the wall to make you look good for a wile!!:)
Susan Fischer christ, you must be a barrel of fun on a date
Susan Fischer christ, you must be a barrel of fun on a date
We help other countries with our hard earned money. If Mexico cannot take care of their own then keep the border open and let us take your country. Stop your wretched complaining about building a wall or not.Take care of your own people and stop burdening America with your own problems.U.S. provides aid worth $320 million a year to Mexico; experts say yanking it could hurt. Thanks Mexico for nothing.At the federal, state, and local levels, taxpayers shell out approximately $134.9 billion to cover the costs incurred by the presence of more than 12.5 million illegal aliens, and about 4.2 million citizen children of illegal aliens. That amounts to a tax burden of approximately $8,075 per illegal alien family member and a total of $115,894,597,664. The total cost of illegal immigration to U.S. taxpayers is both staggering and crippling. In 2013, FAIR estimated the total cost to be approximately $113 billion. So, in under four years, the cost has risen nearly $3 billion. This is a disturbing and unsustainable trend. Besides this burden the U.S assists other countries in aid. Top 25 Recipient Countries of U.S. Foreign Aid FY 2013 Reported in $US millions, Obligations [10] Country Economic and Military Assistance FY 2013, $US millions Aid received per person recipient FY2013, $US Economic Assistance FY 2013, $US millions Military Assistance FY2013, $US millions Afghanistan 4533.51 148 2653.93 1879.58 Israel* 2961.04 367 17.81 2943.23 Egypt 1566.24 19 330.6 1235.6 Jordan 1211.83 188 879.64 332.19 West Bank/Gaza 1007.73 370 Ethiopia 686.53 7 685.19 1.34 South Sudan 618.74 55 598.79 19.96 Malawi 571.18 35 570.91 0.27 Uganda 541.93 14 538.3 3.62 South Africa 526.19 10 523.86 2.32 Nigeria 518.84 3 509.41 9.43 Russia 465.16 3 445.07 20.08 Iraq 444.81 13 382.7 62.11 Tanzania 430.66 9 427.82 2.84 Mexico 419.94 3 348.72 71.21 Congo (Kinshasa) 379.24 6 366.73 12.52 Haiti 378.77 37 377.04 1.73 Lebanon 376.41 84 286.03 90.38 Somalia 367.18 35 188 179.18 Zambia 310.8 22 310.26 0.54 Sudan (former)* 290.05 8 290.05.
We help other countries with our hard earned money. If Mexico cannot take care of their own then keep the border open and let us take your country. Stop your wretched complaining about building a wall or not.Take care of your own people and stop burdening America with your own problems.U.S. provides aid worth $320 million a year to Mexico; experts say yanking it could hurt. Thanks Mexico for nothing.At the federal, state, and local levels, taxpayers shell out approximately $134.9 billion to cover the costs incurred by the presence of more than 12.5 million illegal aliens, and about 4.2 million citizen children of illegal aliens. That amounts to a tax burden of approximately $8,075 per illegal alien family member and a total of $115,894,597,664. The total cost of illegal immigration to U.S. taxpayers is both staggering and crippling. In 2013, FAIR estimated the total cost to be approximately $113 billion. So, in under four years, the cost has risen nearly $3 billion. This is a disturbing and unsustainable trend. Besides this burden the U.S assists other countries in aid. Top 25 Recipient Countries of U.S. Foreign Aid FY 2013 Reported in $US millions, Obligations [10] Country Economic and Military Assistance FY 2013, $US millions Aid received per person recipient FY2013, $US Economic Assistance FY 2013, $US millions Military Assistance FY2013, $US millions Afghanistan 4533.51 148 2653.93 1879.58 Israel* 2961.04 367 17.81 2943.23 Egypt 1566.24 19 330.6 1235.6 Jordan 1211.83 188 879.64 332.19 West Bank/Gaza 1007.73 370 Ethiopia 686.53 7 685.19 1.34 South Sudan 618.74 55 598.79 19.96 Malawi 571.18 35 570.91 0.27 Uganda 541.93 14 538.3 3.62 South Africa 526.19 10 523.86 2.32 Nigeria 518.84 3 509.41 9.43 Russia 465.16 3 445.07 20.08 Iraq 444.81 13 382.7 62.11 Tanzania 430.66 9 427.82 2.84 Mexico 419.94 3 348.72 71.21 Congo (Kinshasa) 379.24 6 366.73 12.52 Haiti 378.77 37 377.04 1.73 Lebanon 376.41 84 286.03 90.38 Somalia 367.18 35 188 179.18 Zambia 310.8 22 310.26 0.54 Sudan (former)* 290.05 8 290.05.
Dario Sanchez come here legally!  He can be your President!
Border patrol 😂 we still gonna get through.
Border patrol 😂 we still gonna get through.
And again, NO IDEA ON WHAT HE'S DOING.
And again, NO IDEA ON WHAT HE'S DOING.
Your mother
Dario Sanchez Just you keep your head in that dark place that's between your legs!
I completely feel like you have NO IDEA on what you're doing anymore.
I completely feel like you have NO IDEA on what you're doing anymore.
Thank you Mr. President we appreciate you so much God bless you
Thank you Mr. President we appreciate you so much God bless you
do not cave, we want the wall. trump strong!
do not cave, we want the wall. trump strong!
It is also the sworn duty of members of Congress. How do you intend to encourage them to do what they swore to do?
Finally a President with a Spine!!
Finally a President with a Spine!!
GOD BLESS PRESIDENT TRUMP  🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸❤🙏MAGA 2020
GOD BLESS PRESIDENT TRUMP  🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸❤🙏MAGA 2020
This is the first time since Barack Hussein Obama that we have been taken seriously.
This is the first time since Barack Hussein Obama that we have been taken seriously.
We believe in your Sir! We need to get our government workers back to work, so use a combo of the Fund Me page and all the seized cash from drug busts to fund the wall. In a sense, this "IS" Mexico paying for it. Done. I'm sure someone must have put this idea forward before!
We believe in your Sir! We need to get our government workers back to work, so use a combo of the Fund Me page and all the seized cash from drug busts to fund the wall. In a sense, this "IS" Mexico paying for it. Done. I'm sure someone must have put this idea forward before!
How about you fire pelosi the old fossil?that will make america great again.
How about you fire pelosi the old fossil?that will make america great again.
Cathie Lee 72%
27% of eligible voters voted for trump.
27% of eligible voters voted for trump.
@trump it's call to serve #buildthewall
@trump it's call to serve #buildthewall
It is why I call him "Mr.Triumph"!!
I guess the wall will magically be built overnight
I guess the wall will magically be built overnight
Don't back off and don't give in..
Don't back off and don't give in..
Go President Trump!! We are behind you!!
Go President Trump!! We are behind you!!
We need the Wall & More..
So let's give the President his Monument, (a statue or obelisk) to his commemoration but NOT a WALL !!
So let's give the President his Monument, (a statue or obelisk) to his commemoration but NOT a WALL !!
President Trump, stay strong!!!  We live you & what you're doing!!!
President Trump, stay strong!!!  We live you & what you're doing!!!
But let's not pay the TSA, air traffic controllers and the Coast Guard so we can build an ineffective wall. (that will never, ever be built) Great job defending the country!
But let's not pay the TSA, air traffic controllers and the Coast Guard so we can build an ineffective wall. (that will never, ever be built) Great job defending the country!
Trump is protecting his country like a good president should. Obama and Bush ran this place in the ground and since Trump has taken office there has been vast improvements in the job fields with thousands of jobs and the Unemployment rate is the lowest it's been in awhile.  Trump has my vote in 2020 !
Trump is protecting his country like a good president should. Obama and Bush ran this place in the ground and since Trump has taken office there has been vast improvements in the job fields with thousands of jobs and the Unemployment rate is the lowest it's been in awhile.  Trump has my vote in 2020 !
Declare the emergency, build that wall & work on getting those 2 clowns out of there, I'm sick of this crap with them bullying you for doing what most voters want you to do!
Declare the emergency, build that wall & work on getting those 2 clowns out of there, I'm sick of this crap with them bullying you for doing what most voters want you to do!
If it was so important why did you not fix it when Republicans had complete control. I'll wait on an answer for that!
If it was so important why did you not fix it when Republicans had complete control. I'll wait on an answer for that!
The civilized citizens are supporting you!   Stay strong
The civilized citizens are supporting you!   Stay strong
Then why sell it out to Russia???
Then why sell it out to Russia???
At least the Trump Trolls here are receiving their paychecks.
At least the Trump Trolls here are receiving their paychecks.
We've been a nation long before you and your "barrier" became America's reality TV.
We've been a nation long before you and your "barrier" became America's reality TV.
Daniel McKinnon Old Pelosi and Schumer have allowed their party to be hijacked by left wing radical groups and are too stupid to notice! Scream at the sky...it helps!
Daniel McKinnon Old Pelosi and Schumer have allowed their party to be hijacked by left wing radical groups and are too stupid to notice! Scream at the sky...it helps!
Daniel Mckinnon Scream at the sky some more! They claim it helps! 🙄
Daniel Mckinnon Scream at the sky some more! They claim it helps! 🙄
Daniel Mckinnon so you want open borders and no country? That’s stupid!
Daniel Mckinnon so you want open borders and no country? That’s stupid!
Stand firm Democrats, don't give in to this POS President who throws temper tantrums like a 5 year old who soils his depends diaper. Make him cry.. His WH is made of glass and will soon shatter..
Stand firm Democrats, don't give in to this POS President who throws temper tantrums like a 5 year old who soils his depends diaper. Make him cry.. His WH is made of glass and will soon shatter..
Jason Jindo we need walls not just for Russia 🇷🇺!
Protect us from Russia.
Protect us from Russia.
Im here and waiting for service. Ready to make Australia great again with your support Sir.
Just say whatever you think will get you votes!
Just say whatever you think will get you votes!
President Trump.....use seized dollars to build the wall!
President Trump.....use seized dollars to build the wall!
Just remember France ! Damn Black Forest!
How about $10 billion towards climate change
How about $10 billion towards climate change
A goat’s stubbornness tramples Iran, bible prophecy.
Don't give in sir, Continue digging in, they will surely succumb
Don't give in sir, Continue digging in, they will surely succumb
Cynthia Hill  wake up , look around you !!!
Melanie Garrett BS. Didn't u notice how many more ppl got Medicaid under Obama?
More people are Dying from lack of HEALTHCARE , then Violence from ILLEGALS !!!!!   Money for Health , Not Walls !!!
More people are Dying from lack of HEALTHCARE , then Violence from ILLEGALS !!!!!   Money for Health , Not Walls !!!
Good bag up the liberals and deport there asses .
We can help are president,to build the wall with electricity ☠️...ok mr president I have one question for you?why you don’t collect money for all the people of the United States ❤️ !!course with people who love are country!! ❤️❤️❤️❤️
We can help are president,to build the wall with electricity ☠️...ok mr president I have one question for you?why you don’t collect money for all the people of the United States ❤️ !!course with people who love are country!! ❤️❤️❤️❤️
If we don’t stop them at the border, we’ll be stopping them at our front door.
If we don’t stop them at the border, we’ll be stopping them at our front door.
Thank you for fighting for our country.
Thank you for fighting for our country.
Keep your promise to BUILD THE BORDER WALL.  We need to feel safe.
Keep your promise to BUILD THE BORDER WALL.  We need to feel safe.
I mean.. in what metric do you mean failing?  Greatest job numbers ever, largest stock market numbers... ever, lowest unemployment, low gas prices, The Korea peninsula talking?  I mean.. What is the failure you're referring to?  You don't like the guy, that's fine, but the results are quite measurable.
It's incredible to see someone fail so miserably...
It's incredible to see someone fail so miserably...
Interesting picture, reminds me of the Stalinist posters.
Keeping everyone in America safe, even from themselves.
Keeping everyone in America safe, even from themselves.
God sought a man among them that would build the wall, and stand in the gap before me on behalf of the land, that it should not be destroyed. Ezekiel 22:30 -- Pray for President Trump & a strong America! 🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯🇺🇸️
Lol, right. What are you smoking? Are people going to check a box on their tax forms saying "I oppose the wall, fine me."??
Lol, right. What are you smoking? Are people going to check a box on their tax forms saying "I oppose the wall, fine me."??
What if Trump fined everyone against his wall like Obama did with obamacare
What if Trump fined everyone against his wall like Obama did with obamacare
Yes sir, mr president. #buildthewall
We need the wall!! Never give in Mr. President!!
We need the wall!! Never give in Mr. President!!
It's about time we got a President that actually cares about  his countrymen/women.
It's about time we got a President that actually cares about  his countrymen/women.
Mr. President I am with you all the way. Executive order It's time!
Mr. President I am with you all the way. Executive order It's time!
President Trump, if you really want to connect with the American people, have a fireside State of the Union address.  That way you will have their undivided attention without interruption from the radical democrats.
President Trump, if you really want to connect with the American people, have a fireside State of the Union address.  That way you will have their undivided attention without interruption from the radical democrats.
Wherever,  let make it,  the stupid wall, but let's open Government again, held we the Illuminates.
Wherever,  let make it,  the stupid wall, but let's open Government again, held we the Illuminates.
no wall criminal traitor individual #1
no wall criminal traitor individual #1
Reopen the government you dolt. 🖕🏻
Reopen the government you dolt. 🖕🏻
John C Dickinson That hurt coming up with that on your own didn’t it? Scream at the sky, they say it helps! 🙄
More lies, impeach the Russian
More lies, impeach the Russian
Mr.President keep the Government closed till we get the "WALL"
Mr.President keep the Government closed till we get the "WALL"
If we don’t restore decency, compassion and competence to the Oval Office, then we cease to be a nation.
If we don’t restore decency, compassion and competence to the Oval Office, then we cease to be a nation.
In this picture, I bet you were pointing at a senior aid and saying "You... leave the room. I have to talk with Vlad privately."
In this picture, I bet you were pointing at a senior aid and saying "You... leave the room. I have to talk with Vlad privately."
TRUMP : "I would build a great wall, and nobody builds walls better than me, believe me, and I’ll build them very inexpensively. I will build a great great wall on our southern border and I'LL HAVE MEXICO PAY FOR IT"
TRUMP : "I would build a great wall, and nobody builds walls better than me, believe me, and I’ll build them very inexpensively. I will build a great great wall on our southern border and I'LL HAVE MEXICO PAY FOR IT"
Karl Meaders they photoshopped it to make his finger longer. 😂 https://www.reddit.com/r/PoliticalHumor/comments/ah26x0/trumps_facebook_page_slimmed_him_down_and_made/?st=JR1GZE9O&sh=d8ef485f
Karl Meaders they photoshopped it to make his finger longer. 😂 https://www.reddit.com/r/PoliticalHumor/comments/ah26x0/trumps_facebook_page_slimmed_him_down_and_made/?st=JR1GZE9O&sh=d8ef485f
DONT ACT THAT U ARE SMART CUZ THIERS ALWAYS SOMEONE SMARTER THEN YOU MR.TRUMP!!!!!
DONT ACT THAT U ARE SMART CUZ THIERS ALWAYS SOMEONE SMARTER THEN YOU MR.TRUMP!!!!!
Stay STRONG President Trump - we are behind you!!!
Stay STRONG President Trump - we are behind you!!!
The people want the wall.  Rasmussen Poll 1/14/19.  53% of Americans want the wall.  39% don’t.
The people want the wall.  Rasmussen Poll 1/14/19.  53% of Americans want the wall.  39% don’t.
You are correct, and that makes the Democratic actual end game very clear.
You are correct, and that makes the Democratic actual end game very clear.
Stop talking about it use your power president
Nice picture president Trump
Nice picture president Trump
IT SHOULD BE! that is the main thing as a country
IT SHOULD BE! that is the main thing as a country
Trump, please turn to our God for direction of what to do. I understand the importance of the wall, but also understand the importance of millions that are vulnerable at this time. I only pray we can turn to the Lord of Host for guidance and direction. Thank you Missionary Marie
Shame on you Sir for holding Your citizens pay hostage. Shame on You!
Shame on you Sir for holding Your citizens pay hostage. Shame on You!
Why don’t all you Trumpets show your support during the shutdown and work for free?
Why don’t all you Trumpets show your support during the shutdown and work for free?
Take a stand people before it is too late !! Get behind this President !!! Our constitution is in jeopardy !!!
Take a stand people before it is too late !! Get behind this President !!! Our constitution is in jeopardy !!!
Get a balanced budget and the wall.
Get a balanced budget and the wall.
ceasing to be a nation is what the democrats want.
ceasing to be a nation is what the democrats want.
Making your hands appear larger is your highest priority, after congratulating yourself.
Making your hands appear larger is your highest priority, after congratulating yourself.
I am very proud of my President... Waterbury Republicans for Trump. Right-through!
The commander and chiefs main job is to the country safe.
The commander and chiefs main job is to the country safe.
Keep standing strong Sir!!  You will win this!!  ❤️🇺🇸
Keep standing strong Sir!!  You will win this!!  ❤️🇺🇸
Doesn't matter Republican or Democrat, it about America...just build the wall.
Doesn't matter Republican or Democrat, it about America...just build the wall.
Our great President get’s it!! That’s why common sense hardworking Americans elected him-Let’s stay with & support him my fellow Deplorables 👍👍🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Our great President get’s it!! That’s why common sense hardworking Americans elected him-Let’s stay with & support him my fellow Deplorables 👍👍🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
I love all the illegal trolls comments! Just magnifies your stupidity for all our pleasure 😎
I love all the illegal trolls comments! Just magnifies your stupidity for all our pleasure 😎
Is that why you're not paying the TSA and Homeland Security?
Is that why you're not paying the TSA and Homeland Security?
Please defend us against Russian interference in our elections
Please defend us against Russian interference in our elections
The USCG and CBP defend our borders quite satisfactorily, thank you very much.  Get them back to work.
The USCG and CBP defend our borders quite satisfactorily, thank you very much.  Get them back to work.
omg, then what would you have done with CRIMNILLARY who was the one who was PAID by the russians ??
Impeach this Russian owned traitor ~
Impeach this Russian owned traitor ~
Trump On!! DO NOT give in to those liberal loons sir!!!
Trump On!! DO NOT give in to those liberal loons sir!!!
How rubles does Trump make?
How rubles does Trump make?
The left along with some rhinos don’t want a strong prosperous nation or a safe republic they want elite rule NWO and socialism, which is chaos/misery. This is the biggest battle for freedom since 1776. Right is might! Hang tough!
The left along with some rhinos don’t want a strong prosperous nation or a safe republic they want elite rule NWO and socialism, which is chaos/misery. This is the biggest battle for freedom since 1776. Right is might! Hang tough!
Mr President  , tell sneaker Pelosi  (yes sneaker) to take a long walk off a short pier and you intend to expose the liberal agenda for what it's worth in the State of the Union.
Mr President  , tell sneaker Pelosi  (yes sneaker) to take a long walk off a short pier and you intend to expose the liberal agenda for what it's worth in the State of the Union.
If only the democrats could see this. Or perhaps this is what Thay want.
If only the democrats could see this. Or perhaps this is what Thay want.
Defending our president is protecting America!
Defending our president is protecting America!
Pay the federal workers while you figure out how Mexico pays for the wall.
Pay the federal workers while you figure out how Mexico pays for the wall.
But you are doing the opposite. Poll today 57% not voting for you in 2020. living in Texas, no emergency except worrying about my retirement funds as the economy plunges into a contraction. Way to hurt the economy by billions of dollars. We as a country need to demand NO MORE Government Shutdowns. Run the branches as intended.
But you are doing the opposite. Poll today 57% not voting for you in 2020. living in Texas, no emergency except worrying about my retirement funds as the economy plunges into a contraction. Way to hurt the economy by billions of dollars. We as a country need to demand NO MORE Government Shutdowns. Run the branches as intended.
Are you really against a wall that keeps out let me rephrase that slows down the illegals that come here and take over every construction job we have for less money to protect a bunch of government people that have no worry of loosing there job to an illegal
Are you really against a wall that keeps out let me rephrase that slows down the illegals that come here and take over every construction job we have for less money to protect a bunch of government people that have no worry of loosing there job to an illegal
And if you don’t look out for your citizens?? At what point does one outweigh another. You truly can’t say you care about America when there is so many people working for the government, your government, not getting paid....I mean come on
And if you don’t look out for your citizens?? At what point does one outweigh another. You truly can’t say you care about America when there is so many people working for the government, your government, not getting paid....I mean come on
Why is it sooo difficult to Secure 👣 Protect our Country’s Borders 🇺🇸 my fellow Americans ?
Why is it sooo difficult to Secure 👣 Protect our Country’s Borders 🇺🇸 my fellow Americans ?
I believe our President need's to stop paying congress and put the real worker's back to work. Our congress is a joke! Please dock their pay for not doing their job. Put our American worker's first.Drain the swamp and replace all congress officials with term limits.
I believe our President need's to stop paying congress and put the real worker's back to work. Our congress is a joke! Please dock their pay for not doing their job. Put our American worker's first.Drain the swamp and replace all congress officials with term limits.
If boarder security was that important you would ensure DHS was funded no matter what!!! #paythecoastguard #paydhs
If boarder security was that important you would ensure DHS was funded no matter what!!! #paythecoastguard #paydhs
Yes!!  Stand strong! Don't give in to them.  We need border security!
Yes!!  Stand strong! Don't give in to them.  We need border security!
Don't budge!!!  Build the WALL or keep the government closed!!!  🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Don't budge!!!  Build the WALL or keep the government closed!!!  🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Declare a state of emergency already. Show them all what GOP backbone really is!!!
Declare a state of emergency already. Show them all what GOP backbone really is!!!
I'll vote for Donald. Nobody else has any references! Check that out?
That's not true at all lol..
You had the house and senate for two years. Now, the wall is priority? How about opening up the government so workers can get paid!!!!!
You had the house and senate for two years. Now, the wall is priority? How about opening up the government so workers can get paid!!!!!
Thank you President Trump for being there for our country . Hold your ground for many of us support you. God Bless You!
Thank you President Trump for being there for our country . Hold your ground for many of us support you. God Bless You!
Wrong (trump voice ) as long as we have people willing to fight for this great nation will always be a nation .
Wrong (trump voice ) as long as we have people willing to fight for this great nation will always be a nation .
A wall won't fix your divided nation.
A wall won't fix your divided nation.
Don't  back down.  Build the wall.
Don't  back down.  Build the wall.
Build the wall. Pay the hard working federal employees asap so they can feed their families. Also fire the committee members that decided not to pay our coast guard and homeland security. YES I KNOW HE CAN'T LITERALLY FIRE CONGRESS MEMBERS.
I guess you didn't see the latest in the senate, as they tried to block a removal of sanctions against a Russian Oligarch. Or his comment, that Russia was justified in the invasion of Afghanistan, or his taking and hiding the translator notes from his talks with Putin, or....etc etc. Your description of mainstream media as garbage indicates you, yourself, have a raging case of Coprophagia. Wise up, Mr. Green. The hour is late.
I guess you didn't see the latest in the senate, as they tried to block a removal of sanctions against a Russian Oligarch. Or his comment, that Russia was justified in the invasion of Afghanistan, or his taking and hiding the translator notes from his talks with Putin, or....etc etc. Your description of mainstream media as garbage indicates you, yourself, have a raging case of Coprophagia. Wise up, Mr. Green. The hour is late.
Oh yeah?  Where?  Where is the proof of this?  Stop eating the garbage that is mainstream media, you hack.
Oh yeah?  Where?  Where is the proof of this?  Stop eating the garbage that is mainstream media, you hack.
Wish you'd spend as much time defending us as you do Russia.
Wish you'd spend as much time defending us as you do Russia.
P-R-O-P-A-G-A-N-D-A.   Your airbrushed photos and rhetoric are straight out of the dictator handbook
Stand Strong!  This is why we elected you!!!!!!!
Stand Strong!  This is why we elected you!!!!!!!
Well I just received a call from my kids food program. You might be “ceasing a nation” as we speak. Enjoy your hamburger.
Well I just received a call from my kids food program. You might be “ceasing a nation” as we speak. Enjoy your hamburger.
The congress has refused to address immigration for years - that s why we have daca. Congress get to the table and do your jobs If we dont have borders we will cease to be a country. Build our wall
The congress has refused to address immigration for years - that s why we have daca. Congress get to the table and do your jobs If we dont have borders we will cease to be a country. Build our wall
If we don't remove the dual citizenship people from Congress,  we can kiss the US goodbye.
If we don't remove the dual citizenship people from Congress,  we can kiss the US goodbye.
“Now you sons-a-b*tches know how I feel!” (General George Patton)
“Now you sons-a-b*tches know how I feel!” (General George Patton)
Ronald Palmer  It certainly is a part of his job.  Since I do not perci me a threat along our Southern border, but I am alarmed by his contempt for NATO, I think he behavior and policy are inappropriate.
Its just common sense ,any leader in any country their primary duty is the defence of that country and its citizens
Its just common sense ,any leader in any country their primary duty is the defence of that country and its citizens
Mike Pesci Not too bright, are you!
Dude. Dumbest quote ever. How is this joker in charge of the free world???
Dude. Dumbest quote ever. How is this joker in charge of the free world???
The State of the Union MUST be given; do not let it be delayed!
The State of the Union MUST be given; do not let it be delayed!
Thank you President Trump!   We are so proud of your hard work.
Thank you President Trump!   We are so proud of your hard work.
Go for it Mr T; don't let the US be taken over like Britain has been!!(And I'm English!!)
Go for it Mr T; don't let the US be taken over like Britain has been!!(And I'm English!!)
So True! Yet Ignorant Liberals can’t figure that out!
So True! Yet Ignorant Liberals can’t figure that out!
Then pay the Department that is responsible for defending those borders!
Then pay the Department that is responsible for defending those borders!
Not me, not again. He has shown his total lack of regard for Americans. Keeping the government shutdown because he can’t get a wall. My husband is a federal contractor for the FAA and won’t be getting back pay. He isn’t doing anything to help us.
Not me, not again. He has shown his total lack of regard for Americans. Keeping the government shutdown because he can’t get a wall. My husband is a federal contractor for the FAA and won’t be getting back pay. He isn’t doing anything to help us.
We have been a nation before you came on the scene.
We have been a nation before you came on the scene.
Why didn't you go to Vietnam then ?
Why didn't you go to Vietnam then ?
Stand your ground Mr. President! The people need a strong leader!
Stand your ground Mr. President! The people need a strong leader!
Having a strong, secure border without a wall is like trying to have a strong, superior military without weapons!
Having a strong, secure border without a wall is like trying to have a strong, superior military without weapons!
If we don’t pay our employees, then we cease to be good people.
Thank you Mr. President. Stay strong! We support you.
Thank you Mr. President. Stay strong! We support you.
It’s nothing more than your rhetoric kremlin has your number
It’s nothing more than your rhetoric kremlin has your number
It's true. All persons defend their house borders.. it's the same. Not sure for democratic, They think.. not in my house but in my country yes.
It's true. All persons defend their house borders.. it's the same. Not sure for democratic, They think.. not in my house but in my country yes.
According to the Constitution, that is absolutely right.
According to the Constitution, that is absolutely right.
and yet the corporations tax cuts were more important i guess?
and yet the corporations tax cuts were more important i guess?
I knew Nancy Pelosi would eventually pull her penis out to show Trump who has the bigger one.  She is disgusting.
I knew Nancy Pelosi would eventually pull her penis out to show Trump who has the bigger one.  She is disgusting.
Dear Mr President do not cave to Nancy Plousy she is out to get you we are behind you 1000%.
Dear Mr President do not cave to Nancy Plousy she is out to get you we are behind you 1000%.
True!!! Thankyou for your good work!
You could have done it while you had control of the house
You could have done it while you had control of the house
That's right let's fight to get mexico to pay for that wall! That's what you promised right?
That's right let's fight to get mexico to pay for that wall! That's what you promised right?
Build it & they won’t come 🤣 🇺🇸 #Trump2020
Build it & they won’t come 🤣 🇺🇸 #Trump2020
You made your fingers longer and photoshopped yourself thinner.  This would be hilarious if it weren’t sad.
You made your fingers longer and photoshopped yourself thinner.  This would be hilarious if it weren’t sad.
I'm waiting for you to cease being our president!
I'm waiting for you to cease being our president!
Somebody gives him money to building the wall. He was the US president who did very well for America great again. Congress gotta trust him instead of selfish as right now.
Somebody gives him money to building the wall. He was the US president who did very well for America great again. Congress gotta trust him instead of selfish as right now.
Yet you want to remove sanctions on Russia. How is that defending our country.
Rod Novoa on what grounds? Pelosi should be charged with Obstruction
Rod Novoa on what grounds? Pelosi should be charged with Obstruction
Happy birthday! Now go build a wall make sure it’s around yourself though
How many Suzie Snowflakes do we have in here ready to whine?????
How many Suzie Snowflakes do we have in here ready to whine?????
Which is exactly what Soro's   lib/left Dems and RINOs want to happen
Which is exactly what Soro's   lib/left Dems and RINOs want to happen
A nation without borders...is no nation at all.
A nation without borders...is no nation at all.
I would expect nothing less from my President. Thank you for your strength and commitment.
I would expect nothing less from my President. Thank you for your strength and commitment.
Of all the nerve of them, taking a seven (7) day trip (excursion) in the middle of the shutdown they refuse to negotiate with the Pres. & gov. workers not being paid at that.  If they go anyway by (commercial flight) our  POTUS should declare a National Emergency !!!!
Of all the nerve of them, taking a seven (7) day trip (excursion) in the middle of the shutdown they refuse to negotiate with the Pres. & gov. workers not being paid at that.  If they go anyway by (commercial flight) our  POTUS should declare a National Emergency !!!!
That's their whole plan. To make us a Socialist open border UN province.
That's their whole plan. To make us a Socialist open border UN province.
I would LOVE to see Trump grow a beard. It would make him look more DISTINGUISHED and AUTHORITATIVE! Then the entire world would take him more serious. The Liberal Left radicals would go insane! 🤣
I would LOVE to see Trump grow a beard. It would make him look more DISTINGUISHED and AUTHORITATIVE! Then the entire world would take him more serious. The Liberal Left radicals would go insane! 🤣
Thank you President Donald J. Trump for taking care of our Country business which had been neglected for years?  God bless you and our Nation.  In God We Trust!  United We Stand ❤️🙏❤️
Thank you President Donald J. Trump for taking care of our Country business which had been neglected for years?  God bless you and our Nation.  In God We Trust!  United We Stand ❤️🙏❤️
Build that wall...save lives on both sides.....IN GOD WE TRUST - IN TRUMP WE BELIEVE...Amen...
Was wondering if Soros sent out checks for trolls during shutdown, asking for a friend
Just bypass congress and build the wall!
Just bypass congress and build the wall!
Folks write your representatives and ask that they do this...change happens when people speak up !Get rid of Speaker Pelosi and let our country move forward: How to remove Nancy Pelosi as Speaker of the House: If Pelosi's caucus wants to depose her  , the House Rules allow this to happen. According to Jefferson’s Manual, a 19th century procedural manual that has been largely incorporated into the House Rules:  A Speaker may be removed at the will of the House, and a Speaker pro tempore appointed.  A resolution declaring the Office of Speaker vacant presents a question of constitutional privilege, though the House has never removed a Speaker. It has on several occasions removed or suspended other officers, such as Clerk and Doorkeeper. A resolution for the removal of an officer is presented as a matter of privilege.
Folks write your representatives and ask that they do this...change happens when people speak up !Get rid of Speaker Pelosi and let our country move forward: How to remove Nancy Pelosi as Speaker of the House: If Pelosi's caucus wants to depose her  , the House Rules allow this to happen. According to Jefferson’s Manual, a 19th century procedural manual that has been largely incorporated into the House Rules:  A Speaker may be removed at the will of the House, and a Speaker pro tempore appointed.  A resolution declaring the Office of Speaker vacant presents a question of constitutional privilege, though the House has never removed a Speaker. It has on several occasions removed or suspended other officers, such as Clerk and Doorkeeper. A resolution for the removal of an officer is presented as a matter of privilege.
Keep going on your path. Praying for you.
Keep going on your path. Praying for you.
What if Mexico builds steps on their side of the wall 😂
What if Mexico builds steps on their side of the wall 😂
Prayers for continued Successes and safety.
Prayers for continued Successes and safety.
don't flinch we 63 mil and counting have your back ,as you have ours
don't flinch we 63 mil and counting have your back ,as you have ours
You dont know about votes huh? Liberals are so dumb!
Tina Rojas #CNNsheep
Tina Rojas #CNNsheep
You had the past 2 years with GOP in control of the House, the Senate and the Presidency...why is the wall so important now that the Dems have control of the House? #Distraction #PowerPlay
You had the past 2 years with GOP in control of the House, the Senate and the Presidency...why is the wall so important now that the Dems have control of the House? #Distraction #PowerPlay
This shutdown has lasted more days than Trump has spent with Barron in his entire life.
In that day the song will be sung in the land of Judah; "We have a strong city, He sets up walls and ramparts for security."  Isaiah 26:1   We need walls for out protection.....Heaven even has walls.
In that day the song will be sung in the land of Judah; "We have a strong city, He sets up walls and ramparts for security."  Isaiah 26:1   We need walls for out protection.....Heaven even has walls.
Russian agent #trumpresign
Russian agent #trumpresign
Can you give Mrs May some pointers please Mr President.
Can you give Mrs May some pointers please Mr President.
Great, get Mexico to pay, LIKE YOU PROMISED!
Great, get Mexico to pay, LIKE YOU PROMISED!
From time to time it becomes necessary to water the tree of liberty with the blood of traitors.
From time to time it becomes necessary to water the tree of liberty with the blood of traitors.
Yes indeed...! Stay the course Mr President. God Bless You.
Yes indeed...! Stay the course Mr President. God Bless You.
It's incredible that so many can block the president's every move - and get away with it.
God Bless our Awesome President wish he had some support
God Bless our Awesome President wish he had some support
This FB post is a LIE! DHS and CBP statistics prove that we defend our borders.
Walls are a terrible expenditure of our security dollars.  They are more of a vanity project
Walls are a terrible expenditure of our security dollars.  They are more of a vanity project
What a huge load of horseshit!
True that Mr President. Praying for God's intervention and power to get this done.
True that Mr President. Praying for God's intervention and power to get this done.
Thank you President Trump
Thank you President Trump
Thanks for keeping us safe and FREE
Thanks for keeping us safe and FREE
No border .. no country ... just take a look at Europe ..
No border .. no country ... just take a look at Europe ..
Mike Miller you my friend ...win the internet today!!  👍👍
Mike Miller you my friend ...win the internet today!!  👍👍
I disagree with the President canceling the military flight for Pelosi ..I would have waited ..Then canceled the return flight. 😂😂😛😛👍👍
I disagree with the President canceling the military flight for Pelosi ..I would have waited ..Then canceled the return flight. 😂😂😛😛👍👍
Democrats are now an adversary of the U.S. and like any enemy of the U.S. they care nothing about National Security and Public Safety..
Democrats are now an adversary of the U.S. and like any enemy of the U.S. they care nothing about National Security and Public Safety..
https://www.cnn.com/2019/01/14/opinions/trump-border-wall-bonds-solution-zelizer-zeldin/index.html?fbclid=IwAR1vCVNN44hN-bW74GWLP55dcNkM7xvhJDIrpnOSP1zmyX151phYHS6DmlY  Is this a viable option, Mr. President? I would donate :)
Hold the State of The Union at a MAGA Rally, that would be awesome!
Hold the State of The Union at a MAGA Rally, that would be awesome!
Nice pic, do you wish you were a comic book hero?  Wait, wrestler, that's it.
Nice pic, do you wish you were a comic book hero?  Wait, wrestler, that's it.
We need a wall to defend our selves from you
We need a wall to defend our selves from you
And ... I,m glad it is ... no one seems to know ..what the democrats highest and most important duty is ...I,m pretty sure it,s about taking something from you .. not doing anything for you ...
Michael Fowler, trump can't freeze Congress's paychecks. LOL 😆 Stu-pid!
So far Mr. President, the best idea yet is to freeze the pay of Congress, especially the House.  Pretty sure they will come around and do the "right" thing then...…...🤔
So far Mr. President, the best idea yet is to freeze the pay of Congress, especially the House.  Pretty sure they will come around and do the "right" thing then...…...🤔
Darlene Carter done!
Call 1800 344 8082 press 1 to Demand THE Wall
Call 1800 344 8082 press 1 to Demand THE Wall
So true.  We will be a third world county in 20 years.  Stop them now.  Oh, another caravan, 2000, is on its way.  Democrats just don't get it or it is just because Trump wants it.  Guess what, so do the American people.
Keep dogging them and stand strong!!!
Keep dogging them and stand strong!!!
"And it is not just $5 Billion... that's a downpayment for this little vanity project. The best estimate seems to be roughly $23 Billion. Which would be really nice going into education, healthcare, housing and/or FEMA about now."
"And it is not just $5 Billion... that's a downpayment for this little vanity project. The best estimate seems to be roughly $23 Billion. Which would be really nice going into education, healthcare, housing and/or FEMA about now."
Agreed Mr. President.  When we as Americans want to travel internationally we adhere to the laws; we get our vaccines, passports etc.  if we don’t, then they have the right to detain us.  Period.  I’m not sure why Democrat’s like to pretend that this is not how the civil world works...
Agreed Mr. President.  When we as Americans want to travel internationally we adhere to the laws; we get our vaccines, passports etc.  if we don’t, then they have the right to detain us.  Period.  I’m not sure why Democrat’s like to pretend that this is not how the civil world works...
I've never seen a leader come under so much fire for putting his people first.
I've never seen a leader come under so much fire for putting his people first.
Don't forget to make Fed employees have to choose between rent and their medication so you can get money to build a monument for yourself. #StoptheTrumpShutDown #MAGA
Don't forget to make Fed employees have to choose between rent and their medication so you can get money to build a monument for yourself. #StoptheTrumpShutDown #MAGA
Thanks for taking your job seriously.  Everyday it becomes more apparent that we need your strong leadership.
Thanks for taking your job seriously.  Everyday it becomes more apparent that we need your strong leadership.
Thank you President Trump, stand firm, Patriotic Americans stand behind you. '
Thank you President Trump, stand firm, Patriotic Americans stand behind you. '
WAKE UP PEOPLE... Dems don't want the wall because "DRUG MONEY" is being funneled directly into the DNC's pockets. - - #America1ST💯 #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸️
I know it  You know it  Everyone I know understands it  But ask yourself this , how do you get democrats to pay for it ? Offer to step down and they will give you $100 billion plus . They just don’t like you because your doing a great job witch includes smashing their agenda
I know it  You know it  Everyone I know understands it  But ask yourself this , how do you get democrats to pay for it ? Offer to step down and they will give you $100 billion plus . They just don’t like you because your doing a great job witch includes smashing their agenda
Jul Cox perfect so we can show Donald J. Trump the door anytime now...
We agree! Anti Americans who don’t protect our citizens can leave.
We agree! Anti Americans who don’t protect our citizens can leave.
Ever wonder what happened to the border security wall that George W. had funded and Obama claimed completed (only 37 miles not the 700 miles funded)?  So where did that money go and did that wall ever get completed or did that just go into the Dems pocket?
Ever wonder what happened to the border security wall that George W. had funded and Obama claimed completed (only 37 miles not the 700 miles funded)?  So where did that money go and did that wall ever get completed or did that just go into the Dems pocket?
I’m excited to vote again Mr. President. Trump Train 🚂💕🇺🇸👩‍👩‍👦‍👦👨‍👩‍👧‍👦🇺🇸💯
I’m excited to vote again Mr. President. Trump Train 🚂💕🇺🇸👩‍👩‍👦‍👦👨‍👩‍👧‍👦🇺🇸💯
A man that stands for the principle of America great president
A man that stands for the principle of America great president
This Is The Sign Of Your Absurdity
This Is The Sign Of Your Absurdity
You have my 100% support! May God bless you, President Trump. MAGA!!
You have my 100% support! May God bless you, President Trump. MAGA!!
We elected you to do a job and you are doing that job. I’ll vote for you in 2020 again
We elected you to do a job and you are doing that job. I’ll vote for you in 2020 again
Don't  give in to  the  stubborn  Democrats  President Trump  we are praying for you and our country. God  bless  you and your love ones
Annual cost of illegal immigration: OVER $84 BILLION. Yet Democrats will NOT spend 5 BILLION to keep Americans safe & stop drugs. WAKE UP TAXPAYERS! #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸
Nancy Pelosi wants to thank you for voting democrat in the last election. She and 30 of her democrat coworkers along with 100+ lobbyists were having a lovely time in Puerto Rican enjoying that balmy weather, attending the play Hamilton and partying with the cast in the evening, while regular Americans are struggling to make ends meet since giving 0.005% of the $3.8 trillion annual budget for the wall is just to expensive!
Nancy Pelosi wants to thank you for voting democrat in the last election. She and 30 of her democrat coworkers along with 100+ lobbyists were having a lovely time in Puerto Rican enjoying that balmy weather, attending the play Hamilton and partying with the cast in the evening, while regular Americans are struggling to make ends meet since giving 0.005% of the $3.8 trillion annual budget for the wall is just to expensive!
How many thousand American government employee's are currently not working who's job it is to protect us ?  That is defending a nation sir and you won't let them with your shutdown...   Let me repeat that Donald Trumps Shutdown.   So with that if National Defense is your highest priority?  You fail.    Resign
I’m so proud of our President!  I’m right with you in 2020. Thank you for all that you do!
I’m so proud of our President!  I’m right with you in 2020. Thank you for all that you do!
On December 12, Cohen was sentenced to 36 months in federal prison. At his sentencing, Cohen said he acted out of "blind loyalty" to Trump, adding that "time and time again I felt it was my duty to cover up his dirty deeds."
On December 12, Cohen was sentenced to 36 months in federal prison. At his sentencing, Cohen said he acted out of "blind loyalty" to Trump, adding that "time and time again I felt it was my duty to cover up his dirty deeds."
Mr President please have the SOTU address where every don,t let her get away with anything, the American people want to hear you. Good bless your North American Indian Brother.
Mr President please have the SOTU address where every don,t let her get away with anything, the American people want to hear you. Good bless your North American Indian Brother.
And nobody seemed to have cried over Obama's attempt to secure our boarder, yet all cab cry over Trump doing so? Build the wall Trump and MAGA
And nobody seemed to have cried over Obama's attempt to secure our boarder, yet all cab cry over Trump doing so? Build the wall Trump and MAGA
True...you are doing an amazing job....Mr.President keep it up...
True...you are doing an amazing job....Mr.President keep it up...
More bullshit from Mr spur head
More bullshit from Mr spur head
Chemtrails, Laser Blaster, Muslims Trojan Horse....the Wall.
Chemtrails, Laser Blaster, Muslims Trojan Horse....the Wall.
Shari Petski Mayer and it feel GREAT! He has my vote in 2020! #repeat #loveourpresident
Finally ❣️We have a Real President that will protect Our Country 🇺🇸❤️💙🇺🇸❤️💙🇺🇸❤️💙
Finally ❣️We have a Real President that will protect Our Country 🇺🇸❤️💙🇺🇸❤️💙🇺🇸❤️💙
I give tRump this much; for a man at his age, at his height, with bone spurs, to be able to get on his knees and get his mouth lined up just right with someone as short as Putin.... that's GOTTA be physically difficult to do. But I saw it. Right there in Helsinki.  #PutinsCockHolster #StateOfTheSovietUnion #TreasonousTrump Winter is Here Mueller is Coming
I give tRump this much; for a man at his age, at his height, with bone spurs, to be able to get on his knees and get his mouth lined up just right with someone as short as Putin.... that's GOTTA be physically difficult to do. But I saw it. Right there in Helsinki.  #PutinsCockHolster #StateOfTheSovietUnion #TreasonousTrump Winter is Here Mueller is Coming
Then defend our Country! High tech border security is what we need NOT A WALL! Stop defending Putin over our great institutions and the great men and women that have taken the oath to defend this Country against foreign or domestic threats. For goodness sake open the government!
Then defend our Country! High tech border security is what we need NOT A WALL! Stop defending Putin over our great institutions and the great men and women that have taken the oath to defend this Country against foreign or domestic threats. For goodness sake open the government!
You are an empty ballon that just wants to be pretty.
You are an empty ballon that just wants to be pretty.
Stand strong, do not cave in like the weak Republicans of the past! Patriots STAND with you! BUILD THAT WALL!!!!
Stand strong, do not cave in like the weak Republicans of the past! Patriots STAND with you! BUILD THAT WALL!!!!
Fear fear fear fear fear mongering.thats all he has
Fear fear fear fear fear mongering.thats all he has
Love you, Donald Trump!!!  Most of us are with you... !!!
Love you, Donald Trump!!!  Most of us are with you... !!!
I hope our president never gives in.  He is trying to protect our country.  God bless you President Trump.  You have my vote again in 2020.
I hope our president never gives in.  He is trying to protect our country.  God bless you President Trump.  You have my vote again in 2020.
God bless you Mr. President!!! Please continue to fight for us !!!
God bless you Mr. President!!! Please continue to fight for us !!!
I have an idea better than the wall that will not cost taxpayers one cent. But it is too easy so nobody listens. Mr Trump, just ask me.
I have an idea better than the wall that will not cost taxpayers one cent. But it is too easy so nobody listens. Mr Trump, just ask me.
End the Shutdown. Families are affected. You are a embarrassment
Oh lord are you one manipulative bastard, Mr. President. Talking about the defense of our nation when the very federal agencies that protect and prosper us are being shuttered or forced to work without pay.  Agencies within DHS include Coast Guard, Customs and Border Patrol (the very ones who’re supposed to be protecting our border), Secret Service, Immigration and Customs Enforcement, Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency, and even FEMA to an extent. Other agencies impacted within DOJ include FBI, DEA and Attorneys General. Not to mention the Department of State (including all the US Embassies and VISA and passport office), the USDA (which manages the lifeline for farmers) and the Department of Interior (which manages all Federal parks).  Now for USDA and Dept of Interior it might take only a few months to re-hire anyone that left. But for DHS, DOJ, DOS depending on clearance level it could take well over a year to replace someone who left.     How long, Mr. President, do you think all these people can go without a paycheck before they look elsewhere? How impacted will our security and safety be if it takes so long to rehire those in security positions? How impacted will our readiness be to prevent future terrorist attacks?  These are the questions NO ONE is talking about and you are ignoring completely or completely ignorant of. So please, sir, shut the hell up about how you’re defending us. Because: you aren’t.
Oh lord are you one manipulative bastard, Mr. President. Talking about the defense of our nation when the very federal agencies that protect and prosper us are being shuttered or forced to work without pay.  Agencies within DHS include Coast Guard, Customs and Border Patrol (the very ones who’re supposed to be protecting our border), Secret Service, Immigration and Customs Enforcement, Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency, and even FEMA to an extent. Other agencies impacted within DOJ include FBI, DEA and Attorneys General. Not to mention the Department of State (including all the US Embassies and VISA and passport office), the USDA (which manages the lifeline for farmers) and the Department of Interior (which manages all Federal parks).  Now for USDA and Dept of Interior it might take only a few months to re-hire anyone that left. But for DHS, DOJ, DOS depending on clearance level it could take well over a year to replace someone who left.     How long, Mr. President, do you think all these people can go without a paycheck before they look elsewhere? How impacted will our security and safety be if it takes so long to rehire those in security positions? How impacted will our readiness be to prevent future terrorist attacks?  These are the questions NO ONE is talking about and you are ignoring completely or completely ignorant of. So please, sir, shut the hell up about how you’re defending us. Because: you aren’t.
Please stop smoking crack.  It's bad for you Mr. Trump.
Please stop smoking crack.  It's bad for you Mr. Trump.
Keep up the great work Mr President!!  we support you dont give in one little bit!!
Keep up the great work Mr President!!  we support you dont give in one little bit!!
We will build wall if u promise to stay on other side
We will build wall if u promise to stay on other side
Trump you need to threaten to take away TSA. Same difference protecting passengers and you are tring to protect citizens.
Trump you need to threaten to take away TSA. Same difference protecting passengers and you are tring to protect citizens.
It's ok to defend everyone else's borders but not our own. That's pretty damn messed up.
It's ok to defend everyone else's borders but not our own. That's pretty damn messed up.
Enjoy prison as we clean up your mess.
Enjoy prison as we clean up your mess.
Then stop doing Putin’s bidding.
Then stop doing Putin’s bidding.
God Bless you Mr President! We do appreciate all you are doing for our us and country. Keep up the good work. Keep moving forward. ❤️🇺🇸💙
God Bless you Mr President! We do appreciate all you are doing for our us and country. Keep up the good work. Keep moving forward. ❤️🇺🇸💙
We agree with you President Trump!!
We agree with you President Trump!!
I cant wait till this trump movie is over and he is not our president any longer ..
I cant wait till this trump movie is over and he is not our president any longer ..
Agreed! Don’t give up the fight!
Agreed! Don’t give up the fight!
I support you 100%.  However, if you have the power to declare national emergency to get this done and resolved and hundreds of thousands of American workers can get back to work, please do so and stop playing into Pelosi's hands.
I support you 100%.  However, if you have the power to declare national emergency to get this done and resolved and hundreds of thousands of American workers can get back to work, please do so and stop playing into Pelosi's hands.
It's also supposed to be the job of Congress. Even Democrats!
It's also supposed to be the job of Congress. Even Democrats!
Stand strong, Mr. President!  Build the wall!  Build it strong!  Build it tall!
Stand strong, Mr. President!  Build the wall!  Build it strong!  Build it tall!
Jody Powell finally someone with a brain. Thank you for posting this
Jody Powell finally someone with a brain. Thank you for posting this
you the one freaking out about a non existent emergency 😂🤷🏻‍♂️ keep melting down ❄️❄️❄️
Jody Powell.  Haha. It is now Snowflake!
January 2017: - GOP wins majority January 2017: Wall not an emergency February 2017: Wall not an emergency March 2017: Wall not an emergency April 2017: Wall not an emergency May 2017: Wall not an emergency June 2017: Wall not an emergency July 2017: Wall not an emergency August 2017: Wall not an emergency September 2017: Wall not an emergency October 2017: Wall not an emergency November 2017: Wall not an emergency December 2017: Wall not an emergency January 2018: Wall not an emergency February 2018: Wall not an emergency March 2018: Wall not an emergency April 2018: Wall not an emergency May 2018: Wall not an emergency June 2018: Wall not an emergency July 2018: Wall not an emergency August 2018: Wall not an emergency September 2018: Wall not an emergency October 2018: Wall not an emergency November 2018: Wall not an emergency November 2018: Democratic majority elected in House January 2019: EMERGENCY!!!
January 2017: - GOP wins majority January 2017: Wall not an emergency February 2017: Wall not an emergency March 2017: Wall not an emergency April 2017: Wall not an emergency May 2017: Wall not an emergency June 2017: Wall not an emergency July 2017: Wall not an emergency August 2017: Wall not an emergency September 2017: Wall not an emergency October 2017: Wall not an emergency November 2017: Wall not an emergency December 2017: Wall not an emergency January 2018: Wall not an emergency February 2018: Wall not an emergency March 2018: Wall not an emergency April 2018: Wall not an emergency May 2018: Wall not an emergency June 2018: Wall not an emergency July 2018: Wall not an emergency August 2018: Wall not an emergency September 2018: Wall not an emergency October 2018: Wall not an emergency November 2018: Wall not an emergency November 2018: Democratic majority elected in House January 2019: EMERGENCY!!!
Stand strong President Trump!!  DO NOT CAVE TO THE WICKED DIM-WITS!!
It seems to be doing fine compared to the US.
Canada has open borders and it's fucked up. Wasting allot of money on this ppl when we should be helping are own
Canada has open borders and it's fucked up. Wasting allot of money on this ppl when we should be helping are own
We stand with you, Mr. President. Build the wall.
We stand with you, Mr. President. Build the wall.
May God bless you and all you love <3
May God bless you and all you love <3
Please keep standing your ground for us Mr President!
Please keep standing your ground for us Mr President!
My people were a nation... We were also freedom, for your kind... You stole that freedom and called it your own. we need a person from that nation to lead us if we want true greatness again... You are not it
My people were a nation... We were also freedom, for your kind... You stole that freedom and called it your own. we need a person from that nation to lead us if we want true greatness again... You are not it
Thank you President Trump for caring about America and Americans! ! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Thank you President Trump for caring about America and Americans! ! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
You  are  so  right  President Trump,  keep  up  the  great  work  you  are  doing  for  America  and  the  American people,  thumbs  up  Mr.  President,  yes!!!!!!!!!!
You  are  so  right  President Trump,  keep  up  the  great  work  you  are  doing  for  America  and  the  American people,  thumbs  up  Mr.  President,  yes!!!!!!!!!!
Thank you for putting America first
Thank you for putting America first
Keep up the great work Mr. President.  God bless you and all you are doing for our country.  You are the key to the world's future.  Take good care. 💖
Keep up the great work Mr. President.  God bless you and all you are doing for our country.  You are the key to the world's future.  Take good care. 💖
Mind=blown
:O
And by his logic the native Americans are the only real Americans.
And by his logic the native Americans are the only real Americans.
So by Donald Dumbs logic the united states never was a nation because it never had a huge wall next to Mexico. Seems legit.
So by Donald Dumbs logic the united states never was a nation because it never had a huge wall next to Mexico. Seems legit.
First Secure the Border gate of America '' That's the Job of the President ..
First Secure the Border gate of America '' That's the Job of the President ..
President Trump, your people are praying for you daily! Our Lord GOD cannot be stopped by anyone! Thank you for your service to our beloved America!⭐️
President Trump, your people are praying for you daily! Our Lord GOD cannot be stopped by anyone! Thank you for your service to our beloved America!⭐️
You told everyone that Mexico will pay for it. You even got the crowd to chant it. Now US has to pay for it and you are throwing your little tantrump.(Tantrum) LOL
You told everyone that Mexico will pay for it. You even got the crowd to chant it. Now US has to pay for it and you are throwing your little tantrump.(Tantrum) LOL
I can't wait until you cease to be President.....
I can't wait until you cease to be President.....
stay strong Mr. President There starting to cave  it's all tongue & cheek double talk right now but it's showing that Nancy is losing her support
stay strong Mr. President There starting to cave  it's all tongue & cheek double talk right now but it's showing that Nancy is losing her support
Of course take from the innocent children The rich will be okay But the poor people suffer People will start to rage you will we #throughout #fucktrump #wethepoeple
Of course take from the innocent children The rich will be okay But the poor people suffer People will start to rage you will we #throughout #fucktrump #wethepoeple
You wouldn’t like my new shirt with Pres Trump on it if you don’t like this
You wouldn’t like my new shirt with Pres Trump on it if you don’t like this
Kevin Bay but we serve a mighty God
They blew the chance to repeal Obamacare because the RINOs couldn't handle being in the majority. If go weak now, is over. They'll have a sickle and hammer on Old Glory by the next inauguration.
They blew the chance to repeal Obamacare because the RINOs couldn't handle being in the majority. If go weak now, is over. They'll have a sickle and hammer on Old Glory by the next inauguration.
Stand your ground! God Bless and protect our President as he stands up to evil!
Stand your ground! God Bless and protect our President as he stands up to evil!
President Trump it has to be the most important. Because liberal Democrats want to sell our country out
President Trump it has to be the most important. Because liberal Democrats want to sell our country out
Well you have the people behind you ... it’s wall or bust
Well you have the people behind you ... it’s wall or bust
STFU. No SOTU propaganda speech for you!
STFU. No SOTU propaganda speech for you!
We cease to be a nation if we have a king/dictator.
We cease to be a nation if we have a king/dictator.
Imagine if TRUMP fined everyone that didn't want the wall. Kinda like OBAMA and Obama Care.
Imagine if TRUMP fined everyone that didn't want the wall. Kinda like OBAMA and Obama Care.
Yeah, but if you build a wall, how are the Dems going to get the voters necessary to secure Texas and Florida's electoral college votes?
Joseph Hart military is still funded you idiot
Lost my vote in 2020 the minute DHS didnt get paid.  #paythecoastguard
Lost my vote in 2020 the minute DHS didnt get paid.  #paythecoastguard
Thank you Mr. President Trump. Thank you Lord, please Lord Bless our President to govern this country. Protect him from harm, from evil, Keep him away from danger.  Thank you Lord Amen.
Thank you Mr. President Trump. Thank you Lord, please Lord Bless our President to govern this country. Protect him from harm, from evil, Keep him away from danger.  Thank you Lord Amen.
https://www.dps.texas.gov/administration/crime_records/pages/txcriminalalienstatistics.htm
We do defend our borders quit being so dramatic! 😳😳
We do defend our borders quit being so dramatic! 😳😳
President with good ideology..... God keeps you safe.
President with good ideology..... God keeps you safe.
trump is the best.......2020 here we come
trump is the best.......2020 here we come
Thank you President Trump!🇺🇸🙏🏻🇺🇸🙏🏻🇺🇸
Thank you President Trump!🇺🇸🙏🏻🇺🇸🙏🏻🇺🇸
Quite a bombshell Giuliani dropped yesterday, huh? “I never said the campaign didn’t collude with Russia”.  Ouch. 🔥
Quite a bombshell Giuliani dropped yesterday, huh? “I never said the campaign didn’t collude with Russia”.  Ouch. 🔥
Go back to history class.  The Berline wall divided a country that did not want to be divided.  Our American wall will divide two different countries that want to be divided.  See the difference or are you still blind with hate.
Jim See Like I said read up on that! Because you are wrong! An estimated 5000 escaped into West Berlin! 327 were killed! Again,like I said do some reading on it & then get back to me instead of spouting ignorant nonsense!
Abby Schmidt lol, yea that is true. but how many border hoppers was there ? check the facts, there was 0 border hoppers. nice try tho 😂😂😂
Abby Schmidt lol, yea that is true. but how many border hoppers was there ? check the facts, there was 0 border hoppers. nice try tho 😂😂😂
Jim See Not really! Read up the history on it! As I recall it was President Regan ( a Republican) who stood & asked for the wall to be torn down! Do some reading on it then get back to me!
Abby Schmidt they tore it down cause it worked too well
Jim See And What happened to that wall in Berlin?
Jim See And What happened to that wall in Berlin?
build the wall, it worked great in Berlin
build the wall, it worked great in Berlin
Tax cuts for billionaires were more urgent.
He had two years to address this 'critical' issue and did nothing.
He had two years to address this 'critical' issue and did nothing.
Those are indeed all words...
You crossed the border from the spiritual realm to the physical realm!!! You did it Solo without any help from the government. You developed the awareness of thoughts and consciousness!! And because you are a divine being you have Sovereignty and Freewill and most valuable currency:Time!!! You created your own Reality!!!! No borders just space and time!!! Maybe a lesson to all who is interested in following the wealthy elite lifestyle? Its the ignorance of masses that's makes the 1 percent wealthy?
You crossed the border from the spiritual realm to the physical realm!!! You did it Solo without any help from the government. You developed the awareness of thoughts and consciousness!! And because you are a divine being you have Sovereignty and Freewill and most valuable currency:Time!!! You created your own Reality!!!! No borders just space and time!!! Maybe a lesson to all who is interested in following the wealthy elite lifestyle? Its the ignorance of masses that's makes the 1 percent wealthy?
Jennifer Byars White  I will propose the armed forces keep our sovereignty, not the proposed wall.  For example, Constantinople had magnificent walls, for a thousand years, but the fell as gun powder came into use with cannon.  In 1456.
Jennifer Byars White  I will propose the armed forces keep our sovereignty, not the proposed wall.  For example, Constantinople had magnificent walls, for a thousand years, but the fell as gun powder came into use with cannon.  In 1456.
I agree. A country without borders is just open land. Build that big, beautiful door Mr. Trump & let's maintain ownership of this great nation. I support you
I agree. A country without borders is just open land. Build that big, beautiful door Mr. Trump & let's maintain ownership of this great nation. I support you
COAST GUARD AND BORDER PATROL AREN'T BEING PAID.
Stay strong Mr president against the evil demoRATS
Stay strong Mr president against the evil demoRATS
Stand strong we support you!
Stand strong we support you!
Then??...Call it a National Emergency,!!  Fund and Build "Our" Wall!! Open the Gov....get back on track!! ... MAGA KAG and Safe!
Then??...Call it a National Emergency,!!  Fund and Build "Our" Wall!! Open the Gov....get back on track!! ... MAGA KAG and Safe!
That is true..no borders no country anymore
That is true..no borders no country anymore
Build it. It creates safety and jobs.
Build it. It creates safety and jobs.
100% agree. Secure our border. Stop the invasion. Stop catch and release.
100% agree. Secure our border. Stop the invasion. Stop catch and release.
There are far more criminals and murderers  that are white Americans ,  not to mention all the other American gangs and criminals than the 0.0132% of illegals that are criminals. Most drugs come through check points, human bodies, planes, etc. Hell, the drug cartels, can spend an extra couple of hundred dollars to go to Canada first then here. I mean damn...they have submarines and bring them all up and down the coast. You think an ignorant wall will stop them, lmbo! They are laughing at us!
Kathy Werbicki, the man baby doesn't know what work is! In less than two years he has golfed and vacationed more than our last president did in 8 years! He has done so while profiting off of us tax paying Americans, by staying and playing as privately owned Resorts and golf courses. He is a con man. The Democrats have said every day for him to re-open the government! That there are other ways to secure our border other than an ineffective wall!
Jeramy Felton Hargis He is the one working while the Democrats vacation.  Love you President Trump
He just wants to government shutdown so he can golf more
He just wants to government shutdown so he can golf more
No doubt.  It shows what kind of person you are.    Do you realize how many people around Trump have been charge, indicted, and plead guilty to a plethora or crimes, many leading back to 'individual 1' ?   Do you just ignore all of that, and somehow reason it all out?
I think he's awesome
I think he's awesome
"If you like your doctor, you can keep your doctor".    We currently have a potus who lies way more than he tells the truth, this is a new experience.
Edward Miller all presidents lie. Why didn't you say anything about the last one
Edward Miller all presidents lie. Why didn't you say anything about the last one
Mike, if you think it takes heat stroke to tell the truth, ok.  Please prove any of my points to be wrong.  I'll be waiting.....
Mike, if you think it takes heat stroke to tell the truth, ok.  Please prove any of my points to be wrong.  I'll be waiting.....
Edward Miller are you suffering heat stroke
Edward Miller are you suffering heat stroke
Last I checked, Mexican border has remained the same since the 1850s, and we've seemed to get by. Illegal border crossings have steadily declined since the 1970s.  I'm trying to understand why now we have an "emergency", or "crisis"..  I thought healthcare was a crisis, that was going to be "so easy" to fix, and was going to be fixed on your first day, what happened??  Seems the great negotiator,  you're NOT!!!   You have said many, many times over the years, that a government shutdown is the president's fault, it shows their lack of ability to negotiate.   WELL?????
Last I checked, Mexican border has remained the same since the 1850s, and we've seemed to get by. Illegal border crossings have steadily declined since the 1970s.  I'm trying to understand why now we have an "emergency", or "crisis"..  I thought healthcare was a crisis, that was going to be "so easy" to fix, and was going to be fixed on your first day, what happened??  Seems the great negotiator,  you're NOT!!!   You have said many, many times over the years, that a government shutdown is the president's fault, it shows their lack of ability to negotiate.   WELL?????
I can not believe Beto said he would abolish the Constitution today! He said no one follows it anyway! If that is NOT a verbal acknowledgement that the Democrats are trying to eleminate our laws.. Which is TYRANNY!  That verbal statement shows that we are fighting a domestic enemy! These people slipped through our system that failed to prosicute these people for their self confession of taking out the constitution! Why arent you people holding those accountable for stating this is their agenda..  And they sit in as a member of congress who are allowed to make laws and change them.. And no one is doing anything about it? Why? We demand answers!
I can not believe Beto said he would abolish the Constitution today! He said no one follows it anyway! If that is NOT a verbal acknowledgement that the Democrats are trying to eleminate our laws.. Which is TYRANNY!  That verbal statement shows that we are fighting a domestic enemy! These people slipped through our system that failed to prosicute these people for their self confession of taking out the constitution! Why arent you people holding those accountable for stating this is their agenda..  And they sit in as a member of congress who are allowed to make laws and change them.. And no one is doing anything about it? Why? We demand answers!
A wall won't make a difference trust me drugs and people will still get in!!  The only problem it will cost double the money so if anyone has bad habits expect to pay more for your drugs!!
A wall won't make a difference trust me drugs and people will still get in!!  The only problem it will cost double the money so if anyone has bad habits expect to pay more for your drugs!!
It’s amazing how idiots don’t understand that.
It’s amazing how idiots don’t understand that.
With our president 100% he has been the only president that cares about our country and citizens. 👍🏻👍🏻🇺🇸🇺🇸
With our president 100% he has been the only president that cares about our country and citizens. 👍🏻👍🏻🇺🇸🇺🇸
Good grief,  this feed is crawling with trolls! But it's a good sign 😊
Good grief,  this feed is crawling with trolls! But it's a good sign 😊
Dont get suckered like Reagan did!! No deals until you get your wall!! You will win this!!
Dont get suckered like Reagan did!! No deals until you get your wall!! You will win this!!
That doesn’t mean a wall.
That doesn’t mean a wall.
u are right Mr President.
u are right Mr President.
Good Bye Rudy Tuesday. Who could hang a name on you. When you change with every new day. Still I'm going to miss you ! You're Fired ! LMFAO
Good Bye Rudy Tuesday. Who could hang a name on you. When you change with every new day. Still I'm going to miss you ! You're Fired ! LMFAO
Sherry Michaels Saye your rude and old
Sherry Michaels Saye your rude and old
President Trump, just go for the executive order. Leave the Dems behind. The people need you.
President Trump, just go for the executive order. Leave the Dems behind. The people need you.
You have my support Mr. President.
You have my support Mr. President.
Thank you Mr President Donald Trump for standing up for AMERICANS!
Thank you Mr President Donald Trump for standing up for AMERICANS!
stop serving Russia if yourre so concerned
stop serving Russia if yourre so concerned
The shutdown makes no sense. Mayors and city officials who live along the border have said it’s not needed! This wall is not popular! Reopen the government!
The shutdown makes no sense. Mayors and city officials who live along the border have said it’s not needed! This wall is not popular! Reopen the government!
Build the Wall Trump.  You are the President and you have the right and authority to do this for American citizens.  We need the Wall.
Build the Wall Trump.  You are the President and you have the right and authority to do this for American citizens.  We need the Wall.
Louis Scherfig Proof of the vulgar left going even lower and proof of the dumbing down of America. Nice language.
Louis Scherfig Proof of the vulgar left going even lower and proof of the dumbing down of America. Nice language.
Typical lib! Lol
Typical lib! Lol
Louis Scherfig go away satan
I support you... in fucking yourself!
I support you... in fucking yourself!
I thank the President for being the tool we the people use to push the corrupt and greedy into the spotlight.  We want a wall, politicians been promising it for years, THIS President is willing to stand firm, obdurate in the face of slander, lies, innuendo and threats from our corrupt institutions, media, hollywood and academia.  AGAIN,       THANK YOU Sir!
I thank the President for being the tool we the people use to push the corrupt and greedy into the spotlight.  We want a wall, politicians been promising it for years, THIS President is willing to stand firm, obdurate in the face of slander, lies, innuendo and threats from our corrupt institutions, media, hollywood and academia.  AGAIN,       THANK YOU Sir!
Keep it up, Mr. President.  We are with you.  Law & Order, sovereignty
Keep it up, Mr. President.  We are with you.  Law & Order, sovereignty
Please Mr. President, just build the wall and tell the obstructionist to take a hike.
Please Mr. President, just build the wall and tell the obstructionist to take a hike.
Please sign the executive order!!!
Please sign the executive order!!!
Don’t give in, build that Wall.
Don’t give in, build that Wall.
Not only that the “Government Officials “ protesting the wall live behind walls to protect them from us
Not only that the “Government Officials “ protesting the wall live behind walls to protect them from us
Keep charging on soldier. We support you!
Keep charging on soldier. We support you!
Is this just another Russian post or has Trump learned how to di it too???   I hear Vlad is a good teacher!
Is this just another Russian post or has Trump learned how to di it too???   I hear Vlad is a good teacher!
Andy Pagoota let’s toss you over the border first
Andy Pagoota let’s toss you over the border first
We ceased to be as a DECENT nation when your sorry ass took over, but one we toss your worth less behind out, we will come back stronger than ever.
We ceased to be as a DECENT nation when your sorry ass took over, but one we toss your worth less behind out, we will come back stronger than ever.
Unbelievably, Nancy Pelosi threatened to cancel the State of the Union address for fabricated “security” reasons while simultaneously refusing to open up the government because she doesn’t want security at the border. This only makes sense if you’re a liberal. 🤔
I dont know if u r the real Donald J. Trump but good job! I wish I had even the slightest business smarts you have to grow my company!
I dont know if u r the real Donald J. Trump but good job! I wish I had even the slightest business smarts you have to grow my company!
Word Mr. President! Thank you for being brave enough to take on this important matter!! Build that wall, immigration reform, stop the drugs, stop human trafficking!!
Word Mr. President! Thank you for being brave enough to take on this important matter!! Build that wall, immigration reform, stop the drugs, stop human trafficking!!
We need to protect our borders. Every other country does so why can't we?
We need to protect our borders. Every other country does so why can't we?
Stay your ground Mr. President, whatever it takes.
Stay your ground Mr. President, whatever it takes.
Our nation isn't so weak that we need walls. Great Wall of China? Scared. Hadrian's Wall? Scared. Berlin Wall? Scared.
Our nation isn't so weak that we need walls. Great Wall of China? Scared. Hadrian's Wall? Scared. Berlin Wall? Scared.
Yes Mr. President secure our borders for the security of our nation and our future.
Yes Mr. President secure our borders for the security of our nation and our future.
that's what has happened in England, no longer a nation.
that's what has happened in England, no longer a nation.
How about cutting Congress pay? Aren't they government workers?
How about cutting Congress pay? Aren't they government workers?
#AmericasWall God bless POTUS!!
Then declare a national emergency already we are behind you
Obviously not talking about people.
Obviously not talking about people.
Thank you, President Trump ❤️. Team Trump 🇺🇸. Trump 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Thank you, President Trump ❤️. Team Trump 🇺🇸. Trump 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Stay strong Mr. President! We stand by you!!!
Stay strong Mr. President! We stand by you!!!
More lunatic ramblings from Der TrumpenFuhrer!
More lunatic ramblings from Der TrumpenFuhrer!
Please continue to hold firm for our safety.  The Dems don't care about us.
Please continue to hold firm for our safety.  The Dems don't care about us.
Worst president of all times
Worst president of all times
Thank you mr president. You are awesome. Maga2020
Thank you mr president. You are awesome. Maga2020
Study the life of Christ and then think about what you just said.
Study the life of Christ and then think about what you just said.
I rebuke you in the name of jesus liar!!!! This is not how things where supposed to be!!!
I rebuke you in the name of jesus liar!!!! This is not how things where supposed to be!!!
Bobb Marly it's still not 100% foolproof and we don't have an unsecured border like the tRumpsters like to call it..tell those that patrol it that it's unsecured
What comes through the legal entrances can be controled and tracked because they have security.  Things that come through an unsecure border can not.
You better worry what's coming through our airports and ports of entry
You better worry what's coming through our airports and ports of entry
Build The Wall Sir. Trump 2020.
Build The Wall Sir. Trump 2020.
Thank you President Trump. Correct without borders we cease to be a nation.
Thank you President Trump. Correct without borders we cease to be a nation.
In today’s news: Individual-1 spouts same old rhetoric, but doesn’t actually do anything but keep various branches of government (one of which is primarily responsible for protecting our borders) shut down and unfunded.  You can’t make this stuff up, folks.
In today’s news: Individual-1 spouts same old rhetoric, but doesn’t actually do anything but keep various branches of government (one of which is primarily responsible for protecting our borders) shut down and unfunded.  You can’t make this stuff up, folks.
The witch hunt is over!!....We found her— It’s Nancy😂.  She thinks she can block the President of the United States from speaking the truth to all Americans in the SOTU...  Nancy , Schumer and all the dems need some common sense....Your job is to protect Americans first... We are the most generous people in the world but this country will collapse if you don’t protect our people....  Do your job— we have more caravans headed this way... build the steel barrier!!!!!  You took an oath to protect America first...   🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸. Thank you Mr. President for making a stand... and if you have to, please proceed, this is a national emergency— The SOTU is a good time to outline the obvious and proceed to uphold your oath...
The witch hunt is over!!....We found her— It’s Nancy😂.  She thinks she can block the President of the United States from speaking the truth to all Americans in the SOTU...  Nancy , Schumer and all the dems need some common sense....Your job is to protect Americans first... We are the most generous people in the world but this country will collapse if you don’t protect our people....  Do your job— we have more caravans headed this way... build the steel barrier!!!!!  You took an oath to protect America first...   🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸. Thank you Mr. President for making a stand... and if you have to, please proceed, this is a national emergency— The SOTU is a good time to outline the obvious and proceed to uphold your oath...
Stand firm Mr President!
Stand firm Mr President!
Nancy Pelosi, as well as many other democrats have what the Bible calls a "reprobate mind," Calling good things evil and evil things good.
Nancy Pelosi, as well as many other democrats have what the Bible calls a "reprobate mind," Calling good things evil and evil things good.
so you are ok with 1 our of every 3 woman being sexually assaulted because they have been duped by coyotes to come to this country illegally?
Roman Wood ooh i would love to see a source for that one.
Shanna Jones most mass shootings have been committed by emigrants from other countries, research it before making an uneducated statement
Soooo y'all just gonna act like white men are not the #1 terrorists in Amerikkka? Stop the random mass shootings and then I'll support your shut down for your wall!! #unimportanttoyou...#unimportanttome
Soooo y'all just gonna act like white men are not the #1 terrorists in Amerikkka? Stop the random mass shootings and then I'll support your shut down for your wall!! #unimportanttoyou...#unimportanttome
Democrats aren't afraid the wall won't work. They're afraid the wall WILL work- thereby stopping the drug money they are currently receiving! #TRUMP2020 #MAGA #America1ST💯
Democrats aren't afraid the wall won't work. They're afraid the wall WILL work- thereby stopping the drug money they are currently receiving! #TRUMP2020 #MAGA #America1ST💯
Democrats are the problem, haven't worked for Americans in a very long time.
Democrats are the problem, haven't worked for Americans in a very long time.
To those liberals who say a couple thousand illegals crossing is not bad, how many would you consider a problem? 10,000? 100,000?  1 for me is too much, are you personally going to sponsor any of them?  I bet NO, why is that?
To those liberals who say a couple thousand illegals crossing is not bad, how many would you consider a problem? 10,000? 100,000?  1 for me is too much, are you personally going to sponsor any of them?  I bet NO, why is that?
Do your job with the money you have just like the rest of the world has to. Stop whining.
Do your job with the money you have just like the rest of the world has to. Stop whining.
Actually, tax cuts for rich people, deregulating Industry, developing wildlife preserves, and massively increased spending in the arms industry were your first priorities. Among others.  You waited until we elected Democrats to stop this nonsense to decide a wall was your priority. Your goal is to divide us more than get anything else done.
Actually, tax cuts for rich people, deregulating Industry, developing wildlife preserves, and massively increased spending in the arms industry were your first priorities. Among others.  You waited until we elected Democrats to stop this nonsense to decide a wall was your priority. Your goal is to divide us more than get anything else done.
AND YOUR DOING A GREAT JOB MR PRESIDENT
AND YOUR DOING A GREAT JOB MR PRESIDENT
Pelosi is more worried about her security than ours.
Pelosi is more worried about her security than ours.
Wish the UK had a leader that cared for the country and people like DT
Wish the UK had a leader that cared for the country and people like DT
The drug lords are lobbying against the wall
The drug lords are lobbying against the wall
Thank you Mr President for trying your best to protect our country. Build that wall.
Thank you Mr President for trying your best to protect our country. Build that wall.
Absolutely!! Let the liberals cry..
Absolutely!! Let the liberals cry..
Thank you Trump for stepping up to the plate and fighting for us.  God bless you
Thank you Trump for stepping up to the plate and fighting for us.  God bless you
Bless our President & his Family. Thank you for working to make USA great again. Cooperation from Congress is what is needed.
Bless our President & his Family. Thank you for working to make USA great again. Cooperation from Congress is what is needed.
Stand strong we’ve got your back.
Stand strong we’ve got your back.
Except for giving it over to Putin...You will eventually be arrested or impeached for treason!!
Except for giving it over to Putin...You will eventually be arrested or impeached for treason!!
Steven Brickhouse You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Funny how all the liberal trolls love to post propaganda that has nothing to do with his post...... Same Ol' crap over and over.... Noone looks at it, or dismisses it for the sewage it is.
Funny how all the liberal trolls love to post propaganda that has nothing to do with his post...... Same Ol' crap over and over.... Noone looks at it, or dismisses it for the sewage it is.
Charlie Daboub, Honestly no.. I'm just saying I think a good idea...
Charlie Daboub liar
Lisa Golden You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Lisa Golden You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
I'll vote for that man in 2020 also! BUILD THE WALL!  And anyone that doesn't like the wall or the idea of it should go live on the other side of it
I'll vote for that man in 2020 also! BUILD THE WALL!  And anyone that doesn't like the wall or the idea of it should go live on the other side of it
I didn't get paid but don't let that stop you president Trump keep fighting for the wall I'm behind you if I lose it all. I can always ask for the freebies if American citizens are eligible.
Say Strong Mr. President!  We back you 100%
Say Strong Mr. President!  We back you 100%
Civil War is unfortunately inevitable, time to prepare brother's n sister's!
Civil War is unfortunately inevitable, time to prepare brother's n sister's!
Yes...and only dummycrats don't believe that!! Build the wall Sir..please!!
Yes...and only dummycrats don't believe that!! Build the wall Sir..please!!
Well, I guess we'll just have to continue defending our borders, just like we have been this whole time.  Bummer!  I guess you really wanted that Re-Election Wall, didn't you?
Well, I guess we'll just have to continue defending our borders, just like we have been this whole time.  Bummer!  I guess you really wanted that Re-Election Wall, didn't you?
Stand firm Mr. President. We love you and love how you are fighting for our country.
Stand firm Mr. President. We love you and love how you are fighting for our country.
COULD YOU PLEASE GET GOVERNMENT OUT OF MEDICAL CARE ! I DONT APPRECIATE DOCTORS WRITING PRESCRIPTIONS WITH THE INTENTON OF HARMING THE PATIENT ! WHAT HAPPENED TO THE DOCTORS MOTTO OF FIRST DO NO HARM ! THIS IS THE RESULT OF obomocare !
Brian Nixon oh sales tax. Why would they get that back, do we?
That’s a dead link Cindy. Feel free to try again.
I never said income taxes. I said taxes. Everything they buy here, they pay taxes on. Just like you or me.
Brian Nixon how do they pay taxes? Don't you need SS# or visa to work?
Brian Nixon how do they pay taxes? Don't you need SS# or visa to work?
Undocumented immigrants literally don’t qualify for federal aid. Period. They do, however, pay taxes that they never see a penny of.  They also have much lower crime statistics than any other group of American citizens.  Feel free to try and prove me wrong. I’ll wait.
Undocumented immigrants literally don’t qualify for federal aid. Period. They do, however, pay taxes that they never see a penny of.  They also have much lower crime statistics than any other group of American citizens.  Feel free to try and prove me wrong. I’ll wait.
Brian Nixon do your research...the country blows that amount taking care of others, not the hard working taxpaying citizens of the USA.
Brian Nixon do your research...the country blows that amount taking care of others, not the hard working taxpaying citizens of the USA.
Brian Nixon Yes, Nancy and Chuck better wake up and make a deal for the LEGAL TAXPAYING AMERICAN CITIZENS and not for their greedy selves.
Brian Nixon Yes, Nancy and Chuck better wake up and make a deal for the LEGAL TAXPAYING AMERICAN CITIZENS and not for their greedy selves.
We’ll gladly defend them. But we won’t pay $21 billion just to build the damn thing, plus billions per year in maintenance.   The answer is “No”.  Your popularity is dropping pretty quick. You might want to go ahead and accept defeat on this one. That’s what you get for trying to tack regulatory bills onto spending bills.  “No”. - Nancy Pelosi
We’ll gladly defend them. But we won’t pay $21 billion just to build the damn thing, plus billions per year in maintenance.   The answer is “No”.  Your popularity is dropping pretty quick. You might want to go ahead and accept defeat on this one. That’s what you get for trying to tack regulatory bills onto spending bills.  “No”. - Nancy Pelosi
Mr President you have my support one hundred percent. As the great grand daughter of immigrants who came here the right way.....by right way I mean they didn't sneak or try to push their way in....I say kudos for taking on this fight and not simply whimping out and passing it on to the next administration .
Border patrol and customs, TSA, and Coast Guard  non essential Federal employees all not fully staffed.  How is that protecting our  borders again? Asking for a friend.
Border patrol and customs, TSA, and Coast Guard  non essential Federal employees all not fully staffed.  How is that protecting our  borders again? Asking for a friend.
Don't back down. Stay strong America. Stay strong President Trump. Love from Canada. <3
Don't back down. Stay strong America. Stay strong President Trump. Love from Canada. <3
We have been defending our borders quite successfully without your fifth century vanity wall that Mexico was supposed to build.
We have been defending our borders quite successfully without your fifth century vanity wall that Mexico was supposed to build.
Your own personal gain and the advancement of your family is your main priority.
Your own personal gain and the advancement of your family is your main priority.
God Bless President Trump!! #BUILDTHEWALL #TRUMP2020
God Bless President Trump!! #BUILDTHEWALL #TRUMP2020
It's a crisis, build the wall
It's a crisis, build the wall
we must have a wall, in order for us to be in charge of our destiny..! otherwise...OTHERS will be in charge..!
we must have a wall, in order for us to be in charge of our destiny..! otherwise...OTHERS will be in charge..!
Only thing in the morning the news is the corrupt justice department, and the Clinton's paying for a phony dossier that was used to spy on Americans
Only thing in the morning the news is the corrupt justice department, and the Clinton's paying for a phony dossier that was used to spy on Americans
Jill Earnhardt Go and read Michael Cohen’s tweet, honey.
Alix Kruz   Oh yes, if it’s in the news, it’s got to be true.  LOL
Alix Kruz   Oh yes, if it’s in the news, it’s got to be true.  LOL
Wanda Martin It all over the news right now.
Wanda Martin It all over the news right now.
PROOF??????
PROOF??????
Turns out that there was rigging going on in the 2016 election, and Trump was steering it too!  #CrookedTrump
Turns out that there was rigging going on in the 2016 election, and Trump was steering it too!  #CrookedTrump
keep it up President Trump.They are all losing their minds because you are truly saving our nation
keep it up President Trump.They are all losing their minds because you are truly saving our nation
“If you tell a lie big enough and keep repeating it, people will eventually come to believe it. The lie can be maintained only for such time as the State can shield the people from the political, economic and/or military consequences of the lie. It thus becomes vitally important for the State to use all of its powers to repress dissent, for the truth is the mortal enemy of the lie, and thus by extension, the truth is the greatest enemy of the State.”
It would be far cheaper and save alot of Money to Just Build the Wall...
It would be far cheaper and save alot of Money to Just Build the Wall...
We love you President Trump! Keep up the fight!
We love you President Trump! Keep up the fight!
Absolutely right! Thank you for staying true! The Democrats are becoming more leftist and more communist than ever! That is why they oppose you.. we know what's happening... we are onto them.
Absolutely right! Thank you for staying true! The Democrats are becoming more leftist and more communist than ever! That is why they oppose you.. we know what's happening... we are onto them.
Thank you Pres Trump for keeping America safe!
Thank you Pres Trump for keeping America safe!
ABSOLUTELY... BUILD THE BORDER WALL NOW.
ABSOLUTELY... BUILD THE BORDER WALL NOW.
The only President to actually LISTEN to the people he works for! Thank you!
The only President to actually LISTEN to the people he works for! Thank you!
Have the SOTU in an stadium, garage or anywhere... BUILD THE WALL.
Have the SOTU in an stadium, garage or anywhere... BUILD THE WALL.
This is a household that totally AGREES.
This is a household that totally AGREES.
Declare a national emergency and #BuildTheWall Mr. President.  Pelosi and the Democrats don't care about us.
Declare a national emergency and #BuildTheWall Mr. President.  Pelosi and the Democrats don't care about us.
Agree   Build the wall !!
Agree   Build the wall !!
what does defending your fragile ego get us?
what does defending your fragile ego get us?
Thank you, Mr President. As an American citizen, thank you. 2020! 🇺🇸
Thank you, Mr President. As an American citizen, thank you. 2020! 🇺🇸
Thank God for President Donald J. Trump and not President Hillary R. Clinton!!!
Thank God for President Donald J. Trump and not President Hillary R. Clinton!!!
So it's a wall making the US a nation? Thought that would be true for China....
So it's a wall making the US a nation? Thought that would be true for China....
JL Schermerhorn no its the OTHER ADMINISTRATION'S THAT everyone cheered and gave wall money to....who LIED AND DID NOTHING!! Where is your blame for them? Oh thats right the liberal paid media only Trump bash 24/7 for over two years BECAUSE THEY ARE PAID TO BY THE DNC/HILLARY CLINTON! Because she lost.....TWICE!! Maybe we would not be in this situation if they walked their talk....but Democrats just talk the talk! That was proven with 8 crap years of Obama!
We are less safe than we were for this. That's on the Trumper-tantrum.
We are less safe than we were for this. That's on the Trumper-tantrum.
The Coast Guard, you know the ones who STOP all the drugs he's got you upset about....They are NOT. The welders who fix their boats? ARE NOT.  TSA, who actually stop the terrorists...are NOT. He has sacrificed EVERY US border to get a political win. Screw him and his support for it.  Don't tell me this is about border security. It's about trump's tiny penis size and slipping popularity and impending indictments.
The Coast Guard, you know the ones who STOP all the drugs he's got you upset about....They are NOT. The welders who fix their boats? ARE NOT.  TSA, who actually stop the terrorists...are NOT. He has sacrificed EVERY US border to get a political win. Screw him and his support for it.  Don't tell me this is about border security. It's about trump's tiny penis size and slipping popularity and impending indictments.
JL Schermerhorn OUR MILITARY IS BEING PAID!! YOURE WELCOME!
JL Schermerhorn OUR MILITARY IS BEING PAID!! YOURE WELCOME!
So PAY THE F*CKING COAST GUARD. You're putting us all at risk.
So PAY THE F*CKING COAST GUARD. You're putting us all at risk.
Jody Radtke Vie Never have said we have never been safe. 4000 deaths due to illegals is not safe
Jody Radtke Vie Never have said we have never been safe. 4000 deaths due to illegals is not safe
Jody Radtke Vie If you live in a border state you would see what is happening
Jody Radtke Vie If you live in a border state you would see what is happening
Dianne Moore cause we have never been safe? Come on! Wow
President Trump keeps trying to make America safe and is fought every step of the way.  So sad
President Trump keeps trying to make America safe and is fought every step of the way.  So sad
Buck Strunk have another beer
Buck Strunk have another beer
Lots of countries have open borders. You're so poor, you've never traveled.
Lots of countries have open borders. You're so poor, you've never traveled.
Buck Strunk to bad the people who are brave enough to stand at that boarder and protect the nation didn’t get paid thanks to his wall.   #paythecoastguard #paydhs
Blaine Tundler sure they are. You need to stop watching fake news CNN.
Blaine Tundler sure they are. You need to stop watching fake news CNN.
Blaine Tundler what are they calling then, they want open borders there other way to explain it
Stephen DeVoy - I travel a lot, but I don't go to any other country, because I live in the best country in the world and there is so much to see and do in our Republic.
Stephen DeVoy - I travel a lot, but I don't go to any other country, because I live in the best country in the world and there is so much to see and do in our Republic.
Blaine Tundler yes they are
Blaine Tundler yes they are
Roy J. Freeman, here you go, you lazy and illiterate git.  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Open_border
😂😂😂😂🤔
Buck Strunk do you read at all?
Buck Strunk do you read at all?
Yes, that's right. All other countries are completely surrounded by walls, yup, sure. ;)
Yes, that's right. All other countries are completely surrounded by walls, yup, sure. ;)
Buck Strunk what about the whole of Europe dumbass
Buck Strunk what about the whole of Europe dumbass
Uhm... we don't. You don't need a wall to have border security
Buck Strunk in the vatican's defense everything in the Vatican is made of gold
Buck Strunk in the vatican's defense everything in the Vatican is made of gold
Buck Strunk have you ever been to Europe?!
Buck Strunk have you ever been to Europe?!
We shouldn't.  And we don't.
We shouldn't.  And we don't.
The Vatican has a wall. Are you saying the pope is immoral? And the Catholic Church!?!? The Vatican has the biggest wall in the world
The Vatican has a wall. Are you saying the pope is immoral? And the Catholic Church!?!? The Vatican has the biggest wall in the world
Paul Burton some have walls why shouldn’t we.
Paul Burton some have walls why shouldn’t we.
Stu Brierley shithole
Oh, and by the way, the USA DOES NOT have open borders, so you're stupid on that one too.
Oh, and by the way, the USA DOES NOT have open borders, so you're stupid on that one too.
Does Canada have a wall?  You said no other country has open borders.  We do not have open borders in the USA.
Does Canada have a wall?  You said no other country has open borders.  We do not have open borders in the USA.
Blaine Tundler where what countries
Blaine Tundler where what countries
Buck Strunk the 28 countries in the European Union have open borders. Try escaping your little bubble, the world is bigger than the US
We don't have open borders. The budget proposed by the house, which is the exact same one proposed by republicans in December, includes 21.5 BILLION for border security. I'll tell you what if trump will tax the top 5% at 70% to cover costs and bring down the deficit he can have the wall even though we know walls don't work. https://www.usatoday.com/border-wall/story/drug-trafficking-smuggling-cartels-tunnels/559814001/
We don't have open borders. The budget proposed by the house, which is the exact same one proposed by republicans in December, includes 21.5 BILLION for border security. I'll tell you what if trump will tax the top 5% at 70% to cover costs and bring down the deficit he can have the wall even though we know walls don't work. https://www.usatoday.com/border-wall/story/drug-trafficking-smuggling-cartels-tunnels/559814001/
Zulu Dalek yez
Laurie Dunco, and that's because it doesn't benefit them.
Is that a real name?
Western Europe basically has open borders and look at the chaos over there!! Millions of so-called refugees from africa & the middle east are flooding the European continent.
Western Europe basically has open borders and look at the chaos over there!! Millions of so-called refugees from africa & the middle east are flooding the European continent.
LITERALLY NOBODY is talking about open borders, you fucking moron.
LITERALLY NOBODY is talking about open borders, you fucking moron.
Horacio Daniel Hernandez freedom is worth more then gold to me sir
Horacio Daniel Hernandez freedom is worth more then gold to me sir
First time in history the Dem's don't want to spend money on something😳
First time in history the Dem's don't want to spend money on something😳
Buck Strunk Most other countries have open borders.
Buck Strunk no more crack for you
Buck Strunk no more crack for you
Buck Strunk we don’t wow!
Renate Elhart there is no mess lol
Buck Strunk actually it’s not accurate your BS.. it’s surrounded but totally open in the frontside!
Buck Strunk actually it’s not accurate your BS.. it’s surrounded but totally open in the frontside!
How many.of you anti wall people have gates and or fences around your yard?
How many.of you anti wall people have gates and or fences around your yard?
Buck Strunk schengen?
Buck Strunk we don’t have open borders! What is wrong with you trump people! So dumb you believe a jackass
Buck Strunk we don’t have open borders! What is wrong with you trump people! So dumb you believe a jackass
Buck Strunk what a dumbass
Buck Strunk what a dumbass
Buck Strunk so when will you be writing the CHECK!! #45fakepresidentwithhelpfromrussia. FOOL
Robert W. Wood i didn’t know that Hungary has a border with Syria.. when people say the Americans usually are dumb i always said “oh guys cmon” but when i see the republicans writing daaaaamn! What a waste
Robert W. Wood i didn’t know that Hungary has a border with Syria.. when people say the Americans usually are dumb i always said “oh guys cmon” but when i see the republicans writing daaaaamn! What a waste
Shamir Dehghani PREACH YOUNG KING
Shamir Dehghani PREACH YOUNG KING
We don't you fucking idiot, Jesus Christ.  Clearly never had to wait hours to cross the border.
Stephen DeVoy and you are so democrat
Buddy Phillips Nancy Pelosi does and protestors hopped her fence proving border walls don't work.
Buddy Phillips Nancy Pelosi does and protestors hopped her fence proving border walls don't work.
No one says the border is, or should be, open. You obviously don't ever cross the border or you would know that.
No one says the border is, or should be, open. You obviously don't ever cross the border or you would know that.
Buddy Phillips false equivalence. Move on.
Buddy Phillips false equivalence. Move on.
Really so the EU funded wall between Syria and Hungary says what?
Buddy Phillips you red neck get a life you loser
https://www.facebook.com/HostileSnowflakes/photos/a.586439028455494/630406827392047/?type=3&theater
https://www.facebook.com/HostileSnowflakes/photos/a.586439028455494/630406827392047/?type=3&theater
Horacio Daniel Hernandez to South Americans everything in the US is gold also! You can't just let people in without them following the process that's what Buck Strunk is trying to say! Immigrats are people that come to this country legally, Dems want to just let in anyone without being vetted because that's a sure vote for them!
Horacio Daniel Hernandez to South Americans everything in the US is gold also! You can't just let people in without them following the process that's what Buck Strunk is trying to say! Immigrats are people that come to this country legally, Dems want to just let in anyone without being vetted because that's a sure vote for them!
Buck Strunk Vatican has the biggest wall in the world?  In what fantasy land are you seeing this?  You can walk right into St. Peter's Square, and the whole Vatican is not surrounded by a wall.  Sorry.
Buck Strunk Vatican has the biggest wall in the world?  In what fantasy land are you seeing this?  You can walk right into St. Peter's Square, and the whole Vatican is not surrounded by a wall.  Sorry.
Stephen DeVoy please mention one
Paul Burton I give you Israel 🇮🇱 an China 🇨🇳!!! Plus Mexico southern border.
Paul Burton I give you Israel 🇮🇱 an China 🇨🇳!!! Plus Mexico southern border.
👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼
Buddy Phillips, better question: How many of us anti-wall people only have gates or fences on *one side* of our yards?
Buddy Phillips, better question: How many of us anti-wall people only have gates or fences on *one side* of our yards?
Tom Peden travelling outside the US might give you some perspective.
Sam Panza bruh some people are actually denying the existence of open borders in Europe. I’m so fucking done 😂😂😂😂
Sam Panza bruh some people are actually denying the existence of open borders in Europe. I’m so fucking done 😂😂😂😂
Buck Strunk we  are. America. . America  is and will always be the melting  pot of all nations
Kevin Huth those countries that have walls are under attack by pretty much everyone omg . Walls are for war , which I'm sure trump already has a plan for how much he will make off it . More border security at all ports of entry is the issue . The wall is for you idiots 🙄
Noble Loria not true if by open borders you mean any one can enter without permit from the country authorities.
Diana Berger only if you Russian bots suddenly grow bodies and build it yourselves. We won't be held hostage by a spoiled man child with no leadership,abilities.
Lonnie McAfee or how many of us have them not to keep people out, but to,keep livestock like say sheep in?
Danielle Moore tell that to Israel 🇮🇱
Danielle Moore tell that to Israel 🇮🇱
Lonnie McAfee but we will get that WALL
Lonnie McAfee but we will get that WALL
...lol...if ANYBODY wanted to stop the cheap labor coming over the border & working in America, they'd punish some businessmen...but NOBODY in Business or government really wants to stop the China-cheap workers coming over the border.  Get real...wake up!  Business love American peons and workers are supporting their workers while they've lowered their taxes, letting average Americans subsidize their workers!  They're laughing all the way to the bank. Trump hires undocumented and contract foreign laborers brought over by some slimy company...you're ridiculous and naive...
...lol...if ANYBODY wanted to stop the cheap labor coming over the border & working in America, they'd punish some businessmen...but NOBODY in Business or government really wants to stop the China-cheap workers coming over the border.  Get real...wake up!  Business love American peons and workers are supporting their workers while they've lowered their taxes, letting average Americans subsidize their workers!  They're laughing all the way to the bank. Trump hires undocumented and contract foreign laborers brought over by some slimy company...you're ridiculous and naive...
Trump supporters , you have no relevance. You are a Trump supporter. You obviously have no common sense, no morals, and are too gullible to have an intellectual opinion, since you are dumb enough to support Trump. You have been conned. A damn wall really? A wall to swim or boat around, because the wall can't block waterways. A wall to dig under, because they haven't been building mile long tunnels across the border already. A wall they can't climb over, blast or cut through like they have done. A wall they can't fly over....I mean, Trump supporters have no common sense, to know it's a waste of money. Especially, when we have a homeless problem and places like Flint!
Buck Strunk no body wants open borders. Not even Democrats.
Buck Strunk no body wants open borders. Not even Democrats.
There are far more criminals and murderers  that are white Americans ,  not to mention all the other American gangs and criminals than the 0.0132% of illegals that are criminals. Most drugs come through check points, human bodies, planes, etc. Hell, the drug cartels, can spend an extra couple of hundred dollars to go to Canada first then here. I mean damn...they have submarines and bring them all up and down the coast. You think an ignorant wall will stop them, lmbo! They are laughing at us!
Dumb ineffective wall to climb or fly over, swim or boat around, tunnel under, blast or cut through. Pure ignorance, from ignorant play president. He wants a government shutdown to golf more. Lazy crybaby babbling incoherent corrupt conman prick.
Buck Strunk we don't Buck! Quit listening to the liars saying we do.
Buck Strunk we don't Buck! Quit listening to the liars saying we do.
Buck Strunk try China for the biggest wall.... you bigly fucknugget
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
Buck Strunk where is Canadas wall
Buck Strunk where is Canadas wall
Mike Maynard That is not true at all. No Democrat ever has called for open borders. Republicans just like to say that's what Democrats want. But no Democrat has ever said that. If you do not have a social security number you can't vote in the US. So no illegals can vote for Democrats or Republicans. Democrats win more often then Republicans, because they show human compassion more often then Republicans. The vast majority of the people in this country want that from their leaders more then the strong arm approach. You don't have to agree with me on the surface. But just think critically as to why the last three Republican presidents only won the electoral college and not the popular vote, while the last 3 Democratic presidents won the electoral college and the popular vote.
Europe is falling apart with its open door massive immigration and illegal immigration policy. Canada same crap under commie Trudeau.
Mike Maynard ask the local businesses who hire if they care...lol...they don't and won't unless you string a few up every day until they respect you...lol...that's NOT going to happen... Businessmen are toooo greedy...plus you are subsidizing their workers very nicely...and they have lowered their taxes so you pay even more...you're the fool for thinking gov isn't helping business...
I'll take "Worn out Strawman for 200, Alex"
I'll take "Worn out Strawman for 200, Alex"
Frankie Pazo  Yes. As long as they come in legally. Not storming the border!!
Frankie Pazo  Yes. As long as they come in legally. Not storming the border!!
You don't have open borders. Stop being an idiot.
Renate Elhart because you lot fund the bombs that drive them out their own countries.!
We've never had opwn borders, idiot.
https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/ppx7b9/a-brief-history-of-donald-trump-and-the-mafia
Buddy Phillips only to stop my dog from escaping....
Jeramy Felton Hargis, why is it anti Trump people can’t even see the noses on their own faces? You have this idea a wall is only a physical structure, but with seismic instruments, drones, and other technologies, it becomes a smart wall. Of course there are still other areas to address, but a wall is a good beginning   As far as homeless and flint goes, doesn’t Pelosi have 54 billion in discretionary expenses? Why not send some of that money to those concerns?  Also, Trump is asking for about 1/60th of the annual interest that accrued on 22 trillion in debt.   Talk about anti Trump people not having even the insight God bestowed on even a pet hamster.
Jeramy Felton Hargis, why is it anti Trump people can’t even see the noses on their own faces? You have this idea a wall is only a physical structure, but with seismic instruments, drones, and other technologies, it becomes a smart wall. Of course there are still other areas to address, but a wall is a good beginning   As far as homeless and flint goes, doesn’t Pelosi have 54 billion in discretionary expenses? Why not send some of that money to those concerns?  Also, Trump is asking for about 1/60th of the annual interest that accrued on 22 trillion in debt.   Talk about anti Trump people not having even the insight God bestowed on even a pet hamster.
Buck Strunk What about the Great Wall in China? That is the worlds largest wall & China was still invaded by the Mongols! Not by imaginary caravans!
Buck Strunk  Right....so close Canadian border and Great Lakes and especially the east and west coast....You know those Dem strongholds will let ANY TERRORIST in.
Buck Strunk  Right....so close Canadian border and Great Lakes and especially the east and west coast....You know those Dem strongholds will let ANY TERRORIST in.
Buck Strunk stupid as remark
Jason Mills walls and fencing works! Ask Nancy & Chuck. They have them around their palaces to keep people like you out!
Buck Strunk Canada?
Buck Strunk 🙄 hmm is there a fence in Mexico? Hmm is there a wall on Canadian border hmm you mean all countries have a wall around them. Orange Kool-Aide.
Buck Strunk 🙄 hmm is there a fence in Mexico? Hmm is there a wall on Canadian border hmm you mean all countries have a wall around them. Orange Kool-Aide.
Buck Strunk
Don't you need passport to visit other countries
Don't you need passport to visit other countries
Joseph Hart ... they all get paid, dumbass....
Horacio Daniel Hernandez and the Vatican's gold is more precious than American's lives?
Solo son ustedes basura
Jajsjsjajaj
Que ridículos son e.U
We do not have open borders you cultist
Try not being hysterical open borders is not what we are talking about
Buck Strunk fact. Democrats and liberals are too stupid to understand how the real world works.
Buck Strunk fact. Democrats and liberals are too stupid to understand how the real world works.
Here's another crook >:(  https://www.facebook.com/1537229243218831/photos/a.1627289967546091/2250342431907505/?type=3&theater
Here's another crook >:(  https://www.facebook.com/1537229243218831/photos/a.1627289967546091/2250342431907505/?type=3&theater
Buck Strunk   The constant state of fear you people live in is preposterous.  What exactly is it that drives this incredible paranoia you have?
Buck Strunk   The constant state of fear you people live in is preposterous.  What exactly is it that drives this incredible paranoia you have?
cnn said that "Cohen was the President's lawyer". I have to look that up if that is strictly correct. Was Cohen the lawyer of the Potus when he took Office? The word "lawyer" also seems not really correct: Cohen was in fact more of a fixer. Nobody sees him as "a learned legal mind" at all.
cnn said that "Cohen was the President's lawyer". I have to look that up if that is strictly correct. Was Cohen the lawyer of the Potus when he took Office? The word "lawyer" also seems not really correct: Cohen was in fact more of a fixer. Nobody sees him as "a learned legal mind" at all.
Tabatha L Deeks, why don’t you visit any number of cruise companies and read their Q&A about which countries require passports and some need visas too?
Tabatha L Deeks, why don’t you visit any number of cruise companies and read their Q&A about which countries require passports and some need visas too?
sweden😂😂 Adam Lindström
sweden😂😂 Adam Lindström
Tabatha L Deeks, are you joking!!  Damn straight we need passports! Who told you we didn’t?
Tabatha L Deeks, are you joking!!  Damn straight we need passports! Who told you we didn’t?
Buck Strunk no other country has a wall around it. Canada, Russia, China, Brazil none has a border wall.
Buck Strunk , all countries under international law are required to accept people seeking asylum. Get educated before you speak.
Buck Strunk changed has to start somewhere right so build the wall it's a start on cleaning up the drugs. Unless you want the drug.
Buck Strunk changed has to start somewhere right so build the wall it's a start on cleaning up the drugs. Unless you want the drug.
Kathy Finley Hayden do you know what it takes to immigrate legally to Canada ? My Lebanese family , applied and they had to pass a French test , a medical test , wait 10 whole years before their papers arrived then they only had one month timeline to land in Canada ... illegal immigration is not allowed in Canada or in any other country in the world ! Stop with the hypocrisy ! Why should illegal immigration be allowed in the states ? Love your country more than you love your party guys and stop finding excuses to illegal behavior ! Shame !!
Kathy Finley Hayden do you know what it takes to immigrate legally to Canada ? My Lebanese family , applied and they had to pass a French test , a medical test , wait 10 whole years before their papers arrived then they only had one month timeline to land in Canada ... illegal immigration is not allowed in Canada or in any other country in the world ! Stop with the hypocrisy ! Why should illegal immigration be allowed in the states ? Love your country more than you love your party guys and stop finding excuses to illegal behavior ! Shame !!
Paul Burton give me one single country in the world , including third world countries where illegal immigration is allowed and no punishable by law . Waiting ...
Paul Burton give me one single country in the world , including third world countries where illegal immigration is allowed and no punishable by law . Waiting ...
Stephen DeVoy give me one country , one single country that allows illegal entry to its territories ... when I lived in Copenhagen I would take the train to malmo Sweden twice a week for Work , and do you know how many check points there were ? One before boarding the train , another one ON the train and one last upon arrival ... you should always have your passport on you ... I believe it is YOU who have never traveled so zip it !
Stephen DeVoy give me one country , one single country that allows illegal entry to its territories ... when I lived in Copenhagen I would take the train to malmo Sweden twice a week for Work , and do you know how many check points there were ? One before boarding the train , another one ON the train and one last upon arrival ... you should always have your passport on you ... I believe it is YOU who have never traveled so zip it !
Buck Strunk I guess you're unaware that we do not have open borders buck. We have barriers in place in certain areas and the border patrol is doing a fantastic job. This is all a scare tactic that you believe from your president. I never want to hear the word wall again because everybody's obsessed with it
Buck Strunk I guess you're unaware that we do not have open borders buck. We have barriers in place in certain areas and the border patrol is doing a fantastic job. This is all a scare tactic that you believe from your president. I never want to hear the word wall again because everybody's obsessed with it
Buck Strunk Uh, we don’t have open borders.
Buck Strunk yes they do.  All the bad ones can come live with you or by you and your kids.
Buck Strunk NO ONE wants open borders doofus! Quit drinking the faux koolaid
Buck Strunk Have You Never Heard Of The Great Wall Of China?
Buck Strunk they aren’t open here either
Buck Strunk your borders aren’t open... and they wouldn’t be if a wall fails to suffice. do you even look anything up or get your info straight from the hog?
Any police Officer or Civilian murdered by a Illegal is 100% the Democrats Fault....Demtards Have Blood on their Hands...
Any police Officer or Civilian murdered by a Illegal is 100% the Democrats Fault....Demtards Have Blood on their Hands...
Christina Messa drugs are the problem concentrate on the problem not a midevil wall that can be breeched over under around or through
Shamir Dehghani only an idiot would state that , I don’t think you ever traveled to Europe because if you are talking about he Schengen status here’s how it works : if you want to immigrate to any of the Schengen countries LEGALLY , you need to apply for a visa in one of those and land FIRST in the country you took the visa from , then you can go from Schengen country to another freely , ONLY if your visa states MULTIPLE ENTRIES on it ! If NOT , the only country you can go to , is the one you took visa for . Now those Schengen countries signed a deal with regulations that makes them like different states . You sure have open borders from one state to the other but as long as you came to the states altogether , LEGALLY , in the first place . Got it ? Ignorance at its finest !
Shamir Dehghani only an idiot would state that , I don’t think you ever traveled to Europe because if you are talking about he Schengen status here’s how it works : if you want to immigrate to any of the Schengen countries LEGALLY , you need to apply for a visa in one of those and land FIRST in the country you took the visa from , then you can go from Schengen country to another freely , ONLY if your visa states MULTIPLE ENTRIES on it ! If NOT , the only country you can go to , is the one you took visa for . Now those Schengen countries signed a deal with regulations that makes them like different states . You sure have open borders from one state to the other but as long as you came to the states altogether , LEGALLY , in the first place . Got it ? Ignorance at its finest !
Marcus Nizza it is a Desaster.
Raul Andres Gonzalez Sr., excuse me??? No other country can demand who we let in or whether that decision is cost prohibitive. We have the final say, not the rest of the world.
Raul Andres Gonzalez Sr., excuse me??? No other country can demand who we let in or whether that decision is cost prohibitive. We have the final say, not the rest of the world.
Keith Webber Jr.  Actually, anyone that is here because they have overstayed their visa Is Trumps fault. Remember, he said he was going to round every illegal up and report them.
Buck Strunk yes. We have. Now see what is happening... 😶 Crime overall
Buck Strunk yes. We have. Now see what is happening... 😶 Crime overall
Does Canada have a wall? 🤔
Ranting In Reality its fact 🐸☕️
It's a TRAP !!!!!!! 😈
Buck Strunk  Germany, Britian, Ireland, Canada, Africa, Saudi Arabia. No walls. should I continue?
Buck Strunk  Germany, Britian, Ireland, Canada, Africa, Saudi Arabia. No walls. should I continue?
Raul Andres Gonzalez Sr. Wrong!
Friends. Have you people joined the team Trump yet? Please join, so we become more effective. Thank you.
Problem with many Yanks is they got tunnel vision...We expecting the rest of Zimbabwe very soon....millions here already...draining our already overstretched resoures...dont put up the wall and that's gonna be your lot..disease,crime and general derogation...look at South Africa and see your DOOM...
Buck Strunk we don't have open borders, hardly any of those other countries have border walls, why should we?
Buck Strunk we don't have open borders, hardly any of those other countries have border walls, why should we?
Buck Strunk we don't have open boarders.....why would you think that?
Buck Strunk we don't have open boarders.....why would you think that?
Because if we have open borders then all the invaders will come and overload the systems and break down the United States. Then the globalist can move forward with the new world order.
Marcus Nizza ya and they are revolting against their government now lol
Buck Strunk we do not have open borders.  Think better.
Buck Strunk uk were fkd
Buck Strunk uk were fkd
Well, UK kind of does. It hasn't gone so well at all. Hahaha
Blaine Tundler I hate liars, and your good at it, also I didn't know they let monkeys at the zoo cut hair, What a disaster.
Buck Strunk Wrong, as pointed out here. But that's these other countries' misfortune and bad judgement.
Buck Strunk, not true, the USA border has never been 'open'.    Except the one square mile , The Vatican, has no continuous fence/wall.
Fernando Volquez you are not that stupid to think that no one has walls to protect their borders are you. I don’t know you so maybe you are. Let me enlighten you some do. Shut for brains
Buck Strunk we don’t have open borders, stop believing everything Trump says....
Lonnie McAfee ok give us you address and we can send some illegals to your house. I pray no one you know gets killed by any illegals. You would change your mind on that.
This is quite literally untrue.
Buck Strunk we do not have open borders
https://www.facebook.com/GoLeftEveryone/photos/a.264248670275743/2318963788137544/?type=3&theater
https://www.facebook.com/GoLeftEveryone/photos/a.264248670275743/2318963788137544/?type=3&theater
To set an example.
Because nobody else has borders probably
Because were the only ones stupid enough to reward them for breaking the law. So they love our open borders.  I said sharp shooters should be all across the boarder. Anything that comes over just shoot it.. but its "inhumane"
Because were the only ones stupid enough to reward them for breaking the law. So they love our open borders.  I said sharp shooters should be all across the boarder. Anything that comes over just shoot it.. but its "inhumane"
Buck Strunk So we should do what other countries do?
I'm guessing you don't live in the EU. Here everyone has open borders and every country is full of immigrants. It's fucking awful
Stan Pierce How does Israel have anything to do with anything that I said?
No other country has guns either and they have socialist healthcare. You still think "other countries" is the example you want to use?
No other country has guns either and they have socialist healthcare. You still think "other countries" is the example you want to use?
Yeah I noticed how Canada built a wall.  And I travelled all over Europe and you couldn't go anywhere without running into a wall.  Even Russia has a wall.  Wait a minute.  Nope, they all have borders with no walls.  How can that be.  Do they know something we don't?   Check your facts.
Yeah I noticed how Canada built a wall.  And I travelled all over Europe and you couldn't go anywhere without running into a wall.  Even Russia has a wall.  Wait a minute.  Nope, they all have borders with no walls.  How can that be.  Do they know something we don't?   Check your facts.
Buck Strunk  Australia has open borders.
Buck Strunk. Do you think all of the other 194 countries in the world are surrounded by 30' walls? 🤷‍♀️
Buck Strunk. Do you think all of the other 194 countries in the world are surrounded by 30' walls? 🤷‍♀️
Wrong, check your facts, you sound like trump.
Buck Strunk we don’t have open borders? Idiot.
Buck Strunk your president needs you immediately  volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money go go
We had well guarded borders before the Trump Shutdown occurred. Thanks to Trump for leaving the borders unsecured and open. Now just about about anyone armed can pass through the gates at our airports. Remember how Osama bin laden got into the country and planned the attacks ok n 9/11?  May as well just reopen the government and put more armed security to work. Because right now we have open borders because of Trump.
We had well guarded borders before the Trump Shutdown occurred. Thanks to Trump for leaving the borders unsecured and open. Now just about about anyone armed can pass through the gates at our airports. Remember how Osama bin laden got into the country and planned the attacks ok n 9/11?  May as well just reopen the government and put more armed security to work. Because right now we have open borders because of Trump.
Buck Strunk is that your real name fucktard?
No one is saying we should have open borders.
No one is saying we should have open borders.
Buck Strunk are you serious?
Buck Strunk are you serious?
Buck Strunk totally agree. Trump however urged his base to vote for him in the simplest terms: rapists and murderers are coming across the border—vote for me, I’ll build a big wall. Try and get some perspective. 30,000 Americans are injured or killed by gun violence committed by other Americans in this country every year. A $20,000,000,000 wall will not protect you from people who want to pick fruit and vegetables.
Buck Strunk totally agree. Trump however urged his base to vote for him in the simplest terms: rapists and murderers are coming across the border—vote for me, I’ll build a big wall. Try and get some perspective. 30,000 Americans are injured or killed by gun violence committed by other Americans in this country every year. A $20,000,000,000 wall will not protect you from people who want to pick fruit and vegetables.
Yes, and why do US citizens have to pay for passports to visit OTHER countries, but Democrats allow and welcome anyone to cross the border regardless. Insane.
Yes, and why do US citizens have to pay for passports to visit OTHER countries, but Democrats allow and welcome anyone to cross the border regardless. Insane.
Buck Strunk No it doesn’t. The biggest wall in the world is the Great Wall of China. The Vatican has a wall like many town/ cities in Italy when it was made up of city states prior to becoming a nation. Lots of cities across Europe have walls, built during the medieval period not this century or the last. Examples such as the Vatican  are not a valid comparison to Trump’s plan.
Leave him alone he apparently doesn't read and Dude has obviously never been to Europe lol..
Leave him alone he apparently doesn't read and Dude has obviously never been to Europe lol..
Buck Strunk Sigh...Do you have open borders right now?
Buck Strunk Sigh...Do you have open borders right now?
And we don't so you don't have a point.
And we don't so you don't have a point.
1. Literally no one is advocating an open border policy. 2. I assume you've never been to the EU.
1. Literally no one is advocating an open border policy. 2. I assume you've never been to the EU.
Buck Strunk This was not your country, read the history, how you got here and made this land your own.  All the whites were illegals, experienced in torturing, tormenting and butchering the Native Americans.
Buck Strunk This was not your country, read the history, how you got here and made this land your own.  All the whites were illegals, experienced in torturing, tormenting and butchering the Native Americans.
Buck Strunk lie
Uhm....you need to educate yourself with a map, and how are your borders open?
Shannon gee do I need to report you to the authorities.you worry me.do you have dead bodies hidden in your basement.
The House overwhelmingly passes resolution disapproving of Russia sanctions relief, 362-53, a symbolic rebuke of Trump admin decision.  There were 136 Republicans who supported the measure and 53 opposed--And just to be clear: This won't stop the sanctions from being lifted because the measure failed in the Senate
The House overwhelmingly passes resolution disapproving of Russia sanctions relief, 362-53, a symbolic rebuke of Trump admin decision.  There were 136 Republicans who supported the measure and 53 opposed--And just to be clear: This won't stop the sanctions from being lifted because the measure failed in the Senate
NRA spent $30 million on pro-Trump endorsements in 2016. Where did that money come from? https://www.newsweek.com/nra-admits-accepting-money-23-russia-linked-donors-882310?fbclid=IwAR015PHN88-ca9ZgQGvoX1CHlHUrxPcvMV0DOU3waskM3xsJFvwY4PL7jkw
Buck Strunk most countries have open boarders
Buck Strunk most countries have open boarders
Buck Strunk Canada has border crossings but no wall yet so our border is open. FYI
Which part of "Donald Trump is a shifty piece of garbage" were you folks too stupid to comprehend?  https://aol.it/2syE6Zk
Absolute moron. All of the EU has open borders.
We don't! Ptf, you believe every little thing he says.
Laurie Dunco and the REPUBLICANS are spending like crazy
Buck Strunk Mexico and Canada do... in fact, most countries have fairly porous borders.  Lol.
Buck Strunk Mexico and Canada do... in fact, most countries have fairly porous borders.  Lol.
because the "educated" has mistaken a sculptors inscription for law....and no one can get through to them that though we invite anyone to come, there is a right way..
Buck Strunk what is the difference between me and you,your country is rich but my country is no many so i want live in amazing country,thats wrong?
Amren Dugan  Typical Hillary follower.
Amren Dugan  Typical Hillary follower.
Buck-  We don’t  have  open  borders  and  despite  what  the  lying  dimwit  in the  White House  says,  the  Democrats  are  not  in  favor  of  open  borders.
Typical Trump follower.
Typical Trump follower.
Buck Strunk if all the other countries decided to jump off of a bridge, would you do it?
Buck Strunk if all the other countries decided to jump off of a bridge, would you do it?
Buck Strunk yes, there are many other countries in Europe for example.. Had you ever been out of the United States?
Buck Strunk no other country besides Russia North Korea has an ASSHOLE as president it holds American workers hostage because Trump don't get what he wants  .who the Flying F said we have open borders we have miles miles miles of Boarder security checkpoints including the one up north so why you freaking telling that Damm lie  oh I forget your a Trump Supporter you believe any lie that comes out of the Jackass I used to love this Country but Trump sorry ass made that Country into a Country of  Hate and you all think this ok .if you love Trump this show you love someone as Freaking dictator
Buck Strunk no other country besides Russia North Korea has an ASSHOLE as president it holds American workers hostage because Trump don't get what he wants  .who the Flying F said we have open borders we have miles miles miles of Boarder security checkpoints including the one up north so why you freaking telling that Damm lie  oh I forget your a Trump Supporter you believe any lie that comes out of the Jackass I used to love this Country but Trump sorry ass made that Country into a Country of  Hate and you all think this ok .if you love Trump this show you love someone as Freaking dictator
Liberalism is a disease!
Buck Strunk Dude, if your meaning is "walled border", you have your list inverted...  About 32 out of 195 countries have walled borders...
Buck Strunk Dude, if your meaning is "walled border", you have your list inverted...  About 32 out of 195 countries have walled borders...
Buck Strunk AMEN
Sandy Nicholson nobody wants to migrate to Canada. That’s why lol
Sandy Nicholson nobody wants to migrate to Canada. That’s why lol
Buck Strunk actually, plenty of countries have open borders. And they’ve all turned to trash. 😉
Buck Strunk actually, plenty of countries have open borders. And they’ve all turned to trash. 😉
Lol. Really? When did Canada build a southern border wall?
Lol. Really? When did Canada build a southern border wall?
Why didn't trump propose this border wall at anytime duri g the first 2 years of his presidency  when the Republicans controlled both House and Senate? 🤔
Why didn't trump propose this border wall at anytime duri g the first 2 years of his presidency  when the Republicans controlled both House and Senate? 🤔
Arnold Bowie He  is  your  President  and  he  is  doing  a  great  job by  putting  America  First.  Research  the  issue  and  see  what  Border  Agents  says  we  need,  WALLS do  WORK....listen  to  Homeland  Security  with  the  actual  facts  instead  of  being  spoon  fed  by  the  ANTI  HATE  TRUMP  media.
Arnold Bowie He  is  your  President  and  he  is  doing  a  great  job by  putting  America  First.  Research  the  issue  and  see  what  Border  Agents  says  we  need,  WALLS do  WORK....listen  to  Homeland  Security  with  the  actual  facts  instead  of  being  spoon  fed  by  the  ANTI  HATE  TRUMP  media.
Bakhtyar Abdullah do it legally! U do know what that word means right?
Bakhtyar Abdullah do it legally! U do know what that word means right?
Danielle Moore no they hopped her fence with illegal immigrants to prove that she dont want people trespassing on her property and felt violated.
Danielle Moore no they hopped her fence with illegal immigrants to prove that she dont want people trespassing on her property and felt violated.
Buck Strunk You got that right.
Buck Strunk You got that right.
Catherine Ott Walls are put where needed.
Buck Strunk your statement is factually incorrect
Buck Strunk your statement is factually incorrect
Buck Strunk He’s married to an illegal. Which of the criteria for the Einstein Visa did she meet??  🤔 https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/EB-1_visaen.wikipedia.org
Buck Strunk He’s married to an illegal. Which of the criteria for the Einstein Visa did she meet??  🤔 https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/EB-1_visaen.wikipedia.org
Buck Strunk we don’t have open borders 🙄
Buck Strunk we don’t have open borders 🙄
Doug King so you don't know history. The Berlin wall was to keep people in not out
Doug King so you don't know history. The Berlin wall was to keep people in not out
didn't the Berlin wall come down?
didn't the Berlin wall come down?
Bakhtyar Abdullah Either do it legally, or make your country amazing!  Nothing wrong with that!
Natasha Bitter Russia
Buck Strunk you are a moron. What other countries have you been to? Right here on this continent there is no border with Canada. No wall. No fence. In Europe there are no walls or fences either. Only in very few places are there walls.  Wake up folks. Read. Educate yourself.
Buck Strunk you are a moron. What other countries have you been to? Right here on this continent there is no border with Canada. No wall. No fence. In Europe there are no walls or fences either. Only in very few places are there walls.  Wake up folks. Read. Educate yourself.
Buck Strunk THANK YOU 🙌🏻🙏🏻👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼🇺🇸
Buck Strunk do you seriously think that every other country in the world has walls around it except for the United States? 🙄
Buck Strunk do you seriously think that every other country in the world has walls around it except for the United States? 🙄
Isaiah Marquiss smart?
Buck Strunk RIGHT ON BUCK. BUILD THAT WALL.
Buck Strunk RIGHT ON BUCK. BUILD THAT WALL.
Buck Strunk are you okay?
Buck Strunk are you okay?
For the love of God we don't have it open border! We have security we had the lowest illegal immigration of all time! The wall is useless as it was a selling point for the simple-minded! And that's the reason why he is sticking with it because if he does not make this happen even the simple-minded won't back him!
For the love of God we don't have it open border! We have security we had the lowest illegal immigration of all time! The wall is useless as it was a selling point for the simple-minded! And that's the reason why he is sticking with it because if he does not make this happen even the simple-minded won't back him!
Every single country in the EU has open borders. Ever heard of the Schengen agreement dumbass??
Every single country in the EU has open borders. Ever heard of the Schengen agreement dumbass??
Barbara Anderson what the f*** do you know? There are hundreds of miles of border with no one watching and people just streaming across. Guess where I live. Now think about where you live. Butt out stupid
Buck Strunk clearly you don’t know what is going on. The States does NOT have “open borders”. Do your homework
Buck Strunk clearly you don’t know what is going on. The States does NOT have “open borders”. Do your homework
Kevin Rodriguez isreal mexico , if you look they a lot more ,
Kevin Rodriguez isreal mexico , if you look they a lot more ,
Buck Strunk Canada’s border is open, Frances boarder is open, Mexico’s boarder is open, Iran’s boarder is open, I could go on
Buck Strunk Canada’s border is open, Frances boarder is open, Mexico’s boarder is open, Iran’s boarder is open, I could go on
other country's have tougher laws and enforce them ...in other country's if you steal you get your hand cut off, here you get a slap on the hand... other country's if you kill someone you get put In front of a firing squad,  here you get 20 years of appeals till your unfit for death...see the difference we need stricter laws and to enforce them..
Nor do we
Nor do we
Buck Strunk 👏🏽👏🏽👏🏽 that’s what I’m saying too!!
Buck Strunk 👏🏽👏🏽👏🏽 that’s what I’m saying too!!
I know you didn't mean that statement literally. Ignore the ignorant word police.
I know you didn't mean that statement literally. Ignore the ignorant word police.
Patrick Benthin and look at how they are over run with two-legged vermin.
Jason Rush I live on the border. Miles and miles of open desert, most illegals don't show up at the gates, DS.
Jason Rush I live on the border. Miles and miles of open desert, most illegals don't show up at the gates, DS.
Buck Strunk so if everyone jumps so will you. Develop a mind and back bone.
Buck Strunk so if everyone jumps so will you. Develop a mind and back bone.
Buck Strunk we don't have open borders dumbshit. You need a passport to come in
Buck Strunk we don't have open borders dumbshit. You need a passport to come in
Danielle Moore   dufus....
Buck Strunk oh I don’t know 9/11, Oklahoma City bombings, Boston Marathon bombings, Mexican and Columbia’s drug cartels, others then that none.
Buck Strunk oh I don’t know 9/11, Oklahoma City bombings, Boston Marathon bombings, Mexican and Columbia’s drug cartels, others then that none.
We dont its a Republican  lie.
We dont its a Republican  lie.
John Hamrick Yet two things of note ... 1) illegals apprehended at the border are at the lowest point in nearly 40 years and 2) less than half of our illegals come across that border.
John Hamrick Yet two things of note ... 1) illegals apprehended at the border are at the lowest point in nearly 40 years and 2) less than half of our illegals come across that border.
Countries with open borders: Spain, France, Portugal, Switzerland, Austria, Denmark, Germany, Netherlands, Belgium, Austria and so on
Countries with open borders: Spain, France, Portugal, Switzerland, Austria, Denmark, Germany, Netherlands, Belgium, Austria and so on
Patrick Benthin And everyone of those country's have major immigration problems
Buck Strunk no one wants that. But a lot of other countries have universal health care, so by your logic, we should too
Buck Strunk no one wants that. But a lot of other countries have universal health care, so by your logic, we should too
America doesn't have open borders either. BTW the UK doesn't have a wall. Neither do many European countries. Canada doesn't have one but they are considering because of the influx of Americans running away from America.
America doesn't have open borders either. BTW the UK doesn't have a wall. Neither do many European countries. Canada doesn't have one but they are considering because of the influx of Americans running away from America.
Nick Amato , they don't have open borders. I needed a passport and they questioned us when we visited. I couldn't just walk on over.
Nick Amato , they don't have open borders. I needed a passport and they questioned us when we visited. I couldn't just walk on over.
Ricky Miles the Hell I would claim that Assclown Trump as my President .My President was Ronald Reagan ,George HW Bush .George w Bush, Jimmy Carter .Bill Clinton and Barack Obama and you can add John F Kennedy Dwight e Eisenhower Abraham Lincoln Franklin Delano Roosevelt
Ricky Miles will my President is the Asshole of the United States of America would allow all 800 thousand American federal workers go with out pay
Ricky Miles will my President is the Asshole of the United States of America would allow all 800 thousand American federal workers go with out pay
Buck Strunk THE BORDERS AREN'T OPEN DUMB AZ! https://www.facebook.com/268914272540/posts/10155952624017541/
Buck Strunk THE BORDERS AREN'T OPEN DUMB AZ! https://www.facebook.com/268914272540/posts/10155952624017541/
Tim Davidson You are a Fool!
Neither do we. Just because he says it doesn't make it true.
Another uneducated cockwomble living in a bubble
https://www.facebook.com/100011042624731/posts/757414017970012/ Buck Strunk
Borders? Never heard about protected border in EU... Sadly. Maybe some legend from XX years ago.
Says the guy who’s clearly never been outside his little bubble. Travel more.
Says the guy who’s clearly never been outside his little bubble. Travel more.
Buck Strunk  I guess you never heard of the EU.
Buck Strunk  I guess you never heard of the EU.
That's the question we should be asking our government maybe government of the past... obviously it's future destruction of our dear country.
That's the question we should be asking our government maybe government of the past... obviously it's future destruction of our dear country.
John Ulsh yes and if I enter Canada illegally, am i breaking your Canadian laws or not ? Also , do you have any idea what it requires to immigrate legally to cabana ? FYI
No other country has open borders why should we
No other country has open borders why should we
It's a shame that people are so ignorant that the president has to tell them this!
It's a shame that people are so ignorant that the president has to tell them this!
Order the ARMY CORP of ENGINEERs to begin....you've a 600 Billion dollar budget
Order the ARMY CORP of ENGINEERs to begin....you've a 600 Billion dollar budget
Thanks for standing for us deplorables.If the liberals want to live in a 3rd world country go for it.Don't try to make mine one.
Thanks for standing for us deplorables.If the liberals want to live in a 3rd world country go for it.Don't try to make mine one.
This is so clear...what are the American people resisting? Democrats that are letting their childish hate for Trump are willing to let "everybody" into our country??  I'm old and thankful for once that I am so I won't be a part of seeing our country destroyed!!  GOD bless Trump and his followers!!
This is so clear...what are the American people resisting? Democrats that are letting their childish hate for Trump are willing to let "everybody" into our country??  I'm old and thankful for once that I am so I won't be a part of seeing our country destroyed!!  GOD bless Trump and his followers!!
STAND STRONG PRESIDENT TRUMP! GOD BLESS YOU AND THE UNITED STATES!
STAND STRONG PRESIDENT TRUMP! GOD BLESS YOU AND THE UNITED STATES!
Build it for Pete’s sake it has to be done
Its working great in HEAVEN! The only open borders lead straight to Hell! I have noticed no prisons having issues with walls nor the Vatican or any of Congress! Ask Obama he sure built a big ole wall around his place! Hypocrites. Gotta love'em ha!
How much do you know about what you are talking about? The wall in Germany was built to keep people from leaving the country.Our wall is for the protection of Americans. There is no comparison. I will get the Dems will believe the that comparison because the government that tried to keep people under control is the very government Dems are building.
Defending the borders does not mean a 30’ high wall. How did that work out for East Germany?
Defending the borders does not mean a 30’ high wall. How did that work out for East Germany?
Charlie Daboub please learn the voting process.
Diane Hozjan You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Diane Hozjan how dare someone pray! Those heathens! Don’t they know there is no god? That’s what you meant, right? 🤪
Prayer rugs found on New Mexico border ranches that should be enough to have the hairs on the back of your neck stand out. Build the wall!!!!
Prayer rugs found on New Mexico border ranches that should be enough to have the hairs on the back of your neck stand out. Build the wall!!!!
Good for you President Trump and thanks!!!
Good for you President Trump and thanks!!!
A country without borders cannot stand.  Keep the dollars in and pesos out!
A country without borders cannot stand.  Keep the dollars in and pesos out!
For this statement I am thankful Mr. President.   TRUMP 2020
For this statement I am thankful Mr. President.   TRUMP 2020
God bless you President Donald J. Trump!!! Succeeding protecting America despite all the evil around you.
God bless you President Donald J. Trump!!! Succeeding protecting America despite all the evil around you.
That is right! Borders are part of a Country.  It is necessary.
That is right! Borders are part of a Country.  It is necessary.
Aww I think we triggered the little trumpcuck.    Are you afraid that Putin’s cockholster is going down?  I love how Barr duped your dipshit orange clown into thinking he was against Mueller.    You know Mueller is a republican right?  He is just one of the few that still has some balls.
Worley Michael like I said you got nothin...go milk your unicorn and clean your room before you mom gets home from turnin tricks.
And Tom has both a limited education and a mental disorder.
And Tom has both a limited education and a mental disorder.
Jeremy Stephens you got nothin.
You should hold your breath while waiting for what  you asked for. It will make it happen faster for you.
Build the wall....go around congress, release all the unredacted documents and FISA apps along with the records of the congressional slush fund including amounts and names, please. I am very afraid that Barr is a mistake with his ties to mueller and the fact the demorats aren't opposing him...please withdraw him for a better AG Mr President. If law, order and justice are not restored and the traitors are allowed to skate we have lost our country and borders will not matter.
Build the wall....go around congress, release all the unredacted documents and FISA apps along with the records of the congressional slush fund including amounts and names, please. I am very afraid that Barr is a mistake with his ties to mueller and the fact the demorats aren't opposing him...please withdraw him for a better AG Mr President. If law, order and justice are not restored and the traitors are allowed to skate we have lost our country and borders will not matter.
These paid haters are really stupid, Soros needs to cough up a little more money and get some with some brains!
These paid haters are really stupid, Soros needs to cough up a little more money and get some with some brains!
Will Titus That might be one of the dumbest things I’ve heard
We ceased to be a nation when we appointed Donald Trump as president.
We ceased to be a nation when we appointed Donald Trump as president.
I wish - actually not so much 'my' - Chancellor Merkel would understand this.  Much love and support from Germany. If you do this and they'll see it works they will have no excuse here as well. This project is important far beyond the US. And that's why they fear it. So good luck my brothers and sisters in the US.
I wish - actually not so much 'my' - Chancellor Merkel would understand this.  Much love and support from Germany. If you do this and they'll see it works they will have no excuse here as well. This project is important far beyond the US. And that's why they fear it. So good luck my brothers and sisters in the US.
Very true. Security should always be our top priority.  MAGA
Very true. Security should always be our top priority.  MAGA
Stand strong Trump.we can conquer the world
Stand strong Trump.we can conquer the world
Chuck and Nancy are so anti wall/barrier/fence but someone should ask them if they’ve ever even visited the border to witness the struggle first hand. Going to say that answer is no.
Chuck and Nancy are so anti wall/barrier/fence but someone should ask them if they’ve ever even visited the border to witness the struggle first hand. Going to say that answer is no.
DO WHATEVER YOU HAVE TO DO.
DO WHATEVER YOU HAVE TO DO.
So not the welfare of the people but a really tall wall. OK
So not the welfare of the people but a really tall wall. OK
Well, then it is obviously the goal of the democrats to weaken the US from within so that it's easier for them to let in illegal immigrants to vote for them and maintain their power :3
Well, then it is obviously the goal of the democrats to weaken the US from within so that it's easier for them to let in illegal immigrants to vote for them and maintain their power :3
Still waiting too get a answer.What 77 countries are you talking about.Come on,where is the list????
Walls are currently working in 77 other countries, a wall will work here as well.
Walls are currently working in 77 other countries, a wall will work here as well.
No one is talking about free anything 😂 I just mentioned there are immaculate flaws with all.of these and you assume it means free. Amazing.
No one is talking about free anything 😂 I just mentioned there are immaculate flaws with all.of these and you assume it means free. Amazing.
Tif Duff why were'nt you complaining when Obama was in office, he promised help for inner cities especially Chicago, notice how he never moved back there. Your a snowflake anyway
Tif Duff why were'nt you complaining when Obama was in office, he promised help for inner cities especially Chicago, notice how he never moved back there. Your a snowflake anyway
Arky James show me where trump has fixed anything bc every source says otherwise
Arky James show me where trump has fixed anything bc every source says otherwise
Colleen Kandra then how come he isnt taking credit for the record low numbers like he has with everything else and is so sure we need the wall bc according to him it's at crisis level. So which is it, boo boo?
Colleen Kandra then how come he isnt taking credit for the record low numbers like he has with everything else and is so sure we need the wall bc according to him it's at crisis level. So which is it, boo boo?
Tif Duff Trump fixed so many problems already, INCLUDING the jail situation, as you so much wanted him to do. Seriously, can you give the man some time to do the best job as president than anyone else has ever done? He's not a communist, so you aren't going to get all that free stuff you want. Get a job.
Tif Duff twisted sister!! Lol its low thanks to OUR GREAT PRESIDENT!!
Tif Duff twisted sister!! Lol its low thanks to OUR GREAT PRESIDENT!!
Nicki Michelle literally no one is trying to "break in"
Nicki Michelle literally no one is trying to "break in"
Arky James education, jail over population, homelessness, the millions of sick folks who can't get help, affordable housing for all, hungry families... idk man pick one
Arky James education, jail over population, homelessness, the millions of sick folks who can't get help, affordable housing for all, hungry families... idk man pick one
issue? like what?
issue? like what?
Michael Hale mm, yall keep saying these people arent seeking asylum and are illegal. Illegal immigrants dont qualify any sort of free programs or government assistance.
Yeah.... right. Keep watching CNN.
Tif Duff problem now days is most people take the easy way out. If they weren’t we wouldn’t have 2-5 thousand people coming up from Central America wanting free stuff.   Lucky the French people figured it out and are currently trying to take back their country and fix it with their yellow vest movement.
Tif Duff problem now days is most people take the easy way out. If they weren’t we wouldn’t have 2-5 thousand people coming up from Central America wanting free stuff.   Lucky the French people figured it out and are currently trying to take back their country and fix it with their yellow vest movement.
The amount of money we spend on illeagal immigrants,could definitely be spent to improve our Country! We can agree on something......
Why should I leave when the #1 argument for those coming is "stay and fix your own country"? Your arguments arent even consistent with each other. Should I flee bc I dont like the state of my country or should I stay and try to fix the problems? Which is it, buddy?
Tif Duff if America isn’t great as we think why aren’t you and everyone else leaving? We would have most of Mexico and Central America trying to get in. Please!
Tif Duff if America isn’t great as we think why aren’t you and everyone else leaving? We would have most of Mexico and Central America trying to get in. Please!
Sherri Giddings Latimer so that's how the right memes, huh? Yikes.
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Tif Duff TROLL!!
America isnt as great as yall think. That's why illegal immigration is at a 46 year low. Maybe we should focus on literally all of the other issues with our country 😂🤷‍♀️
America isnt as great as yall think. That's why illegal immigration is at a 46 year low. Maybe we should focus on literally all of the other issues with our country 😂🤷‍♀️
CM Garner , you do know our president is crooked, Right? You do know trump is Putin's puppet? Right? You are aware that most of the people around trump  are getting arrested for real crimes, Right? How much more do you need, and just last night Giuliani finally told the truth about Russia and trumps campaign.  So it's only a short matter of time before the rest of the truth about out criminal treasonous president comes out.
you DO know it was CRIMINILLARY who recd the "russian money",...right ???
you DO know it was CRIMINILLARY who recd the "russian money",...right ???
It's nice that Putin allows you to speak freely  lol
It's nice that Putin allows you to speak freely  lol
Heavenly Father may Your will be done. In Jesus Christ name The Son of God Amen
Heavenly Father may Your will be done. In Jesus Christ name The Son of God Amen
Thank you President Trump....build the wall.
Thank you President Trump....build the wall.
Cheyenne Swift What are you talking about?
Wanda Martin by starving children and elderly people? Or increasing the homeless population by thousands to millions? Ya...I feel sooooo safe
Not sure how people can say this is about his ego when he is trying to keep ALL Americans safe.
Not sure how people can say this is about his ego when he is trying to keep ALL Americans safe.
As long as we have Democrats in government we the people aren't safe. They want complete control that will ruin America.
As long as we have Democrats in government we the people aren't safe. They want complete control that will ruin America.
Hang tough, Mr. President. We have to get this done. We can’t allow Nasty Nancy to dictate National Security over her twisted political vendettas.
Hang tough, Mr. President. We have to get this done. We can’t allow Nasty Nancy to dictate National Security over her twisted political vendettas.
Nancy & Chuck need to be eliminated from our Government <
Nancy & Chuck need to be eliminated from our Government <
Sunni Dorman Moseley You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress. Can you think of a reason he didn’t do it when he could?
Sunni Dorman Moseley YOU GOT THAT RIGHT.....DEMOCRATS WANT A CIVIL WAR....THEY WILL REGRET IT...IF IT HAPPENS.....IT WILL BE THE END OF THEIR PARTY AS THEY KNOW OF IT
PRESIDENT Trump will go down as the BEST most EFFECTIVE president we have EVER HAD! #maga2020🇺🇸👍🏼
PRESIDENT Trump will go down as the BEST most EFFECTIVE president we have EVER HAD! #maga2020🇺🇸👍🏼
We know role of any real man and leader is to protect family, community and country.  We love you..❤❤🇺🇸🇺🇸❤❤
We know role of any real man and leader is to protect family, community and country.  We love you..❤❤🇺🇸🇺🇸❤❤
Thank you, President Donald J. Trump for standing firm!  63 million people voted for you to put Americans first!   Time to #BuildTheWall and close the loopholes that encourage the invasion of our country.
Thank you, President Donald J. Trump for standing firm!  63 million people voted for you to put Americans first!   Time to #BuildTheWall and close the loopholes that encourage the invasion of our country.
In looking through all of the comments it makes me think of that ole saying "Try as you might...You will never make everybody happy" Going Back to the comments....90% of the posts are pro-trump so I would say he is on the right track!
In looking through all of the comments it makes me think of that ole saying "Try as you might...You will never make everybody happy" Going Back to the comments....90% of the posts are pro-trump so I would say he is on the right track!
Supporting President Trump Putting AMERICA and AMERICANS FIRST
Supporting President Trump Putting AMERICA and AMERICANS FIRST
Yes! Thank you mr. President for knowing what your duties are. Too many years we've spent with presidents who didn't know or didn't care.
Yes! Thank you mr. President for knowing what your duties are. Too many years we've spent with presidents who didn't know or didn't care.
There was a time i hated trump because as an African the only news network we can afford  is CNN but to know what he stands for & his commitment to do it changed my mind. because i love my country & a person who loves his country with all is what all countries need & trump is that person.
Do NOT cave on this Mr President!  Build that wall!!!
Sorry.is there somebody who can tell me what 77 countries he is talking about where the wall is working,og what 55 countries are thinking about getting a wall. Sound like fantasy and rubish!!!!
Sorry.is there somebody who can tell me what 77 countries he is talking about where the wall is working,og what 55 countries are thinking about getting a wall. Sound like fantasy and rubish!!!!
Sherry Waldie Smith Oh they see the logic, they just HATE this man so much they can think of nothing else - how to get him.  It is disgraceful!
Jill Travassos I’m just so frustrated people don’t see the logic in this.
GOOD ONE SHERRY!!!
GOOD ONE SHERRY!!!
A country without borders is no country.  A homeowner without a locked door is what? A future victim.
A country without borders is no country.  A homeowner without a locked door is what? A future victim.
This is about your ego buddy
This is about your ego buddy
Way to go President Trump.
Way to go President Trump.
Stand Firm Mr President !
Stand Firm Mr President !
Let this man do his job,he is wonderful at it!
Let this man do his job,he is wonderful at it!
Stay the course! If not illegals will never stop invading our country! We absolutely need to deter them! God bless you, all border personnel, and law enforcement! MAGA! 2020!!
Stay the course! If not illegals will never stop invading our country! We absolutely need to deter them! God bless you, all border personnel, and law enforcement! MAGA! 2020!!
Thank you President Trump for protecting us. Why would any American defend those who come into our country illegally and harm our children?
Thank you President Trump for protecting us. Why would any American defend those who come into our country illegally and harm our children?
John Carty Wow do you need a history lesson. Reign of terror? lmao
Resign and take Brother Pence with you. End this chaotic reign of terror!
Resign and take Brother Pence with you. End this chaotic reign of terror!
SECURE OUR BORDERS! The Democrats could care less about our safety!!!!👹
Sandra Hughes, it would have been a disaster with that evil woman!
I can't even imagine what our nation would have been like under Clinton!  So grateful for President Trump!
I can't even imagine what our nation would have been like under Clinton!  So grateful for President Trump!
Phoebe Cassandra Smith American citizens are donating to the Wall. We will get it done around failed government.
Phoebe Cassandra Smith - Educate yourself please. Annual cost of illegal immigration: OVER $84 BILLION. Yet Democrats will NOT spend 5 BILLION to keep Americans safe & stop drugs. WAKE UP TAXPAYERS! #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸
Phoebe Cassandra Smith - Educate yourself please. Annual cost of illegal immigration: OVER $84 BILLION. Yet Democrats will NOT spend 5 BILLION to keep Americans safe & stop drugs. WAKE UP TAXPAYERS! #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸
Phoebe Cassandra Smith actually several do even among so called democrats
Phoebe Cassandra Smith actually several do even among so called democrats
Source? Maybe among Republicans but no polls show even a majority among the general population.
Trump 2020, he Is our president, has 70 percent approval for the Wall.
Trump 2020, he Is our president, has 70 percent approval for the Wall.
His duty I did like this guy tell this wall now I can't pay my mortgage and losing my home but that's ok he's got money rich get richer that's way it will always be
His duty I did like this guy tell this wall now I can't pay my mortgage and losing my home but that's ok he's got money rich get richer that's way it will always be
Stay strong Mr Trump, we the people are behind you 100%
Stay strong Mr Trump, we the people are behind you 100%
Dear my favorite President of all time. I am a tiny speck in  Oregon you will never know. I wish I could look you in the eye and thank you for the strength and intelligence you have shared for the USA. I have your back here, because you prove you have ours every day💪 j🇱🇷
Dear my favorite President of all time. I am a tiny speck in  Oregon you will never know. I wish I could look you in the eye and thank you for the strength and intelligence you have shared for the USA. I have your back here, because you prove you have ours every day💪 j🇱🇷
Stand Strong... BUILD THE WALL..
Stand Strong... BUILD THE WALL..
I'm behind you100% Mr Trump sir
I'm behind you100% Mr Trump sir
I believe I’ve paid enough federal taxes in the last couple years to pay for the wall. Go ahead with it.
I believe I’ve paid enough federal taxes in the last couple years to pay for the wall. Go ahead with it.
Carrie Stewart not true, trumpet stop being blinded by the light and drinking the koolaid.
Dems are responsible at this point.  Their hate for Trump is so deep, they're willing to open our borders and let anyone and everyone in.
Dems are responsible at this point.  Their hate for Trump is so deep, they're willing to open our borders and let anyone and everyone in.
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Natalie Halem pay attention mam... The Democrats are not going to give OUR PRESIDENT ANY SUPPORT ...THAT'S RIGHT HE IS YOUR PRESIDENT TOO!!!
Tommy Carter not in the your life time, complete waste. Dont get me wrong I want people to come in to this country the right way, 5.7 naw
Natalie Halem. 5.7 billion please!!
Natalie Halem. 5.7 billion please!!
Thaddeus Mountain yep we know:), yet democrats are keeping it shutdown for not taking the security and safety of the American people seriously.
Thaddeus Mountain yep we know:), yet democrats are keeping it shutdown for not taking the security and safety of the American people seriously.
No they aren’t. He quite literally said that he would be proud to shut it down and would take credit for it. Try again
Natalie Halem yea Nancy and the Democrats won’t open the government. 5.7 billion is a drop in the bucket for them! They rather give it to Central American dictators than use it at home.
Carrie Stewart careful You might offend it
Carrie Stewart careful You might offend it
Natalie Halem, is that all you've got?!  Nice try libturd.
Natalie Halem, is that all you've got?!  Nice try libturd.
democrqts are our in Puerto Rico vacationing while Trump is trying to secure the border, says a lot about cons huh? #walkaway
democrqts are our in Puerto Rico vacationing while Trump is trying to secure the border, says a lot about cons huh? #walkaway
Do your job and open the government and stop holding  them hostage
Do your job and open the government and stop holding  them hostage
The Dems don’t want us to be a Strong Nation,, they want Communist rule!!
The Dems don’t want us to be a Strong Nation,, they want Communist rule!!
James Kenney you are a comminst agitator alias a traitor
James Kenney you are a comminst agitator alias a traitor
Donald Trump the best President ever
Donald Trump the best President ever
Ed Weibe  What heart????
Ed Weibe  What heart????
do whats in your heart Sir.
do whats in your heart Sir.
We need the wall by all means necessary!
We need the wall by all means necessary!
Thank you Sir 🇺🇸if ever it’s going to be done, you’ll be the one to do it!  Hold your ground
Ryan Riffe plus all these on here that hate our president are enemy to our country they should be trying to help make it better but they can not because they are to full of hate.
Respect is EARNED, not given. Schumer and Pelosi deserve NO respect until they are on our side!
Respect is EARNED, not given. Schumer and Pelosi deserve NO respect until they are on our side!
How about Dems have a little respect for our countries security and what made this country great and realize that what they are doing is far from helping THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!
How about Dems have a little respect for our countries security and what made this country great and realize that what they are doing is far from helping THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!
Trump and his base need to back off on the name calling. Now that the House is under Democratic control he won't get a single bill passed unless he tries to treat people with respect.
Trump and his base need to back off on the name calling. Now that the House is under Democratic control he won't get a single bill passed unless he tries to treat people with respect.
Democrats = #1 enemy of the United States.
Democrats = #1 enemy of the United States.
Defend our borders, sir!  Put up flat screens in Congress to "loop" all the Demo support for secure borders (in very recent years)............play those remarks non-stop and even during SOTU address so cnn can broadcast truth for a change.
Defend our borders, sir!  Put up flat screens in Congress to "loop" all the Demo support for secure borders (in very recent years)............play those remarks non-stop and even during SOTU address so cnn can broadcast truth for a change.
Jesus isn't into civil war so FU with your fake Christianity!
Good words. Very dramatic. Life isn't a movie though is it. Sit down ffs.
Good words. Very dramatic. Life isn't a movie though is it. Sit down ffs.
lol, ok. I'm sorry you are so easily conned.
lol, ok. I'm sorry you are so easily conned.
Mary Sue or everyone stop working . we the people can truely shut down America
you guys...we don't need to resort to violence...just stop paying your taxes aka funding the destruction of your country..that's the peaceful solution
you guys...we don't need to resort to violence...just stop paying your taxes aka funding the destruction of your country..that's the peaceful solution
Same.
Civil war is in the horizon . I stand with. My God , President . Country , And Flag
Civil war is in the horizon . I stand with. My God , President . Country , And Flag
Jay Boogie Boogie Woogie Roogsky?????
Jay Boogie Boogie Woogie Roogsky?????
Suiter Kaye ask the Democrats that run Flint why? Also know this if the Democrats cannot clean up the water in Flint just think what they will do to the rest of America if they take over.
Suiter Kaye ask the Democrats that run Flint why? Also know this if the Democrats cannot clean up the water in Flint just think what they will do to the rest of America if they take over.
Suiter Kaye That’s on Flint, Michigan. That falls under state government. What is your corrupt Democrat run state government doing with your money instead of fixing your drinking water problems? That doesn’t have anything to do with the rest of us. I wouldn’t bring that up if I were you. It doesn’t prove your point.
Suiter Kaye That’s on Flint, Michigan. That falls under state government. What is your corrupt Democrat run state government doing with your money instead of fixing your drinking water problems? That doesn’t have anything to do with the rest of us. I wouldn’t bring that up if I were you. It doesn’t prove your point.
Suiter Kaye um get a clue democrats run flint... president has nothing to do with the water there...look at every hood and ghetto...all democrat run..wake up
Suiter Kaye um get a clue democrats run flint... president has nothing to do with the water there...look at every hood and ghetto...all democrat run..wake up
Military still getting paid
Military still getting paid
Suiter Kaye oh I read yesterday that Elon Musk helped Flint. Musk 2020
Suiter Kaye oh I read yesterday that Elon Musk helped Flint. Musk 2020
Suiter Kaye makes sense right?
Really? Because borders do matter and he actually cares about this country like a REAL american you should respect that if u love your country
lol if you think that’s a mic drop. I’ll let you have it.   I’m more concerned with why we have a president who thinks a wall is of the utmost importance when his own press secretary has admitted that threat is entering by airport & why people are working & not being paid.
Suiter Kaye 👎👎👎👎👎👎 🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮
No one said your a democrat were just pointing out the obvious truth... democrats destroy everything they touch !! Mic drop!!!
He is the president of the USA. If a wall is a national emergency than so is Flint.  Everybody is so democratic & so republican that no one looks at the big picture.   The U. S coast guard is working without pay!   Y’all assume that everyone that disagrees with you is a democrat. Trumpster logic.   If I wasn’t a democrat before best believe I’ll be voting blue in 2020.  Regardless of your political leanings Trump is one of the worst things to happen to this country in a loooooong time.
Everybody claimed to care so much about vets! Yet this president is willing to starve existing servicemen for a wall.  Yet Flint Michigan doesn’t have clean drinking water today.
Everybody claimed to care so much about vets! Yet this president is willing to starve existing servicemen for a wall.  Yet Flint Michigan doesn’t have clean drinking water today.
Bryan Steinberg We don’t.
Just like when you go to a hotel you stop at the front desk to get your Room no other country let you just walk in the door and make yourself at home why should we
Just like when you go to a hotel you stop at the front desk to get your Room no other country let you just walk in the door and make yourself at home why should we
The communist agitators are paid by the democrat communists kings that live in fortresses
Latoryaira Schnell Peoples If you want to keep bury your head in the sand, sure. Here's just one study in Arizona:  "This data do not rely on self-reporting by criminals. Undocumented immigrants are at least 142% more likely to be convicted of a crime than other Arizonans. They also tend to commit more serious crimes and serve 10.5% longer sentences, more likely to be classified as dangerous, and 45% more likely to be gang members than U.S. citizens."  https://crimeresearch.org/2018/01/impact-illegal-aliens-crime-rates/
All I'm going to say is El Chapo smugglers said they don't get drugs in this country the illegal way... They drive straight through... Every body keep saying the wall will make us safe, keep drugs out this that or another, but if a person wants to get drugs into the country or they just want to come to the country they will find a way... Far as the drugs go, the drug of choice now that such a crisis is opioids and those come right from the doctor... Weed is damn near legal almost every way, and crack has always been around... Now make us safer naw I don't by that because illegal immigrants aren't doing majority of the killing and other crimes... But if you think having a wall will make you safe that's your opinion, but ask all the mass shootings victims family would a wall have made a difference for them...
John Rigazio Frames.
Lara Estes Climate change is a big hoax (nobody says climate never changes, BTW). But why change the subject, we're talking about the wall here.
Chris Ng A house without walls ? What would hold up the roof?
Veronica Torres hahahahahahaha
Democrats aren't afraid the wall won't work. They're afraid the wall WILL work- thereby stopping the drug money they are currently receiving! #TRUMP2020 #MAGA #America1ST💯
Democrats aren't afraid the wall won't work. They're afraid the wall WILL work- thereby stopping the drug money they are currently receiving! #TRUMP2020 #MAGA #America1ST💯
Liberals who say a wall won't work suggest spending trillions to change the weather.#BuildTheWall #America1ST 🎯💯🇺🇸️ 🇺🇸
Liberals who say a wall won't work suggest spending trillions to change the weather.#BuildTheWall #America1ST 🎯💯🇺🇸️ 🇺🇸
Chris Ng tRump says climate change isn't real! Why oh why is he spending million to build a sea wall around his Russian financed Mar A Largo golf course???????
I notice everyone who says a wall is useless, senseless or stupid has walls in their homes. Some even have giant walls or fences around their perimeters.
I notice everyone who says a wall is useless, senseless or stupid has walls in their homes. Some even have giant walls or fences around their perimeters.
Can't believe people hate this President more than they love this Country. Protect your borders now.
Can't believe people hate this President more than they love this Country. Protect your borders now.
Drew Mullen Why don't you ask Nancy Pelosi?
DEMS whom put Israel first think that Americans don't deserve border security yet they have a wall and a military protecting its borders. Why does America's greatest allies Israel not have their best interest at heart???????
Diana Morris  he gone kill all y’all stupid asses 😂😂
Drew Mullen how many terrorists have the TSA caught vs how many of them have been arrested? 😂
He sure is protecting his Government workers huh?  blah blah blah protection starts with helping out those who can't help themselves 🙄
Drew Mullen , tell that to Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer who don’t care about anyone but themselves! Living in their mansions behind gates with bodyguards. They have more than enough room to house illegals. Immigration laws have been in effect a long time, only the liberals have chosen to ignore them.
Drew Mullen , tell that to Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer who don’t care about anyone but themselves! Living in their mansions behind gates with bodyguards. They have more than enough room to house illegals. Immigration laws have been in effect a long time, only the liberals have chosen to ignore them.
Drew Mullen , tell that to Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer, self serving filthy rich elitists!
Drew Mullen , tell that to Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer, self serving filthy rich elitists!
Diana Morris not having the FDA protecting food, TSA quitting and an unpaid Coast Guard protects our country how ?
Diana Morris not having the FDA protecting food, TSA quitting and an unpaid Coast Guard protects our country how ?
Exactly! The role of government is to protect its people!
Exactly! The role of government is to protect its people!
Stay Strong Mr President and give your State Of The Union Message as scheduled and wherever you damn well please! 👍
Stay Strong Mr President and give your State Of The Union Message as scheduled and wherever you damn well please! 👍
Your the first Present to try and actually do something and we appreciate it
Your the first Present to try and actually do something and we appreciate it
Thank you Mr President!  Stay strong.  My family is praying for you.
Doris Caruth Please continue to support trump as this is your right....It is also my right and duty to resist....His values are not mine....
Kevin Lake If trump holds your values, Pleas feel free to “ love all over him”....Fo myself and  those I respect we will not as his values are not....
Joan Clapp What the heck kind a poll  are you looking at? CNN again?? He’s at 67% nice try   Ps That is the Quinnipiac poll
Joan Clapp What the heck kind a poll  are you looking at? CNN again?? He’s at 67% nice try   Ps That is the Quinnipiac poll
oh, it's there..Joan..the love for our president..from all the people who want to live in freedom...that is a vast majority of the citizens..!
oh, it's there..Joan..the love for our president..from all the people who want to live in freedom...that is a vast majority of the citizens..!
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Joan Clapp=TDS patient
Joan Clapp=TDS patient
Nicki Michelle Yes, you are correct...I’m hoping that taking the average of all the polls will be more meaningful...Of course the Russian collusion did have an impact....
Joan Clapp Hillary by a landslide!
Joan Clapp Hillary by a landslide!
Note your poll numbers are tanking and even suburban white men show an 18% drop in approval....You make all this love for you up so you feel OK about yourself....It isn’t working...
Note your poll numbers are tanking and even suburban white men show an 18% drop in approval....You make all this love for you up so you feel OK about yourself....It isn’t working...
The irony is here so rich that I may require an AED
Ray Welch what about McConell?
Ray Welch what about McConell?
impeach pelosi and schumer for malfeasance and obstruction
impeach pelosi and schumer for malfeasance and obstruction
Haha 7 day excursion! Good for him, why should she be able to go during the shutdown! Sit down Nancy your flight is delayed
Haha 7 day excursion! Good for him, why should she be able to go during the shutdown! Sit down Nancy your flight is delayed
How bout you start charging them money to come in this country and work for this country and pay us the money they owe the cartel lol
How bout you start charging them money to come in this country and work for this country and pay us the money they owe the cartel lol
Arky James who's going to take your vote when gov't employees aren't paid and quit? Logical?
Matt McNulty When we go high, you lie.
Ooh, using “gay” as an insult. The 1980s think you’re awesome.
Annual cost of illegal immigration: OVER $84 BILLION. Yet Democrats will NOT spend 5 BILLION to keep Americans safe & stop drugs. Wake up Taxpayers! #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸
Annual cost of illegal immigration: OVER $84 BILLION. Yet Democrats will NOT spend 5 BILLION to keep Americans safe & stop drugs. Wake up Taxpayers! #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸
Step 3 - Crumble as a nation under the most idiotic leadership in history
Step 3 - Crumble as a nation under the most idiotic leadership in history
The borders ARE secure. We spend billions every year to make sure of that. Good luck with that.
The borders ARE secure. We spend billions every year to make sure of that. Good luck with that.
Step one - secure the borders. Step two - vote out the Democrats
Step one - secure the borders. Step two - vote out the Democrats
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Lee Barrett omg...dude...you've got a seriously huge democrat cock up your ass...i'm anarchit...which means i reject being ruled by anyone..so as a neutral third party? get that dick out of your ass
Believe you need to stop watching that Homo Don lemon on CNN
Believe you need to stop watching that Homo Don lemon on CNN
Joe Schrock Surprised you can type with that orange dick in your mouth.
Joe Schrock Surprised you can type with that orange dick in your mouth.
It would take a really Stupid person too believe Trump would be anyone's Agent or Puppet , Trump not as a Business Man and for sure not as the Most Powerful Man on the Planet , You leftist morons need to think before you Type , Speak or even breed !  Trump Has a Big Ego , Oh Trump's A Puppet ,   Trump Stupid ""  YET Trump  is worth 3.5 Billion dollars and Liberals are only good and taxing other Americans !
It would take a really Stupid person too believe Trump would be anyone's Agent or Puppet , Trump not as a Business Man and for sure not as the Most Powerful Man on the Planet , You leftist morons need to think before you Type , Speak or even breed !  Trump Has a Big Ego , Oh Trump's A Puppet ,   Trump Stupid ""  YET Trump  is worth 3.5 Billion dollars and Liberals are only good and taxing other Americans !
Lee Barrett that’s barry and Killary
You should’ve got on here to correct all the lies Obama and.  Hillary Clinton  told
OK James you’ve got all the answers you’re trying to correct everybody
Hey lee did you give James a call hey James I think you found one more friend ? so you’re on Facebook just a troll like a fucking liberal that lives in his moms basement
Tommy Elston Why the fear of LGBT?
Tommy Elston Why the fear of LGBT?
James only got 9? friends Maybe you could send a friend request to leave and you to Homo’s can make out
Says the Russian agent.
Says the Russian agent.
agree 100%!  Thank you for all you are doing (and trying) to do.
agree 100%!  Thank you for all you are doing (and trying) to do.
Susan Dowd  um tell that to Pelosi and Shumner...lol
Susan Dowd  um tell that to Pelosi and Shumner...lol
Anne Crossway shut up, granny
Anne Crossway shut up, granny
Susan Dowd Donny is sealing his fate as a one-term president!  Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is his cost-ineffective wall.  Donny needs to agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so his shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
Susan Dowd Donny is sealing his fate as a one-term president!  Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is his cost-ineffective wall.  Donny needs to agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so his shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
Susan Dowd you realize Obama did it to force unconditional Health Care that is failed and fund illegal in Texas, but your OK with that?
Susan Dowd you realize Obama did it to force unconditional Health Care that is failed and fund illegal in Texas, but your OK with that?
Nancy Pelosi doesn't care. Keep the Shutdown in force Build the wall
Nancy Pelosi doesn't care. Keep the Shutdown in force Build the wall
Poor baby hillary lost
Poor baby hillary lost
Donna Park The original Fathers who wrote the Constitution & later some amendments, wrote that good sound protection of the country was important. They also said that a strong defense would protect & Americans would be safe. Damages would not be by "External" attack, but by "Internal" decisions. Yes, Democrats appear uninterested in USA border security.. & only the illegals. Citizens are not their priority..it is illegals votes & the power they will gain.
Susan Dowd I hope it stays shut down and leftist unhinge....we want leftist to become more violent and unhinge
Susan Dowd I hope it stays shut down and leftist unhinge....we want leftist to become more violent and unhinge
hope you are talking to Nancy, because she is the one keeping the gov't closed..she will not negotiate in any way...stays hidden or on vacation..the president is ready to listen to whatever she purposes...
hope you are talking to Nancy, because she is the one keeping the gov't closed..she will not negotiate in any way...stays hidden or on vacation..the president is ready to listen to whatever she purposes...
Terry Clark what's Hillary got to do with anything. That shipped sailed long ago. You guys need a new tune....lol
James Walker oh that's right. Paid vacation. I forgot.
James Walker name calling. Typical. Fake polls by who? According to Cohen...that was Trump.
Lee Grant your delusional. Obviously your getting a paycheck. Ask the 800,000 not getting paid about becoming unhinged.
Pencil pushers are starting to freak out about Trump's shutdown, warning that if federal workers miss another paycheck, a drop in economic growth coupled with the loss of consumer and business confidence, combined with Trump's trade war and the long term sting on consumer credit ratings, could trigger a recession. Lucky for Trump, who gauges his success on the ebbs and flows of stock market, Wall Street's 1% hasn't noticed rank-and-file federal workers are on the verge of quitting en masse.  Trump's 2020 campaign manager and pubic beard-in-chief, Brad Parscale, says that they have all this polling data that says they're winning the war on messaging, but he refuses to show anybody. I guess Parscale's model is from a different school three towns over, and isn't available right now because it's currently vacationing in Russia.
Anne Crossway Ann and Susan two airheads. Our border security sucks. They keep pouring in . Fake polls by the media.
Robert Demars Suzan is a loser.
Victor Bare hey Vic get a life.
Susan Dowd Susan no high horse here. Nancy won’t negotiate. Complain to her. Not our president. They all will be paid for doing nothing. Apply for unemployment, food stamps etc. they give these things to illegals they can give to deserving Americans.
Get off your high horse and reopen the government while you "negotiate". Stop using people as pawns to get your way. Not everybody can afford like you to not get paid for a month.
Get off your high horse and reopen the government while you "negotiate". Stop using people as pawns to get your way. Not everybody can afford like you to not get paid for a month.
Stephen Pierson praying for you!
Well, that's nice and dandy, but the original text was not written in English but Greek and most likely referred to a Shofar. These were also blown when the walls of Jericho fell. The passage you quoted is talking about the resurrection, not a wall in the US.  National pride is the beginning of Babylon. That is coming from someone who lives in Germany. ;)
John Galicia i am praying for you
John Galicia i am praying for you
Michelle Helderman and if you use the Bible, remember it says not to commit adultery like trump, don’t steal like trump, be a righteous man unlike trump, love thy neighbors unlike trump, be humble, help the sick, help the poor, etc etc.
Michelle Helderman stop letting your  faith lead you so blindly, use you head not a bible
Michelle Helderman stop letting your  faith lead you so blindly, use you head not a bible
Sandy Swaney Mahady 1 Corinthians 15:51-52 King James Version (KJV) 51 Behold, I shew you a mystery; We shall not all sleep, but we shall all be changed,  52 In a moment, in the twinkling of an eye, at the last trump: for the trumpet shall sound, and the dead shall be raised incorruptible, and we shall be changed.  King James Version (KJV) Public Domain
been fighting over two decades, a lifetime of Hell. Believe me, we are past the antichrist in office. now to keep him out!
Michelle Helderman  I absolutely love this! And if you read in revelations, when the world goes as  one nation the anti christ will rule it. We are given a choice to stop it!
Julie Smith yes but we need to warn them.
Michelle Helderman he is coming soon for those who are looking for his appearing
Michelle Helderman he is coming soon for those who are looking for his appearing
Michelle Helderman You are a nobody, same as I am. You witnessed nothing. You saw a little thing in your book and latched onto it with all you have, with the hopes it would explain to your practical mind, why your spiritual mind thought voting for this highly immoral person was the best choice for America. I don't mind being prayed for, as I will pray for you as well.
Jeremy Stephens I am Gods WITNESS and at the same time I posted this i was given a sign. I will pray for you Jeremy.
Michelle Helderman If that scripture were referring to a person then trump would have a capital T. You are just grasping at straws. Also, God would never condone the actions of this man. The fact you think he would makes you a fake.
let me know when you see it...... 1 Corinthians 15:51-52 King James Version (KJV)  51 Behold, I shew you a mystery; We shall not all sleep, but we shall all be changed,  52 In a moment, in the twinkling of an eye, at the last trump: for the trumpet shall sound, and the dead shall be raised incorruptible, and we shall be changed.  King James Version (KJV)
let me know when you see it...... 1 Corinthians 15:51-52 King James Version (KJV)  51 Behold, I shew you a mystery; We shall not all sleep, but we shall all be changed,  52 In a moment, in the twinkling of an eye, at the last trump: for the trumpet shall sound, and the dead shall be raised incorruptible, and we shall be changed.  King James Version (KJV)
Joseph Hart You'll get paid every cent brother. That being said, if this shutdown prevents you from feeding your kids then you are a fucking loser. ...or were you just using a catchy phase to sound profound?
WAKE UP PEOPLE... Dems don't want the wall because "DRUG MONEY" is being funneled directly into the DNC's pockets. - - #America1ST💯 #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸️
WAKE UP PEOPLE... Dems don't want the wall because "DRUG MONEY" is being funneled directly into the DNC's pockets. - - #America1ST💯 #BuildTheWall 🇺🇸️
Paul Hogan tell that to my kids who need food on the table.  #paythecoastguard
Drew Mullen I agree. It's disgraceful that Democrats would choose weak borders over American workers.
Drew Mullen I agree. It's disgraceful that Democrats would choose weak borders over American workers.
Paul Hogan National Parks are trash heeps, TSA agents quit, government employees on SNAP.  What a disgrace!
I have an incredibly kind heart. I hope they all make it into America ...LEGALLY. You can't properly vet an illegal - you just can't. Fund the border wall and everyone gets paid. It's that simple. Every LEGAL American wins that way.
Paul Hogan  And  you have a very dark heart. GOD BLESS YOU.
Only one party is trading Border Security for illegal votes. That's the Democrats. TSA isn't getting paid because Democrats favor illegals over America's safety. All for votes ...not for anything else either.
Maxine Barnes your reply is so much nicer than what i want to say lol u handled it gracefully so I'm gonna not say anything mean lol
Maxine Barnes your reply is so much nicer than what i want to say lol u handled it gracefully so I'm gonna not say anything mean lol
Paul Hogan and you won’t get paid until 2020. You will work for free???   Moron just like the spurs boy
Paul Hogan When it starts to affect you, your song will change. Good luck .
Paul Hogan When it starts to affect you, your song will change. Good luck .
Paul Hogan ill have your pussy ass screaming like a bitch after i beat you down
Bette Ristoff Cite one of your "reports". Or were you just screaming like a crazy cat lady because you can't help it?
Keep the government shut down until 2020 for all I care. Build the Wall!
Keep the government shut down until 2020 for all I care. Build the Wall!
Do not back down Sir!! Thank you for fighting for AMERICA!!
Do not back down Sir!! Thank you for fighting for AMERICA!!
Mark said after 30 days of shut down they can cut some stuff interesting times
Mark said after 30 days of shut down they can cut some stuff interesting times
Steve Zadorozniak maybe you’re suffering from cognitive dissonance and leftist mental disorder
Houston police: Child fatally shoots 9-year-old cousin while playing with gun Houston police say a 9-year-old child was fatally shot by a 9-year-old cousin while playing with a gun the children found in a local apartment. INSTEAD OF WORRYING ABOUT THE BORDERS HOW ABOUT WE PROTECT KIDS WITHIN YOUR BORDERS, OR MAYBE MORE THOUGHTS AND PRAYERS
Houston police: Child fatally shoots 9-year-old cousin while playing with gun Houston police say a 9-year-old child was fatally shot by a 9-year-old cousin while playing with a gun the children found in a local apartment. INSTEAD OF WORRYING ABOUT THE BORDERS HOW ABOUT WE PROTECT KIDS WITHIN YOUR BORDERS, OR MAYBE MORE THOUGHTS AND PRAYERS
We're going to assume Rudy Giuliani was ALLEGEDLY drunk (again) when he went on CNN last night to walk back the whole NO COLLUSION narrative that Trump and Co. have been peddling for the past two years. Perhaps Giuliani suffering verbal diarrhea after a bad word salad, or maybe he was just foreshadowing the next Mueller indictment, but Chris Cuomo was dumbfounded when Giuliani blithered, "I never said there was no collusion between the campaign, or between people in the campaign. I have no idea."
Ross Jones Ross no wonder your in the nuthouse.
Ross Jones Ross no wonder your in the nuthouse.
Ross Jones that's best of luck you poor soul. God help you.
Ross Jones body off lick you poor doul.
Un SOS   Im  a psychopath locked in the NHS mental health system currently in hospital knowing full well  that all health care is controlled by the secret service currently being injected against my will enforced by law  Thet put images of my father and uncle on the packaging  of imperial tobacco products and stole the money physcopathically directing their tumors
Nick Baker but it was ok when Barry did it? Question why there are so many non essential employees
Nick Baker but it was ok when Barry did it? Question why there are so many non essential employees
Maybe the Democrats should pull their head out of their ass!
Maybe the Democrats should pull their head out of their ass!
Nick Baker maybe the non essential ones should go find another job.
Nick Baker maybe the non essential ones should go find another job.
Nick Baker  He has been trying to open the government back up everyday and Democrats are admit they don’t want a wall. I’m not going to sound like a die hard republican because I’m far from it but I do support trump because I believe he truly loves America. If the right democrat runs you bet I’ll vote for them. I’m not trying nor will I sit here and argue. #unitedwestanddividedwefall
Not sure why that's funny
Not sure why that's funny
Nick Baker quit listening to that fake news that CNN and MSN spew out . We the people elected Mr. Trump to build that wall. We the people want that wall for our safety , well being and the sake of our children.
Nick Baker quit listening to that fake news that CNN and MSN spew out . We the people elected Mr. Trump to build that wall. We the people want that wall for our safety , well being and the sake of our children.
Orie Franco yup. Non essential. And they will get all the pay back. So, you Democrat’s want more government control over your lives so you are more dependent on them?  You don’t even know how stupid and brainwashed you are. True to your Nazi/communist roots.
Kevin Lake the essential ones are the ones working without pay..... hmmmm your argument is pointless.
Kevin Lake the essential ones are the ones working without pay..... hmmmm your argument is pointless.
Kevin Lake great! Good to know you don't care about workers
Lisa Hertel non-essential refers to the job they do. National security is essential. Issuing social security numbers is not. That type of thing.
Nick Baker maybe Nancy should start caring about keeping the country safe instead of caring more about liberal BS
Nick Baker maybe Nancy should start caring about keeping the country safe instead of caring more about liberal BS
Chris Lonas he's not doing anything you goof! I thought Trump was the deal maker? More like a real faker!
Chris Lonas he's not doing anything you goof! I thought Trump was the deal maker? More like a real faker!
Joseph Hart first of all I  a disabled vet myself and have the utmost respect for any service member. Secondly, chill out buddy. You will get your pay. If you are in financial troubles after missing on paycheck then obviously you aren't very good with money and acting all badass calling me a keyboard commando sure doesn't make me shake in my boots.
Kevin Lake Then why doesn't Trump just fire those redundant people? I'm sure we'd all like to know who he doesn't care about!
Kevin Lake Then why doesn't Trump just fire those redundant people? I'm sure we'd all like to know who he doesn't care about!
Judy Feinberg Qualls The Senate passed a spending bill (with no money for the wall) 100-0 in December. The Republican house rejected it. Democrats took control of the House in January and passed that same bill. Now Mitch McConnell isn't even bringing it up for a vote (new session, new vote). This shutdown could end right now if Mitch McConnell wanted to. Trump isn't doing anything to help bring this shutdown to an end.
Nick Baker there is to much redundancy in government. They need to thin the ranks and actually make people work.
Nick Baker there is to much redundancy in government. They need to thin the ranks and actually make people work.
Nathan Teal you are mistaken, Trump doesn't love anything but himself and money! He hasn't been trying to open the government, he is playing politics for his vanity wall. He owns the shutdown, he said so himself.
Nathan Teal you are mistaken, Trump doesn't love anything but himself and money! He hasn't been trying to open the government, he is playing politics for his vanity wall. He owns the shutdown, he said so himself.
Valerie Spofford Tilley what’s pointless is taking out loans to feed my family after 18 years of service to my country you ignorant Facebook commando.  #paythecoastguard #paydhs
Kevin Lake man you are in a roll, I can’t wait to see you tell that to my units face, and my families. Facebook commando, keyboard hero, bet you keep your mouth shut in real life #paythecoastguard #paydhs
Bill Lowery We the people elected Democrats to the House. Quit listening to that propaganda Fox News throws out there! Trump couldn't get money for the wall with Republican's in control of Congress, he's not going to get it now.
Bill Lowery We the people elected Democrats to the House. Quit listening to that propaganda Fox News throws out there! Trump couldn't get money for the wall with Republican's in control of Congress, he's not going to get it now.
Nick Baker tell that to President Nancy she will not give one dollar to the wall. Result shutdown.
Sandy Swaney Mahady by "whats right" I'm assuming you mean pass legislation to re-open the government so those 800k workers can get paid? House Democrats passed a spending bill that Senate Republicans previously passed 100-0. Why won't Mitch McConnell allow a vote?
Nick Baker He will a soon as Democrats get off their ass and do what’s right for the nation

Nick Baker Kevin Lake thinks a government shutdown is a good thing. Hard to understand how one can rationalize that it makes our country safer.
Nick Baker Kevin Lake thinks a government shutdown is a good thing. Hard to understand how one can rationalize that it makes our country safer.
Kevin Lake Again, its not a vacation. There are people being threatened with eviction, people who could have their services shut off, and people who can't get medication all because they don't have their money now. How is that so hard to understand? Again, if Trump thinks these people aren't essential why doesn't he just fire them and show us who he doesn't care about?
Kevin Lake Again, its not a vacation. There are people being threatened with eviction, people who could have their services shut off, and people who can't get medication all because they don't have their money now. How is that so hard to understand? Again, if Trump thinks these people aren't essential why doesn't he just fire them and show us who he doesn't care about?
Nick Baker it is actually vacation for many of them. It is a paid vacation because they will get back pay even though most aren't at work.  The ones who are working , I respect and they should get the back pay but there should be some furrowed because the government has to many non essential workers.
Nick Baker it is actually vacation for many of them. It is a paid vacation because they will get back pay even though most aren't at work.  The ones who are working , I respect and they should get the back pay but there should be some furrowed because the government has to many non essential workers.
Kevin Lake its not vacation for these people. There are real life consequences of Trump throwing a tantrum over his vanity wall. These workers aren't getting paid. Some people are being forced to work without getting paid. I would call that slavery.
Valerie Spofford Tilley the USDA in Montana just called back all their staff to work for 3 days. They did this so they wouldn't be furrowed. One office in particular staffs 7 people vital they all get so much vacation time there is usually only 2 or 3 working. If that doesn't show non-essential I am not sure what does. That is what is happening all across government jobs.
Valerie Spofford Tilley the USDA in Montana just called back all their staff to work for 3 days. They did this so they wouldn't be furrowed. One office in particular staffs 7 people vital they all get so much vacation time there is usually only 2 or 3 working. If that doesn't show non-essential I am not sure what does. That is what is happening all across government jobs.
Maybe you can open the government so our workers can start getting paid again
Maybe you can open the government so our workers can start getting paid again
Leif Menzie I went to the food bank, I went to donate food for those that need it, instead of complaining on social media maybe you could do the same thing! PS in case you didn’t now trumps decision on the wall is now up to 63% approval rate you know that has to include Democrats
Leif Menzie I went to the food bank, I went to donate food for those that need it, instead of complaining on social media maybe you could do the same thing! PS in case you didn’t now trumps decision on the wall is now up to 63% approval rate you know that has to include Democrats
Yeah I think the people going to food banks right now for food would disagree with you.
Yeah I think the people going to food banks right now for food would disagree with you.
BUILD THE WALL! Thank you President Trump! 🇺🇸 👍
BUILD THE WALL! Thank you President Trump! 🇺🇸 👍
Annual cost of illegal immigration: OVER $84 BILLION. Yet Democrats will NOT spend 5 BILLION to keep Americans safe & stop drugs. Wake up Taxpayers! #BuildTheWall  🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯
Annual cost of illegal immigration: OVER $84 BILLION. Yet Democrats will NOT spend 5 BILLION to keep Americans safe & stop drugs. Wake up Taxpayers! #BuildTheWall  🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯
I’m not looking for a scapegoat Cecilia. I’m looking for security at our borders. There’s a legal way to enter our country as opposed to the mobs that are trying to enter. Also for security against trafficking, drugs and crime that are proven to be an issue at the border.
I’m not looking for a scapegoat Cecilia. I’m looking for security at our borders. There’s a legal way to enter our country as opposed to the mobs that are trying to enter. Also for security against trafficking, drugs and crime that are proven to be an issue at the border.
Keep the caravan of criminals OUT! #BUILDTHEWALL
Linda Leitner Martin you do realize uh that we all technically are immigrants and that there is much crime found within our nation by itself... stop looking for a scapegoat.
Stay Strong against those who will destroy our country!
Stay Strong against those who will destroy our country!
God would never condone the actions of this individual. The fact that you can't see that makes you a fake.
PRAISE THE LORD for POTUS, God Bless you dear Sir and THANK YOU, you are in my prayers. MAGA 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
PRAISE THE LORD for POTUS, God Bless you dear Sir and THANK YOU, you are in my prayers. MAGA 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Why this man look like he just appointed the new manager of Crystal Palace Colin Charlie
I urge moving the "State of the Union" Address to Independence Hall Philadephia, we need the Rock Solid visual of a Republic, at its Founding, and the back drop Story of those Events, this is a fight over the role of each branch of Government, no place surrounds those Ideals like the Home of the Founding Documents, our birth as a Nation, and the hope for We The People every where in the Wider World. Folks each American knows the story of Independenc Hall, and the Founding Fathers, with President Trump's skills in weaving in History, Events, and the Crowd, he can Hit a Home Run Speech likes of which has never been seen, the one liners will reverberate for years...
Really? What about airport security? How can the tsa do their jobs effectively while thinking about what they will feed their kids that night? The 911 terrorists boarded domestic flights..... remember??? Isn’t that why we got such a strong tsa for in the first place? To protect Americans within America? Answer me that. 😔
Really? What about airport security? How can the tsa do their jobs effectively while thinking about what they will feed their kids that night? The 911 terrorists boarded domestic flights..... remember??? Isn’t that why we got such a strong tsa for in the first place? To protect Americans within America? Answer me that. 😔
Kingsley Medland dude...you’re British slime. What a dumbass
Leslie Kirscht-Sutton Holker lol, I probably know more about your country's limited history to understand that Trump as Presidents go is nothing short of a joke..and I'm here because your comment was funny..the thing is you and the rest of the world are likely to need some prayer because he is an incompetent menace to not only Americans but to the rest of us..you do realise your country is the one believed to be the biggest threat to global peace. That said.. Clinton was shite too..for the so called, self given 'greatest' country on earth you lot are clueless. Go read some books and educate yourself.
Kingsley Medland, why are you here?  Apparently you don't have a clue how huge a bullet this country dodged with the victory of Donald J. Trump. So, why are you here?  🤬
Are you off your meds?
Are you off your meds?


GOD BLESS YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP, BECAUSE HE SURE BLESSED US WITH YOU!!!!  <3
GOD BLESS YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP, BECAUSE HE SURE BLESSED US WITH YOU!!!!  <3
Our country is better protected if there was no shutdown.
Wall isn’t going to happen
People around the world love America!!! Stay strong Canadians are waking up to Trudeau's commie agenda and oil ties with Saudi Arabia.
People around the world love America!!! Stay strong Canadians are waking up to Trudeau's commie agenda and oil ties with Saudi Arabia.
Mr. President, stand your ground in order to protect our country. Americans are with you.  God bless the USA
Mr. President, stand your ground in order to protect our country. Americans are with you.  God bless the USA
Nikolai Patrushev, Putin's national security advisor, has just threatened Ukraine with "loss of statehood." Is anyone in this administration still awake?
WTF?
Sonny CaptainButtler GiduduOcean crack is a hell of a drug
As we attend the classes of "Eating the SALTY FEET OF,,,We shall get missions & those missions will define our purpose & that Purpose is your Job/Employment.This why in around Sept 2018 when we got to drawings of Kissing the SALT FEET OF SALT JESUS CHRIST/SALT ALLAH/SALT BRAHMAN we said we said respect your Job! If you ve big feet or you ve some uniqueness on your feet;perhaps they are well shaped with somewhat salty perfect toes or nails or features,wear open shoes/sandles that are that are catchy or fluffy & start self employment job of preaching the SALTY FEET OF,,,With the best you gat/got. You could ve this Salty Smirky teeth/Smile & join the salt emplyment line of illustrating the SALTY SNAKE Swallowing snakes of 13gang/fallen angels/satan at the US=Mexican Boarder"wall/wars/Govt Shut down/Brexit. Salt Court Navigation of Donald Trump's recent events: The "California wild fires" we had just gone through details of that.When we consider the "Government shut down" because of the 5billion or 6 billion for the "wall(witchcraft war/witchcraft wars that he wants to wage in at Mexico boarder"-his talking about the wars he wants to wage around the world just like Putin 2013 to 2018 when he was finally exhausted by Salt Action & Sanctions.Donald Trump sent American soldiers to American Embassy in Gabon well before the coup attempt indicating that he was aware of it.When he saw we were about to burst his plans(as per the salt telepathy Friday 11th 1 2019-Sept 11th 2001) just like putin he co ordinated witchcraft elements in Kenya for attacks we are seeing in Kenya that started yesterday Tues 15th 1 2019. That Dollars 5billion or 6billion he wants for the "wall is to fund dictators,sprinter groups,assassins & the free world must hold him back with Salt Action & ensuring he DOES NOT get a penny of that money. 14,7&15Advancing Salt Action Around the World Everyday: Events of the “California” "Wild Fires" recall the images;its our duty as 3Billion+Salt Presidents & your Going to make an emotional WORLDWIDE CROWD Commitment to daily Share this Page Sonny Captain Buttler Gidudu Ocean;tell them to click on the Name 2 or 3times for a better view & tell them to reshare,TELL SOME BODY TO TELL SOME BODY From Sonny Gidudu 22nd April 1977/42 years Age/Salty Edges/Salty Corners22nd 4 2019 & Mrs.Georgina May Gidudu 6th March 1987/32years of Age/Salt Edges/Salt Corners 6th 3 2019
As we attend the classes of "Eating the SALTY FEET OF,,,We shall get missions & those missions will define our purpose & that Purpose is your Job/Employment.This why in around Sept 2018 when we got to drawings of Kissing the SALT FEET OF SALT JESUS CHRIST/SALT ALLAH/SALT BRAHMAN we said we said respect your Job! If you ve big feet or you ve some uniqueness on your feet;perhaps they are well shaped with somewhat salty perfect toes or nails or features,wear open shoes/sandles that are that are catchy or fluffy & start self employment job of preaching the SALTY FEET OF,,,With the best you gat/got. You could ve this Salty Smirky teeth/Smile & join the salt emplyment line of illustrating the SALTY SNAKE Swallowing snakes of 13gang/fallen angels/satan at the US=Mexican Boarder"wall/wars/Govt Shut down/Brexit. Salt Court Navigation of Donald Trump's recent events: The "California wild fires" we had just gone through details of that.When we consider the "Government shut down" because of the 5billion or 6 billion for the "wall(witchcraft war/witchcraft wars that he wants to wage in at Mexico boarder"-his talking about the wars he wants to wage around the world just like Putin 2013 to 2018 when he was finally exhausted by Salt Action & Sanctions.Donald Trump sent American soldiers to American Embassy in Gabon well before the coup attempt indicating that he was aware of it.When he saw we were about to burst his plans(as per the salt telepathy Friday 11th 1 2019-Sept 11th 2001) just like putin he co ordinated witchcraft elements in Kenya for attacks we are seeing in Kenya that started yesterday Tues 15th 1 2019. That Dollars 5billion or 6billion he wants for the "wall is to fund dictators,sprinter groups,assassins & the free world must hold him back with Salt Action & ensuring he DOES NOT get a penny of that money. 14,7&15Advancing Salt Action Around the World Everyday: Events of the “California” "Wild Fires" recall the images;its our duty as 3Billion+Salt Presidents & your Going to make an emotional WORLDWIDE CROWD Commitment to daily Share this Page Sonny Captain Buttler Gidudu Ocean;tell them to click on the Name 2 or 3times for a better view & tell them to reshare,TELL SOME BODY TO TELL SOME BODY From Sonny Gidudu 22nd April 1977/42 years Age/Salty Edges/Salty Corners22nd 4 2019 & Mrs.Georgina May Gidudu 6th March 1987/32years of Age/Salt Edges/Salt Corners 6th 3 2019
Joy Z Cohen joy, but she will still pay for her I phone cable tv that’s more important. Complain to Nancy and chuck.
Joy Z Cohen  CNN is notorious for staging their broadcast! If this is true it’s truly sad that this person did not have even 60 days in savings for an emergency!
Joy Z Cohen  CNN is notorious for staging their broadcast! If this is true it’s truly sad that this person did not have even 60 days in savings for an emergency!
"I went to bed and just hoped I'd wake up."  Diabetic furloughed federal worker tells Anderson Cooper she was rationing insulin during the shutdown to avoid going further into debt.   cnn.it/2RyQ3x0The government is STILL shut down: Live updatescnn.com
"I went to bed and just hoped I'd wake up."  Diabetic furloughed federal worker tells Anderson Cooper she was rationing insulin during the shutdown to avoid going further into debt.   cnn.it/2RyQ3x0The government is STILL shut down: Live updatescnn.com
How much does Russia pay you to post?
Winning everyday!!!!!
Winning everyday!!!!!
Not much winning so far.
Ijeoma Amaka repent
Ijeoma Amaka repent
Is that one your headache
Is that one your headache
You're not even in America. Go troll somewhere else, hahaha!
You're not even in America. Go troll somewhere else, hahaha!
The fighter and the winner....more strength I pray
The fighter and the winner....more strength I pray
That’s why DOD employees are still working and getting paid. The Coast Guard is not DOD—but Dept. of Commerce.
That’s why DOD employees are still working and getting paid. The Coast Guard is not DOD—but Dept. of Commerce.
We should use the seized drug money to build the wall legalize marijuana and tax it federally to pay the people working at the wall and to maintain it
Stop Congress members pay not govt workers.  Congress has nothing to lose but so.why should they give in
Stop Congress members pay not govt workers.  Congress has nothing to lose but so.why should they give in
You get it, walls don't work anyway.
Jim Villella they should feel LUCKY not to be Canadians! It's about SOVEREIGNTY You MORON!
Why are the cartels building tunnels if walls don't work?
Bonnie S. Pickett Because there are fanatics like the trump supporters who have come felt free to express their hatred due to trump's encouragement with his hateful tweets. :)
Bonnie S. Pickett Because there are fanatics like the trump supporters who have come felt free to express their hatred due to trump's encouragement with his hateful tweets. :)
Bonnie S. Pickett because they say one thing preach another, they hypocrites.
Mark van Beek , why do wealthy politicans and movie stars have walls and gates surrounding their homes.
Mark van Beek , why do wealthy politicans and movie stars have walls and gates surrounding their homes.
Why in the HELL aren't ground penetrating radar trucks (like in Iraq and Afghanistan) cruising the streets of San Yasidro and Calexico?
Why in the HELL aren't ground penetrating radar trucks (like in Iraq and Afghanistan) cruising the streets of San Yasidro and Calexico?
i thought it was an anime-like pic but actually it was himself, this man is awesome
i thought it was an anime-like pic but actually it was himself, this man is awesome
Its seems elementary, but its seems half the country wants to stay in Kindergarten for a lifetime........🙈
Its seems elementary, but its seems half the country wants to stay in Kindergarten for a lifetime........🙈
You know the pic is photoshopped, right? They fixed his hair, made him thinner, and elongated his fingers.
You know the pic is photoshopped, right? They fixed his hair, made him thinner, and elongated his fingers.
Wow you look great! Must feel good to lose all that weight! Congratulations
Wow you look great! Must feel good to lose all that weight! Congratulations
Derrick J Johnston: You obviously do not live in Upstate NYS.  We rarely get sunshine in the Winter Months.  The only place the sun always shines is in Cuomo's pockets that he lines more and more of our tax dollars, with no end in sight.
Derrick J Johnston: You obviously do not live in Upstate NYS.  We rarely get sunshine in the Winter Months.  The only place the sun always shines is in Cuomo's pockets that he lines more and more of our tax dollars, with no end in sight.
Derrick J Johnston and they will all get their money.
I came here for the comments. (Was not disappointed) I find it halarious that everyone needs a voice on social media instead of a hobby in real life... maybe everyone should go outside for a bit...  The government has been shut down for how long? And the sun still goes up and down every day. Something to think on there
I came here for the comments. (Was not disappointed) I find it halarious that everyone needs a voice on social media instead of a hobby in real life... maybe everyone should go outside for a bit...  The government has been shut down for how long? And the sun still goes up and down every day. Something to think on there
People live from paycheck to paycheck thanks to people like Cuomo that insists he is taking everyone's savings accounts year by year.  I just can not understand why people insist they keep voting him in to get re-elected to do that.  Stupidity has to be put in our foods, or broadcast as subliminal messages in the frequencies filling the air.
People live from paycheck to paycheck thanks to people like Cuomo that insists he is taking everyone's savings accounts year by year.  I just can not understand why people insist they keep voting him in to get re-elected to do that.  Stupidity has to be put in our foods, or broadcast as subliminal messages in the frequencies filling the air.
I agree we need to have secure borders but get the government open so people get paid. Granted people should plan with emergency money put aside but the reality is people spend what they make.
I agree we need to have secure borders but get the government open so people get paid. Granted people should plan with emergency money put aside but the reality is people spend what they make.
Really?   That’s why TSA is understaffed now and considering a job action.  You only care about yourself.
Really?   That’s why TSA is understaffed now and considering a job action.  You only care about yourself.
Stephen Pierson how do you know the majority? Did we take it to a vote? ..... oh that's right..... we did.... we elected a president who put that as his campaign promise.... I see both sides and have friends in both sides.
Stephen Pierson how do you know the majority? Did we take it to a vote? ..... oh that's right..... we did.... we elected a president who put that as his campaign promise.... I see both sides and have friends in both sides.
In the Illuminati Secret Order Of Society Satanic Worshiping Group Contract, it says Congress is the almighty powerful that they are so powerful, they will take every penny then can from the tax payers and vote themselves a raise for doing it.
Okay Stephen. According to the way we elect presidents in the United states, we elected a president. This president's name is Trump. I don't care who or who doesn't like him. We, the United states of America, have a president. The people, according to years of tradition, have elected Trump as that president. Work harder at getting a viable democratic president.
Cath Stricker congress is not going to do anything as long as trump wants it
Worley Michael If you take all the dead people off and illegals he did better start doing home work.
Stephen Pierson Thats a lie FAKE POLLS
Susan Rena Wolf Mid terms kicked his ass. He is not a majority, never was. Shutdown just makes him look bad and ruin our economy but he will blame someone else like all assholes do. Moderate Americans decide his fate.
Oh and dumbass, trump didn’t even win the majority vote.    The wall is even less popular than he is.
They already are.    They are stopping a dipshit man child from pissing money into a worthless wall to make bigots feel less scared.
Congress,  too,  has  a  responsibility to  the  same.    Look  forward  to  Congress  getting  down  to  work  and  fulfilling  "their"  responsibility.
Congress,  too,  has  a  responsibility to  the  same.    Look  forward  to  Congress  getting  down  to  work  and  fulfilling  "their"  responsibility.
What the Government should learn from this shutdown is that people “do not” have 6 months savings for an emergency!  That needs to be addressed!!
What the Government should learn from this shutdown is that people “do not” have 6 months savings for an emergency!  That needs to be addressed!!
"As husband, the loyalty to my wife is at my highest and most important duty." -Not Trump  😂
"As husband, the loyalty to my wife is at my highest and most important duty." -Not Trump  😂
Wow the lengths these people go. I'm legit sorry for your husbands
Wow the lengths these people go. I'm legit sorry for your husbands
Cynthia Hill hope, but I'm not the president talking about his promises either.
Cynthia Hill hope, but I'm not the president talking about his promises either.
Cynthia Hill says a lot that you think not cheating on your spouse is "living on a pedestal"
Cynthia Hill says a lot that you think not cheating on your spouse is "living on a pedestal"
Chris Reed Lame. I suppose u live on a pedestal?
Chris Reed Lame. I suppose u live on a pedestal?


Chris Reed guess you are perfect
Chris Reed got'm....🤣
Chris Reed got'm....🤣
Val Maciag well I was born on Christmas,  just saying. 👼
Of course you are perfect!!!!!!!
Cynthia Hill are you really defending Trump and his "sudden" dedication to his promises? 😂
Chris Reed I hope you get an excruciating beat up from an illegal Mexican immigrant, then we'll see.
Dovid Staples So you and/or Chris Reed are able to cast the first stone? Then your own private lives must be without a single stain, but I doubt it.
Dovid Staples So you and/or Chris Reed are able to cast the first stone? Then your own private lives must be without a single stain, but I doubt it.
I voted for the guy, but I've worked construct for 25 years and every Hispanic I've talked to over two decades, all came over on a plane.   90% of the world's heroin originates in Afganistan,  a country we control with a very powerful military.  So if f16's, machine guns, an ocean or two cant stop the drugs, how the hell is a wall going to? 🤔
I voted for the guy, but I've worked construct for 25 years and every Hispanic I've talked to over two decades, all came over on a plane.   90% of the world's heroin originates in Afganistan,  a country we control with a very powerful military.  So if f16's, machine guns, an ocean or two cant stop the drugs, how the hell is a wall going to? 🤔
So how many friends *do* you have that are cheating on their spouses Elisabeth Temple?
So how many friends *do* you have that are cheating on their spouses Elisabeth Temple?
Elisabeth Temple you do now. 😁
Chris Reed and never lied and always lived by the commandments. You will get your reward. I never knew a person without any faults.
Chris Reed ... you’re ....
Let's see your husbands cheat on you,  then turn around and say "well you're not perfect either". Lol let's see how much sense that makes then
Lol these people:  "Cheating on your wife is bad and says a lot about your character" isn't a statement that requires a perfect person to acknowledge, just a *moral* person to acknowledge
Lol these people:  "Cheating on your wife is bad and says a lot about your character" isn't a statement that requires a perfect person to acknowledge, just a *moral* person to acknowledge
Cynthia Hill yes we can certainly cast the first stone.  We have never cheated on our spouses, so yea.  Maybe it's not the case with you so you find it surprising, but a lot of us live our lives with honesty. You're sounding very suspicious at this point though,  trying to normalize adulterous behavior and all
Cynthia Hill yes we can certainly cast the first stone.  We have never cheated on our spouses, so yea.  Maybe it's not the case with you so you find it surprising, but a lot of us live our lives with honesty. You're sounding very suspicious at this point though,  trying to normalize adulterous behavior and all
Zachary R. Bode another predator that should be locked up with his crazy ass wife.
As a husband you are supposed to be loyal to, but we know how that went. 🤔😂😂
As a husband you are supposed to be loyal to, but we know how that went. 🤔😂😂
I was at the game. I swear that Bundy was short of the goal line on that last TD. They should have had instant replay back then. Bundy would not be the legend he is today if there had been instant replay to show he did not score the winning touchdown in the final seconds.
Don't let this distract you from the the fact that in 1966, Al Bundy scored four touchdowns in a single game while playing for the Polk High School Panthers in the 1966 city championship game versus Andrew Johnson High School, including the game-winning touchdown in the final seconds against his old nemesis, "Spare Tire" Dixon.
Don't let this distract you from the the fact that in 1966, Al Bundy scored four touchdowns in a single game while playing for the Polk High School Panthers in the 1966 city championship game versus Andrew Johnson High School, including the game-winning touchdown in the final seconds against his old nemesis, "Spare Tire" Dixon.
Dear Sir: I agree with you wholeheartedly, however, it is the people you serve to protect that are being penalized. Call off the shut down. Call a National Emergency, if you must. But get this resolved QUICK!
The Majority of We the American People DID NOT vote for trump. trump was installed as Putin's puppet in Our White House by Putin's evil deeds and manipulations. trump is not a legitimately elected POTUS. trump IS Putin's puppet. Period.
Linda Potter That wall is to keep lier out like Trump.
Linda Potter That wall is to keep lier out like Trump.
So trump is god then? Hmmm
Linda Potter read revelation 21 verse 20 . You don't know God word .

Craig Gillhaus No one ever said that Heaven had walls they said you have to go through the gates of Heaven where Trump will never enter.
Linda Potter Hell has walls too and once there you NEVER get out!!
wanna know something else....JESUS HELPED THE POOR AND HUNGRY....HE DIDN'T FUCKING STARVE THEM, DESTROY THEIR LIVES, AND LEAVE THEM TO DIE WHILE HE ATE LIKE A KING
wanna know something else....JESUS HELPED THE POOR AND HUNGRY....HE DIDN'T FUCKING STARVE THEM, DESTROY THEIR LIVES, AND LEAVE THEM TO DIE WHILE HE ATE LIKE A KING
Hell has walls also, and that where fuckhead Trump is going, hopefully sooner than later.
That's blasphemy.
Got to go with Linda on this. ..read the description of heaven....a high wall. By the way, broad is the way that leads to death of destruction and a city without walls is doomed to capture.
Heaven even has walls God put them there so if God created walls around heaven than why shouldn't we have walls also.
Heaven even has walls God put them there so if God created walls around heaven than why shouldn't we have walls also.
Corrado Raeli get my good side....
Agnes Salgado 🌭🌭🌭🌭
Corrado Raeli 🤢🤢🤢
For all the people who came here just to read the comments, please gather round. It's selfie time! 😄😃😀😊😐😉😍😁     😘😚😨😙😜😒         😝😠😳😆                     📱               😂/               <)                /\
For all the people who came here just to read the comments, please gather round. It's selfie time! 😄😃😀😊😐😉😍😁     😘😚😨😙😜😒         😝😠😳😆                     📱               😂/               <)                /\
I think you would need alchemy or something for that not a wall
Mike Keck what the hell does that have to do with the shut down??? Do your RESEARCH majority of murders against Americans are by Americans!!!
Mike Keck what the hell does that have to do with the shut down??? Do your RESEARCH majority of murders against Americans are by Americans!!!
I bet every Angel Mom would go without a paycheck in exchange for having their child back!
I bet every Angel Mom would go without a paycheck in exchange for having their child back!
Yolanda Martinez Lesser ... I am so sorry.     😓
Yolanda Martinez Lesser ... I am so sorry.     😓
Donna Snyder please contact your area uso and American legions
Donna Snyder please contact your area uso and American legions
MaryAnn Scandurra, my son is a federal employee and a member of the "border security" Donnie is holding hostage. You know the "border security" he's SO sure our country needs. Ironic, isn't it?
MaryAnn Scandurra, my son is a federal employee and a member of the "border security" Donnie is holding hostage. You know the "border security" he's SO sure our country needs. Ironic, isn't it?
He is standing firm for his Russian allies.    He doesn't care about our USA Coast Guard.   He doesn't care about any of us.    What part of that are you missing????
He is standing firm for his Russian allies.    He doesn't care about our USA Coast Guard.   He doesn't care about any of us.    What part of that are you missing????
Donna Snyder you can’t have your cake and eat it! If he stands firm the coast guard ain’t getting paid
Donna Snyder you can’t have your cake and eat it! If he stands firm the coast guard ain’t getting paid
Stand firm sir. I do wish something could be done for the coast guard service personnel! They have no union benefits
Stand firm sir. I do wish something could be done for the coast guard service personnel! They have no union benefits
TSA is a sham. Just there to make tools like you feel safe
TSA is a sham. Just there to make tools like you feel safe
Tom DeBiase they should want security for their country and stand strong . If the work for the government they should be responsible people and have a nest egg for this. Gov shut down isn’t new
Sherri Giddings Latimer
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Mary Sue
Mary Sue
hahah...i hope they quit their jobs so we can stop being molested for a false sense of security you shitsucking bootlicking slave of the state lol
hahah...i hope they quit their jobs so we can stop being molested for a false sense of security you shitsucking bootlicking slave of the state lol
I wonder what unpaid TSA workers think when they hear "defense of our nation?"
I wonder what unpaid TSA workers think when they hear "defense of our nation?"
Clark Webber you are pos just like your messiah
Samuel González  Throw away that Nest camera for $100 and build a $50,000 wall round your house dude 😂
Samuel González  Throw away that Nest camera for $100 and build a $50,000 wall round your house dude 😂
great Point , just so everyone know's  Chuck Schumer's Anal dildos say "Made in Mexico ".
EXACTLY!! It doesn't mean you don't care for your neighbors, friends, etc. But family comes FIRST
EXACTLY!! It doesn't mean you don't care for your neighbors, friends, etc. But family comes FIRST
Julie Smith  Re: three caravans, I was not aware, nor do I consider them a threat.  Why should I?  You must be aware that we have the largest and most effective military in the history of the world?  What threat to you suppose these or any of the billions of other migrants might pose?
Barbara. When I was in Puerto Rico I had to move my family to a gated community surrounded by a 12' wall and an armed guard at the gate. Gracias.
Samuel González how many times have you needed to have a ten foot wall around your house for protection???
James Woodruff you’ve been brainwashed
Julie Smith so what. It’s not illegal to apply for asylum.
Elvis Jaws Groves never a crisis for you. Take the doors off your home and let illegals flow through freely. Then we'll see who cares you igmo.
Elvis Jaws Groves never a crisis for you. Take the doors off your home and let illegals flow through freely. Then we'll see who cares you igmo.
Elvis Jaws Groves the greater the jewels, the stronger the safe.
Julie Smith  Lol who the hell cares? Happens all the time Never a crisis ever!
Julie Smith  Lol who the hell cares? Happens all the time Never a crisis ever!
Timothy Norton are you unaware that 3caravans from Honduras are headed here?
Timothy Norton are you unaware that 3caravans from Honduras are headed here?
If I as head of the household don't defend my home then we cease to be a family.
If I as head of the household don't defend my home then we cease to be a family.
Why aren’t the taxpayers vote on this issue?? It’s their tax dollars paying for it!! Why not pay the unpaid government workers with the money paid to the crooked politicians??!
he doantes his pay to chartieswhat has any of the others done and farther more what he did when he wasn't our president doesn't bother as much as what the democrates have done in our goverment at the expense of it people
Joanne MacEachern, people CLAIM Donnie "doesn't get paid." Where's the proof when he's NEVER shown his tax returns? What's he hiding?
so you are wrong again and he doesn't already get paid
Joanne MacEachern trump should also be fined triple that. He started all of this
Joanne MacEachern trump should also be fined triple that. He started all of this
Each member of Congress should NOT be paid their salary and also fined $2000.00 a day the government is in Shutdown
Each member of Congress should NOT be paid their salary and also fined $2000.00 a day the government is in Shutdown
Lonny Watters yes we do. Politics was never suppose to be a career.
Lonny Watters yes we do. Politics was never suppose to be a career.
Lonny Watters humpty dumpty trumpty is filling the swamp
Easy to maintain the Hill Of Corruption once they have gotten their feet in the door and dig deep roots.  Term Limits would possibly help, but not the total solution either.  All Secret ORDER OF SOCIETIES, should be banned from our government.  They have no place here.  Just as JFK had stated in his last speech, and then he was assassinated.  He knew full well the dangers of having "100% of the Senate and 90+% of Congress Illuminati Members", for the Illuminati Secret Order Of Society Satanic Worshiping Group is a very threat to our freedom and God Like Way Of Life.  They are the root of evil and corruption and must be drained from the SWAMP entirely.
Easy to maintain the Hill Of Corruption once they have gotten their feet in the door and dig deep roots.  Term Limits would possibly help, but not the total solution either.  All Secret ORDER OF SOCIETIES, should be banned from our government.  They have no place here.  Just as JFK had stated in his last speech, and then he was assassinated.  He knew full well the dangers of having "100% of the Senate and 90+% of Congress Illuminati Members", for the Illuminati Secret Order Of Society Satanic Worshiping Group is a very threat to our freedom and God Like Way Of Life.  They are the root of evil and corruption and must be drained from the SWAMP entirely.
Patricia Diane life is hard, but if you are 30ish, and haven't saved any money, THAT'S YOUR FAULT, GO LOOK IN THE MIRROR, THERE THE PROBLEM IS. You, you are your own worst enemy.
Patricia Diane life is hard, but if you are 30ish, and haven't saved any money, THAT'S YOUR FAULT, GO LOOK IN THE MIRROR, THERE THE PROBLEM IS. You, you are your own worst enemy.
Patricia Diane he is actually showing how much we don't need most of the 800,000 made up and over paid "nonessential" federal "jobs".
Patricia Diane he is actually showing how much we don't need most of the 800,000 made up and over paid "nonessential" federal "jobs".
Lonny Watters They are never draining that swamp!! He can only do so much but by shutting the government down I feel was wrong!! Hurting the wrong people!! Now if he threw everyone out of congress I think This whole country would throw a party!!!
Lonny Watters They are never draining that swamp!! He can only do so much but by shutting the government down I feel was wrong!! Hurting the wrong people!! Now if he threw everyone out of congress I think This whole country would throw a party!!!
Kathleen Towns Grimsley sad but true, we really just need to scrap Congress and start over with TERM LIMITS
Kathleen Towns Grimsley sad but true, we really just need to scrap Congress and start over with TERM LIMITS
Lonny Watters been there. Our country is so far gone it may never be right again
Lonny Watters been there. Our country is so far gone it may never be right again
Kathleen Towns Grimsley i have called my representatives offices about this and at first we have a great connection, but as soon as I mention term limits they can't hear me then hang up 😢.
TRUE
TRUE
Call your rep and tell them to get behind the Cruise bill on this.
Call your rep and tell them to get behind the Cruise bill on this.
As it should be, but to truly drain the swamp we need TERM LIMITS for ALL seats on our hill!
As it should be, but to truly drain the swamp we need TERM LIMITS for ALL seats on our hill!
Gene Kutina   Wow   Nailed it.
Gene Kutina that is exactly what we see in the Democratic Party today!  STUPIDITY!
Gene Kutina that is exactly what we see in the Democratic Party today!  STUPIDITY!
Boris Nikolayev    You can call me American, comrade.
Boris Nikolayev    You can call me American, comrade.
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
Dear Trumpanzees,  Please don't conflate hate with patriotism.
Boris Nikolayev Well said comrade!  😵
Open your eyes and minds to this traitorous blow hard who has betrayed his country and the office of the President.  God has nothing to do with this lying , manipulative drone of Vladimir Putin!
Gene Kutina huh?
Gene Kutina try getting off of the "I hate Trump" bandwagon long enough to see that we do have a  big problem at the border that he is trying to fix. His solution is very wise, but there is too much opposition.
Gene Kutina try getting off of the "I hate Trump" bandwagon long enough to see that we do have a  big problem at the border that he is trying to fix. His solution is very wise, but there is too much opposition.
Dan Barrios:  News flash!  Obama is no longer president.  🤪
Dan Barrios:  News flash!  Obama is no longer president.  🤪
Boris Nikolayev:  Do your work for the GRU?
Boris Nikolayev:  Do your work for the GRU?
That quote applies to Obama. This isn't about the president, it's about American sovereignty, human trafficking, drug trafficking and American lives.
Gene Kutina got that Pelosi?
"Ego is an anesthetic that dulls the pain of stupidity."  Booker T. Washington.
"Ego is an anesthetic that dulls the pain of stupidity."  Booker T. Washington.
Joel Bernardini, Look at your family picture. FFS.  I detect trolls.
Joel Bernardini, Look at your family picture. FFS.  I detect trolls.
Anna Karen Medina is this serious or sarcastic?
Anna Karen Medina is this serious or sarcastic?
just like hillary
Joel Bernardini fake news! 🤣🤣

Joel Bernardini, your family pic? Look at it. LMFAO. trolls!!!


Joel Bernardini What ever you smoke is way way way to strong for you #remove Joel
Joel Bernardini What ever you smoke is way way way to strong for you #remove Joel
Joel Bernardini yet he kept the umpa lumpa orange.  How Malania deals with that ... oh for the money.  The first hooker to become 1st “lady”.
Joel Bernardini yet he kept the umpa lumpa orange.  How Malania deals with that ... oh for the money.  The first hooker to become 1st “lady”.
Peggy McGinnis reported as fake
Peggy McGinnis reported as fake


Peggy McGinnis has no integrity
Heather Hegge and I’m in no way a liberal.
Heather Hegge and I’m in no way a liberal.
Heather Hegge gee Heather, why is his administration wasting time on doing it then.  Sit down, your cognitive dissonance is showing.
Heather Hegge gee Heather, why is his administration wasting time on doing it then.  Sit down, your cognitive dissonance is showing.
Yes, that is the biggest concern in America today! 🙄 #liberalthoughtprocess
Yes, that is the biggest concern in America today! 🙄 #liberalthoughtprocess
Sable Ash I’m a sad person?  I asked a fucking question as to why they falsify Trumps appearance on his own Facebook page.  I do hope at some point you develop the ability of independent though.  Until then 🖕🏼.
Sable Ash I’m a sad person?  I asked a fucking question as to why they falsify Trumps appearance on his own Facebook page.  I do hope at some point you develop the ability of independent though.  Until then 🖕🏼.
Joel Bernardini u r a sad person to be wasting you time on here with this remark'- I suppose if your child had been killed from some one illegal - u would be more respectable.
Jeff Gibson can you explain that statement or you just here to hurl baseless insults?
Jeff Gibson can you explain that statement or you just here to hurl baseless insults?

Barbara Anderson oh man, again I asked a question, and now my upbringing, reproductive organs, and intentions are being questioned.  It is easy to be an asshole, and I’m good at being one, but that was not the intent here.  I asked a question.
Joel Bernardini why are you such a bully??? Daddy issues or mommy not love you, better yet lacking in the lower region?? It’s easy to be an asshole (as I’ve just demonstrated).
Well we c u didn't Photoshop your profile pic.... Lol
Joel Bernardini , demented demoncratic snowflake. At least he's still the man to all kinds of things your likes celebrate.
Heather Hegge so you don’t understand my original question, retort to your reply, nor cognitive dissonance.  Cool story.
photo shop can fix his ugly obese A%&


Joel Bernardini, who freaking cares! I could care less if he looked like Chris Christy or weighed 90 lbs. What I care about is agenda and that we have a stronger economy! So, please go ahead and attack MY cognitive dissonance! 🙄
Joel Bernardini, who freaking cares! I could care less if he looked like Chris Christy or weighed 90 lbs. What I care about is agenda and that we have a stronger economy! So, please go ahead and attack MY cognitive dissonance! 🙄
Joel Bernardini TROLL
Say, that's important!
Joel Bernardini
Peggy McGinnis it is photoshopped
Joel Bernardini I was being sarcastic lmao and all you ppl need a life for real! Stop kissing ass! It’s just a little humor 🙄
Joel Bernardini I was being sarcastic lmao and all you ppl need a life for real! Stop kissing ass! It’s just a little humor 🙄
Phyllis Haberkamp oh the irony.  Read what you wrote, think about it, and get back to me.
Joel Bernardini, really? THAT is what you see? There are more important things to look at.
Linda Lail no, I didn’t.  What’s your point?
Joel Bernardini you are a worthless liberal.
Linda Lail why do you feel the need to insult my family as well?
Department of Homeland Insecurity is working here
Greg Ellis I cant believe he photoshopped in bigger hands.  What a twat.
Greg Ellis I cant believe he photoshopped in bigger hands.  What a twat.
Gave himself longer fingers, too. 🤣😂🤣😂
Gave himself longer fingers, too. 🤣😂🤣😂
Scotty G. Donnelly there is no need for a wall.  So again, what?
Scotty G. Donnelly uhm, what?
Joel Bernardini Funny that is your liberal reply ! Don't focus on need for a wall . Just sad .
Joel Bernardini Funny that is your liberal reply ! Don't focus on need for a wall . Just sad .
Jamie Hammack also, check out the responses to my question.  People are insulting my family, including my dead grandmother, a few cousins (who I might add have struggled with weight issues, and one who is somewhat ability impaired), and my sister.  You wanna talk about belittling, address those from “your party” who think that behavior is acceptable.     INSULTING MY DEAD GRANDMOTHER.  Let that sink in.
Jamie Hammack read my original post.  This is about Trump editing his appearance to appear more fit on social media.  I’m sorry, but his entire existence is mired in falsehoods, and his social media team editing his appearance to make him more attractive is yet another way of manipulating people into thinking he is something that he is not.    So by my asking the question of why he feels the need to do that I’m belittling others who are overweight?  That’s a stretch bro.  By “my party” I’m assuming you mean “Democrats”.  Nah man, keep trying though.
Jamie Hammack I’m not belittling anyone.  I asked a fucking question, grow up.
Wow really so you going to belittle heavy set people. Some people can't lose weight and don't eat that much they have physical issues with their body that makes them retain weight. You sound just as ignorant as your party
Just curious why you find the need to photoshop your pictures to make you appear not obese.  Seriously, they’ve shaved about 150lbs off for this one.
Just curious why you find the need to photoshop your pictures to make you appear not obese.  Seriously, they’ve shaved about 150lbs off for this one.
Rudy Giuliani says Trump didn't collude with Russia but can't say if campaign aides did  (CNN) Rudy Giuliani said Wednesday that he never denied President Donald Trump's campaign colluded with the Russian government during the 2016 campaign, only that the President himself was not involved in collusion.  In an interview with CNN's Chris Cuomo on "Cuomo Prime Time," Giuliani, a former New York mayor and Trump's attorney, said he doesn't know if other people in the campaign, including former campaign chairman Paul Manafort, were working with the Kremlin during the 2016 presidential race.  "I never said there was no collusion between the campaign, or people in the campaign," Giuliani said.  He added, "I said the President of the United States. There is not a single bit of evidence the President of the United States committed the only crime you can commit here, conspiring with the Russians to hack the DNC."
Susan Scarberry All of that drivel, yet he hasn't had one single indictment from a Republican controlled House and Senate. Kinda makes it look like its a bunch of made up BS created by right-wing talking pundits like Sean Hannity or Rush Limbaugh to whip you mindless people into shape. You should not listen to those folks, they are steering you wrong.
FACT❗️  Ovomit Scandals: 👺  1.) IRS targets Obama’s enemies 2.)Benghazi 3.)Spying on the AP 4.)The ATF “Fast and Furious” scheme 5.)Sebelius demands payment 6.)The Pigford Agriculture Department Scandal 7.)The General Services Administration Las Vegas Spending Spree. 8.)Veterans Affairs in Disney World and neglecting vets 9.)Solyndra 10.)New Black Panthers Voter Intimidation 11.)The hacking of Sharyl Attkisson’s computer 12.)Obama’s LIES about the Affordable Care Act 13.)NSA Spying on American People Foreign Policy 14.)Lack of solidarity with Israel 15.)Disaster with the Arab Spring 16.)Leaving Iraq too soon and letting ISIS take over 17.) Handling of Syrian Red Line 18.) Calling ISIS “JV” 19.) Failing to Recognize ISIS as a Radical (or Devout) Muslim Movement 20.) Returning the bust of Churchill to the Brits 21.)Lack of Confidence by NATO nations 22.)Signing a Disastrous Nuclear Deal with the Mullahs of Ira  23.) Paid $5 Billion & Released 5 Taliban Prisoners For Deserter Bergdahl 24.) Waging war by attacking Libya without Congressional approval  Domestic Policy 25.)Failure to secure the Border 26.) Illegals bringing guns, drug and diseases through the southern border 27.)Bowe Bergdahl swap 28.)Passing on the keystone pipeline  29.)9 Trillion dollars more in debt 30.)Vast expansion of government 31.) Racial Division at all-time high 30.) Inviting Bomb Boy Ahmed to White House 31. Disrespect for Cops 32.) Failed economic stimulus plan 33.)Constant disregard for the Constitution and tyrannical rule 34.) China overtook America as world’s largest economy 35.)Double Downgrade 36.)Housing policies failed to stop foreclosures 37.) Price of healthcare has drastically risen for those purchasing it 38.) Education policies failed to curb college costs 39.)Highest percentage of Americans on Food Stamps and Medicaid 40.)Record 92,898,000 Americans over 16 years not working 41.) Lowest Labor Force participation rate of 62.7% 42.) Denying the notion of American Exceptionalism 43.) Securing the Olympics for Chicago in 2016 44.) Naming numerous Communists/Socialists/Progressives to Czar Positions 45.) Mismanagement and cover up of Terrorist shootings in San Bernardino, California 46.) Mismanagement of Gulf Oil Spill 47.)Disastrous Vetting Process of “Immigrants” from Muslim Nations 48.) Used his mighty pen for transgenders to use womens bathrooms all over America!! 49.) "I'll pass my own laws without Congress Participation"!!! 50.) Crimea And he aint over causing shameful change!! Do ya like my change now??   OBAMA'S ACCOMPLISHMENTS.   He has done more than any other President before him. Here is a list of his impressive accomplishments: 1. First President to be photographed smoking a joint. 2. First President to apply for college aid as a foreign student, then deny he was a foreigner. 3. First President to have a social security number from a state he has never lived in. 4. First President to preside over a cut to the credit-rating of the United States. 5. First President to violate the War Powers Act. 6. First President to be held in contempt of court for illegally obstructing oil drilling in the Gulf of Mexico. 7. First President to require all Americans to purchase a product from a third party. 8. First President to spend a trillion dollars on "shovel-ready" jobs when there was no such thing    as "shovel-ready" jobs. 9. First President to abrogate bankruptcy law to turn over control of companies to his union supporters. 10. First President to by-pass Congress and implement the Dream Act through executive fiat. 11. First President to order a secret amnesty program that stopped the deportation of illegal immigrants    across the U.S., including those with criminal convictions. 12. First President to demand a company hand-over $20 billion to one of his political appointees. 13. First President to tell a CEO of a major corporation (Chrysler) to resign. 14. First President to terminate America’s ability to put a man in space. 15. First President to cancel the National Day of Prayer and to say that America is no longer a Christian nation. 16. First President to have a law signed by an auto-pen without being present. 17. First President to arbitrarily declare an existing law unconstitutional and refuse to enforce it. 18. First President to threaten insurance companies if they publicly spoke out on the reasons for their rate increases. 19. First President to tell a major manufacturing company in which state it is allowed to locate a factory. 20. First President to file lawsuits against the states he swore an oath to protect (AZ, WI, OH, IN). 21. First President to withdraw an existing coal permit that had been properly issued years ago. 22. First President to actively try to bankrupt an American industry (coal). 23. First President to fire an inspector general of AmeriCorps for catching one of his friends in a corruption case. 24. First President to appoint 45 czars to replace elected officials in his office. 25. First President to surround himself with radical left wing anarchists. 26. First President to golf more than 150 separate times in his five years in office. 27. First President to hide his birth, medical, educational and travel records. 28. First President to win a Nobel Peace Prize for doing NOTHING to earn it. 29. First President to go on multiple "global apology tours" and concurrent "insult our friends" tours. 30. First President to go on over 17 lavish vacations, in addition to date nights and Wednesday evening     White House parties for his friends paid for by the taxpayers. 31. First President to have personal servants (taxpayer funded) for his wife. 32. First President to keep a dog trainer on retainer for $102,000 a year at taxpayer expense. 33. First President to fly in a personal trainer from Chicago at least once a week at taxpayer expense. 34. First President to repeat the Quran and tell us the early morning call of the Azan (Islamic call to     worship) is the most beautiful sound on earth. 35. First President to side with a foreign nation over one of the American 50 states (Mexico vs Arizona). 36. First President to tell the military men and women that they should pay for their own private insurance     because they "volunteered to go to war and knew the consequences." 37. Then he was the First President to tell the members of the military that THEY were UNPATRIOTIC for balking at     the last suggestion. I feel much better now. I had been under the impression he hadn't been doing ANYTHING... Such an accomplished individual... in the eyes of the ignorant maybe.!.SHARE! !!!!!  P.S. Ovomit funding hezbola and the trillions of missing  money from the pentagon and the 650billion to fund George Soros and the open societies and what about all those dreamers he abandoned and tax payers are paying for all this disruption such a nice guy oh we forgot the Muslim brotherhood..and the private searver spying on American citizens ect...Oh! Men in Women Restrooms!!  NEVER VOTE DEMOCRAT ❗️  #WALKAWAY
FACT❗️  Ovomit Scandals: 👺  1.) IRS targets Obama’s enemies 2.)Benghazi 3.)Spying on the AP 4.)The ATF “Fast and Furious” scheme 5.)Sebelius demands payment 6.)The Pigford Agriculture Department Scandal 7.)The General Services Administration Las Vegas Spending Spree. 8.)Veterans Affairs in Disney World and neglecting vets 9.)Solyndra 10.)New Black Panthers Voter Intimidation 11.)The hacking of Sharyl Attkisson’s computer 12.)Obama’s LIES about the Affordable Care Act 13.)NSA Spying on American People Foreign Policy 14.)Lack of solidarity with Israel 15.)Disaster with the Arab Spring 16.)Leaving Iraq too soon and letting ISIS take over 17.) Handling of Syrian Red Line 18.) Calling ISIS “JV” 19.) Failing to Recognize ISIS as a Radical (or Devout) Muslim Movement 20.) Returning the bust of Churchill to the Brits 21.)Lack of Confidence by NATO nations 22.)Signing a Disastrous Nuclear Deal with the Mullahs of Ira  23.) Paid $5 Billion & Released 5 Taliban Prisoners For Deserter Bergdahl 24.) Waging war by attacking Libya without Congressional approval  Domestic Policy 25.)Failure to secure the Border 26.) Illegals bringing guns, drug and diseases through the southern border 27.)Bowe Bergdahl swap 28.)Passing on the keystone pipeline  29.)9 Trillion dollars more in debt 30.)Vast expansion of government 31.) Racial Division at all-time high 30.) Inviting Bomb Boy Ahmed to White House 31. Disrespect for Cops 32.) Failed economic stimulus plan 33.)Constant disregard for the Constitution and tyrannical rule 34.) China overtook America as world’s largest economy 35.)Double Downgrade 36.)Housing policies failed to stop foreclosures 37.) Price of healthcare has drastically risen for those purchasing it 38.) Education policies failed to curb college costs 39.)Highest percentage of Americans on Food Stamps and Medicaid 40.)Record 92,898,000 Americans over 16 years not working 41.) Lowest Labor Force participation rate of 62.7% 42.) Denying the notion of American Exceptionalism 43.) Securing the Olympics for Chicago in 2016 44.) Naming numerous Communists/Socialists/Progressives to Czar Positions 45.) Mismanagement and cover up of Terrorist shootings in San Bernardino, California 46.) Mismanagement of Gulf Oil Spill 47.)Disastrous Vetting Process of “Immigrants” from Muslim Nations 48.) Used his mighty pen for transgenders to use womens bathrooms all over America!! 49.) "I'll pass my own laws without Congress Participation"!!! 50.) Crimea And he aint over causing shameful change!! Do ya like my change now??   OBAMA'S ACCOMPLISHMENTS.   He has done more than any other President before him. Here is a list of his impressive accomplishments: 1. First President to be photographed smoking a joint. 2. First President to apply for college aid as a foreign student, then deny he was a foreigner. 3. First President to have a social security number from a state he has never lived in. 4. First President to preside over a cut to the credit-rating of the United States. 5. First President to violate the War Powers Act. 6. First President to be held in contempt of court for illegally obstructing oil drilling in the Gulf of Mexico. 7. First President to require all Americans to purchase a product from a third party. 8. First President to spend a trillion dollars on "shovel-ready" jobs when there was no such thing    as "shovel-ready" jobs. 9. First President to abrogate bankruptcy law to turn over control of companies to his union supporters. 10. First President to by-pass Congress and implement the Dream Act through executive fiat. 11. First President to order a secret amnesty program that stopped the deportation of illegal immigrants    across the U.S., including those with criminal convictions. 12. First President to demand a company hand-over $20 billion to one of his political appointees. 13. First President to tell a CEO of a major corporation (Chrysler) to resign. 14. First President to terminate America’s ability to put a man in space. 15. First President to cancel the National Day of Prayer and to say that America is no longer a Christian nation. 16. First President to have a law signed by an auto-pen without being present. 17. First President to arbitrarily declare an existing law unconstitutional and refuse to enforce it. 18. First President to threaten insurance companies if they publicly spoke out on the reasons for their rate increases. 19. First President to tell a major manufacturing company in which state it is allowed to locate a factory. 20. First President to file lawsuits against the states he swore an oath to protect (AZ, WI, OH, IN). 21. First President to withdraw an existing coal permit that had been properly issued years ago. 22. First President to actively try to bankrupt an American industry (coal). 23. First President to fire an inspector general of AmeriCorps for catching one of his friends in a corruption case. 24. First President to appoint 45 czars to replace elected officials in his office. 25. First President to surround himself with radical left wing anarchists. 26. First President to golf more than 150 separate times in his five years in office. 27. First President to hide his birth, medical, educational and travel records. 28. First President to win a Nobel Peace Prize for doing NOTHING to earn it. 29. First President to go on multiple "global apology tours" and concurrent "insult our friends" tours. 30. First President to go on over 17 lavish vacations, in addition to date nights and Wednesday evening     White House parties for his friends paid for by the taxpayers. 31. First President to have personal servants (taxpayer funded) for his wife. 32. First President to keep a dog trainer on retainer for $102,000 a year at taxpayer expense. 33. First President to fly in a personal trainer from Chicago at least once a week at taxpayer expense. 34. First President to repeat the Quran and tell us the early morning call of the Azan (Islamic call to     worship) is the most beautiful sound on earth. 35. First President to side with a foreign nation over one of the American 50 states (Mexico vs Arizona). 36. First President to tell the military men and women that they should pay for their own private insurance     because they "volunteered to go to war and knew the consequences." 37. Then he was the First President to tell the members of the military that THEY were UNPATRIOTIC for balking at     the last suggestion. I feel much better now. I had been under the impression he hadn't been doing ANYTHING... Such an accomplished individual... in the eyes of the ignorant maybe.!.SHARE! !!!!!  P.S. Ovomit funding hezbola and the trillions of missing  money from the pentagon and the 650billion to fund George Soros and the open societies and what about all those dreamers he abandoned and tax payers are paying for all this disruption such a nice guy oh we forgot the Muslim brotherhood..and the private searver spying on American citizens ect...Oh! Men in Women Restrooms!!  NEVER VOTE DEMOCRAT ❗️  #WALKAWAY
You DO know he's going to prison for being a Russian traitor right? There will never be a wall.
You DO know he's going to prison for being a Russian traitor right? There will never be a wall.
You are breaking up the nation-----Russia ,Saudi, North Korea and china are all joining together because of a reckless man you are.  Your putting all the american people at risk.  A man who knows it all is going to be the destroyer
You are breaking up the nation-----Russia ,Saudi, North Korea and china are all joining together because of a reckless man you are.  Your putting all the american people at risk.  A man who knows it all is going to be the destroyer
Jeremy Stephens   it is going to come out--- he is corrupted in every way-  Its people like you who are brain washed to believe his lies--A wall come on-- 2 years and did nothing but spent $210 million to send  troops to the border when he could have spent this money on a wall  if he wanted to when he had full control of the house.  He is sucking people in like you.
Jeremy Stephens   it is going to come out--- he is corrupted in every way-  Its people like you who are brain washed to believe his lies--A wall come on-- 2 years and did nothing but spent $210 million to send  troops to the border when he could have spent this money on a wall  if he wanted to when he had full control of the house.  He is sucking people in like you.
Mischeal Trala well duh. It's a crime. and is being investigation as you deny it. Try to research.
Jeremy Stephens wow, talk about delusion. Ohr testified a lot of things, some of them back to mueller. It's getting very interesting. Do you realize just how many investigations are ongoing at this time into the abuse of fisa court and abuse of power? Guess not.
Lynda Worden we need President Trump too!!!!
David Schroeder Old news,find something else to rag on!
Don Zunner You do know you are  certifiable insane! You lost,there will be a wall!
David Dennison yThat is getting old,two years and the can't find anything! Go find your safe space!
David Dennison you still into those fake fisa warrants, that was done by last administration , just wow !!
Don Zunner the real Russia collusion. https://www.newsweek.com/russia-routed-millions-influence-clinton-uranium-deal-informant-tells-congress-801686?fbclid=IwAR0MC9qJgeCCGCDN_hUSO0XF81-3DBmxsfL-2hFYwGxTCyvoaS5GHRL4abs
Don Zunner the real Russia collusion. https://www.newsweek.com/russia-routed-millions-influence-clinton-uranium-deal-informant-tells-congress-801686?fbclid=IwAR0MC9qJgeCCGCDN_hUSO0XF81-3DBmxsfL-2hFYwGxTCyvoaS5GHRL4abs
Hes going to be kicked out. You are loosing
David Dennison- old fake news
It's a distraction and a waste of money.
Robbie Miller, no, sweetie, what David Schroeder wrote about the CNN report and Rudy is NOT "Old news." It happened YESTERDAY.   Why are you people so resistant to the truth?
Robbie Miller, no, sweetie, what David Schroeder wrote about the CNN report and Rudy is NOT "Old news." It happened YESTERDAY.   Why are you people so resistant to the truth?
Susan Scarberry, FACT❗️Obama is NO LONGER IN OFFICE. Try to keep up!  You can't deflect from the deep, deep trouble the man CURRENTLY in the White House finds himself. Scandal after scandal. The name RUSSIA seems to pop up often. WHY?   If President Obama was such a hardened criminal why has the ONLY issue connected to him was paying a fine for errors in campaign records? Not ONE indictment, not ONE conviction and NO ONE from his administration went to prison. Oops!
Red neck trash
David Dennison No it suggests some were working on their own agenda and not the administration's.
Thank you, thank you! Don't give in. Stay strong. They are trying to take you down, but we need the wall.
Thank you, thank you! Don't give in. Stay strong. They are trying to take you down, but we need the wall.
Barbara Hill look up who picks up more drugs and illegal migrants than any one else.....to will find out its the Coast Guard, and guess what we aren’t getting paid because of a “national security emergency at the boarder”. Seems a little off right..?  #paythecoastguard #paydhs
Barbara Hill look up who picks up more drugs and illegal migrants than any one else.....to will find out its the Coast Guard, and guess what we aren’t getting paid because of a “national security emergency at the boarder”. Seems a little off right..?  #paythecoastguard #paydhs
Barbara Hill  Secure borders, Yes. All Americans want that.  A big beautiful wall is a waste of taxpayers money.  This shutdown is hurting your fellow Americans.  #NOWALL #OPENTHEGOVERNMENT
Barbara Hill Based on president dumb alternative facts 🤣🤣🤣
Barbara Hill Based on president dumb alternative facts 🤣🤣🤣
Human trafficking is still going to happen .... why yall discriminating against hispanic/latino people .... at the end of the day we need to build a wall to keep out pedophiles, rapists,school shooters, corrupted cops ... the real threat to our people this is all bogus trump hates Latinos because vanessa has the hots for them she dated a latin king that's the real truth lol no one rapes more, does more drugs, sells more drugs,shoots up more innocent people then the people that are here in the country fix the problem here instead of making it worst for us
Human trafficking is still going to happen .... why yall discriminating against hispanic/latino people .... at the end of the day we need to build a wall to keep out pedophiles, rapists,school shooters, corrupted cops ... the real threat to our people this is all bogus trump hates Latinos because vanessa has the hots for them she dated a latin king that's the real truth lol no one rapes more, does more drugs, sells more drugs,shoots up more innocent people then the people that are here in the country fix the problem here instead of making it worst for us
It will slow them down for sure. I can't figure why the Dems were all for wall when OBAMA was in but not now. Why didn't Obama fix it OH BECAUSE HE WAS TO BUSY ON AN APLOLOGY TOUR ,FAST N FURIOUS,4 AM TARMAC MEETING SPENDING 65,000 ON PIZZA & HOTDOGS,AND FUNNELING MONEY .THIS GUY GOT RICH QUICK AND CLINTON BOUNCED BACK AFTER SHE SAID SHE WAS BROKE.
It will slow them down for sure. I can't figure why the Dems were all for wall when OBAMA was in but not now. Why didn't Obama fix it OH BECAUSE HE WAS TO BUSY ON AN APLOLOGY TOUR ,FAST N FURIOUS,4 AM TARMAC MEETING SPENDING 65,000 ON PIZZA & HOTDOGS,AND FUNNELING MONEY .THIS GUY GOT RICH QUICK AND CLINTON BOUNCED BACK AFTER SHE SAID SHE WAS BROKE.
Barbara Hill Donny is sealing his fate as a one-term president!  Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is his cost-ineffective wall.  Donny needs to agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so his shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
Barbara Hill Donny is sealing his fate as a one-term president!  Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is his cost-ineffective wall.  Donny needs to agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so his shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
www.humantraffickingsearch.com confirms this horrible epidemic ❤️
Barbara Hill you’re believing a lie.
Barbara Hill you’re believing a lie.
Barbara Hill nope.  It won't.
If Mexico stopped sending drugs to America because of a wall, Americans will dig tunnels to Mexico
If Mexico stopped sending drugs to America because of a wall, Americans will dig tunnels to Mexico
Barbara Hill #Pedogate
Barbara Hill The wall will not stop them from using boats to get here
Barbara Hill The wall will not stop them from using boats to get here
Lawrence Plants boat and cargo planes...Mexico isnt the only way in
Lawrence Plants boat and cargo planes...Mexico isnt the only way in
Karen Edwards They also forgot they they can come by boat
Karen Edwards They also forgot they they can come by boat
I got my facts at: www.humantraffickingsearch.com which confirms this horrible epidemic ❤️
I got my facts at: www.humantraffickingsearch.com which confirms this horrible epidemic ❤️
Barbara Hill where did you get your stats that trafficking was as a direct result of illegal immigrants entering at illegal points of entry?? Or are you like trump, spewing alternative facts???!!
No it won't, if they're carting them in vehicles, they're coming in at a border point.  That would require more staff to check more vehicles.  If they are coming by sea, no wall will stop that
Barbara Hill have you heard of tunnels?!? And did you know they go under walls?!? You're a fool 🤣😂🤣
Barbara Hill have you heard of tunnels?!? And did you know they go under walls?!? You're a fool 🤣😂🤣
I hope you are taking down walls in your home, leaving your doors unlocked and taking illegals in. Come on, where’s your hearts??
T-Mobile announced a merger needing Trump administration approval. The next day, 9 executives had reservations at Trump’s hotel.------------------Nothing to see here, folks. Lobbyists choose the Trump Hotel for its “fine service and security.”  Apparently, other hotels just don’t offer the same influence-peddling service, or the security of knowing your merger will get preferred treatment.   Hope you enjoyed your stay!
A barrier will also greatly reduce human trafficking, an epidemic with the highest trafficking rates from CA & Texas.
A barrier will also greatly reduce human trafficking, an epidemic with the highest trafficking rates from CA & Texas.
Bobby Wilson run along cupcake
Bobby Wilson keep them closed as long as it takes. Build the wall.
Bobby Wilson call pelosi and tell her!!
Bobby Wilson call pelosi and tell her!!
Daniel Bennett wrong. Try get some facts
Daniel Bennett wrong. Try get some facts
Bonita Selzler they have tried.  He has painted himself into a corner where he is unable to negotiate.
Bonita Selzler they have tried.  He has painted himself into a corner where he is unable to negotiate.
Bobby Wilson bye bye Bobby, sweety... go find a safe space
Bobby Wilson bye bye Bobby, sweety... go find a safe space
So ... our elected leaders have reached the point where they are semi-openly acknowledging that they are entirely powerless to reopen the government and need a deus ex machina -- people outraged at airport lines -- in order to have any hope of returning things to "normal."
He gave Nancy and chuck options. At this point they are the ones better keeping the government shutdown!
He gave Nancy and chuck options. At this point they are the ones better keeping the government shutdown!
Yes Nancy and Pelosi need to do that,
Yes Nancy and Pelosi need to do that,
Bobby Wilson talk to Chuck and Nancy about that.
Bobby Wilson talk to Chuck and Nancy about that.
Don’t fly. Nobody needs to fly.
Don’t fly. Nobody needs to fly.
Excellent Brandon Rayelina Sutton, he owns it. So he shouldn't cave if he's the one causing it. Congrats, you just defended him.
Bobby Wilson stop whining
Trump OWNS the shutdown 👍 he said he would OWN it himself
Trump OWNS the shutdown 👍 he said he would OWN it himself
Kevin Lake how about you run your ignorant ass to my Coast Guard unit and tell my 42 member of an armed service that didn’t receive their paycheck to move along cupcake.... DM for the address and you better bring your big boy pants..cupcake...
Bobby Wilson people are well aware of the risks with taking a government job. They made a choice. It’s good for them in a way. Keeps them thinking. If they wana go make a paycheck tomorrow they can.
Bobby Wilson people are well aware of the risks with taking a government job. They made a choice. It’s good for them in a way. Keeps them thinking. If they wana go make a paycheck tomorrow they can.
Bobby Wilson you ARE talking to the DEMOCRATS in Congress, right?! 🤔
Bobby Wilson you ARE talking to the DEMOCRATS in Congress, right?! 🤔
Bobby Wilson maybe the Dems who originally voted FOR the wall should stop pretending to be against it
Bobby Wilson maybe the Dems who originally voted FOR the wall should stop pretending to be against it
Gerry Visyons without pay...
Gerry Visyons without pay...
Bobby Wilson: Looks like having a government job is not so luxurious after all and has its drawbacks.  Government jobs are the #1 biggest expense this country has and is the very reason our country is in such a deficit.  Converting us from a 'Republic For Which It Stands", to a never ending bloating Democracy Big Government has proven to be a disaster of which I am saddened to see that your just beginning to experience.  Our Founding Forefathers gave us a Republic not a Democracy!  They warned us, "If You Can Keep It".
Bobby Wilson fund the wall like you agreed to over the years then the president will open the govt.
Bobby Wilson they will get back pay. Meanwhile I would like to get my community back, so I want border security.
Bobby Wilson. 5.7 billion please!
Bobby Wilson a lot of people here want a wall for border security but couldn’t care less if terrorists board planes and commit acts of terror. Damn hypocrites
The best way to end this shutdown is for TSA to go on a nationwide strike tomorrow morning so Congress cannot leave and millions of Americans get severely inconvenienced. Since the GOP cannot empathize with the common working person, pain is what they must experience.
Tell that to Pelosi and  Schumer.
Tell that to Pelosi and  Schumer.
Gerry Visyons he said paid, not work
Gerry Visyons he said paid, not work
Or just get rid of tsa.
Or just get rid of tsa.
Then open up the Government so TSA workers get paid
Then open up the Government so TSA workers get paid
God sought a man among them that would build the wall, and stand in the gap before me on behalf of the land, that it should not be destroyed. Ezekiel 22:30 -- Pray for President Trump & a strong America! 🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯🇺🇸️
God sought a man among them that would build the wall, and stand in the gap before me on behalf of the land, that it should not be destroyed. Ezekiel 22:30 -- Pray for President Trump & a strong America! 🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯🇺🇸️
Michael Mont Pas your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go
god has never heard of trump
Michael Mont Pas there is no god😂😂😂😂😂😂
Donna Davis obviously you don't know God.  He loves all people. Even haters like you.
Donna Davis obviously you don't know God.  He loves all people. Even haters like you.
God has nothing to do with this devil 👿
God Love you  Mr. President  #MAGA 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
God Love you  Mr. President  #MAGA 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Sally Gillespie Bailey I hope you get gang raped by 6 illegals, then they rob and kill your family lol
Poor baby hillary lost
Poor baby hillary lost
Yeah....might be back to horse and buggy....stage Coach travels agAin...
Yeah....might be back to horse and buggy....stage Coach travels agAin...
Sally Gillespie Bailey the president is stupid plain and simple!! Screw Trump and the wall!
Sally Gillespie Bailey the president is stupid plain and simple!! Screw Trump and the wall!
Sally Gillespie Bailey no Congress needs to do their JOB and keep their promises to secure our border made during the Reagan Administration and  again in 2006!
Sally Gillespie Bailey no Congress needs to do their JOB and keep their promises to secure our border made during the Reagan Administration and  again in 2006!
Who shooting up the schools and churches Americans i didnt hear bout no mexicans coming over here doing half of wats going on here
Who shooting up the schools and churches Americans i didnt hear bout no mexicans coming over here doing half of wats going on here
Tom DeGregorio What a Jerk you are!
Barbara Sowa They are effective......the ones at work.  Have you not seen the news?
Jasmine Simpson we need the wall especially in California
Jasmine Simpson we need the wall especially in California
Stephen Lee I think the air lines should pay TSA
Sally Gillespie Bailey do you think our TSA agents are not effective.   I am insulted. Doing our job every day without a paycheck
Sally Gillespie Bailey do you think our TSA agents are not effective.   I am insulted. Doing our job every day without a paycheck
Jasmine Simpson little girl you have no idea about the real world. Do a little reading, you might learn something...If we do not secure our borders, you don't have a country.
Jasmine Simpson little girl you have no idea about the real world. Do a little reading, you might learn something...If we do not secure our borders, you don't have a country.
Go to the freaking border for 1 day, and you will see the real threat. Just don't fly if you think it is a big threat. Wake up, you people have no idea how bad it is. But I am sure you will be the first to blame Trump when someone in your family is affected by this....
Go to the freaking border for 1 day, and you will see the real threat. Just don't fly if you think it is a big threat. Wake up, you people have no idea how bad it is. But I am sure you will be the first to blame Trump when someone in your family is affected by this....
Jasmine Simpson  At your age , why wouldn’t listen to your left wing analogy , lmao , talk to us in 30 years ,  When you grow up , a lot !!!!!
Jasmine Simpson  At your age , why wouldn’t listen to your left wing analogy , lmao , talk to us in 30 years ,  When you grow up , a lot !!!!!
Sally Gillespie Bailey Starving border guards are in no way corruptible, and fully attentive.
Sally Gillespie Bailey YES!  And pay me Coast Guard son for doing his job.  Every.  Single.  Day.
Nadine Weber, do YOU live at the border that you can honestly say "how bad it is"? Seriously! You live in NEBRASKA!!   You people are caught up in hysteria for something that doesn't even AFFECT you. This "border crisis" was created by the man in the White House to deflect from the fact he has RUSSIAN CONNECTIONS!
While the hush-money playoffs are more salacious, Trump Org’s *willful and secret* reimbursements to Cohen also included $50,000 that Cohen spent on a technology company for CAMPAIGN-related work.🤨  CLEAR felony per campaign-finance law and NOT a “personal” expense.🙄
While the hush-money playoffs are more salacious, Trump Org’s *willful and secret* reimbursements to Cohen also included $50,000 that Cohen spent on a technology company for CAMPAIGN-related work.🤨  CLEAR felony per campaign-finance law and NOT a “personal” expense.🙄
questions:  👉🏼Did Cohen tape his conversation with Trump about these ILLEGAL acts? 👉🏼Who are the Trump Org executives who knowingly authorized reimbursement for Cohen (other than CFO Weisselberg)? Kremlin🇷🇺Barbie? 👉🏼Why pay via CASH STUFFED IN A BAG?--
questions:  👉🏼Did Cohen tape his conversation with Trump about these ILLEGAL acts? 👉🏼Who are the Trump Org executives who knowingly authorized reimbursement for Cohen (other than CFO Weisselberg)? Kremlin🇷🇺Barbie? 👉🏼Why pay via CASH STUFFED IN A BAG?--
Joshua Yang Lol they are. Look up on how and actually read it. They can't give us a check for it, we'll get it another way.
Joshua Yang Lol they are. Look up on how and actually read it. They can't give us a check for it, we'll get it another way.
Kathy Bezner why don't you pay up and build one and quit telling everyone that a wall is needed. The Trump had three years to fund the wall with a Republican dominated H.O.R and Senate and he didn't do anything. Now all of a sudden we Liberals and Democrats are being blamed for no wall? Let me remind you that he promised Mexico would pay for it and he couldn't force Mexico to pay up. So NO WALL!!! WHATSOEVER!!!
Kathy Bezner why don't you pay up and build one and quit telling everyone that a wall is needed. The Trump had three years to fund the wall with a Republican dominated H.O.R and Senate and he didn't do anything. Now all of a sudden we Liberals and Democrats are being blamed for no wall? Let me remind you that he promised Mexico would pay for it and he couldn't force Mexico to pay up. So NO WALL!!! WHATSOEVER!!!
Sally Gillespie Bailey mm. Tell that to  all the Angel Moms who  no longer have their children....I DARE YOU
Sally Gillespie Bailey mm. Tell that to  all the Angel Moms who  no longer have their children....I DARE YOU
Might want to stop the government shutdown then, so we can have the needed employees in the Airport, where the real threats come from.
Might want to stop the government shutdown then, so we can have the needed employees in the Airport, where the real threats come from.
Logan Storey me to
Logan Storey me to
Happy birthday, Patriot Logan!
Happy birthday, Patriot Logan!
Keep dreaming! Lmao!
Keep dreaming! Lmao!
maybe someone who knows you well gave you some lego
maybe someone who knows you well gave you some lego
Logan Storey Happy birthday! Now go build a wall make sure it’s around yourself though
Logan Storey Fake account
Logan Storey Fake account
Logan, HAPPY BIRTHDAY!!!
Logan, HAPPY BIRTHDAY!!!
Logan Storey Happy Birthday,Sir!
Logan Storey Happy Birthday,Sir!
Chad Overly, learn how to use commas! Lol!
Chad Overly, learn how to use commas! Lol!
And people in Hell want ice water.
And people in Hell want ice water.
Logan Storey  🥳 Happy Birthday 🎈
Logan Storey  🥳 Happy Birthday 🎈
Happy Birthday Patriot! 🎂
Happy Birthday Patriot! 🎂
you're a dummy lol
you're a dummy lol
Rob Jandl you need the lego. You sound like a child.
Logan Storey My Birthday was yesterday and I to would love the Wall for my present 😁 🎁
Logan Storey My Birthday was yesterday and I to would love the Wall for my present 😁 🎁
HB Logan.🎂
HB Logan.🎂
Notice how the mentally unstable cannot resist putting their nonsense in? Never even a hint of a reasonable explanation of their positions, just half cocked gibberish empty any Logic, Critical Thinking or formulated thoughts on the subject. this has become the mantra of the left, sniping without substance, It is exactly what Morons do.
Notice how the mentally unstable cannot resist putting their nonsense in? Never even a hint of a reasonable explanation of their positions, just half cocked gibberish empty any Logic, Critical Thinking or formulated thoughts on the subject. this has become the mantra of the left, sniping without substance, It is exactly what Morons do.
Logan Storey Happy Birthday Logan. Your present is in the works!
Logan Storey Happy Birthday Logan. Your present is in the works!
Happy Birthday Logan Loggy Logansson!  :)
Happy Birthday Logan Loggy Logansson!  :)
Logan Storey sucks to suck dont it. Theres always a way over a wall, ya so dumb just like trump😭😭😭😭😭
Logan Storey sucks to suck dont it. Theres always a way over a wall, ya so dumb just like trump😭😭😭😭😭
Logan Storey Happy Birthday! May your wish come true!
Logan Storey Happy Birthday! May your wish come true!
Logan Storey  Nope
Logan Storey  Nope
Nancy D Heffron You're too old to be collecting dolls and taking their pictures as if they were real.
Nancy D Heffron You're too old to be collecting dolls and taking their pictures as if they were real.
Today is my birthday. I'd like a wall to be built please. Thanks!
Today is my birthday. I'd like a wall to be built please. Thanks!
He has both republican majority in house and senate and didn’t do a damn thing lol
He has both republican majority in house and senate and didn’t do a damn thing lol
Beverly Hurst Smith didn't have the votes and didn't have caravans lining up paid by soros
Beverly Hurst Smith didn't have the votes and didn't have caravans lining up paid by soros
Robert Blim hey dummy, so he thinks he has a better chance now there are MORE people elected who disagree with him?
Robert Blim hey dummy, so he thinks he has a better chance now there are MORE people elected who disagree with him?
You're a special kind of dumb.
You're a special kind of dumb.
Beverly Hurst Smith he didn't have the votes. Needed 8 democraps voting with Republicans.
Beverly Hurst Smith he didn't have the votes. Needed 8 democraps voting with Republicans.
Beverly Hurst Smith hey dummy he has never had the 60 votes needed. Obummer had the 60 votes when he lied to the voters about Obamacare
Beverly Hurst Smith hey dummy he has never had the 60 votes needed. Obummer had the 60 votes when he lied to the voters about Obamacare
Sarah Elizabeth had the house. Most votes in Senate require 60 votes. He only had 51. Want to try again.
Record highs in the market? Lowest unemployment in years? Began denuclearization talks with North Korea? Reestablished respect within world ranks?   I mean just to name a few.
Record highs in the market? Lowest unemployment in years? Began denuclearization talks with North Korea? Reestablished respect within world ranks?   I mean just to name a few.
Well he got Korea to stop launching missiles, he gotten Korea to release hostages, he got Korea to return our fallen soldiers, tax cuts for US citizens, more jobs, brought back jobs that past administrations shut down, prison reform for people that gets out of prison. Ect. But i think keeping us from going to war with North Korea and stopping the missiles flying our way was priority, don't you?
Well he got Korea to stop launching missiles, he gotten Korea to release hostages, he got Korea to return our fallen soldiers, tax cuts for US citizens, more jobs, brought back jobs that past administrations shut down, prison reform for people that gets out of prison. Ect. But i think keeping us from going to war with North Korea and stopping the missiles flying our way was priority, don't you?
Beverly Hurst Smith OMG! Civics 101 doesn’t exist in the Democrat party! Ignorance is bliss! 🙄
Beverly Hurst Smith OMG! Civics 101 doesn’t exist in the Democrat party! Ignorance is bliss! 🙄
What he's done the last 2 years is fight for us and get issues resolved  it the democratic house keeps fighting him on it..dont blame Trump..blame your democratic party house.as even now more and more is being transparent that they are fighting him just because who he is..
What he's done the last 2 years is fight for us and get issues resolved  it the democratic house keeps fighting him on it..dont blame Trump..blame your democratic party house.as even now more and more is being transparent that they are fighting him just because who he is..
Beverly Hurst Smith the republicans controlled the house and he still could not convince all the republicans about his stupid ideas
Beverly Hurst Smith the republicans controlled the house and he still could not convince all the republicans about his stupid ideas
Beverly Hurst Smith Trump is a joke.  He’s Russia’s puppet.
Beverly Hurst Smith Trump is a joke.  He’s Russia’s puppet.
Beverly Hurst Smith it was on the platform when we elected our president but the libs have and has stopped him in his attempts to protect the American people.
Beverly Hurst Smith it was on the platform when we elected our president but the libs have and has stopped him in his attempts to protect the American people.
Educate thyself please!
Educate thyself please!
He didn't have the votes. Republicans want the illegals for cheap labor and Democrats want them for votes and to set this country on a path to Marxist / socialism..
Sarah Elizabeth Nope, there were too many poli-ticks in the republican party too.  Reps and Sens swear an oath to negotiate for their constituents needs, in good faith, to determine national policy.  It is clear they have all been playing a kid's 'Man-O-War' game for over 30 years.  We need leadership not posturing!
Sarah Elizabeth Nope, there were too many poli-ticks in the republican party too.  Reps and Sens swear an oath to negotiate for their constituents needs, in good faith, to determine national policy.  It is clear they have all been playing a kid's 'Man-O-War' game for over 30 years.  We need leadership not posturing!
"Your" president and us have been trying, but D.C. is as full of communist Republicans and Democrats. Paddle faster dear the swamp is draining.
"Your" president and us have been trying, but D.C. is as full of communist Republicans and Democrats. Paddle faster dear the swamp is draining.
Beverly Hurst Smith blinded by hate..
Beverly Hurst Smith blinded by hate..
Trump supporters. Name calling with nothing else!
Trump supporters. Name calling with nothing else!
Beverly Hurst Smith Think of it this way, hardly anyone in Congress was supporting or helping him. The Democrats and Rinos were working against him and the MSM had a constant drumbeat of anti Trumpism going 24/7.  Look at what he did accomplish in spite of that.  Americans have always supported an under dog. Trump by every means Trump is that under dog.
Beverly Hurst Smith Think of it this way, hardly anyone in Congress was supporting or helping him. The Democrats and Rinos were working against him and the MSM had a constant drumbeat of anti Trumpism going 24/7.  Look at what he did accomplish in spite of that.  Americans have always supported an under dog. Trump by every means Trump is that under dog.
Beverly Hurst Smith, sad to see you can't fix stupid. Have a nice day anyway.
Beverly Hurst Smith, sad to see you can't fix stupid. Have a nice day anyway.
Utterly stupid comment Beverly. Proof you’re a leftist moron.
Beverly Hurst Smith lower gas prices ,lowest unemployment in decades , exited the Paris climate agreement ,exited NAFTA,  best economy in decades , highest stock market I  decades , 4 % economic growth , made United states a exporter of crude oil for the first time in decades,  won a unbeatable election , made more areest in human trafficking in 2yrs than the whole Obama tems combined ! Pissed off winning crying little bitches like you !
Beverly Hurst Smith lower gas prices ,lowest unemployment in decades , exited the Paris climate agreement ,exited NAFTA,  best economy in decades , highest stock market I  decades , 4 % economic growth , made United states a exporter of crude oil for the first time in decades,  won a unbeatable election , made more areest in human trafficking in 2yrs than the whole Obama tems combined ! Pissed off winning crying little bitches like you !
Go on get   quit bugging
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
Beverly Hurst Smith you need 60 votes in the Senate to pass border security and the Democrats resisted.
Beverly Hurst Smith you need 60 votes in the Senate to pass border security and the Democrats resisted.
Joan Bentivegna I think he may have needed as many as 10 votes since George Soros’s puppet John McCain was out almost the whole time
Joan Bentivegna I think he may have needed as many as 10 votes since George Soros’s puppet John McCain was out almost the whole time
Alex J Rod , Communism and your New World order runs deep on both sides of the isle. Paddle faster honey, the swamp is draining.
Alex J Rod , Communism and your New World order runs deep on both sides of the isle. Paddle faster honey, the swamp is draining.
Jeff An June Carnahan, please post a link of the missiles flying our way that trump stopped. Apparently the fake news media hid this story from us and only you can prove it.
Jeff An June Carnahan, please post a link of the missiles flying our way that trump stopped. Apparently the fake news media hid this story from us and only you can prove it.
Beverly Hurst Smith idiot
I think you should being asking Paul Ryan & the rest of the never Trumpers in the Rep. party that question    President doesn't write laws
I think you should being asking Paul Ryan & the rest of the never Trumpers in the Rep. party that question    President doesn't write laws
Beverly Hurst Smith not a damn thing
It's ok if you don't understand politics just don't spew your stupidity around
Duval Sotelo hate to break it to you, but the House was mostly Republicans until a few days ago!  The shutdown started in Dec 2018! The Democrats were sworn in to office January 2019! trump said he would take full credit for the shutdown, REMEMBER!  There is NO emergency!  Just trump responding to the conservatives talking heads and FOX Entertainment news! Why didn't he use his "fantastic negotiating skills" (at least that's what he calls them) to talk the few Democrats he needed into voting yes? Because the Republicans didn't want a wall and didn't negotiate in support of it!
Duval Sotelo hate to break it to you, but the House was mostly Republicans until a few days ago!  The shutdown started in Dec 2018! The Democrats were sworn in to office January 2019! trump said he would take full credit for the shutdown, REMEMBER!  There is NO emergency!  Just trump responding to the conservatives talking heads and FOX Entertainment news! Why didn't he use his "fantastic negotiating skills" (at least that's what he calls them) to talk the few Democrats he needed into voting yes? Because the Republicans didn't want a wall and didn't negotiate in support of it!
Beverly Hurst Smith it’s a distraction from his real problem
Beverly Hurst Smith it’s a distraction from his real problem
Penny Terral  paid by Soros... you mean sponsored by Jews don’t you? Isn’t that what you are saying? At least be an honest bigot.
Penny Terral  paid by Soros... you mean sponsored by Jews don’t you? Isn’t that what you are saying? At least be an honest bigot.
We still needed Democratic votes when we had the Congress and Senate.
Informed people know about President Trumps 289 accomplishments in his first 2 years, people that trust the fake media, not so much.
Informed people know about President Trumps 289 accomplishments in his first 2 years, people that trust the fake media, not so much.
Beverly Hurst Smith Trump 2020
Beverly Hurst Smith Trump 2020
Florence Lake you can say that again.... I do hate him.
Beverly Hurst Smith thank you President Trump for all you've done & still doing for our country!!!
Beverly Hurst Smith thank you President Trump for all you've done & still doing for our country!!!
Beverly Hurst Smith more than any other president in history in his first 2 years maybe... get a clue.
How about learning how simple majorities and legislation votes are done, before you spout off
How about learning how simple majorities and legislation votes are done, before you spout off
Kathy A Norton Really???  It takes two parties to talk and actually make a deal to solve a problem.  I don't see the Dems doing much talking.  They were just partying it up in Puerto Rico, on a get away paid for by political lobbyist.
Kathy A Norton Really???  It takes two parties to talk and actually make a deal to solve a problem.  I don't see the Dems doing much talking.  They were just partying it up in Puerto Rico, on a get away paid for by political lobbyist.
Raul Sanchez Sometimes it's better to say nothing than to embarrass yourself.
Beverly Hurst Smith Ask me what i did for the last two years.
Beverly Hurst Smith Ask me what i did for the last two years.
You never trumper's crack me up if you guys get what you want you're not going to be happy and you're going to be crying wake up America still the best place in the world that's why everybody wants to come here we've always had legal immigration
You never trumper's crack me up if you guys get what you want you're not going to be happy and you're going to be crying wake up America still the best place in the world that's why everybody wants to come here we've always had legal immigration
Kathryn Walker Emanuel you mean dividing the country and showing how little negotiating skills he really has. He couldn't even get his own party to agree to pay for his stupid useless wall!
Kathryn Walker Emanuel you mean dividing the country and showing how little negotiating skills he really has. He couldn't even get his own party to agree to pay for his stupid useless wall!
Typical reply from a blind liberal! Sit down!
Trump does more in his sleep than Obama did in 8 years. 😄😆🤣
Trump does more in his sleep than Obama did in 8 years. 😄😆🤣
Frank Lapinski Ever heard of the Caucus Room conspiracy? You can blame your own party for the current climate of obstruction.
Victor Bare the wall would cost at least $50 billion to complete.
Beverly Hurst Smith liberalism is definitely a mental disorder sister.
Congress is like a herd of cats. Have you ever tried herding cats?
Beverly Hurst Smith you are either funny or stupid!  The Democrats in the Senate vowed to oppose and block anything this Administration puts forth and they had enough votes to do it!
Beverly Hurst Smith you are either funny or stupid!  The Democrats in the Senate vowed to oppose and block anything this Administration puts forth and they had enough votes to do it!
Beverly Hurst Smith he never had full control.  The Senate needed 60 votes so why don't you get your facts straight and take some civics classes.  McConnell should have used the nuclear option like he did with Supreme Court justices (Harry Reid started it) and we wouldn't be where we are today. DEMOCRATIC SHUTDOWN totally.
Beverly Hurst Smith he never had full control.  The Senate needed 60 votes so why don't you get your facts straight and take some civics classes.  McConnell should have used the nuclear option like he did with Supreme Court justices (Harry Reid started it) and we wouldn't be where we are today. DEMOCRATIC SHUTDOWN totally.
Kathy Lee the platform was Mexico was going to pay for it and you sheep probably thought that was going to happen. Damn sheep everywhere
Rich Williams you spelled Hillary wrong
Cally Schneider BS, ditz. Apparently, you can't even read the comments here or didn't bother.
Beverly Hurst Smith thats because it was just recent that the globalist like Soros started the caravans.
Beverly Hurst Smith thats because it was just recent that the globalist like Soros started the caravans.
Beverly Hurst Smith oh I don't know he didn't do much. Just turned the economy around big time, created best unemployment in over 50 yrs. Got North Korea to the table, the first President ever to do that, got the GDP up to double what Obama ever achieved, got over 500,000 manufacturing jobs back from Mexico and China, got new and better trade deals with South Korea, Canada, Mexico and others. Etc etc etc. No didn't do much in the last 2 yrs. 😂 😂 😂
Beverly Hurst Smith oh I don't know he didn't do much. Just turned the economy around big time, created best unemployment in over 50 yrs. Got North Korea to the table, the first President ever to do that, got the GDP up to double what Obama ever achieved, got over 500,000 manufacturing jobs back from Mexico and China, got new and better trade deals with South Korea, Canada, Mexico and others. Etc etc etc. No didn't do much in the last 2 yrs. 😂 😂 😂
Screw Trump and screw that stupid wall!!! President is a moron
Screw Trump and screw that stupid wall!!! President is a moron



Beverly Hurst Smith more than Obama
Beverly Hurst Smith more than Obama
Beverly Hurst Smith BINGO. He and the GOP didn’t do anything because the didn’t want the fallout. All of this crisis stuff and shutdown stuff is for Trumps base. It could have already been funded and in progress by now. THEY HAD ALL THREE BRANCHES OF GOVERNMENT.
he didn't have the support of the republican party.......dodo............and any bill they produced was full of pork barrel, that's your answer...
Steve Deshner When the Dems approved the wall for the same reasons Trump wants the wall how did they plan to pay for it!!? Maybe you ought to check out facts and you'll get a surprise if you didn't already know!! The Dems not only approved the wall they set aside money for it and spent just a little bit of it to put some wall there. They stole the rest of the money, where did they spend it, to other country's!!!!? Mexico paying or not no longer should be an issue, not just Trump but millions of Americans want the wall also.Those that don't just happen to be us that don't want to support something's you do. There is up to 2,000 more illegal Aliens heading our way, in groups of 500 !! Their not all coming from South America, some China and Muslim country's!! Yep shocker all going to the US southern border!!
Steve Deshner When the Dems approved the wall for the same reasons Trump wants the wall how did they plan to pay for it!!? Maybe you ought to check out facts and you'll get a surprise if you didn't already know!! The Dems not only approved the wall they set aside money for it and spent just a little bit of it to put some wall there. They stole the rest of the money, where did they spend it, to other country's!!!!? Mexico paying or not no longer should be an issue, not just Trump but millions of Americans want the wall also.Those that don't just happen to be us that don't want to support something's you do. There is up to 2,000 more illegal Aliens heading our way, in groups of 500 !! Their not all coming from South America, some China and Muslim country's!! Yep shocker all going to the US southern border!!
Beverly Hurst Smith hey ignorant one the dumbasses from both parties have been fighting him but NOW WE Have. Two thousand people pushing at our border thinking they have a right here and another couple thousand heading our way.  If that's not an immediate crisis. I don't know what is.
Beverly Hurst Smith hey ignorant one the dumbasses from both parties have been fighting him but NOW WE Have. Two thousand people pushing at our border thinking they have a right here and another couple thousand heading our way.  If that's not an immediate crisis. I don't know what is.
I can tell you the most important thing he did for me he lowered my corporate tax rate from 37% down to 21 he got rid of that useless Obama Care mandate he made it possible for employees to buy health insurance through other companies in across state lines and that's just a couple that I can think of that changed my life my business has never been so busy since I have been in business everybody I know is hiring looking for people every corner you turn there's a help wanted sign unemployment is at its lowest rate in decades Beverly you should head down to your local government and apply for support pet you can get a chicken and put it on a leash and you can take it everywhere you go to the doctor to the supermarket to the gas station and when you're feeling down and out you can grab that chicken and give it a nice hug and it might help you with all that anxiety you're having
I can tell you the most important thing he did for me he lowered my corporate tax rate from 37% down to 21 he got rid of that useless Obama Care mandate he made it possible for employees to buy health insurance through other companies in across state lines and that's just a couple that I can think of that changed my life my business has never been so busy since I have been in business everybody I know is hiring looking for people every corner you turn there's a help wanted sign unemployment is at its lowest rate in decades Beverly you should head down to your local government and apply for support pet you can get a chicken and put it on a leash and you can take it everywhere you go to the doctor to the supermarket to the gas station and when you're feeling down and out you can grab that chicken and give it a nice hug and it might help you with all that anxiety you're having
Jack Gatty trolls just hear what they want to hear. Fake news.
Steve Deshner Mexico will be paying when the illegals can no longer send American dollars back to Mexico to spend. And we no longer have to pay for illegals medical, food, and housing.
Steve Deshner Mexico will be paying when the illegals can no longer send American dollars back to Mexico to spend. And we no longer have to pay for illegals medical, food, and housing.
Beverly Hurst Smith he is working for us while all you heard was the media bashing him. He is and has been building the wall and fixing it already. He has made people work 20 hours to get medicade and EBT and most were dropped because they refused to do even that. Saved tax payers money 😊so much more even, thank you President Trump! 😍
Beverly Hurst Smith he is working for us while all you heard was the media bashing him. He is and has been building the wall and fixing it already. He has made people work 20 hours to get medicade and EBT and most were dropped because they refused to do even that. Saved tax payers money 😊so much more even, thank you President Trump! 😍
He has been cleaning up the mess Obama made for 8 years.
He has been cleaning up the mess Obama made for 8 years.
Kathy A Norton wrong, the Democratic party refuses to talk so Pelosi is causing the shutdown. Trump has been waiting in Washington DC while Pelosi went to Hawaii and the Democrats went to Puerto Rico to party.   Get you facts right before speak.  Democrats want to protect illegal immigrants over the security of the American people.  DEMOCRATIC SHUTDOWN..
Kathy A Norton wrong, the Democratic party refuses to talk so Pelosi is causing the shutdown. Trump has been waiting in Washington DC while Pelosi went to Hawaii and the Democrats went to Puerto Rico to party.   Get you facts right before speak.  Democrats want to protect illegal immigrants over the security of the American people.  DEMOCRATIC SHUTDOWN..
Tony Perez What would he go to prison for? Hes done nothing illegal.
Beverly Hurst Smith still didn't have the votes and there was not a huge caravan.
Beverly Hurst Smith still didn't have the votes and there was not a huge caravan.
Charlie Daboub and what did your rising star occassional-cortex say they were?? Oh yeah, president, house and Senate.. lol 😀..
Beverly Hurst Smith took him a while to straighten things out after 8 years of Odummer...he's the President...not a magician
Beverly Hurst Smith took him a while to straighten things out after 8 years of Odummer...he's the President...not a magician
Tony Perez troll
Beverly Hurst Smith  I take it your a socialist.
Beverly Hurst Smith  I take it your a socialist.
Jack Gatty.he didn't get north korea to the table.  That's a big lie.
Jack Gatty.he didn't get north korea to the table.  That's a big lie.
Beverly Hurst Smith   It has only been in the last few months Democrats and Soros paid all these thousands of illegals to come to our southern border....and now they have done it again...time for a national emergency.....TIME TO BUILD THE WALL.....🦅🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🦅
Beverly Hurst Smith   It has only been in the last few months Democrats and Soros paid all these thousands of illegals to come to our southern border....and now they have done it again...time for a national emergency.....TIME TO BUILD THE WALL.....🦅🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🦅
Beverly Hurst Smith ???
Kathy A Norton thats difficult when one side dousnt want to do anything the other does hardly
Tony Perez are you upset because your drug dealer got deported
Tony Perez are you upset because your drug dealer got deported
Beverly Hurst Smith idiot
Beverly Hurst Smith a hell of a lot more than any dummycrap. And thats FACTS!!!!!!
Beverly Hurst Smith a hell of a lot more than any dummycrap. And thats FACTS!!!!!!
Beverly Hurst Smith stupid bev. He needed democrat votes.
Beverly Hurst Smith stupid bev. He needed democrat votes.
Steve Imbresci what happen to "the best negotiator" "no one better"?
Beverly Hurst Smith - https://trumpatwar.com/
Beverly Hurst Smith - https://trumpatwar.com/
Cally Schneider no not really I see lots of people listing accomplishments of the President and actually the whole post is about him trying to stop illegal immigration
Cally Schneider no not really I see lots of people listing accomplishments of the President and actually the whole post is about him trying to stop illegal immigration
Exactly
Exactly
Beverly Hurst Smith you know you really should know your history and how Congress and the Senate works we did not have the votes in the Senate hello are you there is anybody home in that head of yours
Beverly Hurst Smith you know you really should know your history and how Congress and the Senate works we did not have the votes in the Senate hello are you there is anybody home in that head of yours
LMAO, damn but the half of you need to get your heads out of your hateful asses
Beverly Hurst Smith all he did was flap that big mouth and spew lies and nonsense
Beverly Hurst Smith all he did was flap that big mouth and spew lies and nonsense
Lol true my health insure is higher now than 2 years ago and can’t afford a new house anymore 😪
Beverly Hurst Smith wimpy a*# republicans wouldn’t do their job! WIMPS WIMPS WIMPS ..that’s why it didn’t get done! Repubs are Dems in disguise
Rich Williams , youre a MSM puppet . They program you sheep
Rich Williams , youre a MSM puppet . They program you sheep
Suzanne Burgess Lee FAKE,  give  one  FACT....
Suzanne Burgess Lee FAKE,  give  one  FACT....
Try googling about the past two years 😂 its allllll available to read babe.
Try googling about the past two years 😂 its allllll available to read babe.
what the hell did you do for the last two years while you had control of all government??? not much of an emergency .
what the hell did you do for the last two years while you had control of all government??? not much of an emergency .
Jennifer Myers you and what army? The traitors are the Dumbocrats/liberal/socialist/communists! You must be one!
Judy Goebel , your right about hanging in there....the noose is tightening.
Judy Goebel you are thanking a man who stopped the pay and pay for 800,000 government employees and forces thousands of critical air traffic controllers to work unpaid. How do you sleep at night condoning such self centered evil?
Judy Goebel Let us all pray to Jesus Christ Our Lord to take Trump to Heaven,Amen!
I think it's time Judy goes to a retirement home. She clearly has Alzheimer's.... js
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
Judy Goebel we are counting on trump to be in prison soon!!! Then the round up of all you traitors will begin!
Judy Goebel we are counting on trump to be in prison soon!!! Then the round up of all you traitors will begin!
Trump Organization’s Use of Foreign-Worker Visas Reaches 10-Year High: TPM  Despite President Trump’s anti-immigration rhetoric, it appears that the Trump Organization has been using foreign workers at a higher rate than ever before, Talking Points Memo reports. The organization requested and received at least 192 visas for foreign workers in 2018—the highest for the company going back to at least 2008, according to Department of Labor data. The Trump Organization received an average of 116 visas per year in the decade prior to 2018, according to American Bridge, a Democratic research group. Review of the data revealed that the visas were almost entirely for the type of low-skilled foreign workers that Trump has claimed drive down American wages. Cooks, servers, housekeepers, and farmworkers make up a large chunk of the Trump Organization’s requests, most of them making between $10 and $15 hourly. The largest number of the Trump Organization’s foreign-worker visas in 2018 went to his Mar-a-Lago property in Palm Beach, Florida. Last year, the resort received 78 temporary foreign-worker visas last year for waiters, cooks, and maids.  DailyBeast
Robbie girl, you wouldn't know a communist if Lenin himself asked you out for a date.
Amen! Thank you for all you do.  Hang in there. We are counting on you.
Amen! Thank you for all you do.  Hang in there. We are counting on you.
Jul Cox you don't know? Are you naive or indoctrinated. Do you think there's a national security crisis at our southern border like Trump said?
Jul Cox you don't know? Are you naive or indoctrinated. Do you think there's a national security crisis at our southern border like Trump said?
Denise Foot lying ? Please tell us
Denise Foot lying ? Please tell us
More fool than foot
facts are the enemy of the truth....keep your foot out of your mouth before running off at the mouth dick head...
Denise Foot please elaborate. Including facts supported by evidence
Denise Foot please elaborate. Including facts supported by evidence
Denise Foot Quit sniffing glue.
Denise Foot Quit sniffing glue.
You are a fool.  You think lies are truth and that truths are lies.  I am very thankful that the majority of people in our great country are not as foolish as you are.
Denise Foot pure propaganda !
Denise Foot pure propaganda !
tRump lies every time he opens his mouth.
tRump lies every time he opens his mouth.
Greg Gray you might look at the data rather than relyingon someone's 'word'.
https://www.facebook.com/Capitalists/posts/10161476374065515
Eh, let's leave her alone.  It's painfully obvious that Denise here is just a washed up, out of touch crusty old bag.  She probably doesn't get much attention in real life so she trolls the internet to get her daily dose of human interaction.  Yes, it is pathetic, but also a very real and growing trend amongst the lonely and socially depraived.
Denise Foot still mad hillary lost ..get over it already
Denise Foot still mad hillary lost ..get over it already
Look at all these dedicated Trump supporters who don't even know that he is lying to them.
Look at all these dedicated Trump supporters who don't even know that he is lying to them.
Kristen Schmitz no that's all the dumbacrats and their followers take it all in and believe whatever the dumbacrats want them to believe.
Greg Felsing quit believing a liar and conman.
Jul Cox why?  You clearly ignore facts to support the man under investigation for talking and behaving like a Russian asset.
Denise Foot liar.
Thomas Evans why not consider the fact that Trump is a liar and conman?
Lee Broniszewski sure. Want to make a comment about your beloved liar in chief?
Talk to the border agents -- they will tell you what they need and they said they need the barrier.
Denise Foot  From a person with land all of the way up to the border...  https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=10210424874452837&id=1672964713
Denise Foot  From a person with land all of the way up to the border...  https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=10210424874452837&id=1672964713
https://www.facebook.com/TruNatEmb/photos/a.1562365740475777/2108464869199192/?type=3&theater
https://www.facebook.com/TruNatEmb/photos/a.1562365740475777/2108464869199192/?type=3&theater
DEMS ARE IMMORAL!
denise.. naivete is only charming in very small children hon. Go on and go to work now.
Jul Cox https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.pbs.org/newshour/amp/politics/trump-says-theres-a-crisis-at-the-border-heres-what-the-data-says  Feel free to offer up your personal anecdote.
Jul Cox https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.pbs.org/newshour/amp/politics/trump-says-theres-a-crisis-at-the-border-heres-what-the-data-says  Feel free to offer up your personal anecdote.
Another retard dem...
Jul Cox there's no security crisis at the southern border. Read the preponderance of the information rather than believing a liar.  https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.businessinsider.com/trump-border-crisis-speech-not-fixed-by-wall-shutdown-2019-1
Jul Cox there's no security crisis at the southern border. Read the preponderance of the information rather than believing a liar.  https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.businessinsider.com/trump-border-crisis-speech-not-fixed-by-wall-shutdown-2019-1
Denise Foot diversion doesn’t work   You stated above that Trump is lying about immigration. Please elaborate. I already have the videos from the borders of San Diego and El Paso
Denise Foot diversion doesn’t work   You stated above that Trump is lying about immigration. Please elaborate. I already have the videos from the borders of San Diego and El Paso
Denise Foot Those aren't lies.  You don't get out much or know many people?  Immigration has been a problem for decades. Illegal migration is created by politicians and always has been. It's a huge problem.   All that California governor is going to have is slave labor and wealthy people and an overpopulation of poor people.  Ever see the homeless situation in southern California?
Sandra Gressett the data and experts don't agree with you.  There is no security crisis at the border. That's why the Republican controlled Congress didn't fund Trump's vanity wall last year or the year before. We are continuing with reasonable and planned border security infrastructure.
Sandra Gressett the data and experts don't agree with you.  There is no security crisis at the border. That's why the Republican controlled Congress didn't fund Trump's vanity wall last year or the year before. We are continuing with reasonable and planned border security infrastructure.
Denise Foot you are out of your mind if you think k there is no security crisis at the border
Denise Foot you are out of your mind if you think k there is no security crisis at the border

There's no crisis at the border now, but it's coming in groves!!! Get the wall built now!!!



Denise Foot What ever you smoke is way way way to strong for you #remove Denise
Denise Foot What ever you smoke is way way way to strong for you #remove Denise
Denise Foot another ignorant liberal POS!!!
Denise Foot I didn't go only by what Trump said. Can't you research anything? You just laugh at everything instead.  There's 700 miles of border wall/fence already there!  Are you totally ignorant or what?  They have been repairing sections and replacing some too. Nancy Pelosi said it when she tried to deny it!  She said...."no new wall is being built, they are repairing sections of what's there and replacing some."   REPLACING some!  You are out of touch and think that laughing at things is rational.
It's called "objectivity."  "Rational and critical thought."
It's called "objectivity."  "Rational and critical thought."
Denise Foot Laughing at the facts? I see you are just ignorant. Good luck with that.  Have you ever been to California or Texas?
Denise Foot Laughing at the facts? I see you are just ignorant. Good luck with that.  Have you ever been to California or Texas?
Joani Pakula you are a fool believing what Trump said.
Joani Pakula you are a fool believing what Trump said.
Denise Foot They did fund the wall last year, dear.  They are using that money right now by repairing and replacing parts of the 700 miles of  wall / fencing that is already there.  They ALL voted for it not so long ago. YOu should keep up on current events.
Denise Foot They did fund the wall last year, dear.  They are using that money right now by repairing and replacing parts of the 700 miles of  wall / fencing that is already there.  They ALL voted for it not so long ago. YOu should keep up on current events.
Denise Foot I'm not wallowing in lies from anyone. YOu are naïve. I know exactly what's been going on in California for decades. I don't need anyone to tell me that.  I don't have to "read" anything about what I said either.  The previous governor Jerry Brown and the new one, Gaven Newsom do nothing but ruin California and if you can't see that , then maybe you should go there and learn a few things.  I don't need Donald Trump or anyone else but the people who actually live it in that state to tell me what those stupid politicians have allowed for over 30 years. My statements are true. YOU are naïve.  And don't call me a fool when you obviously know much of nothing about the situation in California. Take a trip and get outside of your own comfort zone, lady. Try learning real things and talk to real people.  YOur term "vanity wall" is a media term.  Don't you have your own words?
Here‘s just some of the crimes committed by illegals in a six month period in Texas,  take into account this doesn’t include all the crimes where the illegal perp wasn’t caught and only includes those that were already in a database.  It is DISGUSTING the level of crime you demofilth have allowed in this country.  You are a bunch of damn traitors.      https://www.dps.texas.gov/administration/crime_records/pages/txcriminalalienstatistics.htm
Joani Pakula is not my problem that you love to wallow in the lies of Trump.  You believe a well known liar like Trump and then have the audacity to call someone else naive. Don't be a fool.  Read something outside of your comfort zone.
Joani Pakula is not my problem that you love to wallow in the lies of Trump.  You believe a well known liar like Trump and then have the audacity to call someone else naive. Don't be a fool.  Read something outside of your comfort zone.
Denise Foot You get your words from mainstream media. It couldn't be more obvious. Who are your experts?  "vanity wall?" And please tell us what is the "plan" for border security?  The politicians you trust so much have created the situation at that border and they don't wish to fix it!  Don't be so naïve.
Denise Foot You get your words from mainstream media. It couldn't be more obvious. Who are your experts?  "vanity wall?" And please tell us what is the "plan" for border security?  The politicians you trust so much have created the situation at that border and they don't wish to fix it!  Don't be so naïve.
Lying about immigration and shutting down the government is the same as defending national borders?  Only on Fox and Friends.
Lying about immigration and shutting down the government is the same as defending national borders?  Only on Fox and Friends.
Sounds to me like you ppl have a friendly sit-down bases with god and y'all know how god thinks ...
Sounds to me like you ppl have a friendly sit-down bases with god and y'all know how god thinks ...
John Hancock who are you to say what God's plan is and where he/she is working with ppl lives..you yourself are just a man.your not made nor will you ever comprehend the plans of a creator when you are just a creation..that would be like you painting a picture and the picture understand why you created it ..or better yet an ant understanding your purpose when your working in your yard..
John Hancock who are you to say what God's plan is and where he/she is working with ppl lives..you yourself are just a man.your not made nor will you ever comprehend the plans of a creator when you are just a creation..that would be like you painting a picture and the picture understand why you created it ..or better yet an ant understanding your purpose when your working in your yard..
"If we don’t defend our Constitution, then we cease to be a nation. I suck big league!"~Donnie J. Rump~
"If we don’t defend our Constitution, then we cease to be a nation. I suck big league!"~Donnie J. Rump~
Lea Callahan God does not like PUSSY GRABBERS
Lea Callahan God does not like PUSSY GRABBERS
God has nothing to do with a low life like Trump who's threat to destroy NATO endangers this country!
God has nothing to do with a low life like Trump who's threat to destroy NATO endangers this country!
Lea Callahan يمعوده شدعوه هل دعاء الزايد
Lea Callahan يمعوده شدعوه هل دعاء الزايد

Americans are loved all around the world especially in Vietnam. The entire country knows the truth!
Americans are loved all around the world especially in Vietnam. The entire country knows the truth!
TRUMP is so freakin smart and some of you are so freakin ignorant.
TRUMP is so freakin smart and some of you are so freakin ignorant.
Sizin Allaha inancınız varmı lea
Sizin Allaha inancınız varmı lea
These butt hurt mfers^^^ 😂😂 Go back to your safe spaces. Fuckin snowflakes
These butt hurt mfers^^^ 😂😂 Go back to your safe spaces. Fuckin snowflakes
Nancy D Heffron YOU are the fake account, lol.
Nancy D Heffron YOU are the fake account, lol.
Joy Z Cohen  Childish snowflake
Joy Z Cohen  Childish snowflake
Lea Callahan  So dumb
Lea Callahan fake account
Lea Callahan fake account
Lea Callahan God replies: Lea, read Psalm 109:8
Worley Michael it has nothing to do with religious ppl..it's simple .for years ppl in office have said that we needed border security for years ppl in office have talked about and passed laws for immegration yet they don't enforce these laws..we are ppl that want a solution in place to Henderson illeaglly entering this country..
Worley Michael it has nothing to do with religious ppl..it's simple .for years ppl in office have said that we needed border security for years ppl in office have talked about and passed laws for immegration yet they don't enforce these laws..we are ppl that want a solution in place to Henderson illeaglly entering this country..
Stephen Pierson my daughter is 2. Nice one creep.
Stephen Pierson my daughter is 2. Nice one creep.
Worley Michael I'm not even a Christian lol..I'm pagan to be honest..I was just stateing a simple fact..creation can't see what's on the mind of a creator
Worley Michael I'm not even a Christian lol..I'm pagan to be honest..I was just stateing a simple fact..creation can't see what's on the mind of a creator
Redneck trash uneducated fucks
Redneck trash uneducated fucks
No shock the religious ones are the type of hypocrites that support trump.    He needs a deeply uneducated easy to lie to base.    If you are an adult with imaginary friends, you fit the bill.
No shock the religious ones are the type of hypocrites that support trump.    He needs a deeply uneducated easy to lie to base.    If you are an adult with imaginary friends, you fit the bill.
Joy Z Cohen so what you're saying is God won't forgive him for things that he allegedly did in his past, but anyone else that did something in the past will be forgiven??? That makes no sense to me.
Joy Z Cohen so what you're saying is God won't forgive him for things that he allegedly did in his past, but anyone else that did something in the past will be forgiven??? That makes no sense to me.
John Hancock you're completely fuckin stupid!
John Hancock you're completely fuckin stupid!
Joy Z Cohen does that include your man?
Joy Z Cohen does that include your man?
Lea Callahan your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go go
Worley Michael it surely is part of it.  Why are some of you so ignorant and never use the brain that God gave you?
Worley Michael it surely is part of it.  Why are some of you so ignorant and never use the brain that God gave you?
Worley Michael how is that logical when a barrier will limit areas for entry..so yes a barrier is part of border security..even border agents have said many times there needs to be a barrier along the border..and these agents are at these borders everyday..they know what they need..you think you know more on what's needed than these agents working on the border
Border security is not the same thing as a wall.
Peace be upon the Commander of the Believers Ali bin Abi Talib (peace and blessings of Allaah be upon him)
Victoria a d deobald Vietnam... isn't that where they get a hefty two dollars a day for making Ivanka rich.fr the clothing line? they love her in China and India also.so generously giving,those Trump people!!!
Victoria a d deobald Vietnam... isn't that where they get a hefty two dollars a day for making Ivanka rich.fr the clothing line? they love her in China and India also.so generously giving,those Trump people!!!
Donald Trump is the ANTI-CHRIST.  His only God is MONEY.
Loren Michaels Trump's brainwashed following are pathetic.
Dwaine Berbohm he's Putin's President not POTUS for any citizen
The nervousness of the trumpet sheep.priceless
The nervousness of the trumpet sheep.priceless
Dwaine berbohm so sensitive and because you are blindly following you refuse the truth.sorry but ivaka Trump business operates sweat shops that pay people as little as two dollars a day.fact sheep
Dwaine berbohm so sensitive and because you are blindly following you refuse the truth.sorry but ivaka Trump business operates sweat shops that pay people as little as two dollars a day.fact sheep
Loren Michaels Sorry honey  like it or not he is your President to so get over  yourself
Benjamin Barnes Another dumb ass spewing crap he knows nothing about atleast dont make it so obvious STFU
Karar Reh Ab Get the ;hell out of here STFU
Lea Callahan you're as big of a joke as your "president"
#Russia's state TV—which was previously more than happy to exclaim "Trump is ours"— now nervously attempts to refute the idea he is an agent of the Kremlin. Russia's foreign minister Sergey Lavrov complains about the lack of leaks in the Mueller investigation. They smell trouble.
Heads down!! Incoming liberal bullshit!!!!
Stephen Pierson He doesn't bless traitors with potty mouths either.
Lea Callahan god bless and grab em by the pussy
daddy issues isues or a Russian we want to know what is it help us understand your confusing
If your God blesses a self-described "pussy-grabber" and an adulterer, then your god is not in heaven but in hell.
Oscar Carter and who are you to say he's wrong.
Oscar Carter and even they agree that a 26 billion dollar war is NOT the,answer
Indeed!!! God bless and keep you Mr. President. Thank you!!!
Indeed!!! God bless and keep you Mr. President. Thank you!!!
Cheryl you needed to spell check as Mr Trump has been Putin first. :P
Cheryl you needed to spell check as Mr Trump has been Putin first. :P
God sought a man among them that would build the wall, and stand in the gap before me on behalf of the land, that it should not be destroyed. Ezekiel 22:30 -- Pray for President Trump & a strong America! 🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯🇺🇸️
God sought a man among them that would build the wall, and stand in the gap before me on behalf of the land, that it should not be destroyed. Ezekiel 22:30 -- Pray for President Trump & a strong America! 🙏🏻💪🏻🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020💯🇺🇸️
Trump and his base need to dial back the name calling. Now that the House is under Democratic control he won't get a single bill passed without Democratic help. Calling people "evil" isn't going to work.
Trump and his base need to dial back the name calling. Now that the House is under Democratic control he won't get a single bill passed without Democratic help. Calling people "evil" isn't going to work.
Meredith Bogue rather give him my money than ILLEGALS !!!...I work hard and shouldn't have to support MOOCHERS  that came ILLEGALLY!!!
Meredith Bogue rather give him my money than ILLEGALS !!!...I work hard and shouldn't have to support MOOCHERS  that came ILLEGALLY!!!
Barbara Leonard Supporting the Corrupt Dems is BAD for the Whole Country so PULL Your Head OUT !!!!
Barbara Leonard Supporting the Corrupt Dems is BAD for the Whole Country so PULL Your Head OUT !!!!
That's the dumbest damn thing I've read all day. Thanks for the laugh.
That's the dumbest damn thing I've read all day. Thanks for the laugh.
I used to joke that the best evidence the President is not an asset of the Russians is that his policies have been so pro-Russian that even the Russians would tell him, "slow down, you're being too obvious.”  But the damage done to our security is no joke, and demands an answer.
Cheryl Steffen your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go
Cheryl Steffen your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go
Webster you didn't finish the verse, "but I found no one".
Hes not even deporting them hes giving out work visas. Thousands per day. Suckas
Awe Cheryl I feel for ya . But being willfully ignorant is so bad for the rest of us so stop it.
Awe Cheryl I feel for ya . But being willfully ignorant is so bad for the rest of us so stop it.
Ha!Ha! Corrupt and evil! Wow. If democrats are corrupt and evil, what is isis?
With you and your friends do you always put yourself first or are you kind to your friends so they will be there for you later on?
With you and your friends do you always put yourself first or are you kind to your friends so they will be there for you later on?
Putting our country first????
Try putting YOUR BRAIN 🧠 first
Try putting YOUR BRAIN 🧠 first
Rob Kettner F*CK YOU !!!!
Rob Kettner F*CK YOU !!!!
Cheryl Steffen You are a divider. Keep on working for the Russians.
Cheryl Steffen You are a divider. Keep on working for the Russians.
Charlie Daboub Yes I do,,but sure his plan was to show how Un american the Dems are !!!
Charlie Daboub Yes I do,,but sure his plan was to show how Un american the Dems are !!!
James Kenney And now BLOCKED...Bye Bye
James Kenney WOW...You really are DELUSIONAL..Hope you are Wealthy or soon you will be on the DOLE like the ILLEGALS !!!!..It amazes me that you can't see that the CORRUPT DEMS want a One World Order will CONTROL of us all, and while they get RICH we will be told what , how, when we can do ANYTHING....Take a look at Venezuela DUMBASS !!!
James Kenney And where do ILLEGALS fit into your delusional List ??!!!
I feel so sad that you Mr. President have to take so much from the CORRUPT and EVIL Dems, but I THANK YOU for Putting Our Country FIRST !!!!
I feel so sad that you Mr. President have to take so much from the CORRUPT and EVIL Dems, but I THANK YOU for Putting Our Country FIRST !!!!
I'd love to have a president who can spell :(
Casey Voigt we love it he can post it 57 more times!
Casey Voigt we love it he can post it 57 more times!
Only obsessive people would keep track, thanks for confirming your TDS. Have a great day and enjoy 5 more years of winning under President Trump. 🇺🇸
Only obsessive people would keep track, thanks for confirming your TDS. Have a great day and enjoy 5 more years of winning under President Trump. 🇺🇸
Kate Newman oh I’m sorry. 99% of the time it’s a bot Account
Kate Newman oh I’m sorry. 99% of the time it’s a bot Account
He likes it cuz they photo shopped him thin.
He likes it cuz they photo shopped him thin.
Michael Trader - that’s not true.
Michael Trader - that’s not true.
Casey Voigt it’s always a bot account that post these types of comments. What does it say when anti Trump rhetoric is from fake accounts and pro Trump rhetoric is from real people?
Casey Voigt it’s always a bot account that post these types of comments. What does it say when anti Trump rhetoric is from fake accounts and pro Trump rhetoric is from real people?
Lisa Hertel I’m American though. And Casey is right. Trump posts this multiple times a day.
Lisa Hertel I’m American though. And Casey is right. Trump posts this multiple times a day.
Casey Voigt go worship on Barry’s page. You’re not American so F off
Casey Voigt go worship on Barry’s page. You’re not American so F off
Josh Binder he's way smarter than you are.
Josh Binder he's way smarter than you are.
Rick Voss President Trump is the best leader for America and American citizens, he will have my vote again just as he will from all of his supporters! The libtards don't have a brain or a clue
Rick Voss President Trump is the best leader for America and American citizens, he will have my vote again just as he will from all of his supporters! The libtards don't have a brain or a clue
Josh Binder you are free to move! Real patriotic Americans support President Trump and respect how he is restoring America from all the damage caused by obama
Josh Binder you are free to move! Real patriotic Americans support President Trump and respect how he is restoring America from all the damage caused by obama
Lisa Hertel hey but wait ! I’m not american either but come to this page for my morning bowel movement laughing at epic stupidity cause an epic bowel movement !! Never thought worthless brain dead Trumpanzees would turn out to be the best free laxatives on the market !! I do suffer from occasional constipation so could you friend me ? I’m sure your services will be needed from time to time !!
Lisa Hertel hey but wait ! I’m not american either but come to this page for my morning bowel movement laughing at epic stupidity cause an epic bowel movement !! Never thought worthless brain dead Trumpanzees would turn out to be the best free laxatives on the market !! I do suffer from occasional constipation so could you friend me ? I’m sure your services will be needed from time to time !!
Josh Binder   thinking would be nice too
Josh Binder   thinking would be nice too
Denise Foot the photoshop trimmed a lot of pork from the midsection
Denise Foot the photoshop trimmed a lot of pork from the midsection
Casey Voigt troll
Casey Voigt troll
Trump got 27% of registered voters last time .  Won on electoral college ... He won't win again... If he lives that long
Dan Sawyer Just skip over it. Don't continue being a dumbbutt
I hope trumps punishment for treason is public hanging on pay per view... Use the money to build him a wall
Casey Voigt Thats how you whip mindless drones into shape.. constant repetition. He has to spam this message, cause he is still trying to convince America, that this is what we want.
Casey Voigt Thats how you whip mindless drones into shape.. constant repetition. He has to spam this message, cause he is still trying to convince America, that this is what we want.
Steve Imbresci I'd be willing to test that theory
Steve Imbresci I'd be willing to test that theory
Casey Voigt then why are you still here? U love it, dont be a lying leftist!
Casey Voigt then why are you still here? U love it, dont be a lying leftist!
Ron Liptack enjoy the next SIX years Ronnie. TRUMP2020!   KAG!
Rick Voss you are a special kind of stupid aren’t you
Rick Voss you are a special kind of stupid aren’t you
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
Josh binder  You must want the  Secret service showing up at your front door to arrest your ass  You really should be careful about the words you use towards president trump
Josh binder  You must want the  Secret service showing up at your front door to arrest your ass  You really should be careful about the words you use towards president trump
Casey Voigt 58 Cat Kisser......
Casey Voigt That's his tactic and a proven way to manipulate stupid people. Post it every single day, keep up the fear mongering and your supporters think it's true.
Casey Voigt That's his tactic and a proven way to manipulate stupid people. Post it every single day, keep up the fear mongering and your supporters think it's true.
Adam Smith yes, you sure as hell are not AMERICAN, STAY IN YOUR OWN COUNTRY WHEREVER THAT IS!
Adam Smith yes, you sure as hell are not AMERICAN, STAY IN YOUR OWN COUNTRY WHEREVER THAT IS!
I think I will re post this every day just for you😂😂
Casey Voigt  Americans who care about our country are re posting it 😂😂😂 ❤️🇺🇸🙏🎚
Casey Voigt why do you care! Just delete it if you don’t like it!
Casey Voigt ok goat fucker
Ruth Mosley Poor baby hillary lost
Ruth Mosley Poor baby hillary lost
Christopher Goodwin! YOU ARE REAL IDIOT.


Attention All Democrats: Trump IS still your President. COMRADES! 😄😆🤣
Attention All Democrats: Trump IS still your President. COMRADES! 😄😆🤣
Casey Voigt stay outta American problems cocksucker
Casey Voigt stay outta American problems cocksucker
Rick Voss Hahaha where did you get that number from. The majority of Americans do NOT want the wall.
Janice Bradford Wrong, Trump and his supporters want the stupid wall. America doesn't need it.
Janice Bradford Wrong, Trump and his supporters want the stupid wall. America doesn't need it.
Ruth Mosley America needs the Wall! Should've had one many years ago!
Ruth Mosley America needs the Wall! Should've had one many years ago!
Peggy McGinnis liberals every day for 3 years now
Peggy McGinnis liberals every day for 3 years now
Josh Binder Trump won 37 states to 13. Trump won 304 to 224 electoral college votes. Currently 76% of Americans want the wall. #Trump2020
Josh Binder Trump won 37 states to 13. Trump won 304 to 224 electoral college votes. Currently 76% of Americans want the wall. #Trump2020
Jeremy Stephens wrong...he's letting the dimwit demolibtards know he's not going away and standing his ground for the best interest for the USA. TRUMP 2020!!
Jeremy Stephens wrong...he's letting the dimwit demolibtards know he's not going away and standing his ground for the best interest for the USA. TRUMP 2020!!
Casey Voigt lol
Peggy McGinnis That's the toddler Trumpy who is crying that he doesn't get his stupid wall hahaha.
Peggy McGinnis That's the toddler Trumpy who is crying that he doesn't get his stupid wall hahaha.
Lynda Birch Jeffs  The majority does NOT want the wall. You are wrong "Sweety".
Lynda Birch Jeffs  The majority does NOT want the wall. You are wrong "Sweety".
Rick Voss Please read my comment again. I asked you where you got the number of 76% of Americans who want the wall from? I guess you just wrote it, right?
Rick Voss Please read my comment again. I asked you where you got the number of 76% of Americans who want the wall from? I guess you just wrote it, right?
Ruth Mosley the number of states Trump won and the number of electoral college votes he received can be found on google.
Ruth Mosley This is you👳‍♂️
Ruth Mosley This is you👳‍♂️
Adam Smith Another big mouthed DIM
Adam Smith Another big mouthed DIM
He needs to post it 57 more times.
@Ruthmosley. The majority DO WANT IT LADY
@Ruthmosley. The majority DO WANT IT LADY
Ruth, then I suppose the men and women who do the job and says we do need it, is what lying?  Then sweetie, I will go after you and open up my doors for anyone, right after you do it!!!  Feed them, clothe them, take care of them on your own f#cking dime!
Ruth, then I suppose the men and women who do the job and says we do need it, is what lying?  Then sweetie, I will go after you and open up my doors for anyone, right after you do it!!!  Feed them, clothe them, take care of them on your own f#cking dime!
Casey Voigt what’s meme?
Ruth Mosley you are the problem us citizens have! Leave our country
Ruth Mosley you are the problem us citizens have! Leave our country
Ruth Mosley leave America!
Ruth Mosley leave America!
Then Ruth, with all due respect, if you aren't from here STFU, and leave us to our own country,why don't you!!!
Then Ruth, with all due respect, if you aren't from here STFU, and leave us to our own country,why don't you!!!
LMAO OH I GET IT NOW, RUTH DOESN'T HAVE A BRAIN OF HER OWN, WE ARE ARGUING WITH SOMEONE WHO JUST LISTENS TO MEDIA AND DOESNT RESEARCH ON HER OWN!!!!  BORDER PATROL HAS SAID RUTH WE NEED THE WALL, I AM MORE INCLINED TO BELIEVE THOSE WHO DO THE JOB VS MEDIA AND PEOPLE WHO DONT!!!!!
LMAO OH I GET IT NOW, RUTH DOESN'T HAVE A BRAIN OF HER OWN, WE ARE ARGUING WITH SOMEONE WHO JUST LISTENS TO MEDIA AND DOESNT RESEARCH ON HER OWN!!!!  BORDER PATROL HAS SAID RUTH WE NEED THE WALL, I AM MORE INCLINED TO BELIEVE THOSE WHO DO THE JOB VS MEDIA AND PEOPLE WHO DONT!!!!!
Peggy McGinnis "I'm America"??? Please try again
Peggy McGinnis "I'm America"??? Please try again
Peggy McGinnis Something to educate yourself but I am sure you will call it fake again. Trumpturds don't want to hear the truth.   https://www-cbsnews-com.cdn.ampproject.org/v/s/www.cbsnews.com/amp/news/cbs-news-poll-americans-dont-support-building-the-wall/?amp_js_v=a2&amp_gsa=1&usqp=mq331AQCCAE%3D#referrer=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.google.com&amp_tf=Von%20%251%24s&ampshare=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.cbsnews.com%2Fnews%2Fcbs-news-poll-americans-dont-support-building-the-wall%2F
Peggy McGinnis Something to educate yourself but I am sure you will call it fake again. Trumpturds don't want to hear the truth.   https://www-cbsnews-com.cdn.ampproject.org/v/s/www.cbsnews.com/amp/news/cbs-news-poll-americans-dont-support-building-the-wall/?amp_js_v=a2&amp_gsa=1&usqp=mq331AQCCAE%3D#referrer=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.google.com&amp_tf=Von%20%251%24s&ampshare=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.cbsnews.com%2Fnews%2Fcbs-news-poll-americans-dont-support-building-the-wall%2F


Hey Ruth Mosley Nazi   In America it's spelt sweetie. Try again
Hey Ruth Mosley Nazi   In America it's spelt sweetie. Try again
Ruth Mosley I'm blocking you you're not American and you're on here to argue and shove your stupid on us! You are apparently on heavy medication not talking to you your delusional we don't need people like you in America period. Blocked!
Ruth Mosley, Swastika German troll detected. Crawl back into you're chamber.
Ruth Mosley, Swastika German troll detected. Crawl back into you're chamber.




Peggy McGinnis What's a "Zazi" sweetie? I see you deleted your other comment. Criticize others but can't take any criticism hahaha.
Rick Voss Hahaha 82%, still waiting for your proof.
Janice Bradford Who are you to tell other Americans to leave "our" country? Because I have another opinion? Well, it looks like you have a mental problem.
Ruth Mosley, Lying Nazi.
Ruth Mosley, Lying Nazi.
Ruth Mosley it’s actually higher, around 82%. Only anti Americans don’t want Americans to be better protected.
Ruth Mosley it’s actually higher, around 82%. Only anti Americans don’t want Americans to be better protected.
The calling of names is disgusting, immature and non-productive.  some of you people need to seriously grow up.
he needs to keep saying it until congress stops obstructing what common sense tells us we need.
Janice Bradford, Right! I will be watching for this fake and she will be exposed every single time. Always for Trump!!
Peggy McGinnis President Trump will have my vote again! I blocked that crazy thang lol
Peggy McGinnis President Trump will have my vote again! I blocked that crazy thang lol
Ruth, fix your own country where you all allowed for the Jews to get wiped out and you are talking about us Americans?   Get a grip you Jew killer, your country allowed people to be wiped out and YOU SAID NOTHING, AND YOU COME ON OUR THREAD AND TELL US WHOM TO LIKE AND WHAT TO DO?  OH HELL NO LADY GFY WITH A SIZE12 DILDO FRANKLY YOU FREAKING HYPOCRITE
Ruth Mosley, Only thing I delete are foreign trolls. But don't worry old German. I will be here supporting America's President. Here's another lesson for ya. Get some glasses. Liar.
Ruth Mosley, Only thing I delete are foreign trolls. But don't worry old German. I will be here supporting America's President. Here's another lesson for ya. Get some glasses. Liar.




You’ve posted this meme 57 times already. Chill out grandpa.
You’ve posted this meme 57 times already. Chill out grandpa.
Jeremy Stephens before bashing Fox can you post any stories that Fox had to correct and make a public apology? do you know of any Fox News Host that have been fired over #fakenews?  has Fox News ever been sued for #fakenews and lose as CNN has? " with court documents to prove it? "  case in point: https://www.scribd.com/document/339701870/Davide-Carbone-v-CNN  ( i'll wait )
Jeremy Stephens before bashing Fox can you post any stories that Fox had to correct and make a public apology? do you know of any Fox News Host that have been fired over #fakenews?  has Fox News ever been sued for #fakenews and lose as CNN has? " with court documents to prove it? "  case in point: https://www.scribd.com/document/339701870/Davide-Carbone-v-CNN  ( i'll wait )
Mario Salerno definitely saving it from the Democrats trying to destroy it
Mario Salerno definitely saving it from the Democrats trying to destroy it
Mario Salerno Obama created policy that protected Americans from 5 most dangerous countries. Trump opened the boarder to them. Obama created policy to modernize the wall. Trump caged babies. Never forget 9-11 16 terrorists were Saudi. They were Saudi trained. They were Saudi financed. ZERO were Mexican. Zero arrived from Mexico. Zero would have been stopped by a idiotic wall! This man tRump and his son-in-law just sold $billion weapons to the only people, the Saudis, who've attacked America. Trump and GOP just allowed the Saudi Prince to murder and dismember Khashoggi. Makes you think.
Mario Salerno Obama created policy that protected Americans from 5 most dangerous countries. Trump opened the boarder to them. Obama created policy to modernize the wall. Trump caged babies. Never forget 9-11 16 terrorists were Saudi. They were Saudi trained. They were Saudi financed. ZERO were Mexican. Zero arrived from Mexico. Zero would have been stopped by a idiotic wall! This man tRump and his son-in-law just sold $billion weapons to the only people, the Saudis, who've attacked America. Trump and GOP just allowed the Saudi Prince to murder and dismember Khashoggi. Makes you think.
Jennifer Myers his verifiable completed campaign promises to his voters says otherwise and proves you're only using your own hate/bias as your facts. :)
Jennifer Myers his verifiable completed campaign promises to his voters says otherwise and proves you're only using your own hate/bias as your facts. :)
I'd ask you what he is saving the country from.. but then you would list a bunch of proven wrong talking points from FOX news or Rush Limbaugh. No point in arguing with a brick.
I'd ask you what he is saving the country from.. but then you would list a bunch of proven wrong talking points from FOX news or Rush Limbaugh. No point in arguing with a brick.
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
Mario Salerno he’s destroying this country! Trumpets are such idiots
Mario Salerno he’s destroying this country! Trumpets are such idiots
Kathy A Norton did you forget hillary started that mess?
Jeremy Stephens   You mean like "Mexico will pay for the wall"? Oh wait, that's right, the new NAFTA deal will pay for it! LOL! Still chuckling over that one!
Jeremy Stephens   You mean like "Mexico will pay for the wall"? Oh wait, that's right, the new NAFTA deal will pay for it! LOL! Still chuckling over that one!
Mark Hack you're correct, FOX ENTERTAINMENT news has never retracted the "Pizzagate" story or "that Obama wasn't born in the USA" or "that Obama was coming for your guns" or "FEMA camps"! FOX is NOT a NEWS program the CEO of FOX said "they are an ENTERTAINMENT PROGRAM!"
Mark Hack you're correct, FOX ENTERTAINMENT news has never retracted the "Pizzagate" story or "that Obama wasn't born in the USA" or "that Obama was coming for your guns" or "FEMA camps"! FOX is NOT a NEWS program the CEO of FOX said "they are an ENTERTAINMENT PROGRAM!"
Jeremy Stephens From leftist communist is what he saved this country from.  Old elitist and idiot ghetto queens are the only democrat base...all communist
April Foster all these anti-trump bashing points are starting to look like overused pickup lines...   Haven't seen the money we're now getting from Mexico that we NEVER saw before in trade? " it's peanuts compared to what he is asking for the wall "   Big changes for cars. The goal of the new deal is to have more cars and truck parts made in North America. Starting in 2020, to qualify for zero tariffs, a car or truck must have 75 percent of its components manufactured in Canada, Mexico or the United States, a substantial boost from the current 62.5 percent requirement.  There’s also a new rule that a significant percentage of the work done on the car must be completed by workers earning at least $16 an hour, or about three times what the typical Mexican autoworker makes. Starting in 2020, cars and trucks should have at least 30 percent of the work on the vehicle done by workers earning $16 an hour. That gradually moves up to 40 percent for cars by 2023.  While many economists think these new rules will help some North American workers, they also warn that car prices might rise and some small cars may no longer be made in North America because they would be too expensive under the new requirements. There are also concerns that automakers might not make as many cars in North America to export to China and elsewhere overseas because costs would be higher in the USMCA region than making the vehicles in Asia.  Trump’s victory: Canada opens up its milk market to U.S. farmers. Trump tweeted often about how unfair he thought it was that Canada charged such high tariffs on U.S. dairy products. Canada has a complex milk and dairy system. To ensure Canadian dairy farmers don’t go bankrupt, the Canadian government restricts how much dairy can be produced in the country and how much foreign dairy can enter to keep milk prices high. Trump didn’t like that, and dairy was a major sticking point in the negotiations.  In the end, Canada is keeping most of its complex system in place, but it is giving greater market share to U.S. dairy farmers. U.S. negotiators say they got a major victory by forcing Canada to eliminate the pricing scheme for what are known as Class 7 dairy products. That means U.S. dairy farmers can probably send a lot more milk protein concentrate, skim milk powder and infant formula to Canada (and those products are relatively easy to transport and store).  Canada’s victory: Chapter 19, allowing for a special dispute process, stays intact. Canadian Prime Minister Justin Trudeau said repeatedly that he wanted to keep Chapter 19 in place, and that’s exactly what happened. The U.S. side pushed hard to eliminate this chapter, but in the end, it stayed.  Chapter 19 allows Canada, Mexico and the United States to challenge one another’s anti-dumping and countervailing duties in front of a panel of representatives from each country. This is generally a much easier process than trying to challenge a trade practice in a U.S. court. Over the years, Canada has successfully used Chapter 19 to challenge the United States on its softwood lumber restrictions.  Mexico and Canada get assurance Trump won’t pound them with auto tariffs. Trump has repeatedly threatened to slap hefty tariffs on car and vehicle parts coming from overseas into the United States. Along with the new trade deal, his administration signed “side letters” allowing the two nations to mostly dodge Trump’s auto tariffs.  The side letters say Canada and Mexico can continue sending about the same vehicles and parts across the border free of charge, regardless of whether auto tariffs go into effect down the road. Only parts above that quota could face tariffs.  Trump’s steel tariffs stay in place (for now). Canada wanted Trump to stop his 25 percent tariffs on Canadian steel. That didn’t happen — yet. The two countries are still discussing lifting those tariffs, but a senior White House official said Sunday that process is on a “completely separate track.” Trudeau has called the steel tariffs “insulting and unacceptable” because the two nations are such close allies.  Improved labor and environmental rights. The USMCA makes a number of significant upgrades to environmental and labor regulations, especially regarding Mexico. For example, the USMCA stipulates that Mexican trucks that cross the border into the United States must meet higher safety regulations and that Mexican workers must have more ability to organize and form unions. Some of these provisions might be difficult to enforce, but the Trump administration says it is committed to ensuring these happen — a reason U.S. labor unions and some Democrats are cheering the new rules.  Increased intellectual property protections. The new IP chapter is 63 pages and contains more-stringent protections for patents and trademarks, including for biotech, financial services and even domain names. Many business leaders and legal experts believed these updates were necessary given that the original agreement was negotiated 25 years ago.  Big drug companies gain more footing in Canada. U.S. drug companies will now be able to sell pharmaceuticals in Canada for 10 years before facing generic competition. That’s up from eight years of so-called “market protection” now.  Deal must be reviewed after 6 years. The USMCA stipulates that the three nations will review the agreement after six years. If all parties agree it’s still good, then the deal will continue for the full 16 year period (with the ability to renew after that for another 16 years). This was a compromise provision: Trump wanted ability to renegotiate the deal frequently. Ultimately, there will be a review, but it won’t happen until after Trump leaves office.  Chapter 11, giving investors a special way to fight government decisions, is (mostly) gone. Chapter 11 is eliminated entirely for Canada and mostly for Mexico, except for some key industries such as energy and telecommunications. Chapter 11 gave companies and investors a special process to resolve disputes with one of the governments in NAFTA. The idea was that if investors put a lot of money into a project and then the government changed the rules, there was a clear dispute process — outside the court system — where investors could get their problem resolved.  Critics argue that Chapter 11 was mainly used as a way for big corporations to get taxpayer money, but businesses say it was necessary to ensure they weren’t harmed by sudden changes when new governments came into power in Mexico, Canada or the United States. In the end, Chapter 11 is mostly gone, except for a few key industries, such as oil, that lobbied hard to be able to challenge the Mexican government if it changes the rules and tries to nationalize its energy sector again.  Source: WP... https://www.washingtonpost.com/business/2018/10/01/us-canada-mexico-just-reached-sweeping-new-nafta-deal-heres-whats-it/  you're welcome. :)
April Foster all these anti-trump bashing points are starting to look like overused pickup lines...   Haven't seen the money we're now getting from Mexico that we NEVER saw before in trade? " it's peanuts compared to what he is asking for the wall "   Big changes for cars. The goal of the new deal is to have more cars and truck parts made in North America. Starting in 2020, to qualify for zero tariffs, a car or truck must have 75 percent of its components manufactured in Canada, Mexico or the United States, a substantial boost from the current 62.5 percent requirement.  There’s also a new rule that a significant percentage of the work done on the car must be completed by workers earning at least $16 an hour, or about three times what the typical Mexican autoworker makes. Starting in 2020, cars and trucks should have at least 30 percent of the work on the vehicle done by workers earning $16 an hour. That gradually moves up to 40 percent for cars by 2023.  While many economists think these new rules will help some North American workers, they also warn that car prices might rise and some small cars may no longer be made in North America because they would be too expensive under the new requirements. There are also concerns that automakers might not make as many cars in North America to export to China and elsewhere overseas because costs would be higher in the USMCA region than making the vehicles in Asia.  Trump’s victory: Canada opens up its milk market to U.S. farmers. Trump tweeted often about how unfair he thought it was that Canada charged such high tariffs on U.S. dairy products. Canada has a complex milk and dairy system. To ensure Canadian dairy farmers don’t go bankrupt, the Canadian government restricts how much dairy can be produced in the country and how much foreign dairy can enter to keep milk prices high. Trump didn’t like that, and dairy was a major sticking point in the negotiations.  In the end, Canada is keeping most of its complex system in place, but it is giving greater market share to U.S. dairy farmers. U.S. negotiators say they got a major victory by forcing Canada to eliminate the pricing scheme for what are known as Class 7 dairy products. That means U.S. dairy farmers can probably send a lot more milk protein concentrate, skim milk powder and infant formula to Canada (and those products are relatively easy to transport and store).  Canada’s victory: Chapter 19, allowing for a special dispute process, stays intact. Canadian Prime Minister Justin Trudeau said repeatedly that he wanted to keep Chapter 19 in place, and that’s exactly what happened. The U.S. side pushed hard to eliminate this chapter, but in the end, it stayed.  Chapter 19 allows Canada, Mexico and the United States to challenge one another’s anti-dumping and countervailing duties in front of a panel of representatives from each country. This is generally a much easier process than trying to challenge a trade practice in a U.S. court. Over the years, Canada has successfully used Chapter 19 to challenge the United States on its softwood lumber restrictions.  Mexico and Canada get assurance Trump won’t pound them with auto tariffs. Trump has repeatedly threatened to slap hefty tariffs on car and vehicle parts coming from overseas into the United States. Along with the new trade deal, his administration signed “side letters” allowing the two nations to mostly dodge Trump’s auto tariffs.  The side letters say Canada and Mexico can continue sending about the same vehicles and parts across the border free of charge, regardless of whether auto tariffs go into effect down the road. Only parts above that quota could face tariffs.  Trump’s steel tariffs stay in place (for now). Canada wanted Trump to stop his 25 percent tariffs on Canadian steel. That didn’t happen — yet. The two countries are still discussing lifting those tariffs, but a senior White House official said Sunday that process is on a “completely separate track.” Trudeau has called the steel tariffs “insulting and unacceptable” because the two nations are such close allies.  Improved labor and environmental rights. The USMCA makes a number of significant upgrades to environmental and labor regulations, especially regarding Mexico. For example, the USMCA stipulates that Mexican trucks that cross the border into the United States must meet higher safety regulations and that Mexican workers must have more ability to organize and form unions. Some of these provisions might be difficult to enforce, but the Trump administration says it is committed to ensuring these happen — a reason U.S. labor unions and some Democrats are cheering the new rules.  Increased intellectual property protections. The new IP chapter is 63 pages and contains more-stringent protections for patents and trademarks, including for biotech, financial services and even domain names. Many business leaders and legal experts believed these updates were necessary given that the original agreement was negotiated 25 years ago.  Big drug companies gain more footing in Canada. U.S. drug companies will now be able to sell pharmaceuticals in Canada for 10 years before facing generic competition. That’s up from eight years of so-called “market protection” now.  Deal must be reviewed after 6 years. The USMCA stipulates that the three nations will review the agreement after six years. If all parties agree it’s still good, then the deal will continue for the full 16 year period (with the ability to renew after that for another 16 years). This was a compromise provision: Trump wanted ability to renegotiate the deal frequently. Ultimately, there will be a review, but it won’t happen until after Trump leaves office.  Chapter 11, giving investors a special way to fight government decisions, is (mostly) gone. Chapter 11 is eliminated entirely for Canada and mostly for Mexico, except for some key industries such as energy and telecommunications. Chapter 11 gave companies and investors a special process to resolve disputes with one of the governments in NAFTA. The idea was that if investors put a lot of money into a project and then the government changed the rules, there was a clear dispute process — outside the court system — where investors could get their problem resolved.  Critics argue that Chapter 11 was mainly used as a way for big corporations to get taxpayer money, but businesses say it was necessary to ensure they weren’t harmed by sudden changes when new governments came into power in Mexico, Canada or the United States. In the end, Chapter 11 is mostly gone, except for a few key industries, such as oil, that lobbied hard to be able to challenge the Mexican government if it changes the rules and tries to nationalize its energy sector again.  Source: WP... https://www.washingtonpost.com/business/2018/10/01/us-canada-mexico-just-reached-sweeping-new-nafta-deal-heres-whats-it/  you're welcome. :)
Mario Salerno saving how?
Mario Salerno saving how?
Jeremy Stephens he promised y'all a wall and promised Mexico would pay for it. Explain that sir
Jeremy Stephens he promised y'all a wall and promised Mexico would pay for it. Explain that sir
Jennifer Myers  Get a job Commie and enjoy the benefits of OUR Great President, you're a commie obviously.
Jeremy Stephens North Korea, the country that made nuclear threats towards the USA. But obama never had the guts to start a dialogue with them. CNN never told you that.
Jeremy Stephens North Korea, the country that made nuclear threats towards the USA. But obama never had the guts to start a dialogue with them. CNN never told you that.
True, Presidents Trumps 289 accomplishments since the election has restored America to greatness. Let’s not overlook the fact that the world is a safer place since Trump started denuclearization talks with North Korea. No more missiles flying, and North - South Korea in peace talks. The economy booming, millions of jobs, 4 million fewer people on food stamps. Americans can have pride once again, after being ashamed and embarrassed by obama for 8 years.
True, Presidents Trumps 289 accomplishments since the election has restored America to greatness. Let’s not overlook the fact that the world is a safer place since Trump started denuclearization talks with North Korea. No more missiles flying, and North - South Korea in peace talks. The economy booming, millions of jobs, 4 million fewer people on food stamps. Americans can have pride once again, after being ashamed and embarrassed by obama for 8 years.
Kathy A Norton yeah, let's take data from a biased anti-trump network that has been busted for lying many times.   love your logic and source of facts. they match up well. :)
Mark Hack  https://www.politifact.com/punditfact/tv/fox/ Here you go. And a bunch of other half truths and lies!
Mark Hack  https://www.politifact.com/punditfact/tv/fox/ Here you go. And a bunch of other half truths and lies!
Yall are all over the place with this 🤦
Kathy A Norton keep up with your fake headlines with zero proof... it worked out well in the last election. i'm sure Trump thanks you for his 2020 support. :)
Kathy A Norton keep up with your fake headlines with zero proof... it worked out well in the last election. i'm sure Trump thanks you for his 2020 support. :)
Mark Hack did he bring HIS and his families businesses to the USA?  NO, they are still in China and other Asian countries!  But don't worry NONE of them are on the Tariffs list! Did Mexico agree to pay for the Wall?  Did Hillary go to jail? Did he sue those women who said he sexually assaulted them?  But trump followers don't care! They think they're making more money  , and money is all they care about!
Mark Hack did he bring HIS and his families businesses to the USA?  NO, they are still in China and other Asian countries!  But don't worry NONE of them are on the Tariffs list! Did Mexico agree to pay for the Wall?  Did Hillary go to jail? Did he sue those women who said he sexually assaulted them?  But trump followers don't care! They think they're making more money  , and money is all they care about!
Victoria A. Deobald America is hated around the world honey.... And do you know why??
Victoria A. Deobald America is hated around the world honey.... And do you know why??
Kathy A Norton why have you not listed these stories yet? making bs up?  can you prove any lies? i have not seen one lie to turn out to be true in over two years of research. most people just try to use the complete BS on the NY Times like the " definitive list of Trump lies " that's labeled an opinion piece so they don't get sued for FAKENEWS like CNN did and LOST.    but i'd like to see what makes you think he is lying to his voters. his completed campaign promises to date kinda prove otherwise.
Kathy A Norton why have you not listed these stories yet? making bs up?  can you prove any lies? i have not seen one lie to turn out to be true in over two years of research. most people just try to use the complete BS on the NY Times like the " definitive list of Trump lies " that's labeled an opinion piece so they don't get sued for FAKENEWS like CNN did and LOST.    but i'd like to see what makes you think he is lying to his voters. his completed campaign promises to date kinda prove otherwise.
Mark Hack so you STILL believe the pathological liar in the WH??
Mark Hack so you STILL believe the pathological liar in the WH??
Kathy A Norton everything else you stated is complete political bs.   please link these stories if they're real?
Kathy A Norton everything else you stated is complete political bs.   please link these stories if they're real?
April Foster lmaooo u and ur misinformation. Obama #DID want to have dialogue with him. Lmaoooo its funny ppl praised trump for talking to him, but when President obama tried he was condemned. U all are hypocrites https://www.cnn.com/videos/politics/2018/06/12/fox-news-obama-trump-coverage.cnn
Mark Hack Apart from THAT, it's common knowledge Hannity and Orange have a night call where they make up their daily "news" for you to gobble up... BTW they're BOTH  under several investigations... https://www.thedailybeast.com/report-trump-and-hannity-have-a-bedtime-phone-call-most-nights
Mark Hack YES, Fox was sued for constantly spreading lies, back in 2004. Fox won because it was registered as ENTERTAINMENT so they could say whatever they wanted to without being liable. YES, you are watching an ENTERTAINMENT channel... https://www.dailykos.com/stories/2017/1/14/1620475/-Fox-News-Is-NOT-News-Network-s-Own-Ads-Label-Its-Programming-As-Entertainment
Mark Hack YES, Fox was sued for constantly spreading lies, back in 2004. Fox won because it was registered as ENTERTAINMENT so they could say whatever they wanted to without being liable. YES, you are watching an ENTERTAINMENT channel... https://www.dailykos.com/stories/2017/1/14/1620475/-Fox-News-Is-NOT-News-Network-s-Own-Ads-Label-Its-Programming-As-Entertainment
Mike Lee Limmer how many test have NK done since 2016?
i can hear your google humming... 😂💯
Rick Voss Obama quickly, but not soon enough, that the Kim family is not to trusted. Trump hasn't figured that out yet. Perhaps Fox and Brietbart forgot to mention it to their audiences, but NK is continuing to build and develop missiles and nukes. All Kim has to do is to continue to send Trump love letters.
Rick Voss Obama quickly, but not soon enough, that the Kim family is not to trusted. Trump hasn't figured that out yet. Perhaps Fox and Brietbart forgot to mention it to their audiences, but NK is continuing to build and develop missiles and nukes. All Kim has to do is to continue to send Trump love letters.
Kathy A Norton why do you keep defecting and not posting the stories you say are out there? you keep trying to change the topic when called out to prove something. 😂
Kathy A Norton i like real facts. PRO TIP: media headlines are not facts...
Kathy A Norton and how many of those lies have they publicly corrected or have been sued for?  " if they're real and really matter there would be court documents "  like we see for CNN and many other liberal media outlets like the one you're using as a source. 😂
Mark Hack anything not spoken by trump or conservative Talking Heads is a lie according to trump brainwashed cult followers!
Ha if only it were true that's just a bunch of bs
Jennifer Myers very untrue
Jeremy Stephens I would guarantee every bit of your hate for him comes from liberal media outlets and their lies. Who has proven what wrong?? You don't want to debate because a brick could prove you to be a imbecile.
Mark Hack But what are you saying, that there AREN'T 17 investigations into Orange? Coz i tell you, there really ARE... https://www.wired.com/story/mueller-investigation-trump-russia-complete-guide/
thanks for saving the country
thanks for saving the country
Dave Boyer 😂🤣😅🤣
https://newspunch.com/obama-and-clinton-voted-for-a-us-mexico-border-wall-in-2006/
https://newspunch.com/obama-and-clinton-voted-for-a-us-mexico-border-wall-in-2006/
Hahahaha!
Hahahaha!
Our President Donald Trump is the best President ever
Our President Donald Trump is the best President ever
Impeach the mother f*cker! #JustDoIt✅
Impeach the mother f*cker! #JustDoIt✅
"If we don’t defend our Constitution, then we cease to be a nation. I suck big league!"~Donnie J. Rump~
"If we don’t defend our Constitution, then we cease to be a nation. I suck big league!"~Donnie J. Rump~
If he uses executive order....the first time a Democrat takes office they'll knock down the wall. In the same way President Trump has already reversed EVERYTHING that b!tch obuma did.
If he uses executive order....the first time a Democrat takes office they'll knock down the wall. In the same way President Trump has already reversed EVERYTHING that b!tch obuma did.
Dave Boyer timing is everything
https://www.cnsnews.com/blog/craig-bannister/senator-obama-called-undocumented-migrants-illegal-immigrants-illegals
https://www.cnsnews.com/blog/craig-bannister/senator-obama-called-undocumented-migrants-illegal-immigrants-illegals
https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.mcclatchydc.com/news/politics-government/white-house/article213525764.html
https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.mcclatchydc.com/news/politics-government/white-house/article213525764.html
Dave Boyer , the hospital uses tax write offs on nonpayment of bills. You probably didn't deserve a raise.
Dave Boyer , hey dumb ass, Congress can overturn an executive order. If he vetoes, Congress needes 2/3 votes to override his veto. Get educated before you open your pie hole.
Mik Dundee my wife worked at a hospital and didnt receive a raise for 5 long years because of illegal immigrants not paying their bills. That's how.
Mik Dundee my wife worked at a hospital and didnt receive a raise for 5 long years because of illegal immigrants not paying their bills. That's how.
Dave Boyer this is not a dictatorship. Trump cannot build his wall by the issuance of an executive order. He cannot raise or lower taxes. He cannot write laws. Congress under Republican control passed what he wanted for a tax cut. But even McConnell and Ryan did not get him his wall. They had the power, but did not. Because they did not want the wall.  Only Trump wants a wall, with his name on it. And he will starve good government employees and the country's poor retirees to get his way. How can you support that?
Dave Boyer this is not a dictatorship. Trump cannot build his wall by the issuance of an executive order. He cannot raise or lower taxes. He cannot write laws. Congress under Republican control passed what he wanted for a tax cut. But even McConnell and Ryan did not get him his wall. They had the power, but did not. Because they did not want the wall.  Only Trump wants a wall, with his name on it. And he will starve good government employees and the country's poor retirees to get his way. How can you support that?
Ruth Mosley I'm not going to stoop to your level
Ruth Mosley I'm not going to stoop to your level
Ruth Mosley r u
Dave Boyer Little Dummy, aren't you?
Dave Boyer Little Dummy, aren't you?
Ramon Soto why dont u go hang out on a Hillary site.
Ramon Soto why dont u go hang out on a Hillary site.

I still can’t get over this part: Michael Cohen paid the tech company for its campaign-related work with nearly $50,000 of CASH STUFFED IN A BAG.  Classic mob move.🙄
Dave Boyer your president needs you Immediatly Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go
Worley Michael comrade. I served my country. Did u?
No comrade Dave, here in this country we don’t allow the tyrant president to do end runs around congress.    We call that a coup, and we execute people for it.
Dave Boyer Donny is sealing his fate as a one-term president!  Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is his cost-ineffective wall.  Donny needs to agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so his shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
Dave Boyer calls like this, to bybass the Constitution of the United States are inappropriate.
Raul Andres Gonzalez Sr. Oh you mean pass the buck on to the tax pays ( you and me). Not to mention I said my wife. Apparently you cant pay attention. Guess you don't get a lot of raises.
Raul Andres Gonzalez Sr. Oh you mean pass the buck on to the tax pays ( you and me). Not to mention I said my wife. Apparently you cant pay attention. Guess you don't get a lot of raises.
Bill Miller you live in PA , what do you know about border life?? Nothing. Everyone on the border wants the wall, or a large percentage . Until you have lived in a border city you will never understand the impact so please spare us your uneducated opinion!
Bill Miller you live in PA , what do you know about border life?? Nothing. Everyone on the border wants the wall, or a large percentage . Until you have lived in a border city you will never understand the impact so please spare us your uneducated opinion!
I don't know Him Much Let Him do the right thing.
Dave Boyer You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress.
Dave Boyer You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress.
Bill Miller youncantbargue with ignorance
Veronica Torres fool
Dave Boyer why ? Like trump don’t Like hearing that you’re all stupid ?
Bill Miller Trump legally can build a wall all you have to do is declare martial law or a state of emergency and he is in charge of the defense department he is the commander and chief of all military branches in the United States. The money you ask he already has for the defense department from Congress last year. So he legally has the authority to build the wall without Congress.
Bill Miller Trump legally can build a wall all you have to do is declare martial law or a state of emergency and he is in charge of the defense department he is the commander and chief of all military branches in the United States. The money you ask he already has for the defense department from Congress last year. So he legally has the authority to build the wall without Congress.
So you're telling me that after all the bullshit about Obama bringing Sharia Law to America, you'd be okay with Trump declaring martial law over something as pointless as a border wall?
Ruth Mosley actually President Trump has the legal authority to build the wall all he hase  to do is to clear a state of emergency. Which he does not need Congress for and use the money from the defense department who do you think is in charge of the United States defense department? the president of the United States is the Commander in Chief of all our Armed Forces he already has the money in for the National Defense from last year. So legally he doesn't even need the Democratic party or congress once he declares martial law in a state of emergency down at the border which he legally can because it is a threat to all Americans the military will build the wall.
Ruth Mosley actually President Trump has the legal authority to build the wall all he hase  to do is to clear a state of emergency. Which he does not need Congress for and use the money from the defense department who do you think is in charge of the United States defense department? the president of the United States is the Commander in Chief of all our Armed Forces he already has the money in for the National Defense from last year. So legally he doesn't even need the Democratic party or congress once he declares martial law in a state of emergency down at the border which he legally can because it is a threat to all Americans the military will build the wall.
Dave Boyer 5 photos no friends fake account reported
Another fake account set up by the Kremlin!
Another fake account set up by the Kremlin!
Y all is 🐑
Lucky Barry Collins why?
Dave Boyer if he does it he will win a free ticket to impeachment!
Dave Boyer I see you done understand the way our government functions or our Constitution. 😂😂 I suppose your lack of knowledge comes in handy supporting Trump, though.
Dave...instantly someone who doesn’t have a dog in the fight has to throw their two cents in on your opinion. And to beat it all really thinks his opinion matters. That’s one of the things that’s wrong with this country.
Dave...instantly someone who doesn’t have a dog in the fight has to throw their two cents in on your opinion. And to beat it all really thinks his opinion matters. That’s one of the things that’s wrong with this country.
Dave Boyer  impeachment  just do it already!
Dave Boyer Executive Order,  dump as Trump
Kim Karauss its happening tomorrow
Too bad Putin is a really the one in control
After we do build that wall next will be term LIMITS. Poor Nancy and Charlie will have to get a job. Not steal from real Americans.
Veronica Torres nice shill account.
Build that wall Mr President. Only true patriotic American people understand its importance. God bless America.
Cheryl A Flood I know I dont like fat girls
Bill Westerlind more fake news
Troll, doesn't know a thing about American politics.
Executive order. Just do it Mr President
Executive order. Just do it Mr President
Robert White Obama created policy that protected Americans from 5 most dangerous countries. Trump opened the boarder to them. Obama created policy to modernize the wall. Trump caged babies. Never forget 9-11 16 terrorists were Saudi. They were Saudi trained. They were Saudi financed. ZERO were Mexican. Zero arrived from Mexico. Zero would have been stopped by a idiotic wall! This man tRump and his son-in-law just sold $billion weapons to the only people, the Saudis, who've attacked America. Trump and GOP just allowed the Saudi Prince to murder and dismember Khashoggi. Makes you think.
Robert White agree
Veronica Torres hispano lambeculo
Robert White asslicker
Robert White asslicker
The communist agitators are paid by the democrat communists criminals
The communist agitators are paid by the democrat communists criminals
Robert White dumbasses everywhere lol
Robert White your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go go
The shutdown is not protecting us. Our President is making our country weaker just to force a bill that could not pass, even with a Republican controlled congress. Turn off Fox.
The shutdown is not protecting us. Our President is making our country weaker just to force a bill that could not pass, even with a Republican controlled congress. Turn off Fox.
Climate change? On what do you base your fears on? Al Gore’s so called Science? The same science that can’t predict what the weather is going to be tomorrow? Or the same science that doesn’t acknowledge humans begin life at conception?
Anne Crossway you obviously don’t know the full spectrum of the word security. I suggest joining the military and learning 😂🤣 It’s called a deterrent. It’s not an end all solution, only part of the whole package (barrier, cameras, more personnel, equipment, etc...).  Democrats were all for a wall/barrier/fencing before, the ONLY reason they’re against it now is because of President Trump 🤷🏻‍♂️ The President can literally come out with the cure to cancer and the Dems would be against it 😂🤣 The President has and is still willing to compromise, like he did with DACA, and the Dems aren’t..... But isn’t that what our government is supposed to be, a compromise amongst a group of people? But the Dems don’t need to compromise?? Go back to the pastures with the rest of the sheep 🐑 😂🤣
Comrade Veronica seems confused.    Trump is Russia’s bitch, they are paying to help him.    Putin doesn’t want his cock holster out of the Oval Office.
Robert White Donny is sealing his fate as a one-term president!  Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is his cost-ineffective wall.  Donny needs to agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so his shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
Robert White Donny is sealing his fate as a one-term president!  Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is his cost-ineffective wall.  Donny needs to agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so his shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy
Robert White it’s bullshit.
Martha Pickens then not now.
The border patrols are with the democratic party. We do not need a wall. New radio power will take care of it. See what is happen down under.  Let us take care of the caged children.
Charlie Daboub damn here I go again having to explain how the voting process works if a bill passes the House goes to Senate in the Senate the bill will needs 60 votes to pass and the majority only has 51 now can you figure out the answer as to how many more votes it will need to pass and from what side.
Charlie Daboub damn here I go again having to explain how the voting process works if a bill passes the House goes to Senate in the Senate the bill will needs 60 votes to pass and the majority only has 51 now can you figure out the answer as to how many more votes it will need to pass and from what side.
Florence Karfeld who knows best you or the border patrol that has their boots on the ground or maybe you know more than Mark Morgan who was the head of Border Patrol under Obama because he too says we need a wall.
Robert White are you really that stupid or you  just play stupid  on fb? Its not a theory #sillytrumptard
Your a poet and don’t know it!!  We also don’t need the wall. Worry  about underground roads with sleeping quarters. .
Your a poet and don’t know it!!  We also don’t need the wall. Worry  about underground roads with sleeping quarters. .
Robert, first uncage the kids.
Why don't you get a real job!
Robert White You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress.
Did you start the bonfire to burn the books yet?
sociopaths dont crack so he is not strong at all
Robert White he is a strong man. I would have cracked long ago. I am grateful that he stands his ground. He makes me proud to be an American.
Robert White poor walnut
Yes! Build the wall! You'll see the capability of these people to have tunnels and big enough ladders to cross over by the time finish the wall...
Yes! Build the wall! You'll see the capability of these people to have tunnels and big enough ladders to cross over by the time finish the wall...
Barf
Robert White protect us from what??!! In the last two years the largest most violent attack was by an American to Americans!!! What happened to the “scary immigrants “ that were on their way to rape and pillage prior to November elections??? Crickets... because as usual trump uses alternative facts and fear to rally people like yourself on board. Investigate on your own and then chime in trump has enough parrots within the senate!!
If the Russians controlled the President of the United States— what are things they would want him to do:  - shut down the U.S. Government   - ease sanctions, particularly key Putin associates   - undermine and propose pulling out of NATO  - disrupt U.S. allied relationships  - start disruptive trade wars   - discredit U.S. intelligence, law enforcement, and judicial systems   - fill the Government leadership with people who have no relevant experience, give them a mandate of dismantle and neglect, and throw in a healthy dash of graft and corruption  - pull out of Syria  - pull out of Afghanistan   - turn our back on the Ukraine   - turn our back on the Kurds   - support extreme white supremacy groups   - support Brexit and disrupt the EU  - undermine the free press  - undermine the U.S. electoral process  - destroy all records and keep secret the content of discussions from 5 in person meetings with trump since being elected   What else??
If the Russians controlled the President of the United States— what are things they would want him to do:  - shut down the U.S. Government   - ease sanctions, particularly key Putin associates   - undermine and propose pulling out of NATO  - disrupt U.S. allied relationships  - start disruptive trade wars   - discredit U.S. intelligence, law enforcement, and judicial systems   - fill the Government leadership with people who have no relevant experience, give them a mandate of dismantle and neglect, and throw in a healthy dash of graft and corruption  - pull out of Syria  - pull out of Afghanistan   - turn our back on the Ukraine   - turn our back on the Kurds   - support extreme white supremacy groups   - support Brexit and disrupt the EU  - undermine the free press  - undermine the U.S. electoral process  - destroy all records and keep secret the content of discussions from 5 in person meetings with trump since being elected   What else??
Never give in never give up Mr. President hold out for the wall that protects us all
Never give in never give up Mr. President hold out for the wall that protects us all
Some Rep gave theirs up but not one Dem .Their greedy and now we have MAXIPAD & BUGJUICE CORTEZ going to manage our money. They can't add 2x2 together.Maxipad paid her daughter 750,000 stuffing envelopes.We know if missing money where to look.
Some Rep gave theirs up but not one Dem .Their greedy and now we have MAXIPAD & BUGJUICE CORTEZ going to manage our money. They can't add 2x2 together.Maxipad paid her daughter 750,000 stuffing envelopes.We know if missing money where to look.
Kathleen Scott agreed
Kathleen Scott agreed
Kathleen Scott their salary from Congress is nothing compared to the money they get from their corrupt doing with lobbyists.
Samoan Dannielle stupidity at its finest.
Samoan Dannielle stupidity at its finest.
Addy Means Elizabeth Warren gave hers up! To a refugee/ asylum seeker foundation but she did give it up. SMH Right after she said Trump's shut down is keeping 800,000 Americans from being paid so I am donating my paycheck to illegals! OK how does that help Americans not getting paid??  They have lost their minds, or they have never really been heard before.
Kathleen Scott I would have to agree with that.
Kathleen Scott I would have to agree with that.
Addy Means , not true, there are a few Dem Senators that are donating their pay while the shutdown continues..... I support Trump 100%,  and just like there are some Republicans that need to go, there are some good Dem's, unfortunately Pelosi and Schumer are NOT!
Addy Means , not true, there are a few Dem Senators that are donating their pay while the shutdown continues..... I support Trump 100%,  and just like there are some Republicans that need to go, there are some good Dem's, unfortunately Pelosi and Schumer are NOT!
Kathleen Scott, Everyone, contact your representatives and email all of Congress to support “No Government No Pay Act of 2019.” Bill , to stop congress from getting paid in a shutdown going forward. They are the ONLY ones that should not be getting paid!.
Kathleen Scott, Everyone, contact your representatives and email all of Congress to support “No Government No Pay Act of 2019.” Bill , to stop congress from getting paid in a shutdown going forward. They are the ONLY ones that should not be getting paid!.
I TOTALLY AGREE. AND THEIR STAFF TOO.
Samoan Dannielle what  did  DEMS  ever  do...they  will  raise  your  taxes  and spend  the  money.    DEMS  are  the  ones  who  spent  the  Social  Security  funds  and  NEVER  put  it  back  in  the  budget.  The  TAX  CUTS  was  for  all  Americans....for  your  first  $25,000  you  are  not  taxed  plus  President  Trump  gave  Us  more  of  an exemption...PLUS  paychecks  sees  anywhere  from  20  to  100  dollars  more....
Samoan Dannielle what  did  DEMS  ever  do...they  will  raise  your  taxes  and spend  the  money.    DEMS  are  the  ones  who  spent  the  Social  Security  funds  and  NEVER  put  it  back  in  the  budget.  The  TAX  CUTS  was  for  all  Americans....for  your  first  $25,000  you  are  not  taxed  plus  President  Trump  gave  Us  more  of  an exemption...PLUS  paychecks  sees  anywhere  from  20  to  100  dollars  more....
Samoan Dannielle true
Samoan Dannielle true
James Kenney please know facts before posting. Trump's father gave him $1 million which he turned into $4 billion.  No flunky.   He is one of the most elite entrepreneurs in US history and an amazing negotiator.  Art of the deal -playing out for us since he stepped into the WH
James Kenney ya he's a billionaire that's can't add lol
You all think they get paid weekly, you are fools, they get paid once a year.
James Kenney Dude stop trolling. The man has billions. I’m quite sure he has a better grasp on numbers then your petulant self will.
James Kenney Dude stop trolling. The man has billions. I’m quite sure he has a better grasp on numbers then your petulant self will.
Kathleen Scott: Now you see just what has happened since we were reverted from a Republic (small less restrictive form of government) to a Democracy (large restrictive more expensive form of government that chisels away at or freedoms), which was not the original intentions of our Founding Forefathers.  Our Founding Forefathers gave us a republic and warned us, "If We Can Keep It".
Kathleen Scott: Now you see just what has happened since we were reverted from a Republic (small less restrictive form of government) to a Democracy (large restrictive more expensive form of government that chisels away at or freedoms), which was not the original intentions of our Founding Forefathers.  Our Founding Forefathers gave us a republic and warned us, "If We Can Keep It".
Kathleen Scott our guy Dan Crenshaw is an example of the kind of congressman all of your states should want. He literally refused his pay check until other government workers get paid. That's integrity.
Kathleen Scott our guy Dan Crenshaw is an example of the kind of congressman all of your states should want. He literally refused his pay check until other government workers get paid. That's integrity.
If government employees are not getting paid then we MUST with hold pay checks for Congress and Senate
If government employees are not getting paid then we MUST with hold pay checks for Congress and Senate
I think it's hilarious all you people are calling Paul delusional it's you liberals and democrats you people are delusional ones take a good look in the fucken mirror it would do yourselves a big favor to Just shut the fuckup
Stephen Pierson  U R A F*ING Communist!
Paul Howard your just a dumb ass with a dumb ass comment
https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/ppx7b9/a-brief-history-of-donald-trump-and-the-mafia
https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/ppx7b9/a-brief-history-of-donald-trump-and-the-mafia
Stephen Pierson really? #MAGA2020 hating the person responsible for actually doing things to strengthen our country, our economy,  our standing in the world that loser 44 flushed down the toilet. He is still #BestPresidentInYourLifeTime
Stephen Pierson really? #MAGA2020 hating the person responsible for actually doing things to strengthen our country, our economy,  our standing in the world that loser 44 flushed down the toilet. He is still #BestPresidentInYourLifeTime
Yeah. He's the best bullshit artist ever. Even his paintbrush is made from asshole hair.
Yeah. He's the best bullshit artist ever. Even his paintbrush is made from asshole hair.
Donald Trump is the best President ever
Donald Trump is the best President ever
Paul Howard https://www.theatlantic.com/ideas/archive/2019/01/trump-the-toddler-wants-a-wall/580021/
Matthew David Martin Truly on of the best refutations of liberalism I have ever read. Short, to the point, and informative.
Matthew David Martin Truly on of the best refutations of liberalism I have ever read. Short, to the point, and informative.
Paul Howard, hahahahahaha!
Paul Howard not mine... Reagan was 100x better and didn’t have to hurl insults at people like foul mouth Don
Paul Howard not mine... Reagan was 100x better and didn’t have to hurl insults at people like foul mouth Don
Marshall Madison I don't want to become a Demmocommunists, sorry. Got both eyes open!
Marshall Madison I don't want to become a Demmocommunists, sorry. Got both eyes open!
Marshall Madison #Trump2020 #MAGA.
Marshall Madison #Trump2020 #MAGA.
Ramon Soto left wing rag
Ramon Soto left wing rag
Paul Howard I feel bad for you people who inherently hate Democrats. You inherently hate over half the country you live in. So much so that your willing to say this person is the best president of your lifetime. Better then Regan? Better then Bill Clinton.. the last President to actually balance our budget? You should quit listening to the likes of Rush Limbaugh and Sean Hannity, they have poisoned your mind against our own country.
Paul Howard your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go
Anne Crossway  Your just a little snowflake and you're upset that Donald Trump is the greatest president we've ever had plain and simple! You just get the heck out of America and go back to where you came from!
Anne Crossway  Your just a little snowflake and you're upset that Donald Trump is the greatest president we've ever had plain and simple! You just get the heck out of America and go back to where you came from!
Paul Howard Trump 2020 = 20 Years for Obstruction + 20 Years for Treason!!!!
Paul Howard Trump 2020 = 20 Years for Obstruction + 20 Years for Treason!!!!
Paul Howard  He’s married to an illegal. Which of the criteria for the Einstein Visa did she meet??  🤔 https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/EB-1_visaen.wikipedia.org
Paul Howard LIE. Biggest crook and liar of a president in our history. Illegitimate president. Russia Russia Russia
Paul Howard yea best as in the the best russian asset ever place in the peoples  house! Treasonous
Paul Howard You support him at the expense of our nation.
Paul Howard stunod
Dean Rosser. Thanks man.  You're so wise to have said that.
Anne Crossway  not even close
Ramon Soto Vice??? ROFLMAO. Yep that’s a reputable source 😂😂😂😂😂
Paul Howard They are all going to be devastated when Trump wins again in 2020
Paul Howard They are all going to be devastated when Trump wins again in 2020
Sheila Lessing  🖕🏼
Joe Salvatore Carollo Demmocomunists seath with hatred for #TheBestPresidentInOurLifeTime I can't wait till #MAGA2020 becomes their new reality! Thank You Mr. President!
"F*** Donald Trump yea F*** Donald Trump" 😂😂 best song ever made
Paul Howard You Triggered the Liberal mental cases. Good job. Maga 2020.
Paul Howard You Triggered the Liberal mental cases. Good job. Maga 2020.
Thank you President Trump for protecting our Country.
Thank you President Trump for protecting our Country.
Ha more like #WorstPresidentInOurLifetime and #NewHitler
Ha more like #WorstPresidentInOurLifetime and #NewHitler
Paul Howard crackhead
Elisa Farina DiCarlo I hope you enjoy #MAGA2020 when #BestPresidentInYourLifeTime is still your President
Mary Lewis me too, he's a real leader and loves our country!
Ok I understand what you're saying Paul and I apologize because you have the right to your opinion just like I do mine. This doesn't change the way I feel about him but I will respect your opinion. However Lawrence I don't think you're all there yourself thanks and goodbye
Ok I understand what you're saying Paul and I apologize because you have the right to your opinion just like I do mine. This doesn't change the way I feel about him but I will respect your opinion. However Lawrence I don't think you're all there yourself thanks and goodbye
Maria Lopez Not even one of your friends say ,you are smart
Maria Lopez we care, just come here under due process and Support America. We really don't care where a person comes from, however we do care that they come here to join America not to change it suit their ways.
Yea that's all you selfish people care about money and yourselves. As long as you're wealthy no one else matters. Just forget about the imprisoned kids who were taken away from the families and all the families that were seperated in general. We are all humans. We all have feelings. Who cares where we come from. And some of you need to do your history lessons because we are all foreigners the only real "Americans" are the native americans who were here first. Thank you
Meredith Bogue he makes America richer. It's an investment I. Our future not foreigners
Thank you Mr. President. #BestPresidentInYourLifeTime
Thank you Mr. President. #BestPresidentInYourLifeTime
Paul Burton stricken 2 my story gay @ that 2!
Paul Burton stricken 2 my story gay @ that 2!
He won't Joseph his daughter in law was on Hannity last night & said so!!!
He won't Joseph his daughter in law was on Hannity last night & said so!!!
Lorrie Tracy, if Obama's a Muslim, I'm a Satanist.
Lorrie Tracy, if Obama's a Muslim, I'm a Satanist.
Paul Burton what was Muslim Obama excuse?
Paul Burton what was Muslim Obama excuse?
What if his bone spurs hurt?
What if his bone spurs hurt?
Roy Norwood, America's Last Line Of Defense is a liberal troll satire page, dummy, lmao!
Lorrie Tracy, English please
https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/ppx7b9/a-brief-history-of-donald-trump-and-the-mafia
https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/ppx7b9/a-brief-history-of-donald-trump-and-the-mafia
Paul Burton i c u r actually stupid! Put a fork in it !
Paul Burton i c u r actually stupid! Put a fork in it !
Joseph Mellone  Donny is sealing his fate as a one-term president!  Bwahahahahaha!!  Talk about obvious statements...EVERYONE agrees we need border security.  What we don’t need is his cost-ineffective wall.  Donny needs to agree to the bipartisan deal already passed by Congress so his shutdown does not completely destroy our economy.  Just give it up now and reopen our government!!!  Trump doubles down on border wall, as polls show voters turning against his shutdown strategy  https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-doubles-down-on-border-wall-as-polls-show-voters-turning-against-his-shutdown-strategy

Friends, please join Team Trump today... Let's be part our President's Team. Thank you.
Friends, please join Team Trump today... Let's be part our President's Team. Thank you.
Joseph Mellone you must have a paycheck coming in.
Anne Crossway you’re a special kind of stupid! Tell me how much Obama got for border security and where all those billions went? I’ll give you a hint, it was billions more than what trump is asking for and he will actually spend it on what it’s allotted for. Now I’ll wait!
Anne Crossway you’re a special kind of stupid! Tell me how much Obama got for border security and where all those billions went? I’ll give you a hint, it was billions more than what trump is asking for and he will actually spend it on what it’s allotted for. Now I’ll wait!
Joseph Mellone You realize that Trump could have built the wall over the last two years without ANY democrat support don’t you. The wall could be funded already and in progress.
Joseph Mellone your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go
Charlie Daboub  it could have if those Rinos such as,mccain werent such con artists
Charlie Daboub  it could have if those Rinos such as,mccain werent such con artists
Paul Burton whatever from the mouth of a gay- bald Peewee Herman- could possibly not be true?
Joseph Mellone you do have a point uugghh
Joseph Mellone you do have a point uugghh
Ellen Baskin your family profile picture is the reason why family members shouldn’t get married to each other and have offspring!   You disgusting 🐖
Joseph Mellone you must like children a lot
Joseph Mellone right on
Liberalism is a disease, treated as such!
Lorrie Tracy, once again, English please.
Don’t give in Mr President
Don’t give in Mr President
Meredith Bogue They make medicine for your problem..........Preparation "H"
Jonathan Schremp https://www.facebook.com/219730435104566/posts/561409630936643/
Jonathan Schremp ameen
Jonathan Schremp   Can you people find a little something more original to say than God Bless Donald Trump. That seems as though it’s about all you people have to say.  Find some reason why God shou
Jonathan Schremp something wrong with you
....McConnell, Graham, Romney, Cornyn, Burr, Cruz, Johnson and Thur's photo's are shown as though they were heroes - they are traitors.
#Russia's state TV reports that for the first time since 2014, the US is lifting sanctions from Russian companies [#Deripaska's Rusal et al.] The host laughs out loud about the Democrats not getting enough votes to block the effort, expresses hope that this is just the beginning.
Jonathan Schremp your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go
Jonathan Schremp your president needs you immediately Volunteer for the wall protect our borders give him your money Go go
Jonathan Schremp is that the pure white god
KEEP PRAYING TOGETHER  One Nation under God. Prayers, Praises & Faith. May God protect and guide our President! MAGA 2020
William French wow, I hope you never need God because this is honestly the best thing you can say to a person, trust me I know all too well. God bless America and God bless President Trump!!!!
yea hopefully god blesses you so you don't get sent to hell....
Which god are you thanking???
Jonathan Schremp God knows he's a lying, hypocritical, greedy, dumb ass.
Jonathan Schremp phuck trump
Jonathan Schremp God don't bless Corrupt Criminals Bigotic stupid Morons Kidnapper Racists KKK Members and Traitors Liars Bigotic Morons Pussy Grabber and Cheater and Bone Spurse  Proof : Read Bible Low Minded Trumpee  Unbelivable what naive uneducated Brainless People live in USA

Jonathan Schremp  do you think it’s strange that Trump didn’t get the wall funded over the last two years when the GOP controlled all 3 branches of the government? Now that he lost the House, now it’s a crisis. Don’t you think that is strange?
Jonathan Schremp God does not bless satan
Jonathan Schremp AMEN!
Jonathan Schremp  Speaking of defense-Trump’s choice of lawyers was bad. He would have been better off with Frito Pendejo.

https://www.facebook.com/photo.php?fbid=10217680344856468&set=a.1116241702314&type=3&theater
Jonathan Schremp poor walnut
God Bless you President Trump! 🇺🇸 🇺🇸 🇺🇸
God Bless you President Trump! 🇺🇸 🇺🇸 🇺🇸
https://www.facebook.com/theonlyrepublicant/photos/a.558776154266927/1567888923355640/?type=3&theater
https://www.facebook.com/theonlyrepublicant/photos/a.558776154266927/1567888923355640/?type=3&theater
That would have been Osama when he held office.
That would have been Osama when he held office.
Sarah Knutson we don’t like him we LOVE him
Sarah Knutson we don’t like him we LOVE him
Sarah Knutson shows how stupid you Canadians are
Sarah Knutson shows how stupid you Canadians are
Sarah, that's because you have the most basic idea of life wrong.  You say on your FB page that you believe in the basic goodness of people. You are young and havent got a grip on reality yet.  All leftists look at the world this way.  People are not all good.  Unfortunately many are evil.  That's why we need conservatives to do the work of protecting.  Your effeminate leftist men can't protect anything while wearing a dress.  Don't worry tho.  You've got men down here in the US protecting that chunk of ice you call Canada.
No we respect him
No we respect him
Mik Pell they never moved to Canada 😢
Jokes on you and your PM hoser.
Jokes on you and your PM hoser.
Jonathan Clyburn it’s reality. Democrats hate that. So weird how we haven’t heard from Isis, etc since barry left office.
Jonathan Clyburn it’s reality. Democrats hate that. So weird how we haven’t heard from Isis, etc since barry left office.
The US has been a laughing stock Trump is trying to fix it.  He is the first President  that isn't a puppet to all the bureaucrats.
The US has been a laughing stock Trump is trying to fix it.  He is the first President  that isn't a puppet to all the bureaucrats.
Great responses!!! Love my President Trump !!!! Maybe we might need to consider a wall on other borders as well like Canada since they hate us so much!!!
Great responses!!! Love my President Trump !!!! Maybe we might need to consider a wall on other borders as well like Canada since they hate us so much!!!
Your right not sure how they are stuck in his web of lies.
Your right not sure how they are stuck in his web of lies.
Diane Miller you do realise US meddling has helped cause the chaos in many European countries?
Diane Miller you do realise US meddling has helped cause the chaos in many European countries?
Sarah Knutson good thing Americans don't care what the rest of the world thinks
Sarah Knutson good thing Americans don't care what the rest of the world thinks
If America & President Trump is such a laughing stock then why in the hell do we waste money on helping everyone else all over the world???? Cry babies wouldn't survive that's why y'all need us more than we need you so stop calling us !!!!
If America & President Trump is such a laughing stock then why in the hell do we waste money on helping everyone else all over the world???? Cry babies wouldn't survive that's why y'all need us more than we need you so stop calling us !!!!
Sarah Knutson wrong! All french people admire your president. If you want to change, we give you Macron 😂
Sarah Knutson wrong! All french people admire your president. If you want to change, we give you Macron 😂
Sarah Knutson they are not laughing they  are crying because Trump evened the trading field and countries are not sucking Americans dry anymore.
Sarah Knutson they are not laughing they  are crying because Trump evened the trading field and countries are not sucking Americans dry anymore.
https://www-m.cnn.com/2019/01/16/politics/pence-isis-defeated/index.html?r=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.google.com%2F  Haven't heard from ISIS?
Kingsley Medland And European meddling hasn't messed up the world in general?
Lisa hartel what were you babbling about? Spell check please. Something about democrats.
Lisa hartel what were you babbling about? Spell check please. Something about democrats.
Trump prevented Hillary from going into another country to destabilize it for Israeli commie interests. Hillary is no Christian American Patriot.
Trump prevented Hillary from going into another country to destabilize it for Israeli commie interests. Hillary is no Christian American Patriot.
Sarah Knutson Only 30% of the country likes this cocksucker. The rest of us have common sense
Sarah Knutson Only 30% of the country likes this cocksucker. The rest of us have common sense
Diane Miller hahaha you really think that?
Sarah Knutson what world do you live in...the world of fake news?
Rudy Giuliani says Trump didn't collude with Russia but can't say if campaign aides did  (CNN) Rudy Giuliani said Wednesday that he never denied President Donald Trump's campaign colluded with the Russian government during the 2016 campaign, only that the President himself was not involved in collusion.  In an interview with CNN's Chris Cuomo on "Cuomo Prime Time," Giuliani, a former New York mayor and Trump's attorney, said he doesn't know if other people in the campaign, including former campaign chairman Paul Manafort, were working with the Kremlin during the 2016 presidential race.  "I never said there was no collusion between the campaign, or people in the campaign," Giuliani said.  He added, "I said the President of the United States. There is not a single bit of evidence the President of the United States committed the only crime you can commit here, conspiring with the Russians to hack the DNC."
Sarah Knutson too many stupid people. He could piss in their faces and they still would feel blessed.
Sarah Knutson too many stupid people. He could piss in their faces and they still would feel blessed.
I wish that was true Tony I can use the money!!!
I wish that was true Tony I can use the money!!!
Sarah Knutson   Lol, this is hilarious coming from a brainwashed liberal Canuck.
Sarah Knutson   Lol, this is hilarious coming from a brainwashed liberal Canuck.
Debbie Hudson
Debbie Hudson
Victoria A deobald Trump is no Christian.
Victoria A deobald Trump is no Christian.
Sarah Knutson Please..can you think for yourself??  What has Trump done that you hate him so much?
Sarah Knutson it astounds me that somebody might like you! 🤦‍♂️. Rick
Sarah Knutson it astounds me that somebody might like you! 🤦‍♂️. Rick
Sarah Knutson I don't care what people all over the world think. I care about my country . How about the US stops sending money to other countries, let's see who will be laughing then ?
Sarah Knutson I don't care what people all over the world think. I care about my country . How about the US stops sending money to other countries, let's see who will be laughing then ?
Sarah.. WRONG.  Trump is well respected by world leaders unlike drunken HIllary or Ovomit.  You speak for yourself..nothing more.  MAKING AMERICA GREAT AGAIN1
Sarah.. WRONG.  Trump is well respected by world leaders unlike drunken HIllary or Ovomit.  You speak for yourself..nothing more.  MAKING AMERICA GREAT AGAIN1
Sarah Knutson , really??? How would you know that.CNN??? Lol You don't know what you are talking about
Sarah Knutson , really??? How would you know that.CNN??? Lol You don't know what you are talking about
you've your Own Crap to WORRY about...you might want to get to it!
you've your Own Crap to WORRY about...you might want to get to it!
Sarah Knutson I think that honour goes to Trudeau actually... Terrible deals, embarrassed in China, playing Mr. Dress up, and doing nothing but crying and apologizing.
Sarah Knutson I think that honour goes to Trudeau actually... Terrible deals, embarrassed in China, playing Mr. Dress up, and doing nothing but crying and apologizing.
For the love of heaven why don't u Trump haters turn your hate into support for the man who's trying to make decisions & pray he makes the right ones for the good of this country. That's what made this country great.!in God we trust & think positive instead of destroying the head.
For the love of heaven why don't u Trump haters turn your hate into support for the man who's trying to make decisions & pray he makes the right ones for the good of this country. That's what made this country great.!in God we trust & think positive instead of destroying the head.
Trudeau is your leader. He's a joke compared to Trump. Get lost.
Trudeau is your leader. He's a joke compared to Trump. Get lost.
Alexander James oh I'm sorry. Are we going back centuries or staying current? You go and read some books  soft lad...id say start with some history..id actually start with European as you have so little of your own.
Sarah Knutson it astounds me that someone might actually like you!  🤷‍♂️ Rick
Sarah Knutson it astounds me that someone might actually like you!  🤷‍♂️ Rick
OMG I would take Trump over your PM anyday!
OMG I would take Trump over your PM anyday!
Sarah Knutson BS...us 61 million are laughing at you
Sarah Knutson it always amazes me how people stick their two cents worth where it's not wanted nor do we care what you outside of the United states of America think. Worry about your country .
Sarah Knutson it always amazes me how people stick their two cents worth where it's not wanted nor do we care what you outside of the United states of America think. Worry about your country .
Too few understand and are unaware that the left is destabilizing the country for overthrow and subversion. Just today, rising democrat 'star" Beto O'Rourke stated that the US Constitution is an outdated document that should be replaced, and Elizabeth Warren said that the electoral college should be destroyed and replaced by mob rule (aka democracy). In 1958 an FBI agent wrote a book called 'The Naked Communist'. In this book he listed 45 communist goals for overthrowing the United States. One of the rules was: "Instill the idea that the US Constitution is outdated and a product of it's time". This was written 60 years ago. This is why the left is trying to disarm patriots. Too few are understanding the big picture. The left is dismantling the USA and it will be replaced by a communist dictatorship.
Too few understand and are unaware that the left is destabilizing the country for overthrow and subversion. Just today, rising democrat 'star" Beto O'Rourke stated that the US Constitution is an outdated document that should be replaced, and Elizabeth Warren said that the electoral college should be destroyed and replaced by mob rule (aka democracy). In 1958 an FBI agent wrote a book called 'The Naked Communist'. In this book he listed 45 communist goals for overthrowing the United States. One of the rules was: "Instill the idea that the US Constitution is outdated and a product of it's time". This was written 60 years ago. This is why the left is trying to disarm patriots. Too few are understanding the big picture. The left is dismantling the USA and it will be replaced by a communist dictatorship.
Mik Pell normal, lefties are hypocrites and liars..   Bush 41: We have a border crisis. Clinton : We have a birder crisis. Bush 43: We have a birder crisis. Obama: We have a border crisis. HRC : We have a border crisis.   Trump : Let’s build a Wall and end the border crisis.  Media: OMG, Trump manufactured the crisis.
Mik Pell normal, lefties are hypocrites and liars..   Bush 41: We have a border crisis. Clinton : We have a birder crisis. Bush 43: We have a birder crisis. Obama: We have a border crisis. HRC : We have a border crisis.   Trump : Let’s build a Wall and end the border crisis.  Media: OMG, Trump manufactured the crisis.
Cecilia Rick Dorsey, Lisa Donmoyer, Phyllis Denning, Kingsley Medland, James Kenney, Stanley Hewell, Marie Coletta, Marc Alexander, SharonMarie Miller, Chis Horea, Merry Crisp Barrett, Jeff Gibson, Ricky Wilson, Chris Horner,  KREMLIN NAMES TRUMP EMPLOYEE OF THE MONTH  https://www.newyorker.com/humor/borowitz-report/kremlin-names-trump-employee-of-the-month?utm_medium=social&utm_brand=tny&mbid=social_facebook&utm_social-type=owned&utm_source=facebook .
Cecilia Rick Dorsey, Lisa Donmoyer, Phyllis Denning, Kingsley Medland, James Kenney, Stanley Hewell, Marie Coletta, Marc Alexander, SharonMarie Miller, Chis Horea, Merry Crisp Barrett, Jeff Gibson, Ricky Wilson, Chris Horner,  KREMLIN NAMES TRUMP EMPLOYEE OF THE MONTH  https://www.newyorker.com/humor/borowitz-report/kremlin-names-trump-employee-of-the-month?utm_medium=social&utm_brand=tny&mbid=social_facebook&utm_social-type=owned&utm_source=facebook .
Especially in Canada but id like to see all the out of works still support him :p
I think you're thinking of the last person to occupy the Oval Office.  He's the one who went around bowing and apologizing to everyone.
I think you're thinking of the last person to occupy the Oval Office.  He's the one who went around bowing and apologizing to everyone.
Sarah Knutson What ever you smoke is way way way to strong for you #remove Sarah
Sarah Knutson What ever you smoke is way way way to strong for you #remove Sarah
Sarah Knutson Trump supporters just laugh at you out of touch liberals .. ha ha ha.
Sarah Knutson Trump supporters just laugh at you out of touch liberals .. ha ha ha.
Sarah Knutson you have to be a citizen here to have any validity on what you comment. Bye 👋🏻
I can’t believe Carl Ostenderp is still peddling his leftist lunatic tripe.  LOL.  SO funny.
I can’t believe Carl Ostenderp is still peddling his leftist lunatic tripe.  LOL.  SO funny.
Wish we had him instead of our prime minister
Wish we had him instead of our prime minister
And she is a Canadian.
Eva-joy de Lestenac a chubby Canadian kid who has rich parents
Kingsley Medland like they don’t speak German?😂
Facebook said that it had identified two disinformation campaigns originating from #Russia — including one tied to an agency controlled by the Kremlin. The company said it deleted nearly 500 pages and accounts that had posted the misleading messages.-https://www.nytimes.com/2019/01/17/business/facebook-misinformation-russia.html
60% of republicunts love him and coincidentally 60% of republicunts are uneducated
60% of republicunts love him and coincidentally 60% of republicunts are uneducated
Victor Bare 👍👏😉 I would like to copy that.
If he is such a joke then why do so many countries want to make a deal with him?  The joke is on the Democratic Party. This is the first time in a long time our country looks and feels strong. The weak spots in our country are in the Democratic Party.  They care more about their political party than they do this country. We are all seeing clearly each and every day. Schumer, Pelosi and Warren will hand the election to President Trump because they hate him so bad they get nothing done.  Voters are watching them and laughing. Like Warren drinking a beer is going to get the Southern vote... That was pretty lame.
Sarah Knutson, you speak for the whole world, eh? 🤔
Sarah Knutson, you speak for the whole world, eh? 🤔
Randy Johnson if you think Hillary Clinton should have won then your an idiot.
Randy Johnson if you think Hillary Clinton should have won then your an idiot.
Sarah Knutson please read my reply again. Maybe you will learn something.
Sarah Knutson
Sarah Knutson if your talking about our President take your head out of your ass and don’t be astounded. He is making them pay their fair share . They are crying not laughing. You as a pathetic little American don’t understand that.
Tony Perez are you a kook . Not going to happen
Sarah Knutson as we see Canada is not America  we don't care about your  liberal crap. Oh and Canadian people come into America illegally all the time. So we probably need a wall up there also
Sarah Knutson as we see Canada is not America  we don't care about your  liberal crap. Oh and Canadian people come into America illegally all the time. So we probably need a wall up there also
Sarah it astounds me on who would want to go to Canada!!!!
Sarah it astounds me on who would want to go to Canada!!!!
Sarah Knutson. Your world
Sarah Knutson. Your world
Randy Johnson The uneducated garbage is really old. Evidently you don't know many educated people. There are plenty who support him because they don't like the thought of communism.
Tony Perez, your next crisis is trying to figure how to get over that wall.  LOL
Oh ok, kNUTson. You're the laughing stock of Edmonton, Alberta :)
Sarah Knutson finally have a president that cares about the security of the American people.  Democrats are a disgrace to this country!
Sarah Knutson finally have a president that cares about the security of the American people.  Democrats are a disgrace to this country!
Joani Pakula , it scares me how many are not aware of that document, or do not take it seriously. They are well on schedule with the plan. Populous MUST wake up before it's too late!
Joani Pakula , it scares me how many are not aware of that document, or do not take it seriously. They are well on schedule with the plan. Populous MUST wake up before it's too late!
and would love to meet my girls Diamond and Silk
and would love to meet my girls Diamond and Silk
This Man we call our President, has suffered more from people like you than any President of the United States of American ever should...   We do Love him and we love the fact he is going the job no other has ever done before.  We Will Stand together or Fall.  This is for U, President Donald J. Trump.  Amen
This Man we call our President, has suffered more from people like you than any President of the United States of American ever should...   We do Love him and we love the fact he is going the job no other has ever done before.  We Will Stand together or Fall.  This is for U, President Donald J. Trump.  Amen
Sarah Knutson,...hardly.  The world is coming to the realization that what Trump says makes sense.   Had to #WalkAway
James Kenney   Wind Bag
Ruth Mosley you’re gross. You might like that, don’t assume others do
Sarah Knutson: But it is alright in your eyes that your leader of Canada has allowed so many Terrorist affiliated and dangerous people into your country with open arms.  A government that has stripped you of your rights to bear arms in your homes to protect yourselves.  Thankfully here in the USA, we still have our 2nd Amendment Rights to bear arms.  Tune up your own country before you try to tune up ours.
Sarah Knutson: But it is alright in your eyes that your leader of Canada has allowed so many Terrorist affiliated and dangerous people into your country with open arms.  A government that has stripped you of your rights to bear arms in your homes to protect yourselves.  Thankfully here in the USA, we still have our 2nd Amendment Rights to bear arms.  Tune up your own country before you try to tune up ours.
It always astounds me so many US people actually like this man....he’s the laughing joke all over the world...
It always astounds me so many US people actually like this man....he’s the laughing joke all over the world...
Rod Novoa TDS has taken you. Only 6 more years.
Rod Novoa TDS has taken you. Only 6 more years.
Ryan Strickland ummmm.... Russia????
Ryan Strickland ummmm.... Russia????
Give one actual reason. Not your opinion but a undeniable fact that is ground for impeachment
Give one actual reason. Not your opinion but a undeniable fact that is ground for impeachment
Your brain needs to be removed it’s  A fraud
Your brain needs to be removed it’s  A fraud
Rod Novoa over 50% has to decide.
Rod Novoa over 50% has to decide.
Rod Novoa Of course you say that you’re from New York. Lip Tarde.
Rod Novoa anyone who disagrees with the wall will pay a fine, just kidding, that was Obama care
Rod Novoa anyone who disagrees with the wall will pay a fine, just kidding, that was Obama care
Rod Novoa awww you triggered & still beating the impeach drum? 😂😂😂
Rod Novoa awww you triggered & still beating the impeach drum? 😂😂😂
Shut up dummy. Trump is your commander in chief😀
Shut up dummy. Trump is your commander in chief😀
No proof. Just mad
No proof. Just mad
Rod Novoa You need to be removed from facebook😡😡😡😡😡boooh
Rod Novoa You need to be removed from facebook😡😡😡😡😡boooh
Josh Gr Are you seriously such a sad person that you are still blaming Russia for that L in 2016! What a loser haha
Josh Gr Are you seriously such a sad person that you are still blaming Russia for that L in 2016! What a loser haha
Rod Novoa dumb ass liberal. You want oppression and poverty
Rod Novoa dumb ass liberal. You want oppression and poverty
Trump’s “presidency” is a fraud 😂😂 I'm not a rocket scientist but I'm pretty sure Trump won the election fair and square.
Trump’s “presidency” is a fraud 😂😂 I'm not a rocket scientist but I'm pretty sure Trump won the election fair and square.
Still whining after two years. Lmao
Still whining after two years. Lmao
Almost 4 million jobs created since election.  More Americans are now employed than ever recorded before in our history.  We have created more than 400,000 manufacturing jobs since my election.  Manufacturing jobs growing at the fastest rate in more than THREE DECADES.  Economic growth last quarter hit 4.2 percent.  New unemployment claims recently hit a 49-year low.  Median household income has hit highest level ever recorded.  African-American unemployment has recently achieved the lowest rate ever recorded.  Hispanic-American unemployment is at the lowest rate ever recorded.  Asian-American unemployment recently achieved the lowest rate ever recorded.  Women’s unemployment recently reached the lowest rate in 65 years.  Youth unemployment has recently hit the lowest rate in nearly half a century.  Lowest unemployment rate ever recorded for Americans without a high school diploma.  Under Trump's Administration, veterans’ unemployment recently reached its lowest rate in nearly 20 years.  Almost 3.9 million Americans have been lifted off food stamps since the election.  The Pledge to America’s Workers has resulted in employers committing to train more than 4 million Americans. We are committed to VOCATIONAL education.  95 percent of U.S. manufacturers are optimistic about the future—the highest ever.  Retail sales surged last month, up another 6 percent over last year.  Signed the biggest package of tax cuts and reforms in history. After tax cuts, over $300 billion poured back in to the U.S. in the first quarter alone.  As a result of our tax bill, small businesses will have the lowest top marginal tax rate in more than 80 years.  Helped win U.S. bid for the 2028 Summer Olympics in Los Angeles.  Helped win U.S.-Mexico-Canada’s united bid for 2026 World Cup.  Opened ANWR and approved Keystone XL and Dakota Access Pipelines.  Record number of regulations eliminated.  Enacted regulatory relief for community banks and credit unions.  Obamacare individual mandate penalty GONE.  Trump Administration is providing more affordable healthcare options for Americans through association health plans and short-term duration plans.  Last month, the FDA approved more affordable generic drugs than ever before in history. And thanks to our efforts, many drug companies are freezing or reversing planned price increases.  We reformed the Medicare program to stop hospitals from overcharging low-income seniors on their drugs—saving seniors hundreds of millions of dollars this year alone.  Signed Right-To-Try legislation.  Secured $6 billion in NEW funding to fight the opioid epidemic.  We have reduced high-dose opioid prescriptions by 16 percent during my first year in office.  Signed VA Choice Act and VA Accountability Act, expanded VA telehealth services, walk-in-clinics, and same-day urgent primary and mental health care.  Increased our coal exports by 60 percent; U.S. oil production recently reached all-time high.  United States is a net natural gas exporter for the first time since 1957.  Withdrew the United States from the job-killing Paris Climate Accord.  Cancelled the illegal, anti-coal, so-called Clean Power Plan.  Secured record $700 billion in military funding; $716 billion next year.  NATO allies are spending $69 billion more on defense since 2016.  Process has begun to make the Space Force the 6th branch of the Armed Forces.  Confirmed more circuit court judges than any other new administration.  Confirmed Supreme Court Justice Neil Gorsuch and nominated Judge Brett Kavanaugh.  Withdrew from the horrible, one-sided Iran Deal.  Moved U.S. Embassy to Jerusalem.  Protecting Americans from terrorists with the Travel Ban, upheld by Supreme Court.  Issued Executive Order to keep open Guantanamo Bay.  Concluded a historic U.S.-Mexico Trade Deal to replace NAFTA. And negotiations with Canada are underway as we speak.  Reached a breakthrough agreement with the E.U. to increase U.S. exports.  Imposed tariffs on foreign steel and aluminum to protect our national security.  Imposed tariffs on China in response to China’s forced technology transfer, intellectual property theft, and their chronically abusive trade practices.  Net exports are on track to increase by $59 billion this year.  Improved vetting and screening for refugees, and switched focus to overseas resettlement.  We have begun BUILDING THE WALL. Republicans want STRONG BORDERS and NO CRIME. ~The White House
Here is what is fraud:  https://www.briansussman.com/politics/how-obamacare-became-law/
Here is what is fraud:  https://www.briansussman.com/politics/how-obamacare-became-law/
Rod Novoa BUILD THAT WALL
Rod Novoa BUILD THAT WALL
Yeah, good luck with that 😂
Yeah, good luck with that 😂
Rod Novoa  You're just another liberal puppet that's allowed the PATHETIC liberal media to "GIVE" you an opinion. Sad but true. This is why we call people like you sheep.
Rod Novoa  You're just another liberal puppet that's allowed the PATHETIC liberal media to "GIVE" you an opinion. Sad but true. This is why we call people like you sheep.
Rod Novoa should we send back the remain of our soldiers back to N Korea?
Rod Novoa should we send back the remain of our soldiers back to N Korea?
Rod Novoa would you also like gas to go back to 4 dollars a gallon as well?
Rod Novoa would you also like gas to go back to 4 dollars a gallon as well?
Josh Gr yeah we can talk about Russia 2.5 year long investigation with nothing to show for it aside from wasted money...but a wall is wasting money and republicans can’t do that. Only dumbass’s (Democrats) can waste America’s money.
Josh Gr yeah we can talk about Russia 2.5 year long investigation with nothing to show for it aside from wasted money...but a wall is wasting money and republicans can’t do that. Only dumbass’s (Democrats) can waste America’s money.
Rod Novoa  Trump 2020 re-elect that motherf--er.
https://www.cnsnews.com/blog/craig-bannister/senator-obama-called-undocumented-migrants-illegal-immigrants-illegals
https://www.cnsnews.com/blog/craig-bannister/senator-obama-called-undocumented-migrants-illegal-immigrants-illegals
He wants free stuff, not freedom. Typical
He wants free stuff, not freedom. Typical
ASS HOLE  YEA UUUU!!!
ASS HOLE  YEA UUUU!!!
Go play in traffic
Go play in traffic
YOU MUST BE A TERRY BEAN  SUPPORTER.....THAT  OBAMA HAND PICK TO WRITE THE BATHROOM LAW.....LOL
YOU MUST BE A TERRY BEAN  SUPPORTER.....THAT  OBAMA HAND PICK TO WRITE THE BATHROOM LAW.....LOL
Rod Novoa The president right before Trump was a fraud. He was illegitimate.
Rod Novoa The president right before Trump was a fraud. He was illegitimate.
Josh Gr Ummm ... like what about Russia??? Oh, you mean when HC sold Uranium to Russia?? Or maybe you mean when Russia was used in this admittedly fake dossier ?? 😂
Josh Gr Ummm ... like what about Russia??? Oh, you mean when HC sold Uranium to Russia?? Or maybe you mean when Russia was used in this admittedly fake dossier ?? 😂
How is it a fraud Rod?  Explain that to us.  Use words and explain it.
How is it a fraud Rod?  Explain that to us.  Use words and explain it.
Rod if you ever had any doubt if you are an ASSHOLE. I can confirm that you are an ASSHOLE. CONGRATULATIONS.
Rod if you ever had any doubt if you are an ASSHOLE. I can confirm that you are an ASSHOLE. CONGRATULATIONS.
Rod Novoa why
On what grounds and with what evidence? Hurting your feelings is not a good enough reason.
On what grounds and with what evidence? Hurting your feelings is not a good enough reason.
Ryan Strickland he can't .
Ryan Strickland he can't .
Rod Novoa Tell that to 63 million of your fellow citizens! Democrats are dangerous Socialists who’s goal is to tear this country down to its foundation. Old Pelosi and Schumer have been hijacked by left wing radical groups and are too stupid to notice!
Rod Novoa Tell that to 63 million of your fellow citizens! Democrats are dangerous Socialists who’s goal is to tear this country down to its foundation. Old Pelosi and Schumer have been hijacked by left wing radical groups and are too stupid to notice!
Says the window cleaner at Trump tower😂 Rod, you’re a true dumbass!!
Says the window cleaner at Trump tower😂 Rod, you’re a true dumbass!!
https://newspunch.com/obama-and-clinton-voted-for-a-us-mexico-border-wall-in-2006/
https://newspunch.com/obama-and-clinton-voted-for-a-us-mexico-border-wall-in-2006/
"Here's your sign"!
"Here's your sign"!
Rod Novoa how about you move to another country that would help.
Rod Novoa how about you move to another country that would help.
Rod Novoa should we raise the unemployment
Rod Novoa should we raise the unemployment
Rod is just another butt hurt a liberal
Rod is just another butt hurt a liberal
I DO BELIEVE YOU ARE A FRAUD...TROLL   But I see you are a New Yorker,,,so I guess that's why you're so deranged...poor guy.
Don Jared they didn't vote for a wall,they voted for strategic barriers moron. Furthermore walls don't work  https://www.usatoday.com/border-wall/story/drug-trafficking-smuggling-cartels-tunnels/559814001/
Don Jared they didn't vote for a wall,they voted for strategic barriers moron. Furthermore walls don't work  https://www.usatoday.com/border-wall/story/drug-trafficking-smuggling-cartels-tunnels/559814001/
Rod Novoa, would you like a tissue for your presidential issue?
Rod Novoa, would you like a tissue for your presidential issue?
Rod Novoa good luck with that.  Wont happen.  We love our President.
Rod Novoa good luck with that.  Wont happen.  We love our President.
Rod Novoa  And you Ol Rod man, are the biggest fool of all.
Rod Novoa  And you Ol Rod man, are the biggest fool of all.
How so, President Trump won the election according to the rules of the US Constitution.  He is delivering on his campaign promises as few president have done before him in spite of a coordinated and constant attack on him by the establishment in the DC government, the News media and the Entertainment Industry.  20 years from now he will be remembered as an effective president after all of the current rancor is forgotten.
How so, President Trump won the election according to the rules of the US Constitution.  He is delivering on his campaign promises as few president have done before him in spite of a coordinated and constant attack on him by the establishment in the DC government, the News media and the Entertainment Industry.  20 years from now he will be remembered as an effective president after all of the current rancor is forgotten.
#WALKAWAY
#WALKAWAY
Is there any better entertainment than pathetic crying libs?
Is there any better entertainment than pathetic crying libs?
You need to move to Canada.
You need to move to Canada.


Rod Novoa ,your mot American, so I suggest you move elsewhere, if you don't like him!!
Rod Novoa ,your mot American, so I suggest you move elsewhere, if you don't like him!!
Josh Gr , no, that was Hillary, giving 20% of our Uranium to Russia. Don’t you have enough to do in Canada having to deal with Trudope ruining your beautiful country?
Josh Gr , no, that was Hillary, giving 20% of our Uranium to Russia. Don’t you have enough to do in Canada having to deal with Trudope ruining your beautiful country?
Rod Novoa  amen
Rod Novoa  amen
ROD NOVOA... I voted for him and I for one support him... If you don't like the fact he is President that is fine. Get the facts straight though. Don't use such big words like FRAUD obviously you don't know the meaning.
ROD NOVOA... I voted for him and I for one support him... If you don't like the fact he is President that is fine. Get the facts straight though. Don't use such big words like FRAUD obviously you don't know the meaning.
https://www.usatoday.com/story/opinion/2017/11/27/clinton-ponders-2020-run-lets-not-forget-her-real-libya-scandal-glenn-reynolds-column/895853001/
https://www.usatoday.com/story/opinion/2017/11/27/clinton-ponders-2020-run-lets-not-forget-her-real-libya-scandal-glenn-reynolds-column/895853001/
Lmao #fakeoutrage
Lmao #fakeoutrage
Rod Novoa you’re a a fucking moron.
Rod Novoa you’re a a fucking moron.
Only people that don't like trump illegal aliens and their families, anyone losing their food stamps and have to go to work...
You can try and vote him out in 2020 if you so badly want to remove him.
You can try and vote him out in 2020 if you so badly want to remove him.
Rod Novoa Left wing morons like you are the real problem. Get a life. LOL
Rod Novoa Left wing morons like you are the real problem. Get a life. LOL
Chip Hughes was almost 6$ here😐
https://blackagendareport.com/obama_brought_slavery_to_libya
https://blackagendareport.com/obama_brought_slavery_to_libya
Rod Novoa you sound like an idiot
Rod Novoa you sound like an idiot
Rod Novoa lol you liberals are so scared that the president is and will continue to succeed. It proves you all are frauds, immature and liars. You will do and say anything to obstruct and smear him. All tp prove you werent wrong. Well....YOUVE FAILED !! And you look more foolish by the day with you childish tantrums as the president just keeps on winning for American citizens. So what exactly dont you like about a record economy and a record job market or the troops getting out of Afghanistan or peace talks with North Korea or Corporations deciding to build here and create jobs? Idiots.
Rod Novoa lol you liberals are so scared that the president is and will continue to succeed. It proves you all are frauds, immature and liars. You will do and say anything to obstruct and smear him. All tp prove you werent wrong. Well....YOUVE FAILED !! And you look more foolish by the day with you childish tantrums as the president just keeps on winning for American citizens. So what exactly dont you like about a record economy and a record job market or the troops getting out of Afghanistan or peace talks with North Korea or Corporations deciding to build here and create jobs? Idiots.
Give him a diapper that has the name Pelosi or Schumer on. But seriously Rod need urgent medication, he is suffering from TDS infection. A disease that when you change your thinking to Democrats, it can affect you within few minutes😂
Rod Novoa.  Trump is our PRESIDENT  !!!  Get over it already ...
Rod Novoa.  Trump is our PRESIDENT  !!!  Get over it already ...
Josh Gr Ignorance
Josh Gr Ignorance
Carol Zuback Alexander u must be one of the dumbocrats
Carol Zuback Alexander u must be one of the dumbocrats
Joel Nash...God bless you
Rod Novoa your stupid
Rod Novoa your stupid
Josh Gr no proof of collusion..... thank you, next!
Josh Gr no proof of collusion..... thank you, next!
Which part of "Donald Trump is a shifty piece of garbage" were you folks too stupid to comprehend?  https://aol.it/2syE6Zk
Which part of "Donald Trump is a shifty piece of garbage" were you folks too stupid to comprehend?  https://aol.it/2syE6Zk
Rod Novoa please go suck a bullet
Rod Novoa please go suck a bullet
Go back to your history books, or youtube and listen to Eisenhowers speech regarding the military industrial complex. Listen to the speech that killed Kennedy. And dont forget to look into the National Bank supposedly killing Lincoln for trying to break up the central banking, now known as the Federal Reserve. Did you know the Fed reserve is a private company? Who owns it? Do you know?
Go back to your history books, or youtube and listen to Eisenhowers speech regarding the military industrial complex. Listen to the speech that killed Kennedy. And dont forget to look into the National Bank supposedly killing Lincoln for trying to break up the central banking, now known as the Federal Reserve. Did you know the Fed reserve is a private company? Who owns it? Do you know?
You shouldn't listen to fake news it will make you say stupid things.
BUILD THE WALL!!
BUILD THE WALL!!
Rod Novoa considering  where u live your null & void!
Rod Novoa considering  where u live your null & void!
Rod Novoa kinda like your post there asswipe!!!
Rod Novoa it is people like you who are going to get the United States killed your ignorance is behooving
Rod Novoa it is people like you who are going to get the United States killed your ignorance is behooving
Rod Novoa what an idiotic statement.
Rod Novoa what an idiotic statement.
Rod Novoa He will be removed soon. This entire scenario is about him and to satisfy his base. The Democrats want border security too but the fool wants his stupid wall.
Rod Novoa He will be removed soon. This entire scenario is about him and to satisfy his base. The Democrats want border security too but the fool wants his stupid wall.
Rod Novoa so you don’t believe in the best boarder security?  Cause it should be barriers, manpower and end chain migration and loopholes, then maybe it will free up time to become LEGALIZED citizens.    Spoken from a Grandchild of spanish immigrants !!!!!
Rod Novoa so you don’t believe in the best boarder security?  Cause it should be barriers, manpower and end chain migration and loopholes, then maybe it will free up time to become LEGALIZED citizens.    Spoken from a Grandchild of spanish immigrants !!!!!
Rod Novoa typical liberal. Going off at the mouth about Trump with nothing to back it up. If you are so smart Rod, give us one law that it has been proven Trump broke that warrants impeachment. If you can’t provide that than SHUT THE FU@K UP YOU PUSSY SNOWFLAKE!
Novoa  ! Go  crawl  back  under  Pelosi’s dress  .
Novoa  ! Go  crawl  back  under  Pelosi’s dress  .
Are you just pissed off cuz you have to get a job to support yourself???????????
Are you just pissed off cuz you have to get a job to support yourself???????????
Derrick Wright A wall fine should be shoved down their throats just like Obamacare
Derrick Wright A wall fine should be shoved down their throats just like Obamacare
You are a disgrace.
You are a disgrace.
Rod Novoa so is your portfolio
Rod Novoa so is your portfolio
Oh how cute, Michael H. Witte thinks Trump is going to be on the ballot in 2020, lol.  Adorbs!!!
Oh how cute, Michael H. Witte thinks Trump is going to be on the ballot in 2020, lol.  Adorbs!!!
Keeping a campaign promise!!!!
Keeping a campaign promise!!!!
exactly what a pansy would say.
exactly what a pansy would say.
Josh Gr Russia is hoax perpetrated by the far left and fueled by the msm
Josh Gr Russia is hoax perpetrated by the far left and fueled by the msm
Josh Gr why you worrying about the USA when you are not even a citizen,
Don Jared not sure you are aware of this, but Hillary no longer holds office. So what have republicans done to correct this situation in the 2 years they have controlled all 3 branches? Or was that just fake moral outrage?
Don Jared not sure you are aware of this, but Hillary no longer holds office. So what have republicans done to correct this situation in the 2 years they have controlled all 3 branches? Or was that just fake moral outrage?
Don't worry only 5 more years to go snowflake
Don't worry only 5 more years to go snowflake
https://www.facebook.com/theonlyrepublicant/photos/a.558776154266927/1567888923355640/?type=3&theater
https://www.facebook.com/theonlyrepublicant/photos/a.558776154266927/1567888923355640/?type=3&theater
Joe Nash Glad to see you are in love with the traitor in chief...idiot
Joe Nash Glad to see you are in love with the traitor in chief...idiot
Joe Nash I read your recital.  The only problem with it is has no connection to reality whatsoever.  But your confident assertion of these prescribed lines precedes an inevitable resignation and probably some violence because people like you are confused.
Joe Nash I read your recital.  The only problem with it is has no connection to reality whatsoever.  But your confident assertion of these prescribed lines precedes an inevitable resignation and probably some violence because people like you are confused.
Rod Novoa it was Obama who was the fraud. Get off the soy. You have no rational reason to oppose Trump
Rod Novoa it was Obama who was the fraud. Get off the soy. You have no rational reason to oppose Trump
Rod Novoa you are a fake artist. Pay your taxes and pay bock your old student loans.
Rod Novoa you are a fake artist. Pay your taxes and pay bock your old student loans.
Hey moron you cant remove a president just because you don't like or agree with him, besides do you want illegals invading our country, if you do how about doing us all a favor and go to Mexico and support them. Its bad enough that Indians from India are taking over our hotels and convenient stores.. Build the wall Trump 2020...
Hey moron you cant remove a president just because you don't like or agree with him, besides do you want illegals invading our country, if you do how about doing us all a favor and go to Mexico and support them. Its bad enough that Indians from India are taking over our hotels and convenient stores.. Build the wall Trump 2020...
Another idiot lol
Another idiot lol
Rod Novoa Dude, I love the pics of half naked women on your Profile and the cool pic of you at the beach with no shirt on. Dude, you are sooooo cool!!!!! 😂😂😂. You’re such a hipster Douche. You personify what a hipster douche is 😂😂😂🙄🙄🙄
I hope that united states of america be peace
Rod Novoa who are you?  Are you even real? Please, if you are, FYI you are making a fool of yourself! 😂
Rod Novoa who are you?  Are you even real? Please, if you are, FYI you are making a fool of yourself! 😂
Joe Nash 20 years from now he will be remembered as the worst and the first criminal President in the White House.
Joe Nash 20 years from now he will be remembered as the worst and the first criminal President in the White House.
You are a Nim Rod!
You are a Nim Rod!
Sucking the Globalist off won't help you, there agenda 21 is world depopulation from 6-7B to 500M. Trump and Brexit are both massive 🖕 to the satanic elite
Rob Novoa which rock have you been under??  Citing on a February 2017 CIS analysis that used methods of the National Academies of Sciences, Engineering, and Medicine (NAS) Camarota begins diving into the numbers — and they are jarring. “(Based on the 2017 analysis) we estimate that each crosser creates a net cost of $74,722 (taxes paid minus costs) during his or her lifetime, excluding costs for their U.S.-born children. The figures from the NAS study are in 2012 dollars; converting them to 2018 dollars would raise them to $82,191. This estimate means that for every 100,000 illegal immigrants prevented from crossing illegally, it would save taxpayers $8.2 billion over the illegal immigrants’ lifetimes,” Camarota writes. That figure, $8.2 billion, seems a lot more costly than $5 billion. But surely, there can’t possible be 100,000 illegal immigrants crossing, right? “(Border Patrol data) implies that the number of successful crossers in 2018 was between 173,731 and 203,476, which we round to 170,000 and 200,000 in this report for convenience,” Camarota adds. Based on those numbers, that $5 billion wall would only have to stop about 3 to 4 percent of illegal immigrants in the next decade to pay for itself.
Rob Novoa which rock have you been under??  Citing on a February 2017 CIS analysis that used methods of the National Academies of Sciences, Engineering, and Medicine (NAS) Camarota begins diving into the numbers — and they are jarring. “(Based on the 2017 analysis) we estimate that each crosser creates a net cost of $74,722 (taxes paid minus costs) during his or her lifetime, excluding costs for their U.S.-born children. The figures from the NAS study are in 2012 dollars; converting them to 2018 dollars would raise them to $82,191. This estimate means that for every 100,000 illegal immigrants prevented from crossing illegally, it would save taxpayers $8.2 billion over the illegal immigrants’ lifetimes,” Camarota writes. That figure, $8.2 billion, seems a lot more costly than $5 billion. But surely, there can’t possible be 100,000 illegal immigrants crossing, right? “(Border Patrol data) implies that the number of successful crossers in 2018 was between 173,731 and 203,476, which we round to 170,000 and 200,000 in this report for convenience,” Camarota adds. Based on those numbers, that $5 billion wall would only have to stop about 3 to 4 percent of illegal immigrants in the next decade to pay for itself.


Nancy has a wall around her house!  We can blame the Democrat politicians for the shut down!!!   President Trump 2020!
Nancy has a wall around her house!  We can blame the Democrat politicians for the shut down!!!   President Trump 2020!
To those saying he isnt a fraud, are you so blind that you cant even see that this picture is photoshopped? He isnt even honest in photos
To those saying he isnt a fraud, are you so blind that you cant even see that this picture is photoshopped? He isnt even honest in photos
Please explain to us in detail how this presidency is a fraud.  Give us some evidence to back up your claim.
Rod Novoa  why because you said so?
Rod Novoa  why because you said so?
Rod Novoa why? Every President should be put under the same scrutiny then. Let’s see who could survive. Liking or not liking is not a reason to remove a President- chaos.
Rod Novoa why? Every President should be put under the same scrutiny then. Let’s see who could survive. Liking or not liking is not a reason to remove a President- chaos.
That Beto sign by your pic proves your a fuckin NIM ROD ! 🇨🇱
That Beto sign by your pic proves your a fuckin NIM ROD ! 🇨🇱
Democrats are not only promising free health care for Americans, they’re promising it for illegal immigrants too! Sure, it’s easy to sell free stuff as a policy to drive up your voter base, but in reality, nothing is free. Someone always has to pay for it.
Democrats are not only promising free health care for Americans, they’re promising it for illegal immigrants too! Sure, it’s easy to sell free stuff as a policy to drive up your voter base, but in reality, nothing is free. Someone always has to pay for it.
Paula Zuckerman Marshall Hillary didn't have anything to do with the uranium one deal. That was a republican house committee that approved it. Furthermore no,actual uranium could be shipped to Russia. I can't believe you'd rather spend time on pornhub instead of seeking the truth.
Paula Zuckerman Marshall Hillary didn't have anything to do with the uranium one deal. That was a republican house committee that approved it. Furthermore no,actual uranium could be shipped to Russia. I can't believe you'd rather spend time on pornhub instead of seeking the truth.
Rod Novoa only if your mom took that advice
Rod Novoa only if your mom took that advice
no sense replying to someone named "Rod" .  Enough said
no sense replying to someone named "Rod" .  Enough said
😂
And I bet business is really good right now because people have lots of money because our president that's right your President Trump is a bitch ass freaking president brought us back from the brink of Democrat spoil!!!!
And I bet business is really good right now because people have lots of money because our president that's right your President Trump is a bitch ass freaking president brought us back from the brink of Democrat spoil!!!!
What about all the people who voted him in?
Yvonne Webber we elected democrats to the house to stop his tyranny and impeach him. GET OVER IT!
Yvonne Webber we elected democrats to the house to stop his tyranny and impeach him. GET OVER IT!
Rod Novoa https://www.newsweek.com/russia-routed-millions-influence-clinton-uranium-deal-informant-tells-congress-801686
Rod Novoa https://www.newsweek.com/russia-routed-millions-influence-clinton-uranium-deal-informant-tells-congress-801686

BUt I take your point
Rod Novoa I guess you voted for deblasio. 6 more years little snowflake, Trump is the greatest president America has ever had.
Rod Novoa I guess you voted for deblasio. 6 more years little snowflake, Trump is the greatest president America has ever had.
Rod Novoa look at this guys Facebook and u can see what he/she is all about!
Rod Novoa look at this guys Facebook and u can see what he/she is all about!
Not true for donald though
Thats true when it comes to every single politicians who were lobbied ergo jews
Rod Novoa you must taking about OBUTTHEAD
Rod Novoa you must taking about OBUTTHEAD
Rod Novoa  we wish liberals kept their promises and moved to Canada but here we are and life isn’t fair.
Michael H. Witte won't have to he'll be serving 20 for fraud, 20 for election interference, and probably the death penalty for treason.
Michael H. Witte won't have to he'll be serving 20 for fraud, 20 for election interference, and probably the death penalty for treason.
Idiot stfu
Idiot stfu
Rod Novoa You are the fraud!  You are a betrayer!
Rod Novoa You are the fraud!  You are a betrayer!
Rod Novoa ~ President Trump is the Greatest President in American history. Evil Obama almost destroyed America ~ President Trump is having to clean up the wreck he made!!
Rod Novoa ~ President Trump is the Greatest President in American history. Evil Obama almost destroyed America ~ President Trump is having to clean up the wreck he made!!
Rod Novoa  your masculinity is what is the fraud here, "rod". How about grow a pair, remove tour head from your ass and act like an adult .
Rod Novoa  your masculinity is what is the fraud here, "rod". How about grow a pair, remove tour head from your ass and act like an adult .
Lol this dude still has a Beto filter on his picture, has to be a troll or at least a sore loser
Lol this dude still has a Beto filter on his picture, has to be a troll or at least a sore loser
The "Nation State" cannot be taken lightly. Main worry for Brexit and the British Government is "the falling apart of the United Kingdom". We already heard lots of Brits politicians talking about "the Scottish Nation".. "The Welsh..the Irish.. do not accept this".
Rod Novoa go back to slobbing on knobs you're just another snowflake we don't care what you say thank you don't like it leave the country
Rod Novoa Looks like you’re a fraud, from seeing your....work!! Cheap line of clothing lol!
●●●●●  ROD NOVOA  STOP TROLLING, GET A LIFE!  YOU'RE BLINDED BY YOUR HATE AGAINST OUR PRESIDENT!  YOU'RE SO JEALOUS OF HIS GREAT ACHIEVEMENTS THAT YOU CAN NEVER DO IN YOUR LIFETIME FOR AMERICA AND FOR ALL AMERICANS!    SHUT UP AND GO AWAY!  AMERICA DOESN'T NEED NEGATIVE PEOPLE (LIKE YOU) WHO NEVER ACKNOWLEDGE PRES. TRUMP'S GOOD WORKS FOR ALL AMERICANS  ---  (FREE OF CHARGE, NO PAY!  "GRATIS ET AMORE DEI" WHICH MEANS "BY THE GRACE AND AND LOVE OF GOD"!)!  BUT, YOUR FAVORITE CORRUPT OBAMA KEEPS ASKING TO RAISE HIS PENSION!  SHAME ON HIM! HE'S THE WORST PRESIDENT EVER IN U.S. HISTORY!  HIS LEGACY IS RIDICULOUSLY DISGUSTING!  INGRATE! ! !
Rod Novoa stick to fashion sweety.
Rod Novoa stick to fashion sweety.
You are beacon of light in a world of morons good for you
You are beacon of light in a world of morons good for you
Ok you want Trump gone have Pence see how you like that
Ok you want Trump gone have Pence see how you like that
Lorrie Tracy  Rod Novoa is one of those aoc douche bags that wants free free free while sitting on his ass doing nothing.
Rod Novoa You’re just stupid aren’t you?
Rod Novoa we the people null and void your democratic socialist party
Rod Novoa we the people null and void your democratic socialist party
Rod Novoa Hispanics for Trump here! Build the Wall!
Rod Novoa Hispanics for Trump here! Build the Wall!


Rod Novoa sounds like something a Venezuelan would say about 20 yrs ago!
Rod Novoa the only fraud is people like you. No love, just hate. No respect. What are you.
Rod Novoa the only fraud is people like you. No love, just hate. No respect. What are you.
So what your saying is your gay
So what your saying is your gay
What planet do you live on troll?
What planet do you live on troll?
Obama's legacy is welfare king. Foodstamp champion 🏆 Obama's programs failed! Solyndra scandal!! 4 billion dollar cash for clunkers failure😳
Obama's legacy is welfare king. Foodstamp champion 🏆 Obama's programs failed! Solyndra scandal!! 4 billion dollar cash for clunkers failure😳
Rod Novoa Freddie M WORRY about your own 🚢 hole 🕳....
Rod Novoa Freddie M WORRY about your own 🚢 hole 🕳....
Rod Novoa #liberalismisamentaldisorder
Rod Novoa #liberalismisamentaldisorder
you're not wrong
you're not wrong
Let me know how that turns out for ya.
Let me know how that turns out for ya.
Danielle Moore Venezuela is calling You!
Danielle Moore Venezuela is calling You!
Rod Novoa dude save your breath. You're going to need it to blow up your girlfriend later
says every un-American ever...
says every un-American ever...
You need to take yourself back where you came from and take your relatives with you.
You need to take yourself back where you came from and take your relatives with you.
Moron
Yes
Yes
Rod Novoa what an ass!!!
Rod Novoa what an ass!!!
No fraud. He's trying to enforce our Constitution and laws. Something the Democrats spit upon now!
No fraud. He's trying to enforce our Constitution and laws. Something the Democrats spit upon now!
Ruth Mosley. No Clinton would be your first Criminal.Oh that's right you snowflakes love them cigars don't you
Ruth Mosley. No Clinton would be your first Criminal.Oh that's right you snowflakes love them cigars don't you
Rod Novoa you are truly dumber than a box of rocks
Rod Novoa you are truly dumber than a box of rocks
Rod Novoa troll
Rod Novoa troll

Rod Novoa... really ??? On what ground , you dumbass !!
Rod Novoa you need a wam burger with your cry fries
Rod Novoa you need a wam burger with your cry fries
مزبوط يا رود رئيسك عباره عن كرتونة
مزبوط يا رود رئيسك عباره عن كرتونة
Ruth Mosley wwhhaaayyy. Greatest president ever
Ruth Mosley wwhhaaayyy. Greatest president ever
Rod Novoa really so if the Russians influenced the elections then how on Earth did Hillary win the Popular Vote.
Rod Novoa really so if the Russians influenced the elections then how on Earth did Hillary win the Popular Vote.
Laurie Dunco They are taking care of the illegals with our Social Security money. Years ago in Obama's first years they even sent me a letter telling me not to worry how they would support the illegals as they were using Social Security money. It made me sick.
Laurie Dunco They are taking care of the illegals with our Social Security money. Years ago in Obama's first years they even sent me a letter telling me not to worry how they would support the illegals as they were using Social Security money. It made me sick.
You cowardly communist sellouts need to be met in the streets in a real stand up fight. Let's see how smart and brave you are then. Most are sick of your cowardly use of a weaponized leftwing media, minorities, border security and hate for Trump voters and the constitution. You go against everything that I took an oath to defend, clown. Frankly, I think you're a low life POS and a complete waste of oxygen. You want socialism and communism so much, move out. Because you're going to remove the constitution and inject socialism here over my dead carcass.
You cowardly communist sellouts need to be met in the streets in a real stand up fight. Let's see how smart and brave you are then. Most are sick of your cowardly use of a weaponized leftwing media, minorities, border security and hate for Trump voters and the constitution. You go against everything that I took an oath to defend, clown. Frankly, I think you're a low life POS and a complete waste of oxygen. You want socialism and communism so much, move out. Because you're going to remove the constitution and inject socialism here over my dead carcass.
- Rod Novoa , sure, dream on. That’s the problem we got with people like you who cannot solve any national problem and cannot see they live in a country which is not socialist country such as Cuba or Russia rather live in a country which is called capitalism. If not Trump then who? Obama? Hillary? Come on be real and don’t insult Americans intelligent an IQ. Be grateful that you got someone like trump. Lists the things you don’t like about Trump so people can see your point of you. And please read what you’re about to post before posting it. Fraud !! You think Trump election was a fraud ??? And Congress, Senate, Justice Department, FBI, Homeland security, etc. so all these agencies saw what you saw and they didn’t do anything about it !! Aren’t you a genius!!
Rod Novoa your a CNN washed ANTI AMERICAN fool that trolls all darkness!
https://www.facebook.com/HostileSnowflakes/photos/a.586439028455494/630406827392047/?type=3&theater
https://www.facebook.com/HostileSnowflakes/photos/a.586439028455494/630406827392047/?type=3&theater
Rod Novoa people like you should be stripped of their citizenship and food and out of this country. That is if you have citizenship you're probably one of those New Yorkers that de Blasio takes a liking to
Rod Novoa people like you should be stripped of their citizenship and food and out of this country. That is if you have citizenship you're probably one of those New Yorkers that de Blasio takes a liking to
Donna Davis Takes one to know one.
You need to be executed for treason.
Rod Novoa remove President Trump...you’ll awaken rage against the left not seen in America since the civil war.  Be wary, leftist...be very very wary
Rod Novoa remove President Trump...you’ll awaken rage against the left not seen in America since the civil war.  Be wary, leftist...be very very wary
you wish Rod Nova
you wish Rod Nova
Danielle Moore The stupidity is strong here.
Danielle Moore The stupidity is strong here.
Rod Novoa.So what he did with north Korea the last 8 president's could not do. The only thing obama did was gay marriage that is one of the most disgusting laws that have ever passed.
Rod Novoa.So what he did with north Korea the last 8 president's could not do. The only thing obama did was gay marriage that is one of the most disgusting laws that have ever passed.
Trump hasnt done anything illegal or fraudulent at all. You're basically trying to overturn democracy.
Trump hasnt done anything illegal or fraudulent at all. You're basically trying to overturn democracy.
Keith Marshall: Voter fraud...
Keith Marshall: Voter fraud...
John Westley Clark We the Deplorable solemnly swear to be loyal to our President, Citizens, Country, And Constitution!  Move to Venezuela, betrayer!
John Westley Clark We the Deplorable solemnly swear to be loyal to our President, Citizens, Country, And Constitution!  Move to Venezuela, betrayer!
Danielle Moore You have your head up your butt. The uranium deal had the blessing of both Hillary and Obama and they both made money off of it.
Danielle Moore You have your head up your butt. The uranium deal had the blessing of both Hillary and Obama and they both made money off of it.
Laurie Dunco since you brought it up since trump refused to fund the ACA which actually benefits millions of Americans and works  and is cheaper than a wall that doesn't work, how can anyone claim this is for our safety. BTW illegal immigrants don't qualify for any social programs. Never have never will. That's some Jim Crowe era propaganda there.
Laurie Dunco since you brought it up since trump refused to fund the ACA which actually benefits millions of Americans and works  and is cheaper than a wall that doesn't work, how can anyone claim this is for our safety. BTW illegal immigrants don't qualify for any social programs. Never have never will. That's some Jim Crowe era propaganda there.


Laurie Dunco so you just sit there looking (and sounding) stupid as you make stuff up?  Lol
Rod Novoa grow up and quit whining
Rod Novoa HOW THE "F" WOULD YOU KNOW ??? YOU'RE A LOW LIFE DEMOCRAT, AFRAID OF LOSING YOUR WELFARE... GO SEEK OUT YOUR TRAITOR DADDY, OBAMA AND HIS TRANSGENDER WIFE
Rod Novoa HOW THE "F" WOULD YOU KNOW ??? YOU'RE A LOW LIFE DEMOCRAT, AFRAID OF LOSING YOUR WELFARE... GO SEEK OUT YOUR TRAITOR DADDY, OBAMA AND HIS TRANSGENDER WIFE
David Haseley well that's what republicans tried to do with Obama, so much so they were one of the least effective congresses in history!
David Haseley well that's what republicans tried to do with Obama, so much so they were one of the least effective congresses in history!
Derp! comment.  Now if we were talkin' about Barry Soetoro...
Derp! comment.  Now if we were talkin' about Barry Soetoro...
Clayton Plageman Amen to that!
Clayton Plageman Amen to that!
Timothy Kershner Do you really think saying  "Shitty piece of garbage" is an intelligent way to influence people's opinions?  This is why no one listens to you.
Timothy Kershner Do you really think saying  "Shitty piece of garbage" is an intelligent way to influence people's opinions?  This is why no one listens to you.
Rod Novoa you are so wrong.
Rod Novoa you are so wrong.
ASAP
ASAP
I'm just waiting for it to be legal to shoot people like you.
Another democrap from a democrap state, New York. Hey Rob lets send them all to your home.
Another democrap from a democrap state, New York. Hey Rob lets send them all to your home.
Rod Novoa what a stupid, ignorant, and uneducated post!!
Charles Knapp https://democrats-oversight.house.gov/news/press-releases/justice-department-contradicts-republican-claims-on-uranium-one
Charles Knapp https://democrats-oversight.house.gov/news/press-releases/justice-department-contradicts-republican-claims-on-uranium-one
Rod Novoa  stop watching CNN fool😂
Rod Novoa  stop watching CNN fool😂
Rod Novoa  Kinda like Obama ! At least trump is doing what he promised I can’t say the same for any other president.
Rod Novoa  Kinda like Obama ! At least trump is doing what he promised I can’t say the same for any other president.
I'll pay for your ticket so you can deport yourself to Cucklandia above us.
I'll pay for your ticket so you can deport yourself to Cucklandia above us.
Charles Knapp yet she hasn't had a single indictment. Could it be because that required the approval of a republican house committee?
Charles Knapp yet she hasn't had a single indictment. Could it be because that required the approval of a republican house committee?
Rod Novoa  you voted for Beto so that says everything we need to know about you.
Rod Novoa  you voted for Beto so that says everything we need to know about you.
Ruth Mosley not likely their Ruth! I’m sure the dictatorship of Obama forcing the American people to buy healthcare will go down in the history books though!
Ruth Mosley not likely their Ruth! I’m sure the dictatorship of Obama forcing the American people to buy healthcare will go down in the history books though!
Rod Novoa you’re a special kind of stupid.
Rod Novoa you’re a special kind of stupid.
Rod Novoa How is this a fraud?
Rod Novoa .... go troll Nacy and Chuck's  page
Rod Novoa .... go troll Nacy and Chuck's  page
TDS!!!
TDS!!!
Josh Gr PROOF?
Josh Gr PROOF?
Bahahahahah!. No. That's what Trump did to Obummer!. All his actions are gone!!!. Thank you, President Trump!. You're thee Greatest president ever!!. You were legally and legitimately voted into office!. Unlike Odumbass, as a non American, Muslim, who hated this great nation, we love that you love this great country!!
Bahahahahah!. No. That's what Trump did to Obummer!. All his actions are gone!!!. Thank you, President Trump!. You're thee Greatest president ever!!. You were legally and legitimately voted into office!. Unlike Odumbass, as a non American, Muslim, who hated this great nation, we love that you love this great country!!
Knock knock, you got it. ICE, time to go home.
Knock knock, you got it. ICE, time to go home.
John Howard exactly President Trump should just push through the wall and sign an executive order that fines everyone who didn't support the wall, just like Obama fined everyone who didn't sign up for his  unaffordable Care act that he shoved down our throat after shutting down the government for 17 days.
John Howard exactly President Trump should just push through the wall and sign an executive order that fines everyone who didn't support the wall, just like Obama fined everyone who didn't sign up for his  unaffordable Care act that he shoved down our throat after shutting down the government for 17 days.
Rod Novoa dream on, retard.
Rod Novoa dream on, retard.
Rod Novoa,Really did you not feel that way when Obama was in office giving all the tax payers money to overseas?
David Dennison
Rod Novoa, first thing for someone when he gets somewhere, like you who gets in USA, is to know how to behave, how to be grateful because USA accepted you, your mom and dad... Don't be so rude to someone who believes different. By mocking Trumps presiding, you're mocking more than half of Americans who supports him.
Rod Novoa, first thing for someone when he gets somewhere, like you who gets in USA, is to know how to behave, how to be grateful because USA accepted you, your mom and dad... Don't be so rude to someone who believes different. By mocking Trumps presiding, you're mocking more than half of Americans who supports him.
Rod Novoa 🖕🏻
Rod Novoa 🖕🏻
Rod Novoa your mom is null and void.
Rod Novoa your mom is null and void.
Darlene Donnelly yes it's so funny when our government is being destroy by an insolent man child I can't stop laughing in the faces of my furloughed friends. 🙄
Darlene Donnelly yes it's so funny when our government is being destroy by an insolent man child I can't stop laughing in the faces of my furloughed friends. 🙄
Yeah...you elected MORE CORRUPT DEMOCRATS....THE PARTY THAT KILLED KENNEDY. .BECAUSE HE WAS GIVING THE BLACKS TOO MANY RIGHTS. ..THE DEMOCRAT PARTY CREATED THE KKK TO INTIMIDATE BLACKS INTO VOTING FOR DEMOCRATS. .UNDER THE FEAR OF DEATH, IF THEY DIDN'T.....WHY DO THEY STILL FUND AND SUPPORT THE. KKK TO THIS DAY ??....BECAUSE THEY DID SUCH A GREAT JOB ON THE BLACKS.. JUST THINK WHAT THEY CAN DO FOR THE DEMS, WITH WHITES, HISPANICS,.ETC....DEMOCRATS ARE ALL RACISTS
Yeah...you elected MORE CORRUPT DEMOCRATS....THE PARTY THAT KILLED KENNEDY. .BECAUSE HE WAS GIVING THE BLACKS TOO MANY RIGHTS. ..THE DEMOCRAT PARTY CREATED THE KKK TO INTIMIDATE BLACKS INTO VOTING FOR DEMOCRATS. .UNDER THE FEAR OF DEATH, IF THEY DIDN'T.....WHY DO THEY STILL FUND AND SUPPORT THE. KKK TO THIS DAY ??....BECAUSE THEY DID SUCH A GREAT JOB ON THE BLACKS.. JUST THINK WHAT THEY CAN DO FOR THE DEMS, WITH WHITES, HISPANICS,.ETC....DEMOCRATS ARE ALL RACISTS
Sean P. Flynn
Sean P. Flynn
Rod Novoa you need to troll one of your liberal pages..you are completely outnumbered and obviously a snowflake ..
Rod Novoa you need to troll one of your liberal pages..you are completely outnumbered and obviously a snowflake ..
Rod Novoa DUMB@$$ Keep drinking the kool-aid... TROLL.. sissy boy
Rod Novoa  people voted him in just like every other President!
Rod Novoa  people voted him in just like every other President!
Why are you so fucking retarded? He was voted into office by the people, dumbass.
Why are you so fucking retarded? He was voted into office by the people, dumbass.
He needs to end your welfare, your kind is a special kind of stupid.
He needs to end your welfare, your kind is a special kind of stupid.
Rod Novoa you are a true fool. You do understand that would destabilize the country  both economically and the government would crumble. Become educated before opening you mouth.
Rod Novoa you are a true fool. You do understand that would destabilize the country  both economically and the government would crumble. Become educated before opening you mouth.
So we should put in an ideot like killery in there right u r as dumb as they come don't like it here leave I will pack for u I no ur too stupid to pack ur own bags
So we should put in an ideot like killery in there right u r as dumb as they come don't like it here leave I will pack for u I no ur too stupid to pack ur own bags


Emily Meysembourg all past presidents have completed more of their campaign promises than Trump who has only succeeded at tax cuts for the rich and sending our economy spiraling into a recession.
Emily Meysembourg all past presidents have completed more of their campaign promises than Trump who has only succeeded at tax cuts for the rich and sending our economy spiraling into a recession.
Rod Novoa and I’m assuming you got you information from democrat leaders or watching CNN because it’s obvious trump is the best thing for this country in 70 yrs numbers don’t lie best economy in 50 years lowest unemployment in 40 yrs more African Americans working in history more Hispanics working in history highest wages for women in history set the record high stock market in HISTORY! Created more jobs in 2 yrs then obama did in 8 in fact created more jobs than the last 3 presidents have! But still he is the worst president ever in the eyes of socialist democrats!! So I’m assuming your information has come in the form of manipulation from your democrat leaders along with CNN (FAKENEWS)! It’s ok to think for yourself! And if you ever come across a little common sense please don’t let it get away from you shame you can’t buy some!! Good luck with your recovery
Rod Novoa and I’m assuming you got you information from democrat leaders or watching CNN because it’s obvious trump is the best thing for this country in 70 yrs numbers don’t lie best economy in 50 years lowest unemployment in 40 yrs more African Americans working in history more Hispanics working in history highest wages for women in history set the record high stock market in HISTORY! Created more jobs in 2 yrs then obama did in 8 in fact created more jobs than the last 3 presidents have! But still he is the worst president ever in the eyes of socialist democrats!! So I’m assuming your information has come in the form of manipulation from your democrat leaders along with CNN (FAKENEWS)! It’s ok to think for yourself! And if you ever come across a little common sense please don’t let it get away from you shame you can’t buy some!! Good luck with your recovery
null and void our thriving economy, bring back Isis, send our vets from Korean war back, and I guess kim jong un should fire missles again , null and void the new trade deal , I could go on but you get the point. you may dislike our GREAT PRESIDENT, but please do not make pathetic and ignorant remarks, but if you truly feel this way maybe you should leave this GREAT COUNTRY.
Rod Novoa give back your tax money then move down to the boarder and leave your cars your front door your safe all unlocked and put up a welcome sign and before you go to bed you pray to God that your family is in one piece in the morning
Rod Novoa give back your tax money then move down to the boarder and leave your cars your front door your safe all unlocked and put up a welcome sign and before you go to bed you pray to God that your family is in one piece in the morning
Rod Novoa Look in the Mirror buddy and take a look at the bona fife fraud.
Rod Novoa Look in the Mirror buddy and take a look at the bona fife fraud.
Danielle Moore Try again the contract is PUBLIC Information. Only DUMBOCRATS like you believe lies.
Danielle Moore Try again the contract is PUBLIC Information. Only DUMBOCRATS like you believe lies.
Danielle Moore
Danielle Moore
Dodd Gross that would be unconstitutional and fully illegal and the actions of a tyrant for which the constitution was explicitly written. McConnell needs to hold the vote that has the 2/3 support to over rule the whiny celebrity
Dodd Gross that would be unconstitutional and fully illegal and the actions of a tyrant for which the constitution was explicitly written. McConnell needs to hold the vote that has the 2/3 support to over rule the whiny celebrity
Danielle Moore why don’t you write Pelosi and Shunner?? They are destroying this nation. As far as your friends. My brother is in the CC..so stop crying about your furlough friends..
Danielle Moore why don’t you write Pelosi and Shunner?? They are destroying this nation. As far as your friends. My brother is in the CC..so stop crying about your furlough friends..
Adam Kowalski It can’t be done!  You can’t indite a sitting President!  You can’t just destroy laws passed by Congress, unless they are replaced with new laws passed by Congress!  You can’t even impeach Him in The House with out an impeachable offense, and we have The Senate!
Adam Kowalski It can’t be done!  You can’t indite a sitting President!  You can’t just destroy laws passed by Congress, unless they are replaced with new laws passed by Congress!  You can’t even impeach Him in The House with out an impeachable offense, and we have The Senate!
Paul Nix So agree!
Paul Nix So agree!
Lois Stawitcke Obama actually had no part of the approval process.  The President has an ability to rubber stamp a no on the deal, but the approval for it comes from the CFIUS.
Lois Stawitcke Obama actually had no part of the approval process.  The President has an ability to rubber stamp a no on the deal, but the approval for it comes from the CFIUS.
Rod Novoa just like your mama huh rod
Bring it on honey !! Don't forget to bring your pitchfork to the gun fight...
Bring it on honey !! Don't forget to bring your pitchfork to the gun fight...
Funny half the country thought the same of the last uneducated clown of a president Barry Obama.
Funny half the country thought the same of the last uneducated clown of a president Barry Obama.
Rod Novoa WHY?
Rod Novoa WHY?
Rod Novoa  Youurrrrrre an idiot. Duh Oh yeah, and a hater. Must be tiring to wake up every day just looking for something to complain about.
Rod Novoa  Youurrrrrre an idiot. Duh Oh yeah, and a hater. Must be tiring to wake up every day just looking for something to complain about.
Rod Novoa  you poor little snowflake I have a safe room you  can use it's filled with unicorns and rainbows I also have lots of coloring books with big crayons and your favorite stickers your  welcome to use it while your great PRESIDENT runs the country the way it should be run. Please respond with a comment if you NEED to use the room
Rod Novoa  you poor little snowflake I have a safe room you  can use it's filled with unicorns and rainbows I also have lots of coloring books with big crayons and your favorite stickers your  welcome to use it while your great PRESIDENT runs the country the way it should be run. Please respond with a comment if you NEED to use the room
Danielle Moore  wow your delusional
Danielle Moore  wow your delusional
Rod Novoa your a fraud and a moron. If you’re against border security then you are a commie  AssHat
Rod Novoa your a fraud and a moron. If you’re against border security then you are a commie  AssHat
Worried the rest of you family won't be able to come over? Yeah thats a hard thought to think about 😆
Worried the rest of you family won't be able to come over? Yeah thats a hard thought to think about 😆
Trump’s “presidency” is a fraud. He needs to be removed from office and all of his actions declared null and void. He’s s disgrace to human kind.
Trump’s “presidency” is a fraud. He needs to be removed from office and all of his actions declared null and void. He’s s disgrace to human kind.


Sheldon Satchel fake account
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
https://www.facebook.com/114517875225866/posts/2982796391731319/
Sharon Taylor because hes not ignorant and is smart enough to break from the social stigma of race affiliated with political parties
Sharon Taylor because hes not ignorant and is smart enough to break from the social stigma of race affiliated with political parties
Much respect, you're a smart man I'm also voting once again for Trump.
Much respect, you're a smart man I'm also voting once again for Trump.
I am!! Trump 2020!
I am!! Trump 2020!
Sheldon Satchel Why!
Sheldon Satchel Why!
Sheldon Satchel   God Bless
Sheldon Satchel   God Bless
Sheldon..the Lord was cricified too..!
I'm voting Trump loud and proud
I'm voting Trump loud and proud
Sheldon Satchel smart man it's a shame that our country still divides people by skin  Democrats are the party of depression
Sheldon Satchel smart man it's a shame that our country still divides people by skin  Democrats are the party of depression
Nancy D Heffron you're the fake
Nancy D Heffron you're the fake
Folks, based on the misspelled and grammatically incorrect posts on Sheldon's page, I'm going to have to "out" him: He's actually one of donald's fake profiles.
Folks, based on the misspelled and grammatically incorrect posts on Sheldon's page, I'm going to have to "out" him: He's actually one of donald's fake profiles.
Sheldon Satchel the only name you should have is the name you were born with...followed by "sir", and a firm handshake.
Sheldon Satchel the only name you should have is the name you were born with...followed by "sir", and a firm handshake.
Team maga
Team maga
I  am Trump2020
I  am Trump2020
It's sad that race always has to be brought into this,  a President should be elected on his abilities, I don't agree with everything he says, but I respect the position,  and he has made major changes even though he has been attacked from every side. When will people realize that a divided society will not stand, we are destroying ourselves from within,  this has to stop, we are a joke fighting between ourselves.  We must become the UNITED STATES OF AMERICA again. Maybe you can be a voice Sheldon Satchel! #WAKEUPAMERICA #DIVIDEDWEFALL #BUILDTHEWALL
It's sad that race always has to be brought into this,  a President should be elected on his abilities, I don't agree with everything he says, but I respect the position,  and he has made major changes even though he has been attacked from every side. When will people realize that a divided society will not stand, we are destroying ourselves from within,  this has to stop, we are a joke fighting between ourselves.  We must become the UNITED STATES OF AMERICA again. Maybe you can be a voice Sheldon Satchel! #WAKEUPAMERICA #DIVIDEDWEFALL #BUILDTHEWALL
All I see is a fellow American who loves his country and votes for the man who will make it great again.
All I see is a fellow American who loves his country and votes for the man who will make it great again.
All americans. Thank you Sheldon. Trump is the President America needs to keep America safe and great!
Sheldon Satchel right on! MAGA!🙏🇺🇸💪
Sheldon Satchel right on! MAGA!🙏🇺🇸💪
Sheldon Satchel I'll be right behind you. Trump is doing a GREAT job..MAGA!!!!! I'm a PROUD DEPLORABLE!
Sheldon Satchel I'll be right behind you. Trump is doing a GREAT job..MAGA!!!!! I'm a PROUD DEPLORABLE!
Laurette Reiff how many times did u edit you're dumb post.  girl please hypocrite
Linda L Hopkins and you have a picture of MLK as a mockery to everything he stands for... take your bullshit elsewhere
Linda L Hopkins and you have a picture of MLK as a mockery to everything he stands for... take your bullshit elsewhere
Sheldon Satchel 45's supporters are one of the following... 1. To arrogant to admit their mistake. 2. Too embarrassed to admit their mistake. 3. Too stupid to know they made a mistake! MAGA... Moscow's Asset Governs America
Sheldon Satchel 45's supporters are one of the following... 1. To arrogant to admit their mistake. 2. Too embarrassed to admit their mistake. 3. Too stupid to know they made a mistake! MAGA... Moscow's Asset Governs America
Sheldon Satchel Me
Sheldon Satchel Me
Sheldon Satchel how about I call you a BOSS MAN. MAGA.COOL MAN A PATRIOT!!!
Sheldon Satchel how about I call you a BOSS MAN. MAGA.COOL MAN A PATRIOT!!!
Sarah Elizabeth what a bit@#!
Sarah Elizabeth what a bit@#!
Sheldon Satchel stay strong Sheldon...nobody gets to define you!!
Jewell Jenkins only if you lead by example
Jewell Jenkins only if you lead by example
not at all, Linda...45 supporters are in the higher bracket of intelligence..they voted for a WINNER...don't have to tell you what bracket you fall into..!
not at all, Linda...45 supporters are in the higher bracket of intelligence..they voted for a WINNER...don't have to tell you what bracket you fall into..!
Sheldon Satchel 👍🏻👍🏻👌🏻USA first
Sheldon Satchel 👍🏻👍🏻👌🏻USA first
Nancy D Heffron you wish
Nancy D Heffron you wish
I am with you.
I am with you.
Sheldon Satchel Crack is wack uncle tom 😉
Sheldon Satchel Unfortunately you can't vote for a criminal who got kicked out the White House in 2020.
Sheldon Satchel Unfortunately you can't vote for a criminal who got kicked out the White House in 2020.
Shelby Canada, they are being indoctrinated just like the Mexicans. .build up Democrats then, sabotage all into Socialism. ..Wake up USA
Shelby Canada, they are being indoctrinated just like the Mexicans. .build up Democrats then, sabotage all into Socialism. ..Wake up USA
Sheldon Satchel bot alert
Sheldon Satchel bot alert
Sheldon Satchel I am!!!👏👏
Sheldon Satchel I am!!!👏👏
Sheldon Satchel don't drink and type!
Sheldon Satchel don't drink and type!
Sheldon Satchel, paterotism has no color bounds. .I'm proud you are a true paterot. .
Sheldon Satchel, paterotism has no color bounds. .I'm proud you are a true paterot. .
Sheldon Satchel I assume you don't mean yourself or the nation any good
Nav Moh stay in your house dawg
Nav Moh stay in your house dawg
Sheldon Satchel fake profile full of grammatical errors.
Sheldon Satchel fake profile full of grammatical errors.
Linda L Hopkins having a president that really is doing what he campaigned on is a mistake?   289 accomplishments in just 20 months for his voters, he must be a TRADER...  with a statement like yours, I'm willing to bet money, you couldn't name two of his completed campaign promises...    HINT: even the WP has admitted this... https://www.washingtonpost.com/opinions/trump-could-be-the-most-honest-president-in-modern-history/2018/10/11/67aefc5a-cd76-11e8-a3e6-44daa3d35ede_story.html
Linda L Hopkins having a president that really is doing what he campaigned on is a mistake?   289 accomplishments in just 20 months for his voters, he must be a TRADER...  with a statement like yours, I'm willing to bet money, you couldn't name two of his completed campaign promises...    HINT: even the WP has admitted this... https://www.washingtonpost.com/opinions/trump-could-be-the-most-honest-president-in-modern-history/2018/10/11/67aefc5a-cd76-11e8-a3e6-44daa3d35ede_story.html
I believe in the power of ‘no’ 😜
I believe in the power of ‘no’ 😜
Sheldon Satchel
Sheldon Satchel
43 year old white guy from southwestern Missouri and I'll stand with ya all day every day sir
43 year old white guy from southwestern Missouri and I'll stand with ya all day every day sir
Sheldon why can't Blacks  see that The Democrats are  just using them for Votes and see that History shows Blacks were Slaves to The Democratic Party??? Democrats haven't helped The Black Community! Plus The KKK was  Created by The Democratic Party. From this day Blacks are still Slaves in Islam and The Democratic Party...
Sheldon why can't Blacks  see that The Democrats are  just using them for Votes and see that History shows Blacks were Slaves to The Democratic Party??? Democrats haven't helped The Black Community! Plus The KKK was  Created by The Democratic Party. From this day Blacks are still Slaves in Islam and The Democratic Party...
True American sure their with you I'm with voting for president trump 2020 America great....
I am with you let's make American great again
I am with you let's make American great again
https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/clemson-invite-michelin-starred-restaurant_us_5c405e68e4b027c3bbbe566b
Linda L Hopkins and love your coexist photo, but can we all coexist when your photo only shows two genders?  😳😂
Linda L Hopkins and love your coexist photo, but can we all coexist when your photo only shows two genders?  😳😂
Proud of you for standing your ground  A true patriot! #FINISHtheWall
Proud of you for standing your ground  A true patriot! #FINISHtheWall
Sarah Elizabeth might be going to Facebook jail today lol
Sarah Elizabeth might be going to Facebook jail today lol
Sheldon Satchel...The  DEMS  are pissed because you have as mind of your own. They wanted   to keep you on their Plantation. Just like  they want to OWN the ILLEGALS with their  promises  of FREE stuff. You saw through their BS and they will call you every name in the book. They always   have played the race card  or gender card. Good to see we have a smart one like you.
Sheldon Satchel...The  DEMS  are pissed because you have as mind of your own. They wanted   to keep you on their Plantation. Just like  they want to OWN the ILLEGALS with their  promises  of FREE stuff. You saw through their BS and they will call you every name in the book. They always   have played the race card  or gender card. Good to see we have a smart one like you.
See look at how The Libtards treat Blacks who don't agree with them. There Proof that they hate on Blacks who don't agree with them!
I found this post from a California resident giving his version of what's happening in CA.. "It doesn't matter what color we vote, The Dems have rigged the elections in California.. An illegal gets a driver's license and is automatically registered to vote.. He then gives his absentee ballot to a ballot Harvester Who votes blue and turns in the ballot..Voter ID is not required in California.."
I found this post from a California resident giving his version of what's happening in CA.. "It doesn't matter what color we vote, The Dems have rigged the elections in California.. An illegal gets a driver's license and is automatically registered to vote.. He then gives his absentee ballot to a ballot Harvester Who votes blue and turns in the ballot..Voter ID is not required in California.."
Sheldon Satchel You’re a disgrace to your race
Sheldon Satchel You’re a disgrace to your race
Sharon Taylor, “why wouldn’t” African Americans vote for Trump should be the actual question! He’s done more for them than the democrat party ever has or ever will.
Sharon Taylor, “why wouldn’t” African Americans vote for Trump should be the actual question! He’s done more for them than the democrat party ever has or ever will.
Sheldon Satchel 🙋‍♀️
Sheldon Satchel 🙋‍♀️
Sheldon Satchel, I applaud you for your vote. Just remember, those that called you every name in the book, must be the haters themselves. Bless you.
Sheldon Satchel, I applaud you for your vote. Just remember, those that called you every name in the book, must be the haters themselves. Bless you.
Sheldon Satchel thank you!!!
Sheldon Satchel thank you!!!
God bless you Sir and Welcome to the #TrumpTrain
God bless you Sir and Welcome to the #TrumpTrain
hey Shelly..... если вы хотите, чтобы ваша страница выглядела реальной, вам нужно больше фотографий, таких как семейные или жизненные события и более поздние публикации ...
hey Shelly..... если вы хотите, чтобы ваша страница выглядела реальной, вам нужно больше фотографий, таких как семейные или жизненные события и более поздние публикации ...
Sheldon Satchel  I don't see color brother only intelligence 😉
Sheldon Satchel you a fool to vote for him
Sheldon Satchel 👍
Sheldon Satchel 👍
Jewell Jenkins do the country a favor and leave. Move somewhere far away.
Jewell Jenkins do the country a favor and leave. Move somewhere far away.
Sheldon Satchel blacks for whites you dumb as hell
Sheldon Satchel me
Sheldon Satchel  Stupid is as stupid does.
Sheldon Satchel  Stupid is as stupid does.
Sheldon Satchel  Not everybody wants to leave the plantation.
Sheldon Satchel yes We will good for you, you are America  through and through any real American wants the country run right. God bless you and yours.
Sheldon Satchel yes We will good for you, you are America  through and through any real American wants the country run right. God bless you and yours.


Ron Racheletta why, because he voted for the best person possible
Boris Nikolayev Boris from Moscow! How are Trumps prostitutes doing!🙉🇺🇸
Boris Nikolayev Boris from Moscow! How are Trumps prostitutes doing!🙉🇺🇸
Moise Luc stfu
Sheldon Satchel I’m with you! MAGA
Sheldon Satchel I’m with you! MAGA
Thank you sir,and God bless, we know ,stand strong
Thank you sir,and God bless, we know ,stand strong
Ron Liptack GROW UP
Sarah Elizabeth Cracker
Ok I went to your Facebook page to see of you are a fake account and in one post you said this, "when a person wants something be mindful they would say anything to get what you have. Listen to your instincts instead of their words". That's what you said and you still voted for Trump
Ok I went to your Facebook page to see of you are a fake account and in one post you said this, "when a person wants something be mindful they would say anything to get what you have. Listen to your instincts instead of their words". That's what you said and you still voted for Trump
Illegals are the  Dems new black voter's.  They want need Black voters once the LIBS give Illegals free healthcare, housing, education.
Illegals are the  Dems new black voter's.  They want need Black voters once the LIBS give Illegals free healthcare, housing, education.
Veronica James Just remember, every time you point a finger at someone, 4 more are pointing back at you!
Veronica James Just remember, every time you point a finger at someone, 4 more are pointing back at you!
Rob W Itherspoon ,praying for you all
Sheldon Satchel mental retardation sees no color
Laurette Reiff looney
People are stupid.
Sheldon Satchel really? I wonder why 🤔
Sheldon Satchel really? I wonder why 🤔
Max Salgado grow up
Bill Ciszkowski ,and you've got no room to talk
Bill Ciszkowski ,and you've got no room to talk
Idiot.
Sheldon Satchel sorry for your loss. Of brains
Sheldon Satchel sorry for your loss. Of brains
Dear god no, why?
Dear god no, why?
Bill Ciszkowski why is that, because you say so, because he wants what's best for ALL AMERICANS, the way the looney left is going he'll win again in 2020, stand strong Mr President, REAL AMERICANS are behind you
Bill Ciszkowski why is that, because you say so, because he wants what's best for ALL AMERICANS, the way the looney left is going he'll win again in 2020, stand strong Mr President, REAL AMERICANS are behind you
Dean Gabos .... and this coming from Gabos, a recent Honduran refugee!🤣🤣🤣
Wrong is easy.  Doing the right thing is hard.  I admire your strength.
Wrong is easy.  Doing the right thing is hard.  I admire your strength.
Sheldon Satchel TRUMP2020
Sheldon Satchel TRUMP2020
Your not black and I'm not white, we are Americans.
Your not black and I'm not white, we are Americans.
Patsy Cramer and I pray to Jesus Christ  my Lord to take him to Heaven during his sleep! Amen
Sheldon Satchel... thank you...
Sheldon Satchel African Americans living in poverty with no jobs, So what do we have to lose,  slaves 400 years with no reparations and you Europeans are reaping the benefits from my ancestors.... if someone attack the u.s, why should us black people living poverty with no jobs help you Europeans\ white Americans  that's reaping the benefits from my ancestors... I realize when any other country threatens the US they go directly for Europeans the white man, no other nationality only the Europeans white man, why is this?
Sharon Taylor why not?
Bill Ciszkowski You're a disgrace, full stop!!
Bill Ciszkowski You're a disgrace, full stop!!
Pam Sanders Jackson Let’s all pray to Jesus Christ that HE will take Trump to Heaven during his sleep! MAGA 🇺🇸
Sheldon Satchel  many ppl are with you !
Sheldon Satchel  many ppl are with you !
Nancy D Heffron,  Just bc they don't agree with you doesn't make them Fake!
Nancy D Heffron,  Just bc they don't agree with you doesn't make them Fake!
#Trump2020 #MAGA #KAG
#Trump2020 #MAGA #KAG

What ever happen  to Love Trump Hates  from The Left... Hypocrites!  There's NOTHING but  Hate coming from The Left.
What ever happen  to Love Trump Hates  from The Left... Hypocrites!  There's NOTHING but  Hate coming from The Left.
Shelby Canada  Who does the KKK support right now
Bill Ciszkowski dude you are white. You make me sick moron.
https://www.facebook.com/ScottDworkin/photos/a.10155044587041465/10156880948981465/?type=3&theater
https://www.facebook.com/ScottDworkin/photos/a.10155044587041465/10156880948981465/?type=3&theater
Nick Brizzi  Until the police show up
Chris Crisis Campbell the DEMOCRAP LIBERALS that's WHO!!!!!!!!
Chris Crisis Campbell the DEMOCRAP LIBERALS that's WHO!!!!!!!!
Mary Moogk your a very ugly person, and so is your family.
Sheldon Satchel intelligent man instead of the mental retardation I see in the left
Sheldon Satchel intelligent man instead of the mental retardation I see in the left
Sheldon Satchel thanks for standing in the face of adversity for what you believe in
Sheldon Satchel thanks for standing in the face of adversity for what you believe in
Gary Seebold how do you know so much about blacks?
Sheldon Satchel a high five for you and there are many people that are right there with you. President Trump is a blessing, just what America needed after having to deal with political jerks that are not defending our country but instead have been helping the people that are being fought by our soldiers and their being killed by equipment being left for the enemy to use to against America. And the Dumocrats keep putting people into position jobs to fight the only person that has our best interest at heart. Stop using our tax payers money to finance illegals, it's not okay with us, what the hell is wrong with you idiots. We're tired of what is taking place so we have to fight for our rights because we sure can't count on the governors that are getting into offices that I know I for one would never have voted for, you started this now we citizens with sense will have to take you on morons.
Me me me!!
Nancy D Heffron fake American
Veronica James  you are by far an idiot.
Veronica James  you are by far an idiot.
Sheldon Satchel who are you? who or whatever you are, you certainly have fooled a lot of white people but you haven’t fooled black Americans! I hope Russia is paying you well Pal!
Sheldon Satchel who are you? who or whatever you are, you certainly have fooled a lot of white people but you haven’t fooled black Americans! I hope Russia is paying you well Pal!
Elle Richelle it is cause he is smart. Liberals don't think for themselves 😂😂
Elle Richelle it is cause he is smart. Liberals don't think for themselves 😂😂
Jeff Ersland can't say much for your looks either. Eeeeewwwww
Jeff Ersland can't say much for your looks either. Eeeeewwwww
Sheldon Satchel thank you for speaking out. Dr Ben Carson is such a great example of “we are where we put ourselves.”  He was raised in poverty but became a brain surgeon.
Sheldon Satchel thank you for speaking out. Dr Ben Carson is such a great example of “we are where we put ourselves.”  He was raised in poverty but became a brain surgeon.
Chris Crisis Campbell as if trump can control who does and doesn't support him. The fact that you can't see through the manipulation tells me you really shouldn't even have the right to an opinion much less a vote.
Nancy D Heffron  nust because you’re a dumb white woman that disagrees with him does  not make him a fake account
Nancy D Heffron  nust because you’re a dumb white woman that disagrees with him does  not make him a fake account
Sheldon Satchel I’m with you!!!
Sheldon Satchel I’m with you!!!
Moise Luc I'm pretty sure the same would apply to Hilary or any democratic leader attempting to persuade you to vote for them, just so they get into power and can continue to manipulate the foolish.
Moise Luc I'm pretty sure the same would apply to Hilary or any democratic leader attempting to persuade you to vote for them, just so they get into power and can continue to manipulate the foolish.
Sheldon Satchel God bless you sir!
Nancy D Heffron I knew one you libtards would say that...you guys never disappoint!!😃
John Gardner Omg don't you Dems have other talking points. You definitely have RDS.  Boring as hell.
John Gardner Omg don't you Dems have other talking points. You definitely have RDS.  Boring as hell.
Sean McDonough thank you for alerting us to your status .. we now know not to take you seriously
Ron Liptack oh that’s cute! Do you fee like a real man now? Lol.
Sheldon Satchel I have the utmost respect for you and Candace Owen amongst others.  Being a leader and not a sheep follower is not easy.  God bless you
Sheldon Satchel I have the utmost respect for you and Candace Owen amongst others.  Being a leader and not a sheep follower is not easy.  God bless you
Nick Birkin stupid limey
Sharon Taylor why not? Obama sucked and left a bad taste in everyone’s mouth!
Sharon Taylor why not? Obama sucked and left a bad taste in everyone’s mouth!
Sheldon Satchel r u on meth....?
